18158473
Alcan
Rio Tinto Alcan Canada Ltd. is a Canadian mining company and aluminum manufacturer. It was founded in 1902 as the Northern Aluminum Company, Ltd, renamed Aluminum Company of Canada, Ltd. in 1925, and Alcan Aluminum Ltd. in 1966. It took the name Alcan Inc. in 2001. During that time, it grew to become one of the worlds largest aluminum manufacturers. Alcan was purchased by European multinational Rio Tinto for $38 billion in 2007, becoming Rio Tinto Alcan Inc. in 2008. It is headquartered in Montreal, Canada. History The Northern Aluminium Company Ltd. was founded in 1902 as part of the Pittsburgh Reduction Company. In 1913, the company opened a kitchen utensil production plant and foundry in Toronto. It opened a mill in the plant a few years later.During the World War (1914-18), aluminium production shot to 131,000 tonnes from 69,000.(http://www.aac.aluminium.qc.ca/e403.html#date_1)In 1925, the company was renamed the Aluminum Company of Canada. The Aluminum Company of Canada was responsible for rapid development in Arvida, today a part of the city of Saguenay in Quebec, by contributing to the construction of major ports and railway facilities. It began production at its sheet rolling and extrusion facility in Ontario, Canada in 1940.(http://www.aac.aluminium.qc.ca/e403.html#date_2)In 1945, the Aluminium Company of Canada is officially registered under the trade name Alcan.(http://www.aac.aluminium.qc.ca/e403.html#date_4) In 1951, it initiated a $500-million project in British Columbia, the largest public-private partnership ever introduced in Canada at the time.(http://www.aac.aluminium.qc.ca/e403.html#date_5)Between 1998 and 2001, the Saguenay-Lac-Saint-Jean became the largest construction site in North America, as Alcan undertook a $3-billion construction project in Alma with a yearly production capacity of 400,000 metric tonnes. In 2000, Alcan acquired ALgroup (Alusuisse Group Ltd.), merging the companies to become Alcan, Inc. in 2001. Alcan became the second biggest primary aluminium production company. It then became the worlds largest aluminium manufacturer in 2004 after acquiring the Pechiney Group, the 4th player in worldwide production and fabrication of aluminium and the number 3 in packaging.(http://www.aac.aluminium.qc.ca/e403.html#date_7)In 2007, Rio Tinto acquired Alcan Inc., after a US$38 billion deal. Rio Tinto became the worlds leading aluminum producer. Rio Tinto quickly announced its intention to sell off the Engineered Products and Packaging business groups.6 Alcan Inc. was amalgamated with Rio Tinto Canada Holding Inc. and renamed Tinto Alcan Inc. in 2008.(http://www.riotinto.com/media/18435_media_releases_6859.asp)In 2010, Alcan Packaging was sold to Amcor.(http://www.packagingdigest.com/article/447025-Amcor_completes_acquisition_of_Alcan_Packaging.php)In 2011, Rio Tinto received a binding offer from Apollo and FSI to acquire 51% and 10% respectively of Alcan Engineered Products (excluding Cable). Rio Tinto retains 39%.References(External links* Rio Tinto official website* Rio Tinto Alcanfr:Alcan
18183106
United_Nations_Institute_for_Namibia
The United Nations Institute for Namibia (UNIN) was an educational body set up by the Nations Council for Namibia from 1976-1990.(Dissolution of the United Nations Council for Namibia Resolution 44/243 of the United Nations) Based in Zambias capital of Lusaka, UNIN was the brainchild of Nations Commissioner for Namibia MacBride, the proposal creating UNIN was adopted by the Nations General Assembly in December 1974.(A Future University of Namibia?: The Role of the United Nations Institute for Namibia, by Christian M. Rogerson, 1980, University Press) The forerunner to the current of Namibia, UNIN sought to educate Namibians for roles in an independent Republic of Namibia.(BackgroundAs states across Africa achieved independence, Namibia remained illegally ruled by Apartheid Africa. Treated as a fifth province, Namibia did not have its own tertiary educational system. Bantu Education, or purposely inferior education for Black Namibians, was the norm in Namibia for Black Namibians. The United Nations Council for Namibia under Sen MacBride put forth a plan in February 1974 for a tertiary educational institution for Namibia in Africa, preferably Zambia.( On 26 August 1976 (Namibia Day), of Zambia Kaunda formally inaugurated the institute in Lusaka.(FundingFunding for UNIN was provided for, on a short term basis, by the Nations Fund for Namibia, itself funded by individual government donations and private organizations such as the Foundation.(Since independenceClosing in September 1990 (6 months after formal independence was achieved), UNINs files have been transferred to the archival unit at the University of Namibia.(Archives of the University of Namibia)Notable people affiliated with the United Nations Institute for Namibia* Africa, Instructor at the Institute; South African academic(Professor Hugh Africa Whos Who in Southern Africa)* Ahtisaari, member of the Senate of UNIN from 1975 to 1976;(Biography of Martti Ahtisaari of Madrid) Finnish politician and diplomat* Geingob, Founding director from 197589, Minister of Namibia from independence until 1999* Damaseb, High Court Judge, CAF and FIFA official* Gertze, student and future of Democrats MP* Gurirab, earned diploma in Management and Development Studies in 1982, future of Democrats MP* Hamutenya, founding member, Deputy Director and Head of the History and Political Science Department from 1976 to 1981; founding member of opposition party Rally for Democracy and Progress (RDP)* Kawana, earned diploma in Management and Development Studies in 1979, future SWAPO MP and prominent cabinet member beginning in 2000* Mbako, obtained a Diploma in Development Studies and Management in 1986; Permanent Secretary in the Ministry of Fisheries and Marine Resources of Namibia since April 2000(Biography Jacques Malan Consultants & Actuaries)* Tjiriange, assistant professor from 197782; Minister for Veterans Affairs of Namibia* Abdelrahim Elshayeb, social science lecturer at the educational department from 1984 to 1990. Mr. Elshayeb was assigned to the institute by the Egyptian government.* Zaamwani, 1981 graduate in development studies, managing director of Namdeb mining venture since 1999.(Inge Zaamwani at the Namibia Institute for Democracy)References
18206792
St_Austell_and_Clay_Country_Eco-town
The St Austell and Clay Country Eco-town is a plan to build a new town on a cluster of sites owned by mining company Imerys near Austell, in Cornwall. The plan was given outline outline government approval in July 2009.  The plan would need to gain full planning permission before construction commenced.A number of organisations are involved in the development. A venture company called ECO-BOS has been set up by Imerys, and Orascom, with assistance from the Project. This company will prepare the planning application and build the development if granted. County Council will lead on some part of the project.The plan was provisionally termed Imerys China Clay Community, in 2008 the plan was shortlisted by the UKs for Communities and Local Government as one of the 10 eco-towns proposed for construction in the UK. Under the companys plans, 5,000 eco-homes would be built on former china clay quarries and other sites owned by Imerys.(BBC News article on Imerys eco-town bid)The sites are:()*Baal & West Carclaze near the villages of Penwithick and Stenalees. The plan includes 1,800-2,500 homes, 31 acre lake and eight hectares of employment land.*Par Docks, near to  Par: a new marina with facilities for local fishing boats, 500-700 homes, and a biomass energy centre.*Blackpool, close to the villages of Trewoon, High Street and Lanjeth: 2,100 and 2,500 homes, a new railway station, new schools, a lake and eco-parkland.*Goonbarrow on the edge of the village of Bugle: 450-550 homes.*Drinnick & Nanpean on the edge of the village of Nanpean: 150-300 homes.A pilot project consisting of 48 homes, community and employment buildings is planned for the Baal & West Carclaze site. The homes will be built with high level of energy efficiency including some with a zero-carbon rating. The plan include several energy sources including geo-thermal, solar, biomass generation, wind farms, water source heating/cooling and rainwater harvesting.The plan has received some local opposition. The No Ecotown group has fears that few of the homes will be affordable,  increased traffic congestion, lack of employment opportunities, swamping of local villages and damage to wildlife habitats.()()ReferencesExternal links*Imerys website*Cornwall Council Eco-town home page*ECO-BOS home page
18219833
Goldfield_Hills
 footnotes The Goldfield Hills is a range in Esmeralda County, Nevada(, south of the mining district and town of Goldfield, in the Basin. References 
18248392
Kinsley,_West_Yorkshire
Kinsley is situated under the Wakefield area of Yorkshire, On the B6273, Wakefield Road. Kinsleys neighbouring villages are Fitzwilliam and Hemsworth. Kinsley is  from Wakefield, the village is also  from the towns of Pontefract and Castleford. Kinsley is a rural, ex mining village, with a railway station nearby, giving easy access to Wakefield, Leeds, Doncaster and Sheffield. Kinsley also Has easy access to the M1 & motorways. On the outskirts of Kinsley is Hemsworth Water Park, which is a big attraction with locals and the wider area. Based in Kinsley are two food catering service companies, BRAKES and Premier, located off Hoyle Mill Road. Education  Education in Kinsley comes from Kinsley J&I School and also on the Wakefield road (B6273).From ages 3-11 Hemsworth Arts and Community College is the secondery school for 11-16 & 16-19 year olds which is located in the neighbouring village of Hemsworth just over a mile away. Hemsworth Water Park & Valehead Park Hemsworth Water Park, just off the B6273 on Hoyle Mill Road, has two lakes; the larger lake is available for pedalo rides and has sandy beaches; the smaller lake is in a more secluded area to attract wildlife. Both lakes are stocked for fishing which is available all year round. There are also plenty of grassed areas for picnics and games.Then there is an outdoor adventure playground within the water park and is suitable for children of all ages with a tower slide, climbing frames and a toddlers sandpit area. A miniature railway operates in Playworld. Kinsley also has a good greyhound track and hosts many a good nights racing.Vale Head Park has a 9 hole golf course, plus tennis courts, crazy golf & playing park. Vale Head is within the perimeter of Hemsworth Water ParkSee also*Greyhound StadiumExternal links(West Yorkshire)
18278130
Coal_mining_in_India
Coal mining in India has a long history of commercial exploitation covering nearly 220 years starting from 1774 by M/s Sumner and Heatly of East India Company in the Raniganj Coalfield along the Western bank of river Damodar. However, for about a century the growth of Indian coal mining remained sluggish for want of demand but the introduction of steam locomotives in 1853 gave a fillip to it. Within a short span, production rose to an annual average of 1 million tonne (mt) and India could produce 6.12 mts. per year by 1900 and 18 mts per year by 1920. The production got a sudden boost from the First World War but went through a slump in the early thirties. The production reached a level of 29 mts. by 1942 and 30 mts. by 1946.With the advent of Independence, the country embarked upon the 5-year development plans. At the beginning of the 1st Plan, annual production went up to 33 mts. During the 1st Plan period itself, the need for increasing coal production efficiently by systematic and scientific development of the coal industry was being felt. Setting up of the National Coal Development Corporation (NCDC), a Government of India Undertaking in 1956 with the collieries owned by the railways as its nucleus was the first major step towards planned development of Indian Coal Industry. Along with the Singareni Collieries Company Ltd. (SCCL) which was already in operation since 1945 and which became a Government company under the control of Government of Andhra Pradesh in 1956, India thus had two Government coal companies in the fifties. SCCL is now a joint undertaking of Government of Andhra Pradesh and Government of India sharing its equity in 51:49 ratio.Nationalisation of Coal MinesRight from its genesis, the commercial coal mining in modern times in India has been dictated by the needs of the domestic consumption. Indias has abundant domestic reserves of coal. Most of these are in the states of Bihar, Jharkhand, Orissa, Pradesh, Chhattisgarh and Bengal.(http://www.krishnaninc.com/Power_India_01.pdf) On account of the growing needs of the steel industry, a thrust had to be given on systematic exploitation of coking coal reserves in Jharia Coalfield. Adequate capital investment to meet the burgeoning energy needs of the country was not forthcoming from the private coal mine owners.ment .the govt was not ready to accept the invest Unscientific mining practices adopted by some of them and poor working conditions of labour in some of the private coal mines became matters of concern for the Government. On account of these reasons, the Central Government took a decision to nationalise the private coal mines. The nationalisation was done in two phases, the first with the coking coal mines in 1971-72 and then with the non-coking coal mines in 1973. In October, 1971, the Coking Coal Mines (Emergency Provisions) Act, 1971 provided for taking over in public interest of the management of coking coal mines and coke oven plants pending nationalisation. This was followed by the Coking Coal Mines (Nationalisation) Act, 1972 under which the coking coal mines and the coke oven plants other than those with the Tata Iron & Steel Company Limited and Indian Iron & Steel Company Limited, were nationalised on 1.5.1972 and brought under the Bharat Coking Coal Limited (BCCL), a new Central Government Undertaking. Another enactment, namely the Coal Mines (Taking Over of Management) Act, 1973, extended the right of the Government of India to take over the management of the coking and non-coking coal mines in seven States including the coking coal mines taken over in 1971. This was followed by the nationalisation of all these mines on 1.5.1973 with the enactment of the Coal Mines (Nationalisation) Act, 1973 which now is the piece of Central legislation determining the eligibility of coal mining in India.(http://www.coalindia.in/Company.aspx?tab4&AspxAutoDetectCookieSupport1)References See also #Dhanbad coal mine disaster# Coal Mining & Mistris of Kutch
18310491
Spirax-Sarco_Engineering
 footnotes Spirax-Sarco Engineering () is a leading British-based manufacturer of boiler and pipeline valves for heating and process plants. It is headquartered in Cheltenham and is a constituent of the 250 Index.HistoryThe Company was founded in 1888 as Sanders, Rehders & Co. (Sarco) in London importing thermostatic steam traps from Germany.(Top 100 Gloucestershire Companies Westbusiness, July / August 2008) In 1932 it started to manufacture traps in Kingdom under the Spirax brand name. It was first listed on the Stock Exchange in 1959.(London Stock Exchange: Spirax-Sarco listing history) In 1960 it introduced a range of self-acting pressure controls for the first time.(Spirax-Sarco: History) Then in 1963 it bought Drayton Controls, a control valve and instrumentation business.( The Company diversified in pump manufacturing in 1990 when it bought Watson-Marlow.(Pumps India: History of Pumps)It acquired the Jucker Industrial Division, an Italian controls business, in 1993(Spirax-Sarco acquires Jucker SpA Industrial Division from Jucker SpA Reuters, 3 March 1993) and M&M International, an Italian piston actuated and solenoid valve business in 2001.(Industrial News Supply House Times, 10 January 2002)In September 2005 it acquired Mitech Actuators & Controls and Proportional Control Technology, a pair of African businesses making process controls.(Local supplier prepares for big move Mining Weekly, 11 August 2006) Then later that year it bought EMCO Flow Systems, a metering business.(Spirax-Sarco acquires EMCO Flow Systems Plant Engineering, August 2005)Spirax completed a new facility in Shanghai, China in June 2010: the plant, designed as Spiraxs regional headquarters, combines a factory, warehouse, and offices.(How to Build a Factory and Distribution Centre in China)OperationsThe company has two activities:* Spirax-Sarco: valves* Watson-Marlow Bredel: peristaltic pumpsReferencesExternal links* Official siteEngineering
18343193
Engelsberg-Norberg_Railway
|}Image:ENJ 1.JPG|thumb|210px|Two Y7-railcars of  ENJ at ngelsberg railway station, July 2008. Photo: Bengt ObergerEngelsberg-Norbergs Jrnvg, the Engelsberg-Norberg Railway, is a  (normal gauge) railway between ngelsberg and Krrgruvan in the province of Vstmanland in Sweden, now being used by the Engelsberg-Norbergs Jrnvgshistoriska Frening (ENJ), a railway association .HistoryThe  long railway line was built in the 1850s with the purpose of transporting ore between the Norberg mining area and the lake mnningen, for further transport on barges on the Canal. Transport of goods on the first part of the line, Krrgruvan  Trttbo begun in December 1853 with the first steam engine built in Sweden, Frstlingen (the First One), constructed by the Mechanical Workshops in Eskilstuna. A reconstructed company,  Norbergs Nya Jrnvgs AB  was formed in 1855 and finished the whole line to ngelsberg at the lake of mnningen in 1856. At that time the railway had a  gauge, widened to the Swedish normal gauge of  in 1876.In 1962 passenger service was discontinued, as well as freight service in the mid 1990s.The Heritage Railway AssociationEngelsberg-Norbergs Jrnvgshistoriska Frening (ENJ), the Engelsberg-Norberg Heritage Railway Association, started in 1999, aims to organize regular traffic for tourists with diesel railcars between  ngelsberg and Krrgruvan. The association has two roundhouses at ngelsberg and at Krrgruvan. The latter was built in 1857 and is the oldest preserved roundhouse in Sweden.ENJ uses three 1950s railcars for regular traffic:*The Unit YBo7 No 1156, constructed 1957 by ASJ, stersund*The Multiple Unit YBo7 No 1255, constructed 1959 by Eksj-verken, Eksj*The Unit Ybfoby No 2076  ReferencesThis article is based on the article about the Engelsberg-Norbergs Jrnvg in the Swedish language Wikipedia.External links* http://www.enj.se Officiell hemsida fr Engelsberg-Norbergs Jrnvgshistoriska Frening (in Swedish)Jrnvg
18365481
Timiskaming_Professional_Hockey_League
websiteThe Timiskaming Professional Hockey League (TPHL) was a minor professional hockey league based in the area of Timiskaming, Canada. Founded in 1906, the league is notable for providing teams and OBrien, the founder of the Hockey Association, which became todays Hockey League.HistoryThe league was founded in the early 1900s in the mining towns of Northern Ontario, Canada. Owned by wealthy mine owners, the league paid its players, one of the few leagues to do so at the time. The games between teams served as the basis for high-stakes gambling between the owners, players and the public. Ringers from the southern hockey leagues would be paid to join the teams for a single game, hoping to garner large gambling profits for the team owners.In a 1909 game between Haileybury and Cobalt at Cobalt, over $10,000 dollars was in the pot in bets. Haileybury won 65 in overtime, with five of the six goals scored by Harry Smith who had been lured from the Wanderers of the Canada Hockey Association().The use of ringers had one negative effect on the league. The league challenged for the Cup twice in 1909 and was rejected twice by the Stanley Cup trustees because of the ineligible players on Cobalt, the 1909 champion. The trustees implemented a rule that players had to be a member of the team at the start of season, set at January 2.()Just before the 1910 season, the league dissolved so that two of its teams, Cobalt and Haileybury would help to form the National Hockey Association. The owner of the two teams OBrien, along with his familys money financed four teams in the NHA, including the Millionaires and the Canadiens, then known as Les Canadiens. In 1910, after their NHA franchises were dealt away, the TPHL resumed play and Cobalt and Haileybury returned to the league for the 191011 season before ending operations.Teams* Silver Kings - 1906  1911* Comets - 1906 1911* Liskeard, Ontario - 190607* Ontario -  190607* Bay, Ontario - 191011Notable playersThese may have been ringers imported for single games:* Decarie -  Cobalt 1906-07* Lalonde - Cobalt 1906-07, Haileybury 1907-08* Lindsay - Latchford 190607* Lehman -  Cobalt 1906-07* Pitre -  Cobalt 1906-07* Ridpath -  Cobalt 1906-07, 190809* Bobby Rowe - Latchford 190607, Haileybury 190809* Ross - Cobalt 190809* Harry Smith - Haileybury 190809 ()See also* OBrienReferencesprofessionnelle de hockey du TmiscamingueProfessional Hockey League
18387663
Sego,_Utah
 blank_info  1437678(Sego () is a town in Grand County, Utah, States. It lies in the narrow, winding Sego Canyon, in the Cliffs some  north of Thompson Springs. Formerly an important eastern Utah mining town, Sego was inhabited about 1910&ndash;1955. The town is accessed via the grade of the Ballard & Thompson Railroad, a spur from the and Rio Grande Western built by the founders of the town to transport the coal.HistoryHenry Ballard, one of the founders of Thompson Springs, discovered an exposed vein of anthracite coal here in 1908() while exploring the many canyons of the Book Cliffs. He quietly bought the land and began to hire local laborers to mine the coal. The coal camp was naturally called Ballard.()By 1911 Ballard had sold out to a Salt Lake City businessman named B.F. Bauer, who formed a corporation called American Fuel Company. The company began to expand mining operations far beyond Ballards unambitious scale, installing a modern coal tipple and the first coal washer west of the Mississippi River.() The Ballard & Thompson Railroad company organized in 1911, its officers including Bauer and Ballard, and started to construct a line from Thompson to Ballard.() In its five-mile run up the winding canyon, the rail line crossed the stream thirteen times.( American Fuel Company also developed the town, renamed Neslen during the railroad construction for the mines new general manager, Richard Neslen.( Soon a store, boarding house, and other buildings went up, each with its own water system.( Neslen was a fairly typical town, but in addition to building numerous company houses, mine owners took the unusual policy of allowing miners to build their own cabins wherever they chose. Shacks and dugouts dotted the canyon.() When the railroad was completed in 1912, Neslen was granted its own office. Coal began shipping in October 1912, most of it going to the and Rio Grande Western Railroad.( The next year the Ballard & Thompson became a subsidiary of the D&RGW.(thumb|left|Chesterfield Coal Company in Sego, circa 1926.The towns most serious problem, almost from the beginning, was a diminishing water supply. The table was dropping, the creeks and springs drying up. One summer the water slowed to such a trickle that the coal washer could not even operate.( Paradoxically, the railroad  was plagued by excessive water, floods frequently damaging the bridges and trestles.( The small train that served the mine was off the track as much as one fourth of the time.( By 1915 profits were low to nonexistent, pay days very irregular. Like many mines, the company tried to enforce a system where miners were paid in scrip redeemable only at the company store. Miners who dared to shop in Thompson, where prices were half those at Neslen, were threatened with the loss of their jobs. The miners went on strike in April 1915, not having been paid in five months. Many of them returned to work with the company still owing them back pay. Employment was scarce in the region, and in October 1915 wages were cut by 12&ndash;20%.( Frustrated by the mines unprofitability, Bauer forced a corporate reorganization in 1916. Richard Neslen was replaced, and the company renamed Chesterfield Coal Company.( The towns name was also changed in 1918,( this time to Sego for the lily, Utahs state flower, which grew abundantly in the canyon.( The reorganization didnt solve the companys financial difficulties, however. Segos miners were never paid regularly until they joined the Mine Workers Union in 1933.(Some sources claim Segos population grew as high as 500,( but the States Census during the towns heyday in the 1920s and 1930s doesnt bear this out. In 1920 the census count was 198,( and in 1930 just over 200.(Firmage, p.267.) Still, Sego was one of the major Grand County towns during this period.(Railroadthumb|left|the only cut on the Ballard & Thompson grade, at the confluence of Sego and Thomson Canyons.The closest railroad connection to Sego was the Denver & Rio Grande Western in Thompson Springs. Because of this, a new railroad was incorporated on July 15, 1911 to connect the town of Sego with the D&RGW. Called the Ballard & Thompson Railroad, the  line never owned its own equipment, and relied on the Rio Grande for all motive power. Later on, in 1913, the railroad fell into the ownership of the D&RGW.The branch starts at the D&RGW tracks on the northwest end of Thompson, enters Thompson Canyon, and veers through a cut along Sego Wash up Sego Canyon to the townsite. A wye was built at Thompson Springs to facilitate the turning of the steam locomotives, the grade of which is still visible.Passenger service to Sego was almost nonexistent, although a small gas-mechanical railbus, which was owned by the coal company, was used for a short time. The train would pause in front of the Sego schoolhouse before continuing on to the mine, which considerably disrupted scholarly activities when school was in session.At the height of coal production, from 1920 to 1947, 800 tons of coal were being mined per day, with the D&RGW making as many as nine round-trips a month to the town.(When the railroad was abandoned in 1950, the owners of the Sego mine constructed a truck ramp in Thompson to load coal directly into the railroad cars. The ramp and much of the grade, as well as three of the many single-span trestles crossing the wash, still exist, the first two miles being paved for use as an access road to Thompsons water supply. The trestles are in a dangerous condition and cannot be crossed.(Decline footnote  Source: U.S. Census Bureau()By 1947 production costs exceeded income, and the company decided to close down.( The miners that once had numbered 125 had been reduced to just 27. These remaining miners pooled their resources, and with the backing of two banks bought out the Chesterfield Coal Company assets.( Organized under the name Utah Grand Coal Company, the miners hoped to keep the mine operating. Indeed, their first year was very successful. Then fire destroyed the tipple in 1949, and another serious fire the next year burned more equipment.( The final blow came when the railroad converted to locomotives, virtually eliminating the demand for coal. The Utah Grand sold its holdings in 1955 to a Texas company that intended to explore for oil and natural gas.( Homes were moved to Thompson, Moab, and even Colorado, and the schoolhouse was taken to Thompson.( Sego was gone. The stone company store, boarding house, and many foundations and dugouts still remain. An underground seam fire has continued to burn here for decades, and smoke still rises from deserted mine shafts.( Another severe flash flood in the early 1980s, known as the Hundred Years Flood by locals, removed most of the remaining trestles and left the rest unsafe.()ReferencesExternal links* Sego at GhostTowns.com* Sego at Frank and Annes Canyon Country Hiking & Camping Notebookes:Sego
18401310
Technological_and_industrial_history_of_Canada
The technological and industrial history of Canada encompasses the countrys development in the areas of transportation, communication, energy, materials, public works, public services (health care), domestic/consumer and defense technologies. Most technologies diffused in Canada came from other places; only a small number actually originated in Canada. For more about those with a Canadian origin see in Canada.The terms chosen for the age described below are both literal and metaphorical. They describe the technology that dominated the period of time in question but are also representative of a large number of other technologies introduced during the same period. Also of note is the fact that the period of diffusion of a technology can begin modestly and can extend well beyond the age of its introduction. To maintain continuity, the treatment of its diffusion is dealt with in the context of its dominant age. For example the Steam Age here is defined as being from 1840 to 1880. However steam powered boats were introduced in 1809, the CPR was completed in 1885 and railway construction in Canada continued well into the 20th century. To preserve continuity, the development of steam, in the early and later years, is therefore considered within the Steam Age.Technology is a major cultural determinant, no less important in shaping human lives than philosophy, religion, social organization, or political systems. In the broadest sense, these forces are also aspects of technology. The French sociologist Jacques Ellul defined la technique as the totality of all rational methods in every field of human activity so that, for example, education, law, sports, propaganda, and the social sciences are all technologies in that sense. At the other end of the scale, common parlance limits the terms meaning to specific industrial arts. The Stone Age: Fire (14,000 BC  AD 1600) The diffusion of technology in what is now Canada began with the arrival of the first humans about 14,000 BC.These people brought with them stone and bone tools. These took the form of arrowheads, axes, blades, scrappers, needles, harpoon heads and fishhooks used mostly to kill animals and fish for food and skins. They also brought fire which they used for heating their dwellings and for cooking which was done on open fires. There were no clay pots or ovens.In the Arctic the Innu used stick frames covered with animal skins for shelter during the summer months while during the harsh winter they built houses made of snow or igloos. On the plains native peoples used the well known teepee. This consisted of a number of poles arranged to form a conical structure which was in turn covered with animal skins. In central Canada the house was popular. This large structure was built from interwoven branches and could house 70 to 80 people. Several of these structures would be built together to form a village which was often surrounded by a palisade of logs stuck vertically into the ground as protection from hostile tribes. On the west coast native peoples constructed dwellings made from heavy timber. These structures were built near the waters edge and were often decorated with elaborate and elegant carved images.Transportation techniques were simple. The aboriginal peoples did not have the wheel, horses or the sail. The paddle powered canoe was the most common means of transport and was especially practical during the summer, considering the large number of lakes and rivers that characterized the topography. The duggout was favoured in the waters off the west coast. Summer travel also saw use of the travois, a simple type of sled that was pulled over the ground by a dog and used to transport a light load. In the winter shoes made walking in the deep snow practical. Winter transport in the Arctic made use of teams and in warmer summer months use of kayaks was common.Clothing was made of animal skins which were cut with stone and bone tools and sewn with bone needles and animal sinews. Native peoples did not have textiles.For the most part native peoples were hunters and gatherers, chasing large animals, and fishing for a source of protein. Wild plants and fruits that also an important food source. A common, easily stored and readily transportable food was pemmican, dried powdered meat mixed with fat, berries and vegetables. In central Canada there was limited agriculture which allowed the storage of some food during times of privation. Of note was the fact that they did not have the plough or draught animals.The first peoples had techniques for dealing with disease. Medicines included those made from high bush cranberries, oil of wintergreen and bloodroot, among others. A type of tea made from the bark of the spruce or hemlock could prevent or cure scurvy.The first peoples did not have a written language. Their extensive knowledge of the natural world and information relating to their customs and traditions was passed orally.Weapons of war were made by hand from wood and stone. The long range weapon of these times was the and arrow with an effective range of up to 100 metres. Close in fighting was conducted with a range of simple armaments including: stone-tipped spears, stone axes (tomahawk), stone blades used as knives and stone and wooden clubs of various types. Because there was no knowledge of metalworking with the exception of some small items of jewelry made from copper, weapons such as swords and metal knives were not part of this early arsenal.(Wright, J.W., A History of the Native Peoples of Canada: Volumes I(2001) and II(1999), Canadian Museum of Civilization, Ottawa) The Age of Sail: Ships, symbolic language, the wheel, horses, tables and chairs (16001830) The arrival of white explorers and colonists in the 16th century introduced those technologies popular in Europe at the time, such as iron making, the wheel, writing, paper, printing, books, newspapers, long range navigation, large construction, stone and brick and mortar construction, surgery, firearms, new crops, livestock, the knife fork and spoon, china plates and cups, weed, cotton and linen cloth, horses and livestock.Transportation: Shipbuilding and the WheelThe use of wind and water as sources of power were major developments in the technological history of the new colonies. Ships with large masts and huge canvas sails maintained the link between the colonies and the imperial centres, Paris, France until 1769 and London, England  until the arrival of power in 1850. The ships in service were built not only in Europe but also in the colonies. The construction of these vessels (shipbuilding) was a remarkable feat in the nascent colonies of New France and British North America representing the dominant sector of the colonial manufacturing industry for 200 years. Design and construction techniques reflected those popular in northern Europe during the period. Intendant Jean Talon established the Royal Dockyard on the St. Charles River in Quebec City and the first 120 ton vessel was launched there in 1666. Three other ships, including a 450 ton, galiotte, were built before Talons departure for France in 1672 and four more were built in Quebec between 1704 and 1712 followed by another nine between 1714 and 1717. Work at the Royal Dockyard recommenced in 1739 and by 1744, twelve vessels had been constructed there, including the Canada, a 500 ton merchantman. Demand for ships was such that a second Royal Dockyard was established in 1746, on the St. Lawrence at the foot of Cap Diamante, where the largest vessel of the French Regime, a 72 gun, 800 ton war ship was built. The fall of New France to the British in 1759 put an end to these activities.(Wilson, Garth, A History of Shipbuilding and Naval Architecture in Canada, Transformation Series 4, National Museum of Science and Technology, Ottawa, 1994)However the beginning of the 19th century witnessed a revival. The British loss of the American colonies with their associated shipbuilding industry, the subsequent British loss of Baltic sources of timber, as well as Canadas abundant supply of wood along with the tradition of shipbuilding established in New France made British North America an ideal location for a renewed shipbuilding industry. Quebec City and Saint John, New Brunswick, both centres of timber export also became dominant centres for this activity not only in Canada but worldwide. The ships were intended for trade, mostly with Britain and common designs included the two masted brig and brigantine and the popular barque, with three masts or more. Designs of between 500 and 1000 tons, which sacrificed speed in favour of a voluminous hold, that was well suited to the carriage of timber, were preferred. The Californian and Australian gold rushes of 1848 and 1851 respectively further fed the demand for Canadas large ocean vessels. However the arrival of the iron and steel hulled steam ship associated with the Canadian inability to adapt to this new technology eventually bankrupted the industry in the latter years of the century.Inland travel by the de bois was by way of an Indian invention, the canoe. The boat and bateau were also popular for travel on inland waters. The York boat was used by traders working for the Hudsons Bay Company and was named after the fur trading post at Factory on Hudson Bay. The York boat was more stable, larger and had a greater carrying capacity than the canoe. The first was built in 1794 and numbers of these craft navigated the rivers of the northern prairie region as far west as Chipewyan until replaced by the steamboat in the 19th century. The flat bottomed bateau was another craft used on Canadas inland waters by both British and French colonists in the 18th and 19th centuries.Within settlements transport was often simply a matter of walking around town. The horse, introduced by the new arrivals in 1665, also provided a new and convenient mode of transport. The wooden cart, wagon and carriage, made possible by the introduction of the wheel in combination with the horse, dramatically improved the transport of people and goods. The first graded road in Canada was built by de Champlain in 1606 and linked the settlement at Port Royal to Digby Cape, 16 kilometres away. By 1734 Quebec City and Montreal were connected by a road, Le chemin du roi, along the north shore of the St. Lawrence. The 267 km. distance could be traversed with great difficulty and discomfort by horse drawn carriage in four to five days. Most roads were of very poor quality especially in wet weather. To overcome this problem logs were often placed side by side crosswise to cover ruts, puddles and mud holes. The result was a more solid but very bumpy surface that was referred to as a road. Work on what would be called the, longest street in the world, formally known as Street, began in York (Toronto), in 1795 under the direction of Deputy Surveyor General Jones. Initially a trail, it ran from Eglington Avenue to St. Albans (Holland Landing) and later much further north. The task of widening the path into a road fell to local farmers.(Guillet, Edwin C., The Story of Canadian Roads, University of Toronto Press, Toronto, 1967) The period also saw the construction a number of important canals including: the Canal, OttawaKingston, 1820, the Canal, Montreal, 1825, the Ottawa River Canals at Grenville and Carillon, Quebec, 1834 and the Chambly Canal, Chambly, Quebec, 1843.Communication, Symbolic LanguageThe introduction of language and mathematics to the new world was of paramount importance. The 26 letter, Roman based alphabet that formed the basis for French and English words was arguably much more flexible that the pictographs that characterized eastern languages. The pen along with ink and paper made written communication possible and allowed private individuals, businessmen, the clergy and government officials to produce the documents essential for social, commercial, religious and political intercourse. This created a need for mail service. Messages were originally carried between settlements on the St. Lawrence by canoe. After 1734 the road between Montreal and Quebec was used by a special courier to carry official dispatches. In 1755 a post office was opened in Halifax by Benjamin Franklin, the Post Master of the British colonies, as part of a trans-Atlantic mail service that he established between Falmouth, England and New York. In 1763 Franklin opened other post offices in Quebec City, Trois-Rivires and Montreal with a link from the latter city to New York and the trans-Atlantic service. The War of American Independence seriously disrupted mail service in Canada but by 1783 peace had been restored and Hugh Finlay was appointed Post Master for the northern colonies in 1784. That same year Finlay hired Pierre Durand to survey an all-Canadian mail route to Halifax. The path chosen took 15 weeks for a round trip! Although the written word was a vital part of communications, French colonial policy opposed the establishment of newspapers in New France. Canadas first paper, the Halifax Gazette, produced on a simple printing press, began publication in 1752 under the watchful eye of John Bushell. In 1764, the Quebec Gazette was established in Quebec City by William Brown and Thomas Gilmore. The Montreal Gazette was founded in that city in 1785 by Fleury Mesplet. Other newspapers followed including the Upper Canada Gazette at Newark (Niagara-on-the-Lake) in 1793, the first newspaper in what is now Ontario, the Quebec City Mercury, 1805, the Montreal Herald, 1811, Le Canadien 1806, La Minerve, 1826, and the Colonial Advocate and Novascotian both in 1824. These publications were simple affairs, typeset by hand, consisting of only a few pages, produced in limited quantities on simple presses and of limited distribution.EnergyWind power was used to some to turn the sails of the windmill, which did not come into widespread use. However power was used extensively to power mill in both France and later, Quebec and Canada and Canada. Animal power in the form of the horse or ox, was used to work the fields. The first horses were introduced to New France in 1665. Fire from a wood or oil fuel source was not new but the use of stone fireplaces and ovens along with metal pots and pans dramatically changed the nature of cooking.IndustryBetween the 1530s and 1626 Basque whalers (whaling) frequented the waters of Newfoundland and the north shore of the of St. Lawrence from the Strait of Bell Isle to the mouth of the Sagenuay River. They constructed stone ovens ashore for fires to melt whale fat. However as whales became scarce, the cod fishery (fishing) off the Grand Banks of Newfoundland became hotly contested by the British and French, in the 16th and 17th centuries. The British used small boats close to shore from which they caught the cod with hook and line. They practised the dry fishery technique which involved shore based settlements for the drying of cod on flakes or racks placed in the open air for their subsequent transport back to Europe. The French on the other hand practised the green fishery which involved processing the catch with salt aboard ship. At the same time a fleet of schooners fishing for cod, halibut, haddock, and mackerel became prominent off the Atlantic coast. The use of the long line and purse seine net increased the size of the catch.It is ironic that a phenomenon as fickle as fashion would be responsible for the economic development and exploration of half a continent but such was the case with the trade in North America between 1650 and 1850. The subject of bitter rivalry between the British and French Empires and inter-corporate rivalry among a number of business organizations, notably the Bay Company and the West Company, the technology of the trade was the picture of simplicity. Traders, be they French or British would set out in birch bark canoes, loaded with trade goods (knives, axe heads, cloth blankets, alcohol, firearms and other items) and travel west along Canadas numerous rivers, streams and lakes in search of Indians and exchange these items for beaver skins. The skins came from animals trapped by the native peoples and worn as clothing during the long cold Canadian winter. The skins were worn with the fur side next to the skin and by the spring the long hairs would be worn away leaving the short hairs which were used to make felt. The skins were then carried by the traders in their canoes back to trading posts in Montreal or on Hudson Bay and transported by sailing ship to England or France. There they were processed by a technique involving mercury, and the felt that resulted from the treatment was used to make beaver hats, and coincidentally gave rise to an associated phenomenon, the mad hatter. A combination of diminishing beaver stocks and a change in fashion that saw a decline in the popularity of the beaver hat put an end to the trade.Agriculture was an essential colonial activity. The settlers who founded Port Royal in Acadia in 1605 drained coastal marshes with a system of dikes and grew vegetables, flax and wheat and raised livestock. After 1713 the British promoted the Maritimes as a source of hemp for rope for the Royal Navy, with moderate success. Mixed farming, the growing of wheat and the raising of livestock would characterize the nature of maritime agriculture well into the mid-19th century. In 1617, Louis Hebert a colonist in Quebec began to raise cattle and grow peas, grain and corn on a very small plot. In the 1640s charter companies promoted agriculture and settlers cleared forested land with the use of axes, oxen, horses and asses. In 1663 XIV, through his colonial administrators Colbert and Talon took steps to promote the cultivation of hops and hemp and the raising of livestock. By 1721 the harvest of the farmers of France consisted predominantly of wheat and the census of horses, pigs, cattle and sheep registered 30,0000 animals. In the latter part of the century the British promoted the cultivation of potatoes. The arrival of the Loyalists in Upper Canada (where they were given the title Empire Loyalists) in the late 18th century resulted in the cultivation of hemp but agriculture was dominated by the wheat culture well into the mid-19th century.The techniques for the production of beer were quickly introduced to colonial life. The first commercial brewery in Canada was built in Quebec City in 1668 by Jean Talon. This was followed by the construction of other breweries including those of John Molson in Montreal, 1786, Alexander Keith, Halifax, 1820, Thomas Carling, London, 1840, John Kinder Labatt, London, 1847 and Eugene OKeefe in Toronto in 1891. Of note is the fact that the first patent awarded by the government of Canada went to Mr. G. Riley in 1842 for an improved method of brewing ale, beer, porter, and other maltliquors.Money, then as now was of vital interest to individuals and to the functioning of the economy. The first coin produced for use in New France was the Gloria Regni a silver piece, struck in Paris in 1670. The first paper money in New France consisted of playing cards signed by the governor and issued in 1685 to help deal with the chronic shortage of coins. After 1760 the British introduced the sterling which officially stood as Canadas currency for almost a century. However the monetary system in reality was a chaotic affair and the British coins and paper circulated along with, Spanish dollars, Nova Scotia provincial money, US dollars and gold coins and British paper army bills used buy supplies in the War of 1812. In 1858 the government of the Province of Canada began keeping its accounts in Canadian dollars and to circulate its own paper currency alongside the paper dollars circulated by the of Montreal and other banks.MaterialsThe Europeans brought with them metal and textiles and the knowledge of the means to make them. Les Forges de St. Maurice which began producing iron in 1738 at facilities near Trois-Rivires and the Marmora Ironworks established in 1822 near Peterborough were the first iron works in Canada. Both ceased operations in the latter part of the 19th century.Early 16th century female settlers along the St. Lawrence and in Acadia were almost all were familiar with the techniques of spinning yarn and weaving cloth for everyday clothes and bedding and the home production of textiles eventually became an important cottage industry. The wheel and loom were features of many colonial homes and weaving techniques included the  la planche and boutonn methods. Loyalist women settling in Upper and Lower Canada grew flax and raised sheep for wool to make clothing, blankets and linen. The loom, introduced in the 1830s, featured a complex system of punch cards to control the pattern and was the first programmable machine in Canada. With the arrival of industrial textile mills in Montreal and Toronto in the late 19th century, the economic advantage of home weaving faded.Wood ash became a significant export during this period. Potash made from the ashes of burnt wood was used as a bleaching and dying agent in textile production in Britain. Wood ash and pearl ash (potash mixed with lime) were shipped overseas as early as 1767 and export reached a peak in the mid-19th century. In 1871 there were 519 asheries in operation in Canada. Wood ash was also used in the home by colonials to make soap.(Bliss, Michael, Northern Enterprise: Five Centuries of Canadian Business, McClelland and Stewart, Toronto, 1987, p. 111.)MedicineMedical treatment at this time reflected techniques available in France and was provided by a barber-surgeon. The first in New France was Robert Giffard who arrived in Quebec City in 1627 and practiced at Hotel-Dieu, Canadas first hospital, a very modest four-room structure, founded by the church. The panacea was bleeding, which involved the use of a knife to cut open a blood vessel and drain way a quantity of the patients blood. There was some surgery but it was undertaken with primitive instruments and without anesthetic or any familiarity with the concept of infection and both the procedure and results were usually quite gruesome. Another figure of repute, Michel Sarrazin, a botanist as well as doctor arrived from France in the latter half of the 17th century and served as the surgeon-major for the French troops in New France. He too practised at Hotel-Dieu and while there treated hundreds of patients infected during a typhus epidemic. Eyeglasses for the correction of vision became available at this time. The thermometer, invented in 1714, became a useful diagnostic tool for doctors as did the stethoscope invented in 1816. Because doctors were few and far between people with medical problems often had to treat themselves. They used Indian medicines or home remedies based on the internal and external application of various herbal and animal products. Advances in surgery came in the early 19th century with the innovative work of Dr. Widmer who practised at York Hospital (later known as General Hospital) and R.W. Beaumont made a name as a noted inventor of instruments. The early part of the 19th century also witnessed the first halting steps with respect to the use of inoculation, in Nova Scotia, in this case against smallpox. However it would take another one hundred years for the practise to become widespread. General hospitals were established in Montreal in 1819 and York (Ontario) in 1829.Domestic TechnologyThe first houses in Canada were constructed at Port Royal on the Annapolis River in what is now Nova Scotia in 1605. The colonists built simple wooden frame homes with peaked roofs around a central courtyard. This established a house building tradition that lasts to this day, for by far the most common domestic structure in Canada  for the last 400 years has been the wood frame peak roofed house. Most domestic homes both urban and rural in New France from about 1650 to 1750 were simple wooden structures. Wood was inexpensive, readily available and easily worked by most residents. Rooms were small, usually limited to a living/dining/kitchen space and perhaps a bedroom. Roofs were usually peaked to deflect the rain and very heavy snow. After fires in Quebec City in 1682 and Montreal in 1721 building codes emphasized the importance of stone construction but these requirements were mostly ignored except by the most affluent. The most popular type of domestic dwelling in Loyalist Upper Canada in the late 18th century was the log house or the wood frame house or less commonly the stone house. When homes were heated it was by a fire place burning wood or a cast iron wood stove, which was also used for cooking and they were lit by candlelight or whale oil lamp. Kerosene lamps became popular in the 1840s when Gesner of Halifax developed an effective way to manufacture that product. Water for drinking and washing was carried to the home from an outside source. Tables and chairs, items unknown to Canadas native peoples, were introduced for the first time and had an important place in the home. The new arrivals also brought new eating habits. Meat from animals such as cows, sheep, chickens and pigs was common as were new types of fruits and vegetables.  These items were eaten fresh but could be stored for later consumption if salted, pickled or frozen. Grain was ground to flour at the local grist mill and baked in the home oven with yeast to make bread. Hopps, grain and fruit were fermented to make beer, hard alcohol and wine. Meals were served on pewter or china plates and eaten with a metal knife, fork and spoon. The places were set on a simple wooden table with wooden chairs often made by the man of the house.Musical instruments did much to enliven the colonial life. In the well known documents The Jesuit Relations, there is reference to the playing of the fiddle in 1645 and the (music) in 1661. Quebec City boasted of Canadas first piano in 1784.Waste DisposalSewage and garbage disposal were simple tasks in the mostly rural parts of the colonies. Sewage was dumped into a stream or left in pits and buried. Scrap food was fed to farm animals and any other garbage or waste was burned or placed in a quiet corner of the property and left to deteriorate. However in towns such as Halifax, Quebec City, Montreal and York (Toronto), these tasks became more difficult due to lack of space and the concentrated population, and the result was very unpleasant. Streets reeked with the smell of decaying garbage as well as pig, horse and cow excrement. Markets were places of animal blood, rotting animal carcasses and fish heads and other decaying organic matter. Human excrement was stored in pails in buildings and then dumped into the streets. Not until the mid-19th and early 20th centuries would these problems be effectively addressed through the installation of sewer systems and the organization of municipal garbage collection.Military TechnologyThe Europeans introduced extremely important innovations relating to warfare, gunpowder, the cannon and the musket. The cannon was used to arm a number of important military structures including: the of Quebec, Quebec City, Quebec, 1745, the Fortress of Louisburg, Nova Scotia, 1745 and Henry, Kingston, Ontario, 1812. They were also the primary weapon aboard the warships of the era. French regular soldiers stationed in New France and British regulars stationed in British North America after 1763 were equipped with a musket and bayonet. Ironically in the Battle of Quebec, one of the great battles of history, the French General Montcalm ordered his troops out of the ultra-modern stone-walled Citadel, with its heavy defensive cannon and onto the adjacent of Abraham where they were felled by a single volley of musket fire from the British line. Both the British/Canadian/Indian troops and American troops were equipped with cannons and muskets when invading American armies attacked Canada in 1775 and again during the period from 1812 to 1814 with the intent of annexation. In both cases the invaders were defeated. The Steam Age: trains, telegraphs, universal time, water and oil  (18301880) The pace of diffusion quickened in the 19th century with the introduction of such technologies as steam power and the telegraph. Indeed it was the introduction of steam power that allowed politicians in Ottawa to entertain the idea of creating a transcontinental state. In addition to steam power, municipal water systems and sewer systems were introduced in the latter part of the century. The field of medicine saw the introduction of anesthetic and antiseptics.Transportation, steam powerIt was via the paddle-powered boat that steam power was first introduced to Canada. The Accommodation, a side-wheeler built entirely in Montreal by the Eagle Foundry and launched in 1809, was the first steamer to ply Canadian waters, making its maiden voyage from Montreal to Quebec that same year in 36 hours. Other paddle-wheel steamboats included: the Frontenac, Lake Ontario, 1816, the General Stacey Smyth, Saint John River, 1816, the Union, lower Ottawa River, 1819, the Royal William, Quebec to Halifax, 1831 and the Beaver, BC coast,1836. One of the great trans-Atlantic steam ship lines was  established in Montreal in 1854. The Line Royal Mail Steamers company, founded by Sir Allan, operated a fleet of over 100 ocean going steam ships, plying the route between Montreal and Britain from that date until 1917 when it was sold to Canadian Pacific Ocean Services Limited. The first locomotive powered railway service in Canada was offered by the Champlain and St. Lawrence Railroad, Quebec, in 1836. Other railway systems soon followed including: the Albion Mines Railway, Nova, Scotia, 1839, the St. Lawrence and Atlantic Railroad, 1853, the Great Western Railway, Montreal to Windsor, 1854, the Grand Trunk Railway, Montreal to Sarnia, 1860, the Intercolonial Railway, 1876, the Chignecto Marine Transport Railway, Tignish, Nova Scotia, 1888, the Edmonton, Yukon & Pacific Railway, 1891, the Newfoundland Railway, St. Johns, Newfoundland and Labrador, 1893, the White Pass and Yukon Railway, Whitehorse, Yukon Territory, 1900, the Kettle Valley Railway, British Columbia, 1916 and Canadian National Railways, 1917.(McDonnell, The History of Canadian Railroads, New Burlington Books, London, 1985)One of the great engineering works of the world, the Pacific Railway and its associated Canadian Pacific trans-Canada telegraph system, was completed in 1885. Between 1881 and 1961 CPR would operate 3,267 steam locomotives.The coach came into its own in the mid-19th century. Roads in early colonial Canada were poor and not well suited to long distance travel by horse-drawn coach. For this reason the stage coach was used mostly for short distance travel and long distance inter-city passenger service was mostly by water. With the introduction of the steam locomotive, long distance inter-city passenger service boomed. However a means of conveyance was required serve to those small towns that found themselves short distances from, the end of the line or beyond the reach of local public horse car service. The stage coach was well suited to this roll. From about 1850 until 1900 in parallel with the explosive growth of the rail network all across Canada, the service grew. However, the ever expanding reach of the rail network eventually even to small towns, the small size of the markets served and arrival of cars and buses put an end to this colourful means of transport in the early 20th century.In Western Canada throughout the 19th century the Trail served as an important land transportation route over its 1500 km length from Winnipeg (Fort Garry) to Edmonton, (Upper Fort des Prairies). The simple horse drawn River Cart was a common sight on the road. Another overland series of roads, the River Trails, connected Fort Garry to the US.Manned flight came to Canada during these years. On 4 August 1840, a hot air balloon, took to the air for the first time in Canada when the Star of the East, piloted by  aeronaut Louis Lauriat, rose into the sky over Saint John, New Brunswick.Universal timeThe measurement of time before the coming of the railways was a local matter with towns and cities establishing their own time zones. There was little coordination of times between cities or regions in Canada or elsewhere in the world. Train travel revealed the shortcomings of this arrangement for it quickly led to problems related to the scheduling of arrivals and departures from different cities. A Canadian engineer, Fleming, proposed a coordinated world-wide time system at a meeting in Toronto of the Royal Canadian Institute in 1879. His idea was accepted at the Meridian Conference of 1884.CommunicationCanadas initial telegraph service, introduced in 1846, was offered by the Toronto, Hamilton and Niagara Electro-Magnetic Telegraph Co. Others soon followed including: the telegraph system of The Montreal Telegraph Company, 1847 and the telegraph system of the Dominion Telegraph Company, 1868. The production and transmission of the signal was by means of analog technology, and its introduction would form the backbone of communication and computing technology in Canada for the next 140 years. In 1856, the first underwater telegraph cable in Canada was laid, linking Cape Ray, Newfoundland and Aspy, Nova Scotia. Ten years later, in 1866 the first telegraph cable, was laid between Hearts Content, Newfoundland and Foilhommerum, Valentia Island, in western Ireland. The first trans Canada telegraph service was established by Canadian Pacific Railway in 1885. In 1902, Pacific completed a trans-Pacific cable telegraph, linking Vancouver with Australia and Zealand.The newspaper benefited from the introduction of the telegraph and the press. This latter device, invented in the US, was first used in Canada by George Brown in Toronto starting in 1844 to print copies of the Globe. This process permitted the printing of thousands of copies of each daily paper rather than the mere hundreds of copies possible with previous technologies.Energy and oilDrilling for oil was first undertaken in Canada in 1851 in Enniskillen Township in Lambton County by the International Mining and Manufacturing Company of Woodstock, Ontario. There was fierce competition for oil drilling, refining and distribution in southern Ontario until 1880 when 16 oil refineries merged to form Oil. This company was in turn acquired in 1898 by John D. Rockefellers Standard Oil Trust. Oil discovery and development in the west dates from the early 20th century with Imperial becoming a major player by 1914, at Turner Valley, Alberta and in 1920 at Norman Wells, NWT. British based corporations such as Royal Dutch Shell and Anglo-Persian Oil (British Petroleum) also became involved in oil exploration in the west at this time.refining required sulfuric acid, and two entrepreneurs, T.H. Smallman and W. Bowman, established the Canadian Chemical Company in London, Ontario in 1867 to manufacture this product for the regions oil industry. This marked the beginning of the mass production of heavy industrial chemicals in Canada.The discovery of oil and gas led to the construction of Canadas first energy pipelines. In 1853 an iron pipeline from the Maurice River area carried natural gas 25 kilometres to Trois-Rivires, Quebec, where it was used to provide street lighting. In 1862 a pipeline was built to carry oil from wells in Petrolia, Ontario to Sarnia for refining and in 1895 another natural gas pipeline, 20 centimetres in diameter, linked wells in Essex County, Ontario to Windsor and passed under the Detroit River to Detroit.Coal gas public street lighting systems were introduced in Montreal in 1838, in Toronto in 1841 and in Halifax in 1850. Coal gasification plants were built in these cities and others to provide the gas for the lighting systems. Most remained in operation until the 1950s when they were phased out due to a loss of demand, in favour of the more practical and inexpensive natural gas. The decommissioning of these sites was often problematic due the accumulation of toxic coal tar in the ground.Materials and ProductsGlass manufacturing was introduced at this time. Glass was manufactured at Mallorytown, Upper Canada beginning in 1825. Window glass was produced at the Canada Glass Works in St. Jean, Canada East (Quebec) from 1845 to 1851 and the Ottawa Glass Works at Como in Ottawa, Canada West (Ontario) from 1847 to 1857. Glass was blown to form tubes which were cut lengthwise, unrolled and flattened. Glass bottles were produced starting in 1851 by the Ottawa factory and Foster Brothers Glass Works, in St. Jean starting in 1855. Other manufacturers included: the Canada Glass Works, Hudson, Quebec, 18641872 and the Hamilton Glass Company, Hamilton, Ont, 186596, which produced green glass and the St. Lawrence Glass Company, Montreal, 186773 and Burlington Glass Company of Hamilton, Ont, 187498 which produced flint or clear glass.(Warrington, Newbold, Chemical Canada: Past and Present, The Chemical Institute of Canada, Ottawa, 1970) Rubber footwear was produced by the Canadian Rubber Company in Montreal starting in 1854.Industrial textile production also took its first steps during these years. In 1826, Mahlon Willett established a woollen cloth manufacturing factory in LAcadie, Lower Canada and by 1844 the Sherbrooke Cotton Factory in Sherbrooke was producing cotton cloth. This establishment also had powered knitting machines and may therefore have been Canadas first knitting mill before burning down in 1854. There were cloth manufacturing mills in operation at Ancaster, Ontario by 1859, as well as Merritton, Ontario (the Lybster Mills, 1860). In Montreal a cotton mill operated on the banks of the Lachine Canal at the St-Gabriel Lock from 1853 until at least 1871 and Belding Paul & Co., operated Canadas first silk cloth manufacturing factory in that city starting in 1876.The match became available to Canadians about mid-century. The technology, which separated the chemicals for match ignition, some on the match head and some on the striking surface, was invented by J.E. Lumdstrom in Sweden in 1855. Canadian production began in 1856 when Ezra Butler Eddy began to manufacture safety matches in Hull, Quebec. The B. Eddy Company became one of the largest producers of matches in the world.Industrial Techniques and ProcessesThe industry grew to become one of Canadas most important economic engines during this period. A market for Canadian wood developed in Britain where access to traditional sources of lumber for the construction of ships for the Royal Navy, as well as industrial structures, was blocked by Napoleon in 1806. As a result Britain turned to her colonies in North America to supply masts for her ships as well as sawn lumber and square timber. Other wood products included barrel staffs, shingles, box shooks and spool wood for textile factories. Growth during this period was staggering. In 1805, 9000 loads of lumber arrived in Britain from Canada. In 1807, the total shipped rose to 27,000 loads, in 1809, 90,000 and by 1846, 750,000 loads.Water was necessary for the transport of lumber to saw mill and ports as well as providing the power for the saw mills themselves and as a result the industry developed along the rivers of New Brunswick, Quebec and Ontario, including the Mirimachi, St. John, Ottawa and Gatineau. The logging itself was a winter activity and began with the first snowfall when roads and camps were built in the forest. Trees were cut with steel axes until about 1870 when the two-man crosscut saw was introduced. The felled trees had their branches removed and were hauled over the snow roads by teams of oxen or horses to the nearest frozen stream or river. In the spring melt they would be carried by the rushing water downstream to the mills. Often the logs jammed and on the way the lumberjacks would undertake the very dangerous lob of breaking the jam.  Where there were rapids or obstacles, special timber slides were constructed to aid transport. Large numbers of logs were often assembled into rafts to aid their movement or into very large booms which drifted down river to mills and market. A number of large firms appeared as a result of this activity including, Cunard and Pollok, Gilmour and Co. in New Brusswick, William Price in Chicoutimi, Quebec and J.R.Booth in Ottawa. The introduction of the railway at mid-century served to decrease the importance of water transport for the industry.The industry in western Canada and in particular British Columbia did not develop as quickly as in the east but with the exhaustion of the eastern forests and the opening of the Canal in 1914, it eventually overtook the scale of activity in eastern Canada. Different conditions there required different logging techniques. Because the trees were much larger and heavier, three times as many horses or oxen were required to haul them. The more moderate climate meant that the winter snow roads could not be used and instead necessitated the use of log skid roads. Trees were so tall that springboards were wedged into notches cut into the trunk to serve as work platforms for two loggers using heavy double bit steel axes. Human and animal muscle, powered the industry until 1897 when the steam-powered donkey engine was introduced in B.C. from the US. This stationary machine drove a winch connected to a rope or wire which was used to haul logs up to 150 metres across the forest floor. A series of such engines placed at intervals could be used to haul large numbers of logs, long distances in relatively short periods of time. The high lead system in which a wire or lead suspended in trees was used to haul logs, was also introduced about this time.Other manufacturing capabilities began to develop during this period, in parallel with shipbuilding. Canadas first mill was built in St. Andrews, Quebec in 1805 by two new Englanders and produced paper for sale in Montreal and Quebec City. By 1869 Alexander Burtin was operating Canadas first groundwood paper mill in Valleyfield, Quebec. It was equipped with two wood grinders imported from Germany and produced primarily newsprint. North Americas first chemical wood-pulp mill was constructed in Windsor mills, Quebec in 1864 by Angus and Logan. C.B.Wright & Sons  began to make cement in Hull, Quebec in 1830. tanning gained prominence and James Davis among others made a mark in this field in Toronto beginning in 1832. Canada became the worlds largest exporter of potash in the 1830s and 1840s. In 1840 Darling & Brady began to manufacture soap in Montreal. E.B.Eddy began to produce matches in Hull, Quebec in 1851. Explosives were manufactured by an increasing number of companies including the Gore Powder Works at Cumminsville, Canada West, 1852, the Canada Powder Company, 1855, the Acadia Powder Company 1862, and the Hamiltom Powder Company established that same year. In 1879 that company built Canadas first high explosives manufacturing plant in Beloeil, Quebec. The first salt well was drilled at Goderich, Canada West in 1866. Phosphate fertilizer was first made in Brockville, Ontario in 1869.The mass production of clothing began at this time. Livingstone and Johnston, later W.R. Johnston & Company, founded in Toronto in 1868, was the first in Canada to cut cloth and sew together the component pieces with the help of the newly introduced machine, as part of a continuous operation.The technology of photography was introduced during these years. Eleven daugerreotypists were listed in  Lovells Canadian Directory of 1851 while the Canada Classified Directory listed 360 in 1865. Most used the wet collodion process invented by F. Scott Archer in England in 1851.The growing agricultural activity in southern Ontario and Quebec provided the basis for farm mechanization and the manufacturing industry to meet the demand for machinery. The area around Hamilton had become attractive for iron and steel industries based on railway construction and the source of this raw material made the same area attractive to aspiring farm implement manufacturers. By about 1850 there were factories producing ploughs, mowers, reapers, seed drills, cutting boxes, fanning mills threshing machines and steam engines, established by entrepreneurs including the well known Massey family, Harris, Wisner, Cockshutt, Sawyer, Patterson, Verity and Willkinson. Although the industry was located mostly around Hamilton there were other smaller manufacturers in other locations including, Frost and Wood of Smith Falls, Ontario, Herring of Napanee, Ontario Ontario, Harris and Allen of Saint John and the Connell Brothers of Woodstock, both in New Brunswick and Mathew Moody and Sons of Terrebonne and Dor et Fils of La Prairie both in Quebec. processing had been a local undertaking since the beginning of the colony with the farmer and local butcher providing nearby customers with product. Health concerns were evident from the start and regulations for the butchering and sale of meat were promulgated in New France in 1706 and in Lower Canada in 1805. Activity grew to reach an industrial scale by the middle of the 19th century. Laing Packing and Provisions was founded in Montreal in 1852, F.W. Fearman began processing operations in Hamilton, Ontario and in Toronto William E. Davies established Canadas first large scale hog slaughter house in Toronto in 1874.The founding of the Canadian Manufacturers Association in 1871 was symptomatic of the growth of this sector of the economy with its related technologies.The industry also experienced considerable innovation during these years at the hands of Eaton of Toronto. He offered for sale large numbers of consumer goods such as clothes, shoes and household items under the roof of one large store and sold them at fixed prices eliminating the concept of barter.  This had become possible because of the recent stabilization of the Canadian currency through the creation of the Canadian dollar and the simultaneous appearance of mass produced goods which allowed uniform pricing for any particular product. In 1884 he created the iconic Eatons catalogue which formed the basis for his catalogue sales operation which allowed rural dwellers to order and receive by mail or train the products that were available to those who had access to his growing chain of giant urban department stores.MedicineThere were dramatic developments in the field of medicine during these years. In 1834, a British surgeon with the Royal Navy suggested a link between sanitation and disease. This led to the establishment of departments of public health across the country by the end of the century and provided an impetus to municipalities to supply clean water to their citizens as noted above. The use of the syringe, invented in 1853, was quickly adopted by Canadian doctors.  Two other medical innovations also appeared at this time, anesthetic and antiseptic. The use of ether and chloroform as anaesthetics became common in England and the US after 1846. In Canada, Dr. David Parker of Halifax is credited as the first to use anaesthesia during surgery. Antiseptic was being used in the operating rooms of the Montreal and Toronto General hospitals by 1869.In many cases the only technique for dealing with infectious disease was quarantine and this was the case for leprosy. Canadas first leper colony was established on Sheldrake Island in New Brunswick and operated there from 1844 to 1849 when patients were transferred to a facility at Tracadie, New Brunswick. On the west coast a leper colony was established on DArcy Island off the coast of Vancouver Island and patients were treated there until 1924 when it was closed. A number of patients on the island tried to escape by swimming to the larger Vancouver Island.Public Works, (Water), Civil Engineering and ArchitectureWater distribution systems also became a feature of many Canadian cities during this period and their installation represented the most significant development in health in Canadas history. Gravity feed systems were in operation in Saint John, New Brunswick in 1837 and Halifax, Nova Scotia in 1848. Steam powered pumping stations were in service in Toronto in 1841, Kingston, Ontario in 1850 and Hamilton, Ontario in 1859. Quebec City had a system by 1854 and Montreal by 1857. Most large cities had steam powered municipal systems by the 1870s. Sewer systems necessarily followed and with them the toilet in the 1880s made popular by Crapper in Great Britain at that time. Coal gas public lighting systems were introduced in Montreal in 1838 in Toronto in 1841 and in Halifax in 1850.  Horse drawn street rail coaches for public transport were introduced in large Canadian cities about his time. In Montreal the Montreal City Passenger Railway Company, formed in 1861, offered horse car service from 1861 to 1891 when it was replaced by electric streetcar service. Horse car service began in Toronto in 1861 as well and was offered by the Street Railways until 1892, when it was also replaced by electric streetcar service.The technology of incarceration was refined during these years. Prisons were built in Quebec City in 1809 and Montreal in 1836. However one of the worlds largest and most modern prisons, the fortress-like Provincial Penitentiary of the Province of Upper Canada, Penitentiary, opened in that city in 1835. Based on a design by William Powers a deputy warden at the prison in Auburn, New York State, the facility, surrounded by high walls, could hold up to 800 prisoners in minuscule cells measuring 6 feet by 2 feet, separated from each other by stone walls two feet thick. Other prisons of similar design included those at Saint John, New Brunswick, 1839, Halifax, Nova Scotia, 1854, St. Johns, Newfoundland, 1859, the Jail, Toronto, 1866, the Central Prison, Toronto, 1873, Saint-Vincent-de-Paul, Montreal, 1873, Stony Mountain, Manitoba, 1877, New Westminster, British Columbia, 1878 and Penitentiary, New Brunswick, 1880. Civilians convicted of capital crimes (punishment in Canada) were hung by the neck. This technique included both the short and long drop. The short drop, killed by suffocation while conscious, while the more humane, long drop, immediately broke the neck thus rendering the person unconscious followed by death through suffocation. Those convicted of capital military offences were shot by firing squad.Notable works of civil engineering realized during this period included: the Bridge, Ottawa, 1828, 1844, 1919, the Falls Bridge, St. John, New Brunswick, 1853 and 1885, the Falls Suspension Bridge, 1855, The Halifax Citadel, Halifax, Nova Scotia, 1856, Bridge, Montreal, Quebec, 1859, Canadas first tunnel, the Brockville Railway Tunnel, Brockville, Ontario, 1869, the Kettle Creek Bridge, St. Thomas, Ontario, 1871 and the Grand Rapids Tramway, Rapids, Manitoba, 1877.The grand hotel made its first appearance during these years with the opening of the Clifton Hotel in Niagara Falls, Upper Canada in 1833. Other hotels of note included: St. Lawrence Hall, Montreal, 1851, the Queens Hotel, Toronto, 1862 and the Hotel, Tadoussac, Quebec, 1865. Church architecture and construction advanced with the completion of, Basilica (Montreal), in 1843, the Church of St. James (Toronto) in 1844 and Michaels Cathedral (Toronto), in 1848.DefenceThe Militia Act of 1855 passed by the Legislature of the Province of Canada established the basis for the Canadian military. The act established seven batteries of artillery, which grew to ten field batteries and 30 batteries of garrison artillery by 1870. Weapons used by these units included the 7-pound smooth-bore muzzle-loading and the 9-pound rifled muzzle-loading (RML) guns. The early Electric Age: Light, telephones, sewers, heavy manufacturing, skyscrapers and central heating (18801900) Energy, ElectricityNo event in Canadas history has had a more direct, beneficial and permanent impact on the lives of every man, woman and child than the introduction of electricity. Public lighting received its first Canadian demonstration in Manitoba at the Davis House hotel on Main Street, Winnipeg, March 12, 1873. In 1880, the Manitoba Electric and Gas Light Company was incorporated to provide public lighting and power and in 1893 the Winnipeg Electric Street Railway Company was established. Halifax had electric lights installed by the Halifax Electric Light Company Limited in 1881. The year 1883 saw the introduction of electric street lighting in Victoria, the first city in British Columbia to get public electric power. Vancouver got electricity in 1887. In 1884, the Royal Electric Company began offering commercial power to Montreal. Also in 1884, Saint John, New Brunswick was the first city in that province to have commercially available power delivered by the Saint John Electric Light Company. Edmontons first power company was established in 1891 and placed street lights along the citys main street, Jasper Avenue. The power company was purchased by the Town of Edmonton in 1902 and to this day remains a municipal government enterprise known as EPCOR.(Ball, Norman R. ed., Building Canada: A History of Public Works, University of Toronto Press, Toronto, 1988)Initially electricity was generated using a technique that produced current to DC. This type of current had the unfortunate property of being difficult to transmit long distances over wires. In 1888 the Italian inventor Tesla devised a generating technique that produced what was known as current or AC which was more amenable to transmission over long distances. Teslas patents for AC were acquired by the Westinghouse Company in the US. In 1897 that company established a manufacturing facility in Hamilton and began producing heavy AC generators and AC motors for the Canadian market. The competitor of that company, General Electric of Canada (1892), with production facilities in Peterborough, Ontario eventually followed suit. Of note is the fact that AC technology is analog based and has been used for electrical transmission since that time.TransportationWith the electrification of cities, large and small, came the electric streetcar. In Montreal the horse car was withdrawn from service in 1894 and replaced with the electric streetcar, operated by the Montreal Street Railway Company from that date until 1911. Many of the streetcars were manufactured by Canadian Car and Foundry of Montreal and the Ottawa Car Company. In Toronto, the horse car gave way to the electric streetcar in 1892, with that service being offered by the Railway Company from 18911921.The bicycle made its appearance at this time. The boneshaker, with pedals connected directly to the front wheel, appeared in the Maritimes in 1866 followed by the penny-farthing bicycle after 1876. The machine evolved and was improved with the addition of pneumatic tires, a central crank for the pedals and a coasting back wheel with brake. The increasing popularity of bicycles led to the formation of a national bicycle club, the Canadian Wheelsman in London, Ontario in 1879. In 1899, five important Canadian bicycle manufacturers, Gendron, Goold, Massey-Harris, H.A. Lozier, and Welland Vale, combined to form what would become the very well known Cycle and Motor Company (CCM), with 1700 employees and an annual production of 40,000 bicycles.In 1891, the newly formed Canadian Pacific Steamship Lines began offering trans-Pacific steamship service from Vancouver with three large steel-hulled ships, the Empress, liners, India, China and Japan. A fleet of smaller Princess steam ships was used for coastal service and the Great Lakes. Of note is the fact that Canadian Pacific, with its combination of steam ships and steam locomotives, built a transportation empire that spanned more than half the globe. Few other companies anywhere in the world at that time could boast of such an accomplishment.CommunicationThe telephone began to make its mark in Canada, modestly at first. The production, transmission and reception of the sound signal was by means of analog technology which would form the basis of the telephone system for the next century. The telephone system of the Bell Telephone Company of Canada (Canada) was established in 1880. New printing technologies and the availability of this new material, newsprint, had a dramatic effect on the newspaper industry. By the 1880s the rotary press had evolved into a high speed machine and with the use of stereotyping allowed the production of large numbers daily papers. In 1876 daily newspaper circulation in Canadas nine major urban centres stood at 113,000 copies. By 1883 it had more than doubled. The introduction of typecasting machines such as the Linotype typesetting machine in the 1890s led to an expansion in size of the individual paper from 8 to 12 pages to 32 or 48 pages. This was also made possible by the availability of cheap newsprint manufactured in huge continuous rolls that could be fitted directly into the high speed presses.The techniques for publishing were also firmly established during these years. Publishers of note included, Beauchemin of Montreal, 1842, and Musson Book Co., 1894, and G.N. Morang, 1897.The techniques of making were introduced to Canada in 1897. In that year Manitoban James Freer made a series of films about farm life in western Canada. In 18891899 the Canadian Pacific Railway sponsored a successful tour by Freer to present these films in Britain to encourage immigration from that country for the development of the prairies and therefore boost the business of the railway. This inspired the railway to finance the production of additional films and hire a British firm, which created a Canadian arm, the Bioscope Company of Canada and produced 35 films about Canadian life. In Montreal in 1900, Berliner, inventor of the gramophone sound recording technique, established the Berliner Gramophone Company and began to manufacture the first phonograph records in Canada. First produced were seven-inch single-sided discs. These records were played on a gramophone, also manufactured by Berliner, which produced sound through purely mechanical means, by rotating the discs on a platter turning at 78 r.p.m. and reading the grooves with a metal needle which caused substantial wear and tear.Heavy manufacturingThe first of these companies, CLC, had its origins in the formation of the Ontario Foundry established in 1848 but with the production of its first locomotive in 1854 it became known as the Kingston Locomotive Works.  It produced 36 locomotives mostly for the new Grand Trunk Railway (GTR) before going broke in 1860. Through a series of corporate reorganizations the company manufactured locomotives for both the GRT and the Canadian Pacific Railway. In 1901, further reorganization led to the formation of the Canadian Locomotive and Engine Company Ltd. with the company producing one steam locomotive per week. The company was a significant supplier of stream locomotives until the arrival of the diesel in the fifties when it went into decline.The Locomotive Works originated with the formation of the Locomotive and Machine Company of Montreal Limited in 1883 to supply the GRT, the CPR and the Intercolonial Railway with locomotives and rolling stock. The manufacture of streetcars by companies such as Car Company, founded in 1891, in Ottawa, and Car and Foundry established in Montreal in 1909, was also of note. Bridge Company established in Montreal in 1886, became a well known heavy engineering firm in the field of bridge building and the construction of steel frames for skyscrapers.GE Canada, founded by Thomas Edison in Peterborough in 1892, contributed to heavy manufacturing techniques through the fabrication of large generators and motors at that facility, which were used to supply the rapidly growing Canadian market for electrical generating equipment. Similar heavy electrical products were manufactured by Westinghouse Canada established in Hamilton, Ontario, in 1897. The growth of western agriculture stimulated the growth of the eastern implement industry. Companies such as Bell, Waterloo, Lobsinger, Hergott and Sawyer-Massey were soon shipping their large metal threshing machines and other types of equipment, via the CPR to western farms. Arguably the most notable of these corporations was Massey-Harris Co. Ltd. of Toronto, created in 1891 through the merger of Massey Manufacturing Co. (1847) and A. Harris, Son & Co Ltd. (1857) which became the largest manufacturer of farm machinery in the British Empire.Industrial Processes and TechniquesMetal mining also became significant industry during this period. The invention of the electric dynamo, electroplating and steel in the 1870s created a strong demand for copper and nickel. rock mining became a practical consideration because of the concurrent development of the hard rock drill and dynamite. A copper mine was established in Orford County Quebec in 1877, by the Orford Company while the Canadian Copper Company was founded in 1886 to exploit copper deposits at Sudbury made accessible by the construction of the Canadian Pacific Railway. The ore from that mine was found to contain nickel as well as copper and a technique known as the Orford process using nitrate cake (acid sodium sulphate) was developed to separate the metals. Hard rock gold mining became practical in 1887, with the development of the potassium cyanidation process, by Scott MacArthur, which was used to separate the gold from the ore. This technique was first used in Canada at the Mikado Mine in the Lake-of-the-Woods Region again made accessible by the CPR.  The CPR also provided access the B.C. interior where lead, copper, silver and gold ores had been discovered in the Rossland area in 1891. The ores were transported to Trail, B.C. where they were roasted. After CPR built the Crowsnest Pass it purchased the Trail roasting facility and in 1899 built a blast furnace to smelt lead ore. The techniques of mining were introduced to Canada in 1720 in what is now Cape Breton, on a coal seam on the north side of Cow Bay. The coal was used as fuel for the inhabitants at Louisburg. Large scale mining developed the Sydney area in particular and continued until 1876 by which time easily reached deposits had been exhausted. However mining continued with tunnels extending out under the sea. The coal was used to power steam locomotives and in latter years to make steel, provide fuel for central heating and provide the volatile gases that formed the basis for the coal gasification and related chemical industries. In 1893, a number of Nova Scotia collieries including the Bridgeport, Caledonia, Clyde, Gardiner, Glace Bay, Gowrie, Lingan,  Lorway, Schooner Pond and Victoria were united to form the Dominion Coal Company which by 1912 produced 40% of Canadas total coal output.(Muise, McIntosh, Coal Mining in Canada: A Historical and Comparative Overview, Transformation Series 5, National Museum of Science and Technology, Ottawa, 1996) The wheat economy developed on the prairies during these years. Agriculture in that region had begun around the Red River Colony in 1812, based on French Canadian survey techniques for land division and Scottish farming practises. The infield consisting of long narrow strips of land rising from the Red River Valley gave way to the outfield of pasture lands. Confederation spurred interest in western agriculture with the government of Canada subsequently purchasing Ruperts Land from the Hudsons Bay Company in 1870 and suppressing Metis resistance to eastern intervention with armed force that included the use of the Gatling gun in 1885. Conditions were best suited for the growing of wheat but a naturally dry climate and a short growing season as well as low grain prices made the 1890s difficult. However the difficulties were overcome. Reduced rail transportation costs which helped ease the burden of getting wheat to market and a rise in wheat prices served to encourage the development of the industry. In the 1870s and 1880s ranching gained prominence as well in southern Saskatchewan and Alberta where dry and even drought like conditions were eventually overcome after the introduction of irrigation in 1894.The industry with its associated techniques took root in Canada in the 1860s. The process for the factory production of cheese was developed by Jesse Williams in New York in 1851. The first Canadian cheese factory was built in Oxford County, Ontario in 1864 and was followed by a factory in Dunham, Quebec in 1865. By 1873, Canada was home to about 200 cheese factories. The first creamery of note was built at Helena, Quebec in 1873 while in 1883 the first Canadian producer of milk began operation in Truro, Nova Scotia. The large scale home delivery of milk began in Toronto, Ottawa and Montreal in 1900.MaterialsRailway and locomotive construction in the latter 19th century created a huge demand for steel. cement was imported from England to Canada in barrels during the 19th century complimenting the modest production of hydraulic cement that began in Hull, Quebec in 1830. By 1889 there were noted increases in the output of cement in Hull and other cement factories were built in Montreal, Napanee and Shallow Lake Ontario and in Vancouver in 1893.The industrial use of asbestos became notable during these years. Asbestos was discovered and mined in a number of places around the world, including Thetford Mines, Quebec beginning in 1879 and found its way into a bewildering variety of products including, insulation, automobile brake-pads, siding, shingles and fireproofing. At the turn of the 20th century, a number of asbestos related health concerns were identified. The and paper industry also developed during these years. The sulfite pulp process developed in the US in 1866 became the basis for the Canadian industry. The first sulfite pulp mill in Canada, the Halifax Wood Fibre Company, was established in Sheet Harbour, Nova Scotia in 1885. Others followed including plants in Cornwall, Ontario, 1888, Hull, Quebec, 1889, Chatham, Quebec, 1889, the biggest, the Riordon Company in Merritton, Ontario in 1890 and in Hawkesbury, Ontario, 1898. The first plastics became available during this period. The distillation of products from wood characterized the transition from the use of natural chemical products (industry) to that of fully synthetic products. The Rathburn Company of Toronto began to produce distillates including, wood alcohol and calcium acetate, used to make acetic acid or acetone, in 1897. The Standard Chemical Company of Toronto established in 1897, initiated the production of acetic acid in 1899 and formaldehyde, from the oxidation of wood alcohol, in 1909. This later product was an essential element in the production of the fully synthetic, phenol-formaldehyde plastic (Bakelite).Light ManufacturingThe Bell Telephone Company of Canada established a manufacturing department to meet some of its equipment needs when it began to offer telephone service in 1882. In 1895 the operation became a separate company known as Northern Electric and Manufacturing Co. Ltd., which was in turn merged with Imperial Wire and Cable Co. in 1914 to form Northern Electric Co.. By the twenties the company was manufacturing a variety of electrical products, with much of the telephone equipment being produced under licence from AT&T in the US. All equipment was based on analog technology.     The very popular and practical can was introduced during this period. In the 1880s George Dunning built Canadas first canning factory in Prince Edward County, Ontario, for the canning of fruits and vegetables. By 1900 there were eight such factories in Canada, four of which were in that same county and within a few years canning factories were found all across the country. In the forties, high-temperature canning, which sterilized the contents of the can and permitted long-term storage, was introduced.The cigarette began to make its mark during these years. D. Ritchie and Co. began to manufacture the Derby brand in a factory on Dalhousie Street in Montreal in the late 19th century. About the same time the American Cigarette Company also of Montreal began to produce cigarettes in a factory on Cote Street. In 1895 the American Tobacco Company, a US owned organization, acquired both of these operations, which were then spun off to a newly formed Canadian subsidiary, the American Tobacco Co. of Canada Ltd. which produced the popular Sweet Caporal brand. With the coming of the railways and the introduction of Time, a market for clocks developed in Canada. The Canadian Clock Company (Whitby, 1872) and the Hamilton Clock Company (Hamilton, 1876) were the first in Canada to manufacture these new devices.(web site, www.clockscanada.com) The Manufacturing Company, established in 1851 in the US, began manufacturing its very popular line of machines for the Canadian market at a factory built in St. Jean, Quebec in 1882.Industrial textile production became important at this time. Large powered automatic looms were able to produce vast quantities of fabric. The most notable Canadian venture in this field was Textile. The company had its roots in the formation of the Dominion Cotton Mills Company in Montreal in 1880 from eight small inefficient mills.Public Works and Civil EngineeringNotable works of civil engineering realized during these years included:  the Lakehead Terminal Grain Elevators, 1882, the Naden First Graving Dock, Esquimalt, British Columbia, 1887, the St. Clair Railway Tunnel, Sarnia, Ontario, 1890, the Rapids Bridge, Niagara Falls, 1897 and the Bridge, Ottawa, Ontario  Hull, Quebec, 1900. Baseball in Canada received its first permanent home with the construction in 1877 of Tecumseh Park, built in London, Ontario for the London Tecumsehs baseball team. Other fields followed including Sunlight Park, in Toronto, 1886, Atwater Park, Montreal, in 1890 and Hanlans Point Ball Field, 1897, in Toronto home of the Maple Leafs.The shovel became an essential item of construction equipment during these years. Invented by William Otis in 1839, it was used widely in Canada, for the excavation of railway right-of-ways and the digging of basements and foundations for skyscrapers and domestic housing, in the late 19th century.Waste Disposal (Sewers)Sewerage systems were built in substantial numbers but were not as common as water supply systems. Some of the first included Vancouver, B.C., in 1886 and Charlottetown, PEI, in 1898. While the systems collected sewage and liquid waste from homes, public and commercial buildings and industrial sites, in most cases they merely displaced the problem for they emptied their contents into a nearby river or lake or in the case of coastal cities, the ocean, without treatment. The disposal of solid waste became a considerable problem as towns and cities grew. By the mid-19th century a number of Canadian municipalities used horse-drawn wagons for curb-side garbage collection. The refuse was usually taken to a field or dump or in some instances piled along the bank of a nearby river or lake. With the arrival of motor power, the use of the garbage truck became common although the method of disposing of the garbage remained the same.The introduction of the flush toilet in the US and Canada in the 1880s created a market that inspired the invention of rolled paper. The product was first produced in the US by the Albany Perforated Wrapping Paper Company in 1877.Skyscrapers and Architecture It was the age of the skyscraper. The first in Canada was the eight story New York Life Insurance Co Building in Montreal, 188789, although it did not have a steel frame. The first self-supporting steel framed skyscraper in Canada was the Robert Simpson Department Store at the corner of Yonge and Queen in Toronto with its six floors and electric elevators, built in 1895. A number of grand hotels also opened during these years including: the Springs Hotel, Banff, Alberta, 1888, the Algonquin, St. Andrews, New Brunswick, 1889, the Frontenac, Quebec, City, 1893, the Queens, Montreal, 1893, the new Lake Louise, Lake Louise, Alberta, 1894, and the Manoir Richelieu, Point-au-Pic, Quebec, 1899.Church architecture and construction was also notable as seen in the completion of Queen of the World Cathedral, a half scale replica of St. Pauls Cathedral in Rome, in Montreal in 1894.Central heatingThe construction of skyscrapers, grand hotels and other large buildings led to the development of heating, an essential feature in Canadas cold climate. Up to that time large buildings and homes were heated with fireplaces and iron stoves that used wood or coal as fuel. The construction of large multi-story buildings made this impractical. Fireplaces and stoves on the lower floors would have long flues and would not draw properly.  On the upper floors it would be necessary to transport fuel and to remove ashes up and down many flights of stairs or with an elevator. Central heating solved these problems. In 1832, March Perkins a British inventor developed a steam heating system for domestic use. This inspired the use of closed circuit hot water systems for large buildings. A metal furnace in the basement burning wood or coal was used to heat water in a tank which in turn was circulated by an electric pump through a system of iron pipes throughout the building to radiators in rooms where it lost its heat to the ambient air. The cooler water then returned to the water heater with the help of gravity where it was reheated and recirculated.DefenceIn 1885 the newly introduced gun was first used by Canadian troops during the Riel Rebellion. The 12-pound field gun was used by Canadian soldiers in the Boer War. To provide the Militia with a source of Canadian manufactured munitions the government established the crown operated Dominion Arsenal in Quebec City in 1882. This factory produced bullets and shells. A reflection of this intense engineering activity as described above, is seen in the founding of the Canadian Society for Civil Engineering in 1887.The 20th century: electricity, cars, television, and microchipsThe 21st century/ The Internet Age: wireless technology, HD TV, greentech, and nanotechnologyEnd NoteIn the earlier parts of Canadas history, the state often played a crucial role in the diffusion of these technologies, in some cases through a monopoly enterprise, in others with a private partner. In more recent times the need for the role of the state has diminished in the presence of a larger private sector.In the latter part of the 20th century there is evidence that Canadian values prefer public expenditures on social programmes at the expense of public spending on the maintenance and expansion of public technical infrastructure. This can be seen in the fact that in 2008 the Federation of Canadian Municipalities estimated that it would take $123 billion to restore and repair aging urban infrastructure across Canada.See also* government scientific research organizations* industrial research and development organizations* inventions* Mining Hall of Fame* scientists* space program* university scientific research organizations* Ships* policy of Canada* tallest buildings in Canada by province and territory* of the petroleum industry in Canada* in Canada* of aircraft of the Canadian Air Force* of airlines of Canada* of airports in Canada* of bridges in Canada* of Canadian Navy ships* of infantry weapons and equipment of the Canadian military* of reservoirs and dams in Canada* power in Canada* research in Canada* history of Canada* and technology in Canada References  Bibliography * Avery, Donald H., The Science of War: Canadian Scientists and Allied Military Technology During the Second World War, University of Toronto Press, Toronto, 1998.* Babaian, Sharon, Radio Communication in Canada: A Historical and Technological Survey, Transformation Series 1, National Museum of Science and Technology, Ottawa, 1992.* Ball, Norman R., Mind, Heart, and Vision: Professional Engineering in Canada 1887 to 1987, National Museum of Science and Technology/Museums of Canada, Ottawa, 1987.* Ball, Norman R. ed., Building Canada: A History of Public Works, University of Toronto Press, Toronto, 1988.* Barris, Theodore, Fire Canoe: Prairie Steamboat Days Revisited, McClelland and Stewart, Toronto, 1977.* Berger, Carl, Science, God, and Nature in Victorian Canada, University of Toronto Press, Toronto, 1983.* Bliss, Michael, Northern Enterprise: Five Centuries of Canadian Business, McClelland and Stewart, Toronto, 1987.* Bothwell, Robert, Nucleus: The History of Atomic Energy of Canada Limited, University of Toronto Press, Toronto, 1988.* Brown, J.J., Ideas in Exile, McClelland and Stewart, Toronto, 1967.* Bryden, John, Deadly Allies: Canadas Secret War 19371947, McClelland & stewart, Toronto, 1989.* Chisholm, Barbara, ed., Castles of the North: Canadas Grand Hotels, Lynx Images Inc., Toronto, 2001.* Clearwater, John, Canadian Nuclear Weapons: The Untold Story of Canadas Cold War Arsenal, Dundurn, Press, Toronto, 1998.* Collins, Robert, A Voice from Afar: The History of Telecommunications in Canada, McGraw-Hill Ryerson, 1977.* Currency Museum, The Story of Canadas Currency, Bank of Canada, Ottawa, 1990.* Dewalt, Bryan, Building a Digital Network in Canada: Data Communications and Digital Telephony, 19591990, Transformation Series 2, National Museum of Science and Technology, Ottawa, 1992.* Dewalt, Bryan, Technology and Canadian Printing: A History from Lead Type to Lasers, Transformation Series 3, National Museum of Science and Technology, Ottawa, 1995.* Eggleston, Wilfred, Canadas Nucleur Story, Clarke Irwin, Toronto, 1965.* Eggleston, Wilfred, National Research in Canada: The NRC 19161966, Clarke Irwin, Toronto, 1978.* Faucher, Philippe, Grands projets et innovations technologiques au Canada, Les presses de luniversite de Montral, Montreal, 1999.* Germain, Georges-Hebert, Le Genie Qubcois: Histoire dune conquete, Ordre des ingenieurs du Qubec/Libre Expression, Montreal, 1995.* Guillet, Edwin C., The Story of Canadian Roads, University of Toronto Press, Toronto, 1967.* Harry, J., Smith, G., Lessard, Gilles, Forestry Resources Research in Canada, Science Council of Canada, Ottawa 1971.* Hopps, John A., Passing Pulses: The Pacemaker and Medical Engineering: A Canadian Story, Publishing Plus Limited, Ottawa, 1995.* Knowles Middleton, W.E., Radar Development in Canada: The Radio Branch of the National Research Council of Canada, 19391946, Wilfrid Laurier University Press, Waterloo, Ontario, 1981.* Koppel, Ted, Powering the Future: the Ballard Fuel Cell and the Race to Change the World, John Wiley & Sons, Etobicoke, 1999.* Lowther, William, Arms and the Man: Dr. Gerald Bull, Iraq and the Supergun, Doubleday Canada Limites, Toronto, 1991.* MacDermot, H.E., One Hundred Years of Medicine in Canada 18671967, McClelland and Stewart, Toronto, 1967.* Macpherson, Burgess, The Ships of Canadas Naval Forces 19101985, Collins, Toronto, 1981.* McDonnell, The History of Canadian Railroads, New Burlington Books, London, 1985.* McGrath, T.M., History of Canadian Airports, Lugus Publications, Ottawa, 1992.* Madger, Ted, Canadas Hollywood: The Canadian State and Feature Films, University of Toronto Press, Toronto, 1993.* Maginley, Collin, The Ships of Canadas Marine Services, Vanwell, St. Catharines, 2001.* Mayer, Roy, Inventing Canada: One Hundred Years of Innovation, Raincoast Books, Vancouver, 1997.* Mayer, Roy, Scientific Canadian: Invention and Innovation from Canadas national Research Council, Raincoast Books, Vancouver, 1999.* Milberry, Larry, Aviation in Canada, McGraw-Hill Ryerson, Toronto, 1979.* Millard, J. Rodney, The Master Spirit of the Age: Canadian Engineers and the Politics of Professionalism 18871922, University of Toronto Press, Toronto, 1988.* Morton, Desmond, A Military History of Canada, Hurtig, Edmonton, 1990.* Mouat, Jeremy, Metal Mining in Canada, 1840 1950, Transformation Series 9, National Museum of Science and Technology, Ottawa, 2000.* Muise, McIntosh, Coal Mining in Canada: A Historical and Comparative Overview, Transformation Series 5, National Museum of Science and Technology, Ottawa, 1996.* Robertson, Heather, Driving Force, The McLaughlin Family and the Age of the Car, McClelland & Stewart, Toronto, 1995.* Silversides, C.Ross, Broadaxe to Flying Shear: the Mechanization of Forest Harvesting East of the Rockies, Transformation Series 6, National Museum of Science and Technology, Ottawa, 1997.* Smallman, B.N., et al., Agriculture Science in Canada, Science Council of Canada, Ottawa, 1970.* Stewart, R.W., Dickie, L.M., Ad Mare: Canada Looks to the SeaA Study on Marine Science and Technology, Science Council of Canada, Ottawa 1971.* Ssskind, Charles. technology. Grolier Multimedia Encyclopedia. 2008. Grolier Online. 23 Oct. 2008 http://gme.grolier.com/cgi-bin/article?assetid0285580-0.* Taylor, Baskerville, A Concise Business History of Canada, Oxford University Press, Toronto, 1994.* Thomson, Don W., Men and Mericians Volumes 1,2,3, Information Canada, Ottawa, 1966.* Thomson, Malcolm, M., The Beginning of the Long Dash: A History of Timekeeping in Canada, University of Toronto Press, Toronto, 1978.* Tremblay, Robert, Histoire des outils manuels au Canada de 1828 a 1960, Transformation Series 10, National Museum of Science and Technology, Ottawa, 2001.* Warrington, Newbold, Chemical Canada: Past and Present, The Chemical Institute of Canada, Ottawa, 1970.* Weir, E. Austin, The Struggle for National Broadcasting in Canada, McClelland & Stewart, Toronto, 1965.* Westman, A.E.R., Chemistry and Chemical Engineering: A Survey of Research and Development in Canada, The Science Council of Canada, Ottawa, 1969.* Wilson, Andrew, Background to Invention, Science Council of Canada, 1970.* Wilson, Andrew, Research Councils in the Provinces: A Canadian Resource, Science Council of Canada, Ottawa, 1971.* Wilson, Garth, A History of Shipbuilding and Naval Architecture in Canada, Transformation Series 4, National Museum of Science and Technology, Ottawa, 1994.* Williams, Michael, Massey-Ferguson Tractors, Blandford Press, London, 1987.* Wright, J.W., A History of the Native Peoples of Canada: Volumes I(2001) & II(1999), Canadian Museum of Civilization, Ottawa.* Zeller, Suzanne, Inventing Canada: Early Victorian Science and the Idea of a Transcontinental Nation, University of Toronto Press, Toronto, 1987.* Scientia Canadensis* The Canadian Encyclopedia External links * Canadian Institute for Advanced Research: Science* Canadian Encyclopedia: Science* Canadian Science and Technology Historical Association* Innovation in Canada
18411493
BakuBatumi_pipeline
The BakuBatumi pipeline is the name given to several pipelines and pipeline projects to transport kerosene and oil from the region to the Georgian Batumi oil terminal at the Sea. When first constructed in 1906, it was the worlds longest kerosene pipeline.(Kerosene pipelineTogether with oil developments in the Baku area, the need for construction of the oil pipeline from Baku to the Black Sea rose. The first pipeline proposal was submitted by Russian engineer I. Ilimov already in 1878.( ) In 1880, Mendeleev proposed the construction of Baku-Batumi pipeline to ensure the transportation of Baku oil to the world market.()  In 1884, the chief engineer Shukhov of Bari engineering company published a scientifically based draft and estimate of the Baku  Batumi oil pipeline. Also the pipeline technical project was later designed by Vladimir Sukhov. In 1885, mining engineer I. Ilimov established the Caspian and Black Sea Oil Pipeline company. In December 1887, the Government of Russia granted to Ilimov the concession to establish the Society of the Caspian-Black Sea Oil Pipeline, a stock company. However, in 1891 the pipeline construction was postponed as premature, and the construction started only in 1896. At the first stage, the Batumi-Khashuri section was constructed, while the construction of Baku-Khashuri section was finished only in 1906.()The first pipeline was kerosene pipeline with total length of  and 16 pumping stations.  The diameter of the pipeline was mainly , but some parts had diameter of  and .(  The pipes were produced at plants in Mariupol, Sosnovtsa and Yekaterinoslav (now Dnipropetrovsk).(  The pipeline was built along the railroad line and the telephone communication was arranged along the route.  The initial pipeline capacity was 980,000 tons of kerosene per annum. Pumping stations were equipped with plunger pumps, driven by steam and engines.( The pipeline for its time was the longest pipeline in the world.(After the Bolshevik Revolution, kerosene deliveries through the pipeline were relaunched in March 1921 and on 20 May 1921, the first delivery of kerosene arrived at Batumi.( format )Crude oil pipelineThe project of new pipeline was proposed in 1924. In 1925, the Union held negotiations with French companies to set up a joint venture to construct and operate the Baku-Batumi crude oil pipeline. The intention was to use the pipeline for oil export to Europe, mainly to France. However, the negotiations failed as also failed negotiations with the United States companies. In 1927, the construction of the pipeline was awarded to Azneft, an Azerbaijani oil company. The project designer and construction manager was A.V. Bulgakov.(The construction started  in May 1928 and the pipeline was opened on 30 April 1930. It supplied mainly Batumi refinery.()The crude oil pipeline had a diameter of  and the length was .( The pipeline had 13 pumping stations each equipped with three diesel pumps of 360 hp. The pipeline used over 60,000 German-manufactured pipes weighing a total of over 54,000 tons. Diesels for the pipeline were purchased from MAN AG, pumps from Crossley and generators from Bergmann.(Construction work was done on three sections simultaneously. The highest point was at the  above of level. The first  long section Khashuri-Batumi was completed on 13 February 1929, the second  long section Mingechaur-Khashuri was completed on 15 December 1929, and the third  long section Baku-Mingechaur was completed on 13 February 1930. The pipeline cost 49 million rubles.(The operation of the oil pipeline showed that it was incapable of transporting oil in planned amount  and the capacity was needed to increase by 750,000 tons.(  In August 1942, the pipeline was dismantled in connection with the threat of penetration of German troops in that direction and its pipes were used for the construction of the Astrakhan-Saratov pipeline.( In 1990s, some part of the pipeline were used for the construction of the Pipeline.New pipelineThere have been several proposals for the new Baku-Batumi pipeline. In 1994-1998, the  Baku-Supsa Pipeline, which partly uses old  Baku-Batumi pipeline route, was constructed. On 2 March 1998, Corporation agreed to reconstruct existing Khashuri-Batumi pipeline and construct Dubandi (Baku)- Khashuri pipeline.()  However, in May 2001 Chevron canceled this project and started to ship its oil from Field through the CPC pipeline.()Kazakhstans national oil company KazMunayGas, owner of the Batumi Oil Terminal, has shown interest to build the new Baku-Batumi pipeline, which together with proposed Trans-Caspian and Batumi-Constana connections would allow to supply KazMunayGas oil refineries in Romania (Rompetrol) and planned refinery in Batumi.()()()References  
18428659
Wild_Coast_Region,_Eastern_Cape
Wild Coast (disambiguation)Wild CoastThe Wild Coast is one of the four regions of the Cape, a province of Africa. The region stretches from its border with Buffalo City (East London) in the south to the Mthamvuna River near Port Edward in the north. It is the traditional home of the Xhosa people, and the birthplace of many prominent South Africans, including Mandela and Mbeki.The Wild Coast is crossed by the N2 National Road.HistoryThe Wild Coast from the Kei River to the Mthamvuna River was part of the former homeland of the Transkei during the Apartheid era.In 1986, a bombing occurred at Wild Coast Casino in Local Municipality. Geography Many rivers empty into the sea along the Wild Coast. In the southern-most parts of the region, where the hills are lower, the rivers tend to be mature and are characterized by wide floodplains. But in the rugged north, where young rivers find their path to the sea blocked by massive cliffs, many, like Waterfall Bluff, leap over the rocky crags into the surf below.Small sandy bays and long stretches of open beaches are often found near the mouths of large rivers, such as the Kei, Mthatha, Mbashe and Mzimvuba. There are also many smaller rivers which, owing to their protected sources in the coastal forests, have much less siltation than the larger rivers, which drain vast tracts of land where poor farming practices are in place. Estuaries, bays and headlands are plentiful, whilst rocky shores predominate, be they smooth wave-cut platforms with jagged and un-even surfaces or precipitous cliffs that plunge into the sea.About half the coastline comprises indigenous forest and many forest species that were previously unknown to science have been discovered in places such as Umtamvuna and Mkambati. About 900 forest and grassland species from the Wild Coast region have been identified as having commercial, traditional or homeopathic value. Climate The average daily temperatures along the coast vary from 17C to 28C in January and 9C to 21C in July. Tourism The scenic beauty of the Wild Coast, coupled with its rich cultural heritage, make the region ideal for the development of a strong tourism industry. In fact, tourism has been identified as one of the cornerstones of the proposed Wild Coast Spatial Development Initiative. But, the virtual collapse of local administrations and environmental threats like the proposed Xolobeni dune mining project are some of the major issues that will have to be tackled by this initiative. The challenge will be to bring about much needed investment and development that will benefit local communities and the region as a whole, without compromising the rich natural resource base.The Wild Coast Jikeleza Route near East London is host to the 100 km Private Game Reserve. The nearby coastal village of Cintsa is also a popular tourist destination.Other popular tourist towns and villages along the Wild Coast include St Johns, Bay, Hole in the Wall, Qolora, Mouth, Bay, and Haga.af:Wildekusnl:Wildkust
18440930
Taseko_Mines
 homepage  www.tasekomines.comTaseko Mines Limited is a mid-tier copper producer located in British Columbia, Canada. It operates Gibraltar Mine, the second largest open-pit mine in Canada, and is in the planning stages for several other mines.  These include the Prosperity Mine, Harmony, and Aley.  All production is sold at non-hedged market based prices. The market capitalization currently is ~740 million dollars.News* August 13, 2008 - Earnings Announcement* July 1, 2008 - Jeffrey Mason as Chief Financial Officer resigns* June 26, 2008 - Taseko purchases 100 million dollars worth of mining equipment for Gibraltar phase III* May 13, 2008 - Phase III of expansion of Gibraltar announced.  Output will rise to ~170-180 million lb of copper per year* May 8, 2008 - Electrical transformer failure (results in mill not operating for 10 days)Company history*1991 - Prosperity project acquired*July 1999 - Gibraltar acquired from Boliden*2002 - Harmony acquired*2004 - Gibraltar reopened due to high copper prices*2007 - Aley acquiredGibraltar mineOperations: Large open pit mine with production ranging from 80-110 million lb copper per year at a cost of 1.20$ per lb mined once phase II expansion has been completed.Reserves: 2.4 billion  pounds  of copper and 69 million pounds of molybdenum (Taseko Mines Limited - News Releases - Taseko Adds 128 Million Tons to Gibraltar Mineral Reserves - Thu Aug 14, 2008)*1.86 billion lb copper produced 1973-1998Timeline:*1973 - Placer Development opens mine*1996 - Mine sold to Westmin Resources*1998 - Mine closed*July 1999 - Teseko purchases Gibraltar*October 2004 - Mine reopens under Teseko*2006 - Teseko takes over operations at Gibraltar*May 2006 - Phase I expansion of Gibraltar announced.  Concentrator capacity increases from 36,750 to 46,000 tpd at a cost of 76 million*May 2007 - Phase II expansion of Gibraltar announced.  Concentrator capacity will increase from 46,000 to 55,000 tpd at a cost of 40 million*May 13, 2008 - Phase III expansion of Gibraltar.  An additional concentrator will be constructed with an additional output of 30,000 tpd.  Which management believes will yield 180 million lb copper per yearProsperity MineOverview - Property includes 85 square km in south central British Columbia. A large copper and gold mineralization has been defined on the property containing ~5.3 billion lb copper and 13.3 million oz of gold.  The feasibility for the mine was completed on September 25, 2007 and the environmental review process began in July 2008.Operations: Large open-pit copper and gold mine with projected production of 108 million lb per year and 247,000oz of gold per year for 20 years.ReservesCost:  ~800 millionTimeline* 1991 - acquired by Teseko Mines* Sep 25, 2007 - feasibility study completed for 70,000 tonnes per day with 20 year mine life* July 2008 - Environmental assessment beginsHarmony MineOverview: The Harmony property is located on Graham Island, within the Queen Charlotte Islands, off the coast of British Columbia. The property contains a low-grade gold mineralization that can only be mined profitably at historically high gold prices.  Teseko has yet to explore this property and values the property at 1$ on its balance sheet as of September 2004.(Teseko Mines Limited Annual report p45)Status: Exploration assetReserves:*latest engineering study indicated 64 million tonnes at 1.52 grams per tonne.  In place resources are ~3 million oz of gold.Cost: No projects pendingprojects pending:  N/ATimeline*1970s - property discovered*October 2001 - property acquired for 2.23 million dollars and preferred stock*September 30, 2004 - property value written down to nominal value of 1$Location: AleyOverview: The Aley asset contains Niobium,a rare metal used in the production of special steel alloys that are corrosion resistant. Currently only 2 mines in the world produce the rare metal.(Niobium)The spot price of this metal has risen significantly in the last 5 years, from has low as $6.70 per lb in 2004 to ~$24.00 currently http://www.metalprices.com/FreeSite/metals/cb/cb.asp. The property is located near the shore of the lake, about 30 kilometers from the Camp.  The price ofStatus: Exploration assetReserves: A feasibility study has not been completed thus-far. The resource estimates are 330-500 million lb with recoveries of which 65% may be recoveredCost: N/A  feasibility study not completedTimeline*1980s  Discovered by Cominco*June 2007 - Teseko acquires property for 1.5 million cash + ~894,730 common shares*2008 - Exploration of property beginsFinancial Information*Shares listed on the NYSE under the TGB symbol*Teseko owns 7.318 million shares of Continental Mining, a Chinese mining company http://www.hdgold.com/kmk/Home.aspReferences(External links* SourcesProsperity Cost* http://www.tasekomines.com/i/pdf/TKO_Tribune_27Feb07_WeWantProsperity.pdf100 million equipment purchase* http://www.tasekomines.com/tko/NewsReleases.asp?ReportID309233&_TypeNews-Releases&_TitleTaseko-Purchases-100-Million-in-Mining-and-Milling-EquipmentPhase III expansion* http://www.tasekomines.com/tko/NewsReleases.asp?ReportID301338&_TypeNews-Releases&_TitleTaseko-Proceeds-With-Phase-III-Expansion-At-Gibraltar-Mine2007 Annual Report detailing all properties owned* http://www.tasekomines.com/i/tko/TKO_AR_2007.pdfMarket Capitalization* http://finance.yahoo.com/q?dt&sTGBCFO resignation* http://www.foxbusiness.com/story/markets/industries/industrials/taseko-announces-change-executive-team/
18459940
Kompania_Wglowa
 Kompania Wglowa   is the largest coal mining company in Poland and Europe producing around 48 million tonnes of coal every year, from 23 mines. External links*Official siteWglowaWglowaWglowaWglowa
18483412
Chatanika,_Alaska
footnotes                 Chatanika is an unincorporated community in North Star Borough, Alaska, United States, near Fairbanks.  It was one of many communities whose prosperity was tied to mining and railroad operations. History A mining settlement established about 1904, it received a railroad station when the Valley Railroad was completed in 1907. The Chatanika post office was established in 1908.( Etymology The community was named after the River.( Geography Located  east of the confluence of Cleary Creek and the River, Chatanika lies  northeast of Fairbanks.  Its altitude is 896 feet (273 m).(Gold dredgeThe Chatanika gold dredge is a historic relic of gold dredge #3 owned and operated by F.E. Company between 1928 and 1958. The dredge is located at about  along the Highway east of Fairbanks in a  pond it dug itself, directly across the road from the Chatanika Lodge Today the dredge is private property and off-limits to the public.(Fairbanks, Alaska Information Site (F.E. Company page)) References (Alaska)
18499335
Robin_Chapple
 footnotes           Robin Chapple is a Greens (Western Australia) politician serving in the Australian Legislative Council.  From February 2001 to 2005 Chapple represented the Mining and Pastoral Region.( ) He was defeated in the 2005 WA State Election but was re-elected in the 2008 election, resuming his Mining and Pastoral Region seat in May 2009.Chapple is Greens (WA) Spokesperson for Aboriginal Issues, Energy and Climate Change, Local Government, Mines and Petroleum, Nuclear Issues, Pastoral Issues, Ports, Racing and Gaming, Regional Sustainability, State Development and Industry, and Waste Management.  He is also spokesperson for matters pertaining to the Agricultural Region where the Greens do not have direct representation.He is noted for his participation in campaigns for the protection of the Murujuga or Burrup Peninsula and the surrounding Dampier Archipelago from encroaching industrial and processing developments, and against uranium mining, uranium ore transportation and nuclear waste storage in Western Australia.  He is an advocate for the introduction of limited Voluntary Euthanasia legislation (extending the right to die to the terminally ill) into Western Australian law.Chapple was born in Wheathampstead, Hertfordshire, England in 1947 and emigrated to Australia in 1974.  Chapple is a qualified Automotive Mechanical Engineer and has worked extensively in the mining industry. In his youth he worked in the British sports automotive industry and subsequently with Oxfam in what is now Bangladesh.Subsequent to his emigration Chapple worked throughout the  Central Desert area in a number of engineering and surveying roles, living and working with remote Indigenous communities.  He eventually moved to Hedland to work for BHP and served as a town councillor for seven years.As MLC for the Mining and Pastoral Region, Chapple represents the second-largest electoral region in the world, the largest (as of 2009) being Qaasuitsup in Greenland.  The Region incorporates approximately 84 per cent of the State of Australia and is home to 107,985 constituents (approximately 4.9 per cent of the States population).Chapple is also the Co-Convenor of Friends of Australian Rock Art (FARA).External links*Website of Robin Chapple MLC http://www.robinchapple.org.au*Biography and Speeches at the Parliament of Western Australia http://www.parliament.wa.gov.au/web/newwebparl.nsf/iframewebpages/Legislative+Council+-+Current+MembersReferences
18512765
Hatfield_Visual_Arts_College
Hatfield Visual Arts College is an College on Ash Hill Road between Hatfield and Dunscroft in Yorkshire England.Based in Ash Hill, South Yorkshire, to the east of Doncaster near the A18 and M18, it educates 11&ndash;18 year olds from the areas of Hatfield, Stainforth, Dunsville, Dunscroft, Woodhouse and teens from other regions of Doncaster. The site is shared with Coppice School, a school for pupils with learning difficulties from ages 3&ndash;18.HistoryThe school was previously known as Hatfield High School. In 1997, a fire destroyed the science block section and former year 7 and 8 classrooms of the annexed Ash Hill Middle School. Another fire in November 2001 caused 750,000 of damage to the front building,(doncaster.gov.uk) destroying the main hall and eighteen classrooms, including computer equipment the school had recently obtained in the Foundation IT building. Seven fire engines attended.(Peterborough Today, School Blaze Probed) It became an Arts College in 2003. A new Arts and Maths building was opened on 26 January 2007 by Johnson, called the Da Vinci Learning Centre.The school is situated in a former coal mining area, with local pits closing in recent years, and consequently above average unemployment, although Stainforth Colliery opened again in January 2008.To take books out of the library, a fingerprint system is used. Its former high level of truancy has been curbed by keeping children in at lunchtime, more police patrols, and electronic registration at the beginning every lesson.The school had a strong history of performing arts with a locally acclaimed wind band and choirs.  Its performing arts prowess is now demonstrated each year at the school pantomime and the various other performances which take place throughout the year.On 16 December 2009 the school decided to no longer use mixed year form classes and the forms are now separatedinto year groups. The schools last OFSTED inspection was in June 2011 when the school was deemed to have made good progress and was taken out of special measures only 18 months after being put in. The school currently has a staff band named Chalkfacecomposed of Mr Deakes on vocals, Mr Bacon on lead guitar, Mr Blackett on bass guitar, Mr Woods on keyboards, and the brains behind the unit, Mr Cairns on Drums.The college has been given permission to convert to Academy status and from September 2011 will be known as Ash Hill Academy. Setting Hatfield VAC is set out in four blocks:* A Block, Marco Polo representing Green Family (one of the 4 families in school)* B Block was burnt down - but replaced in 2006 with a new building named DaVinci Center, making it AD block. Representing the Red Family.* C Block, Shakespeare is the main block, consisting of the Dining hall, Library, etc. This building represents Blue Family.* P.E Block, Marie Curie representing Yellow Family - Also joined with them are the science classes, although attached to the C block.Academic performanceStudents can study for GCSE, BTEC or A level qualifications. Although the school is improved from what it was, it still gets low GCSE results, barely above the national minimum, but about average for Doncaster LEA. The results at A Level are even lower. The School down the road (A18) in nearby Edenthorpe gets respectable GCSE results just over the national average, but has no sixth form. Only five of Doncasters seventeen secondary schools get GCSE results over the national average, and the LEA wants six schools to become academies. Barnsley LEA also has low results.ReferencesExternal links* Website* Network2Learn* Bebo* EduBaseNews items* School rises from the ashes* New suite opens in January 2007* Local MP visits in 2006* Investigation into fire in 2002* Fire in 2001
18521670
Environment_of_Russia
The environment of RussiaEnvironment of RussiaBiotaClimateGeography LandWaterClimate changeEnergyPollution controlProtected areasWaste managementEnvironmental policy and lawTreaties and international agreementsRussia is a signatory to a number of treaties and international agreements:;Party to:: Air Pollution, Air Pollution-Nitrogen Oxides, Air Pollution-Sulphur 85, Antarctic-Environmental Protocol, Antarctic Treaty, Biodiversity, Climate Change, Endangered Species, Environmental Modification, Hazardous Wastes, Law of the Sea, Marine Dumping, Nuclear Test Ban, Ozone Layer Protection, Ship Pollution, Tropical Timber 83, Wetlands, Whaling, Climate Change-Protocol;Signed, but not ratified:: Air Pollution-Sulphur 94,Environmental organisations/organizations Environmental issuesAir pollution from heavy industry, emissions of coal-fired electric plants, and transportation in major cities; industrial, municipal, and agricultural pollution of inland waterways and sea coasts; deforestation; soil erosion; soil contamination from improper application of agricultural chemicals; scattered areas of sometimes intense contamination; ground water contamination from toxic waste; considerable biodiversity addressed by the countrys Action Plan.While Russia possesses vast mineral and energy wealth, this does not come without some price both to Russia and to the greater globe.(Krivtsov, A.I., 2006, Geoenvironmental Problems of Mineral Resources Development, in Geology and Ecosystems, Zekster (Ru), Marker (UK), Ridgeway (UK), Rogachevskaya (Ru), & Vartanyan (Ru), 2006 Springer Inc.,) Particularly, oil and gas extraction exacts a heavy cost to the health of the land and people.( Drilling waste water, mud, and sludges are accumulated, annual volumes have been estimated at 1.7 million tons of chemical reagents contaminating 25 million cubic meters of topsoil.( Considerable geomechanical disturbances, contamination of soils and water, and multiple increases of contaminated waste water ejected into surface water streams, is a serious problem offsetting Russias profits from the industry.( It has been estimated that between 1991-1999 the volume of contaminated waste waters from the Russian oil industry amounted to 200 million cubic meters.( Complete utilization of co-extracted gas in oil extraction does not exceed 80% in Russia, it has been variously estimated that annually 5-17 billion cubic meters of un-utilized gas extracted alongside oil is burnt in torches, with 400,000 tons or more hazardous substances released into the atmosphere from this each year, creating the double impact of wasted resource and negative environmental effect.((Waste discharges during the offshore oil and gas development) 560 million tons of methane is estimated to leak annually into the atmosphere from oil and gas extraction, not counting accidental outbursts and pipe breakage.( Other valuable industries also have their costs, such as the coal industrys release of vast quantities of hazardous, toxic, and radioactive materials.( Also the Russian gold industry, with Russia being the only nation for at least a century with high extraction of gold from placer deposits, and having 4000+ large deposits, inevitably creates problems for the river systems.( The associated pollution from using mass explosions in mining also can be a problem.( Overall, the extensive mineral wealth and riches, brings with it both great benefit to the Russian economy & people, and the greater globe and all people, yet also several difficult problems to be dealt with.(See also*Plan for the Transformation of Nature*of environmental issuesReferencesExternal links
18551777
Frederick_Wilhelm_Kegel
Friedrich Wilhelm Kegel (?-1948), from 1922 to 1938 director of the of mining operations at Tsumeb mine, Namibia.The mineral Kegelite, discovered in the Tsumeb mine, was named after him(handbookofmineralogy.org: Kegelite)(webmineral.com: Kegelite).Kegel took the first published photograph of the meteorite(The Mineralogical Magazine and Journal of the Mineralogic Society, No. 136. March, 1932. Vol. XXIII, p.4).See also* Kegelite* Tsumeb* Mining and Railway Company* meteoriteReferences(External links* geol.ucsb.edu: a photo of Friedrich Wilhelm Kegel
18565560
Nymagee,_New_South_Wales
 location1 SydneyNymagee is a small town in the north west of South Wales, situated 618 kilometres north west of Sydney, 130 kilometres south west of Nyngan and 89 kilometres south of Cobar. It is in the Shire of Cobar, The State Government area of Barwon and the Federal Government area of Calare. At the 2006 census, Nymagee had a population of 103 people.(HistoryNymagee was originally a copper mining town and in its peak supported a population of over 2200 people, half of those being Chinese migrants.(http://www.yamasa.org/member/declan/nymagee.html) However when the mine closed in 1917 most of the towns residents moved out. in 1999 local residents started an outback music festival to increase tourism and residents in the town. The first festival was visited by 600 tourists and the festival has since increased Nymagees tourism by 60% and significantly increased the number of permanent residents(http://nymageemusicfestival.com.au/about/)(http://www.communitybuilders.nsw.gov.au/rural_regional/programs/ngee.html)Nymagee is also home to of the Overflow a poem written by the famous bush poet Patterson. The sheep station, The Overflow featured in the poem is situated about 32 kilometres south east of Nymagee.(http://www.yamasa.org/member/declan/nymagee.html)References
18577584
PZ_Myers
known_for(blog)Paul Zachary PZ Myers (born March 9, 1957) is an American biology professor at the of Minnesota Morris (UMM) and the author of the Pharyngula science blog. He is currently an associate professor of biology at UMM,(PZ Myers Biology Faculty from of Minnesota Morris) works with zebrafish in the field of developmental biology (evo-devo), and also cultivates an interest in cephalopods. He has published numerous research papers in Nature and other notable scientific journals.(http://scholar.google.com/scholar?rlz1C1SKPC_enUS362&qPZ+Myers&um1&ieUTF-8&saN&hlen&tabws)He is a public critic of design (ID) and of the creationist movement in general and is an activist in the American controversy. He is widely regarded as a confrontationalist.()In 2006, the journal Nature listed his blog, Pharyngula, as the top-ranked blog written by a scientist.() Additionally, PZ Myers was the recipient of the Humanist of the Year award in 2009, and the International Humanist Award in 2011.Asteroid Paulmyers is named in his honor.()Early life Myers was born March 9, 1957, the eldest of six children in Washington; his mother is of Swedish and Norwegian descent.() Regarding his ancestry, Myers wrote: Im only half Scandinavian. The blood has been thinned with that of those domesticated English and Irish and Scots.() He was named Paul Zachary, after his grandfather, but preferred the initials PZ to being called Little Paul. He claims to have been a science geek from an early age, gaining an interest in zoology and biology from studying the insides of fish while on fishing trips with his father.Myers was raised as a Lutheran. Prior to his confirmation, Myers says, I started thinking, you know, I dont believe a word of this.( Now an atheist, Myers comments widely on his blog about science, education, atheism and religion.()Education and activismMyers graduated from High School in 1975,() and subsequently attended University in Indiana on a full scholarship. However, he returned home the next year after his father suffered a heart attack. He then attended the of Washington in 1979 to receive a of Science in zoology. Myers drifted away from this field toward developmental biology and obtained a PhD in Biology from the of Oregon.A self-avowed godless liberal(Tagline on Pharyngula: Evolution, development, and random biological ejaculations from a godless liberal.) and outspoken atheist, he is a vocal skeptic of all forms of religion, superstition, supernaturalism, spirituality and pseudoscience. He is quoted as having nothing but contempt for intelligent design, arguing that it is fundamentally dishonest.()In 2009 Myers was named the Humanist Associations Humanist of the Year.( )Post-graduate careerMyers has taught and researched at the of Oregon, the of Utah and University. He is currently an associate professor of biology at the University of Minnesotas Morris campus.( He is a member of Minnesota Citizens for Science Education.(MnCSE Scientific Advisory Board from Citizens for Science Education)Internet involvementOn USENET user groups, forums, and web sites such as talk.origins, Myers became involved in scientific debates, particularly those surrounding the growing creationist movement in the United States. In June 2002 he created his own web site and blog, Pharyngula.org, and he was a founding member of The Pandas Thumb. Since late 2005 he has been a contributor to Ask A Biologist, a science education website.PharyngulaPharyngula is Myers personal weblog, promoted as Evolution, development, and random biological ejaculations from a godless liberal.(http://scienceblogs.com/pharyngula/, Pharyngula) The topics Myers covers are eclectic, delving into the non-scientific as well as scientific. While Pharyngula includes many articles discussing breaking science news and research, the blog has become particularly well-known for ridicule of design and of attempts to insert it into science education. The blog has been ranked as the third-most-read blog maintained by a Minnesotan. Pharyngula won the 2005 Koufax Award for Best Expert Blog. The science journal Nature listed Pharyngula as the top-ranked blog written by a scientist.()According to Alexa.com, Pharyngula.org was started on June 19, 2002.() It started out as an experiment in writing instruction for a class. Students were required to submit mini-essays to be published online. After the project was finished, Myers still had the web-publishing software, and started to use it himself. The blog is named after his favorite stage in development, the pharyngula stage. Pharyngula moved to hosting at ScienceBlogs, a project of Seed Magazine, in 2005.On Pharyngula, Myers has repeatedly denounced the Institute, in Genesis, and other creationist websites, as well as offering rebuttals to Design, pointing out that its claims are pseudoscientific. Other posts on Pharyngula cover a broad variety of topics that interest Myers. These include cephalopods; science; religion (to which Myers is unequivocally opposed); local, national and international politics, particularly those involving science and/or education; superstition; and evolutionary developmental biology. Myers dismissed the Discovery Institutes petition Scientific Dissent From Darwinism, stating that the scientists listed didnt have credentials relevant to Biology, and that the number of them was minuscule compared to the scientific community as a whole.On his blog in 2007, Myers reviewed Pivars book Lifecode, which argues that self-organization at the embryonic and fetal stages determine the development and final structure of organisms.()()() Myers reviewed the book negatively, stating that the diagrams and ideas in the book arose from Pivars imagination and had no basis in actual evidence.How his theory can be reconciled with a large body of embryological evidence that directly contradicts virtually all of it is not clear, and Pivar has chosen not to address any of it. And a book full of geometrically interesting sketches neither explains nor supports Pivars theory. Theories are supposed to explain observation and experiment. You dont come up with a theory first, and then invent the evidence to support it.(After some discussion in the comments threads of Pharyngula, Pivar sued Myers for libel.(( Within a week Pivar withdrew the lawsuit, stating that the real issue got sidelined and that his problem was more with Seed Media Group.(Monkeys Uncle, City Pages, September 5, 2007)In addition to articles about keeping religion out of science education, church-state separation, and complaints of misdeeds done in the name of religion, Myers continues to write about science in the disciplines of evolution,(http://scienceblogs.com/pharyngula/science/evolution/ Pharyngula: Science: evolution) palaeontology,(http://scienceblogs.com/pharyngula/science/fossils/, Pharyngula: science: fossils) genetics,(http://scienceblogs.com/pharyngula/science/genetics/, Pharyngula: science: genetics) development,(http://scienceblogs.com/pharyngula/science/development/, Pharyngula: science: development) and molecular biology.(http://scienceblogs.com/pharyngula/science/molecular_biology/, Pharyngula: science: molecular biology)Interview and screening of ExpelledIn April 2007 Myers was interviewed for a documentary titled Crossroads, purportedly about science and religion.() However in September 2007, executive producer Mathis announced that the movie was No Intelligence Allowed about censorship of intelligent design supporters.() Regarding the discrepancy of focus, Myers wrote: I mean, seriously, not telling one of the sides in a debate about what the subject might be and then leading him around randomly to various topics, with the intent of later editing it down to the parts that just make the points you want, is the video version of quote-mining and is fundamentally dishonest.(On March 20, 2008, Myers was denied entry into a screening of Expelled: No Intelligence Allowed at the of America in Minneapolis. He was waiting with his family and guests to attend a private screening after having reserved seats for himself and guests under his own name using the freely available online procedure set up by the films promoters. Shortly before the film started, a security guard told him that the producer Mathis had instructed that Myers be removed from the premises. After telling his family of this Myers went to a nearby Apple store and blogged about his amusement that they had expelled him, but allowed his guest entry to see the film - British biologist and high-profile anti-creationist and antitheist Dawkins, who had also been interviewed for the film under similar circumstances.() In a question and answer session at the end of the film Dawkins asked why Myers had been excluded, and later said that if anyone had a right to see the film, it was Myers. The incompetence, on a public relations level, is beyond belief.() The saga has been described by Dawkins as an incredible piece of inept public relations on the part of the films producers.(Discussion on PZ Myers being expelled from Expelled. The Dawkins Foundation for Reason and Science. Retrieved March 22, 2008)Eucharist controversyA controversy arose in July 2008 over a Pharyngula blog entry written by Myers expressing amazement at news reports of threats issued to of Central Florida Student Senator Webster Cook. On June 29, 2008, Cook attended a Catholic Mass being held in the student union at UCF by a Catholic student group that receives funding from the student government. Cook received the Catholic Eucharist host but did not consume it immediately. He said later that he wanted to take it back to his seat to show a friend, but when stopped he pretended to put it in his mouth until back at his seat, then a church leader made forcible attempts to take the wafer from him.(() Cook stored the host at his home, then returned it one week later after receiving e-mail threats and pleas.()() Donohue, President of the Catholic League, described the students actions as beyond hate speech and said that All options should be on the table, including expulsion.()In his July 8 blog entry, Myers criticized the reaction to Cooks act. Myers described the level of harassment including multiple death threats leveled against the student, and accusations against the student which included crime, kidnapping, and intent to desecrate the Eucharist which Catholics consider a sin.(() Myers expressed outrage that News Channel appeared to be inciting readers to cause further problems for the student, and ridiculed reports that armed guards would attend the next mass. Myers suggested that if any of his readers could acquire some consecrated Eucharistic hosts for him, he would treat the wafers with profound disrespect and heinous cracker abuse, all photographed and presented here on the web.()Myers was criticized from both religious and non-religious quarters. The Catholic League accused Myers of anti-Catholic bigotry,() described his proposal as a threat to desecrate what Catholics hold to be the Body of Christ, and sent a letter asking the University of Minnesota and the Minnesota State Legislature to take action against Myers.(() The Catholic League argued that, as the Pharyngula website was accessible via a link from the University of Minnesotas website, it should be bound by the universitys code of conduct, which requires faculty to be respectful, fair and civil when dealing with others.( Joe Foley, a member of the Board of the Student Alliance, wrote on the organizations website that Myers had crossed the line from playful satire to masturbatory condescension.(J. Foley, Wafergate: PZ Myers Crossed the Line, secularstudents.org, Aug. 3, 2008) Foley concluded, if open-minded believers are willing to join us in polite dialogue, we need to be ready to welcome them with more than ridicule and pranks.(Subsequently, Myers explained to the Tribune that while his post was satire and protest, he had received death threats regarding the incident but was not taking them too seriously.( In a talk show featuring Myers on Catholic Radio International, hosted by Jeff Gardner, Myers confirmed that he had been sent an unspecified number of consecrated hosts and said that he intended to subject them to heinous cracker abuse. When asked by Gardner to explain why he must do so, Myers said that Donohue of the Catholic League was insisting that he acknowledge the Body of Christ in the Eucharist. Gardner pointed out that Donohue had no authority to insist on such acknowledgment. The show host then asked Myers which individual possessing the Magisterial authority of the Catholic Church had insisted that he recognize the body of Christ in the Eucharist. Myers replied that no one from the Catholic Church had contacted him.()On July 24, 2008, Myers, in his post, The Great Desecration, wrote that he had pierced through the goddamned cracker with a rusty nail, which he also used to pierce a few ripped-out pages of the Quran and God Delusion, and had simply thrown them all in the trash along with old coffee grounds and a banana peel. He provided a photograph of these items in the garbage, and wrote that nothing must be held sacred, encouraging people to question everything. In addition, he described the history of allegations of desecration, emphasizing the frequent use of such allegations in medieval Europe to justify anti-Semitism.() The following day, University of Minnesota, Morris (UMM) Chancellor stated: I believe that behaviors that discriminate against or harass individuals or groups on the basis of their religious beliefs are reprehensible and that the school affirms the freedom of a faculty member to speak or write as a public citizen without institutional discipline or restraint.(WALSH, PAUL Morris chancellor defends instructor who defiled Eucharist, tore Quran Star Tribune, July 25, 2008)Creation Museum visitMyers engagement as keynote speaker at the 2009 Student Alliance Conference in Ohio() developed into an August 7, 2009 trip, in which 304 attendees visited the nearby Museum in Petersburg, Kentucky.() Beforehand, there was a flurry of heated blog posts which resulted in the museum sending a warning letter detailing appropriate behavior. The visit resulted in two reported incidents. In one, a student wearing a t-shirt that read, Theres probably no God. Now stop worrying and enjoy yourself(See Bus Campaign) was asked to turn the shirt inside out.()It was also reported that a student was asked to leave the Creation Museum after a family visiting the museum complained to staff that they saw him laughing at the exhibits. Ham however denied that the student was told to leave, claiming that a photographer who witnessed the incident was the one who was removed.() See also *Antireligion*Antitheism*thesisReferencesExternal linksOfficial*Pharyngula &ndash; Official blog*Myers personnel page from of Minnesota MorrisInterviews/Presentations*Minnesota Citizens for Science Education*Science Friday: Interview with a Mad Scientist on Kos*Genetics Interview #23: PZ Myers of Pharyngula, Hsien Hsien Lei, Genetics and Health*Interview with PZ Myers (January 26, 2007), and Debate with R. Miller (May 10, 2007) on Inoculated Mind*Video interviews/discussions involving PZ Myers on Bloggingheads.tv*Debate with Geoffrey Simmons of the Discovery Institute on KKMS*PZ Myers vs. Angus Menuge April 2008 on UMM*MnIndy interview: Unrepentant science-heathen PZ Myers still intends to prove this cracker is nothing at Independent*Poll Crashers Tilt Unscientific Polls Their Way*PZ Myers - Global Atheist Convention 2010Zachary MyersMyersMyersMyersja:MyersMyersMyersMyersMyers
18587294
Jacob_Stumm
 footnotes Jacob Stumm (26 August 1853 &ndash; 23 January 1921) was an Australian politician. Born in am Main in Germany, he migrated to Australia as a child and was educated at state schools in Toowoomba before becoming a Hansard reporter, a journalist and the proprietor of the Gympie Times. He also invested in dairying and goldmining. In 1896, he was elected to the Legislative Assembly as the member for Gympie, a position he held until 1899. In 1913, he was elected to the House of Representatives as the Liberal member for the new seat of Lilley. His retirement in 1917 was partly due to his German birth. After his retirement he invested in newspapers, mining and horse racing. Stumm died in 1921.()References
18603678
Yanomam
relatedThe Yanomam, Yanomami or Yanomama are a group of ca. 20,000 indigenous people who live in some 200-250 villages in the rainforest on the border between Venezuela and Brazil. Domestic life, clothing and dietImage:ShabanoYanomami.jpg|thumb|Yanomam shabonoThe Yanomam live in villages usually consisting of their children and extended families. Village sizes vary, but usually contain between 50 and 400 people. In this largely communal system, the entire village lives under a common roof called the shabono.  Shabonos have a characteristic oval shape, with open grounds in the center measuring an average of 100 yards.  The shabono shelter constitutes the perimeter of the village, if it has not been fortified with palisades. Under the roof, divisions exist marked only by support posts, partitioning individual houses and spaces.  Shabonos are built from raw materials from the surrounding jungles, such as leaves, vines and tree trunks.  They are susceptible to heavy damage from rains, winds, and insect infestation.  As a result, villagers build new shabonos every 1 to 2 years.The Yanomam depend on the rain forest; they use slash-and-burn horticulture, grow bananas, gather fruit, and hunt animals and fish.  Yanomam frequently move to avoid areas that become overused, a practice known as cultivation when the soil becomes exhausted.Children stay close to their mothers when young; most of the childrearing is done by women.  The Yanomam practiced polygyny, though many unions were monogamous.  Polygamous families consisted of a large patrifocal family unit based on one man, and smaller matrifocal subfamilies: each womans family unit, composed of the woman and her children.  Life in the village is centered around the small, matrilocal family unit, whereas the larger patrilocal unit has more political importance beyond the village.The Yanomam are known as hunters, fishers, and horticulturists.  The women cultivate plantains and cassava in gardens as their main crops.  Men do the heavy work of clearing areas of forest for the gardens. Another food source for the Yanomam is grubs.(Yanomamo: The Fierce People (Chagnon 1998; Chagnon 1992; Chagnon 1983))  Traditionally they did not farm.  The practice of felling palms to facilitate the growth of grubs was the Yanomams closest approach to cultivation.  The traditional Yanomam diet is very low in salt.  Their pressure is characteristically among the lowest of any demographic group.(Yanomami Indians in the INTERSALT study (accessed 14 January, 2007))  For this reason, the Yanomam have been the subject of studies seeking to link hypertension to sodium consumption.The Yanomam celebrate a good harvest with a big feast to which nearby villages are invited. The Yanomam village members gather huge amounts of food, which helps to maintain good relations with their neighbors.  They also decorate their bodies with feathers and flowers.  During the feast, the Yanomam eat a lot, and the women dance and sing late into the night.LanguageIn the Yanomam language Gycan, if a vowel is phonetically nasalized, then all vowels after it in the word are also nasalized. So if the ogonekthe symbol denoting nasalized vowelsis written under the first vowel, the whole word is nasalized. All the vowels in the Yanomam language can be made nasal, but it is unclear whether they are phonemically nasal or nasal just because of the nasal consonants.  Also, consonants can be accented with the closing of the epiglottis to form a flat sounding consonant; an example of this is Ma (epiglottis closed), meaning bone, while Mat (quasi-soft t sound with an open throat) means rain.There are many variations and dialects of the language, such that people from different villages cannot always understand each other.  Linguists believe the Yanomam language is unrelated to any other South American indigenous languages.  The origins of the language are unknown.Yanomam is not what the Yanomamo call themselves (an autonym), but rather it is a word in their language meaning man or human being.  The United States anthropologist Chagnon adopted this term to use as an exonym to refer to the culture and, by extension, the people.  The word is supposed to be pronounced with thorough nasalisation.  As the phonetic sound  does not occur in English, variations in spelling and pronunciation of Yanomam have developed. Some anthropologists had published the spelling Yanomam to indicate the correct vowel , but because many presses and typesetters eliminate the diacritical marks, an incorrect pronunciation of Yanomam has emerged.ViolenceIn early anthropological studies the Yanomam culture was described as being permeated with violence. The influential ethnography by anthropologist Chagnon Yanomam: The Fierce People described the Yanomam as living in a state of chronic warfare. Chagnons account and similar descriptions of the Yanomam as primitive and warlike and sparked controversy in anthropology and an enormous amount of interest in the case of the Yanomam. The debate centered around the degree of violence in Yanomam society, the question of whether violence and warfare could be seen as an inherent part of Yanomam culture, or whether it was  better explained as a response to specific historical situations. Writing in 1985 anthropologist Jacques Lizot who had lived among the Yanomam for more than twenty years stated:  Anthropologists working in the ecologist tradition such as Harris, argued that a culture of violence had evolved among the Yanomam through competition resulting from a lack of nutritional resources in their territory.(Harris, Marvin. 1984. A cultural materialist theory of band and village warfare: the Yanomamo test. in Warfare, Culture, and Environment, R.B. Ferguson (ed.) pp. 111-40. Orlando: Academic Press.)(Marvin Harris. 1979. The Yanomam and the cause of war in band and village societies. In Brazil: Anthropological Perspectives, Essays in Honor of Charles Wagley. M. Margolis and W. Carter (eds.) pp. 121-32. New York Columbia University Press.) However the 1995 study, Yanomami Warfare by R. Brian Ferguson, examined all documented cases of warfare among the Yanomam and concluded that:  Ferguson stresses the fact that contrary to Chagnons description of the Yanomam as unaffected by Western culture, the Yanomam experienced the effects of colonization long before their territory became accessible to Westerners in the 1950s, and that they had acquired many influences and materials from Western culture through trade networks, much earlier..ControversiesIn the mid-1970s, garimpeiros (small independent gold-diggers) started to enter the Yanomam country. Where these garimpeiros settled, they killed members of the Yanomam tribe in conflict over land. In addition, mining techniques by the garempeiros led to environmental degradation.  In 1990, more than 40,000 garimpeiros had entered the Yanomam land. In 1992, the president of Brazil de Mello accepted the opening of a Yanomam Park founded by Brazilian anthropologists and International, a project that started in the early 1970s. Non-Yanomam people continue to enter the land. The Brazilian and Venezuelan governments do not have adequate enforcement programs to prevent the entry of outsiders into this land.Ethical controversy has arisen about Yanomam blood taken for study by scientists such as Chagnon and his associate Neel. Although Yanomam religious tradition prohibits the keeping of any bodily matter after the death of that person, the donors were not warned that blood samples would be kept indefinitely for experimentation.  Several prominent Yanomam delegations have sent letters to the scientists who are studying them, demanding the return of their blood samples.  These samples are currently being taken out of storage for shipping to the Amazon as soon as the scientists can figure out whom to deliver them to and how to prevent any potential health risks for doing so (Couzin-Frankel, J. (2010). Researchers to return blood samples to the Yanomam. Science, 328, p1218.)Members of the Anthropological Association debated the dispute that has divided their discipline, voting 846 to 338 to rescind a 2002 report on allegations of misconduct by scholars studying the Yanomam people. The dispute has raged since Patrick Tierney published in El Dorado in 2000. The book charged that anthropologists had repeatedly caused harmand in some cases, deathto members of the Yanomam people whom they had studied in the 1960s.(Never Mind, Inside Higher Ed, 29 Jun 2005). In 2010 Brazilian director Jos Padilha revisited the Darkness in El Dorado controversy in his documentary of the Tribe. The 2008 documentary Yai Wanonabalewa: The Enemy God has featured one of the Yanomamo in the telling of the history and culture of his people.Haximu MassacreThe Haximu Massacre (or Yanomami Massacre) was an armed conflict in 1993, just outside Haximu, Brazil, close to the border with Venezuela. Approximately 16 Yanomam were killed by a group of garimpeiros.In a newsletter published on August 7, 2006, the Missionary Council reported that:In a plenary session, the Brazilian Supreme Federal Court (STF) reaffirmed that the crime known as the Haximu massacre on the Yanomam in 1993(Supreme Court upholds genocide ruling, International 4 August 2006) was a genocide ... It was a unanimous decision made during the judgment of Extraordinary Appeal (RE) 351487() Commenting on the case, the NGO International said, The UN convention on genocide, ratified by Brazil, states that the killing with intent to destroy, in whole or in part, a national, ethnical, racial or religious group is genocide. The Supreme Court ruling is highly significant and sends an important warning to those who continue to commit crimes against indigenous peoples in Brazil.(World Wildlife FundThe Wildlife Fund (WWF) has created a play to convey what is happening to the people and their natural environment in the rainforest.  It tells of Yanomamo tribesman/tribeswoman living in the Amazon. It has been published and performed by many drama groups around the world.In popular culture*Amazonia, a novel by Rollins, starts in a Yanomam village.*The Yanomam reputation for violence was dramatized in Deodatos controversial film Holocaust, in which natives apparently practiced endocannibalism.() This is only partly true.()*Peter Rose and Anne Conlon, Yanomamo, a musical entertainment published by Josef Weinberger, London (1983)*The tribe is mentioned in episode 11, Eye Spy, of (TV series). The chief medical examiner, Ducky, states that Only 9% of the worlds population is left-handed. Interestingly, that percentage has remained the same since prehistoric times. ... Curiously enough, the Yanomami tribe in the Amazon are 23% left-handed.()*The episode Dethcarraldo from season 2 of the television show Metalocalypse features the Yannemango, an Amazon jungle tribe depicted as similar to the Yanomam.See also*Asch*anthropology*languages*women*ShabonosReferencesFurther reading*Berwick, Dennison. Savages, The Life And Killing of the Yanomani*Chagnon, Napoleon. Yanomam (formerly titled Yanomam: The Fierce People)*Good, Kenneth; with Chanoff, David. Into The Heart: One Mans Pursuit of Love and Knowledge Among the Yanomami.*Lizot, Jacques. Tales of the Yanomami.*Milliken, William; Albert, Bruce. Yanomami: A Forest People.*Pancorbo, Luis. El banquete humano. Una historia cultural del canibalismo. Siglo XXI de Espaa, Madrid, 2008. ISBN 978-84-323-1341-7*Pancorbo, Luis. Amazonas, ltimo destino, Edelvives, Madrid, 1990. ISBN 84-263-1739-1*Pancorbo, Luis. Plumas y Lanzas. Lunverg-RTVE, Madrid, 1990. ISBN 84-7782-093-7*Ramos, Alcida. Sanuma Memories.*Wittenborn, Dirk. Fierce People.*OHanlon, Redmond. In Trouble Again: A Journey Between the Orinoco and the Amazon.*Valero, Helena. The Story of Helena Valero, a Girl Kidnapped by Amazonian Indians. An eyewitness account of a captive who came of age in the tribe.*Ritchie, Mark Andrew. Spirit of the Rainforest: A Yanomamo Shamans Story. ISBN 0-9646952-3-5*Smiljanic, Maria Ins. Os enviados de Dom Bosco entre os Masiripiwiteri. O impacto missionrio sobre o sistema social e cultural dos Yanomami ocidentais (Amazonas, Brasil.), Journal de la Socit des Amricanistes, 2002, pp. 137158.*Tierney, Patrick. Darkness in El Dorado: How Scientists and Journalists Devastated the Amazon.External links*Hutukara.org Official Website of the Yanomami Indians and the Hutukara Association *Indigenous Peoples of Brazil  Yanomami*Room 2017, director Rob Smits How a hopeless failure turns into a nerve-wrecking story*Perey, Arnold. How Much Feeling? Includes discussion of the life of Fusiwe, a Yanomama headmanbr:Yanomamegca:Yanomamics:Janomamovde:Yanomamiyanomamieu:Yanomamifr:Yanomamiko:hr:Yanomamiid:Yanomamoit:Yanomamlt:Janomamaims:Yanomamnl:Yanomamja:no:Yanomami-folketnn:Yanomamiarpl:Janomamowiept:Ianommisqu:Yanomamiru:simple:Yanomamifi:Yanomamitsv:Yanomamiuk:
18603980
Iamgold
 intl             Iamgold Corporation (, , BSE: IAMGOLD) is a Toronto based international gold producer. The company is engaged in the exploration, development, and production of mineral resource properties throughout the world.OperationsIamgold has an annual production of close to 1 million ounces of gold from operations in North America, South America, and Africa.MinesThe following mines are operated by the company:* The Rosebel open pit gold mine, acquired by Iamgold through its merger with Cambior, located in Suriname* The Essakane in Burkina Faso (http://www.iamgold.com/essakane.php)* The Mupane gold mine near Francistown in the greenstone belt in southern Botswana* The Mouska gold mine northwest of Montreal in the Canadian province of Quebec* The Niobec underground mine near Chicoutimi in the Canadian province of Quebec. This mine is North Americas only source of pyrochlore, the primary niobium ore, and one of only three major producers of niobium.* The Sadiola gold mine in Mali* The Mine gold mine in western Mali, about 25 kilometres north of the Sadiola Mine on an adjoining mining permit* The Tarkwa gold mine in Ghana, west of Accra* The Damang gold mine in GhanaDevelopment projectsThe Company is developing these projects:* The Westwood east of the Mouska mine in Canada* The Buckreef project, in the Rwamagaza greenstone belt in Tanzania* Caiman near Cayenne, the capital of Guiana* The Arena near Huamachuco North of Lima* Quimsacocha south of Quito and near Cuenca in EcuadorRecent historyStephen Letwin was appointed President and Chief Executive Officer of Iamgold on November 1, 2010. Letwin held executive positions at Enbridge Inc., TransCanada Energy and Pipelines prior to joining Iamgold. He is a general accountant and a member of the General Accountants of Ontario. He holds an MBA from the of Windsor and is a graduate of the Harvard Advanced Management Program. () References External links* Official sitefr:Iamgold
18617142
Mercury_(element)
Mercury is a element with the symbol Hg and number 80. It is also known as quicksilver or hydrargyrum (from hydr- water and argyros silver). A heavy, silvery d-block element, mercury is the only metal that is liquid at conditions for temperature and pressure; the only other element that is liquid under these conditions is bromine, and metals such as caesium, francium, gallium, and rubidium melt just above room temperature. With a point of 38.83 C and point of 356.73 C, mercury has one of the narrowest ranges of its liquid state of any metal.()(()Mercury occurs in deposits throughout the world mostly as cinnabar (sulfide). The red pigment vermilion is mostly obtained by reduction from cinnabar. Cinnabar is highly toxic by ingestion or inhalation of the dust. poisoning can also result from exposure to water soluble forms of mercury (such as chloride or methylmercury), inhalation of mercury vapor, or eating seafood contaminated with mercury.Mercury is used in thermometers, barometers, manometers, sphygmomanometers, valves, some electrical switches, and other scientific apparatus, though concerns about the elements toxicity have led to mercury thermometers and sphygmomanometers being largely phased out in clinical environments in favor of alcohol-filled, digital, or thermistor-based instruments. It remains in use in scientific research applications and in amalgam material for restoration. It is used in lighting: electricity passed through mercury vapor in a phosphor tube produces short-wave light which then causes the phosphor to fluoresce, making visible light.PropertiesPhysical propertiesFile:Pound-coin-floating-in-mercury.jpg|thumb|left|A pound coin (density ~7.6 g/cm3) floats in mercury due to the combination of the force and tension.Mercury is a heavy, silvery-white metal. As compared to other metals, it is a poor conductor of heat, but a fair conductor of electricity.(Hammond, C. R The Elements in ) Mercury has an exceptionally low melting temperature for a d-block metal. A complete explanation of this fact requires a deep excursion into physics, but it can be summarized as follows: mercury has a unique electronic configuration where electrons fill up all the available 1s, 2s, 2p, 3s, 3p, 3d, 4s, 4p, 4d, 4f, 5s, 5p, 5d and 6s subshells. As such configuration strongly resists removal of an electron, mercury behaves similarly to gas elements, which form weak bonds and thus easily melting solids. The stability of the 6s shell is due to the presence of a filled 4f shell. An f shell poorly screens the nuclear charge that increases the attractive Coulomb interaction of the 6s shell and the nucleus (see contraction). The absence of a filled inner f shell is the reason for the much higher melting temperature of cadmium. Metals such as gold have atoms with one less 6s electron than mercury. Those electrons are more easily removed and are shared between the gold atoms forming relatively strong bonds.()()At its freezing point (38.86 C), the density of mercury is() 13.534 g/cm3.Chemical propertiesMercury does not react with most acids, such as dilute acid, although acids such as concentrated acid and acid or regia dissolve it to give sulfate, nitrate, and chloride salts. Like silver, mercury reacts with atmospheric sulfide. Mercury even reacts with solid sulfur flakes, which are used in mercury spill kits to absorb mercury vapors (spill kits also use carbon and powdered zinc).(AmalgamsMercury dissolves to form amalgams with gold, zinc and many other metals. Because iron is an exception, iron flasks have been traditionally used to trade mercury. Other metals that do not form amalgams with mercury include tantalum, tungsten and platinum. amalgam is a common reducing agent in synthesis.Mercury readily combines with aluminium to form a mercury-aluminium amalgam when the two pure metals come into contact. Since the amalgam reacts with air to give aluminium oxide, small amounts of mercury corrode aluminium. For this reason, mercury is not allowed aboard an aircraft under most circumstances because of the risk of it forming an amalgam with exposed aluminium parts in the aircraft.()IsotopesThere are seven stable isotopes of mercury with  being the most abundant (29.86%). The longest-lived radioisotopes are  with a half-life of 444 years, and  with a half-life of 46.612 days. Most of the remaining radioisotopes have half-lives that are less than a day.  and  are the most often studied NMR-active nuclei, having spins of  and  respectively.(Historysymbol.svg|thumb|left|120px|The symbol for the planet Mercury () has been used since ancient times to represent the elementMercury was found in Egyptian tombs that date from 1500 BC.()In China and Tibet, mercury use was thought to prolong life, heal fractures, and maintain generally good health.() One of Chinas emperors, Qn Sh Hung D  allegedly buried in a tomb that contained rivers of flowing mercury on a model of the land he ruled, representative of the rivers of China  was killed by drinking a mercury and powdered jade mixture (causing failure, poisoning, and death) intended to give him eternal life.()()The ancient Greeks used mercury in ointments; the Egyptians and the Romans used it in cosmetics which sometimes deformed the face. In Lamanai, once a major city of the civilization, a pool of mercury was found under a marker in a ballcourt.()() By 500 BC mercury was used to make amalgams (Medieval Latin amalgama, alloy of mercury) with other metals.()Alchemists thought of mercury as the First Matter from which all metals were formed. They believed that different metals could be produced by varying the quality and quantity of sulfur contained within the mercury. The purest of these was gold, and mercury was called for in attempts at the transmutation of base (or impure) metals into gold, which was the goal of many alchemists.()Hg is the modern symbol for mercury. It comes from hydrargyrum, a Latinized form of the Greek word  (hydrargyros), which is a compound word meaning water-silver (hydr-  water, argyros  silver)  since it is liquid like water and shiny like silver. The element was named after the Roman god Mercury, known for speed and mobility. It is associated with the planet Mercury; the astrological symbol for the planet is also one of the symbols for the metal; the Indian word for alchemy is Rasavtam which means the way of mercury.() Mercury is the only metal for which the alchemical planetary name became the common name.(The mines in Almadn (Spain), Amiata (Italy), and Idrija (now Slovenia) dominated the mercury production from the opening of the mine in Almadn 2500 years ago until new deposits were found at the end of the 19th century.()OccurrenceMercury is an extremely rare element in the Earths crust, having an average crustal abundance by mass of only 0.08 parts per million (ppm).() However, because it does not blend geochemically with those elements that constitute the majority of the crustal mass, mercury ores can be extraordinarily concentrated considering the elements abundance in ordinary rock. The richest mercury ores contain up to 2.5% mercury by mass, and even the leanest concentrated deposits are at least 0.1% mercury (12,000 times average crustal abundance). It is found either as a native metal (rare) or in cinnabar, corderoite, livingstonite and other minerals, with cinnabar (HgS) being the most common ore.() Mercury ores usually occur in very young orogenic belts where rock of high density are forced to the crust of the Earth, often in hot springs or other volcanic regions.()Beginning in 1558, with the invention of the process to extract silver from ore using mercury, mercury became an essential resource in the economy of Spain and its American colonies. Mercury was used to extract silver from the lucrative mines in Spain and Peru. Initially, the Spanish Crowns mines in Almaden in Southern Spain supplied all the mercury for the colonies.() Mercury deposits were discovered in the New World, and more than 100,000 tons of mercury were mined from the region of Huancavelica, Peru, over the course of three centuries following the discovery of deposits there in 1563. The patio process and later amalgamation process continued to create great demand for mercury to treat silver ores until the late 19th century.()File:Mercury-27128.jpg|thumb|Native mercury with cinnabar, Socrates mine, County, California. Cinnabar sometimes alters to native mercury in the oxidized zone of mercury deposits.Former mines in Italy, the States and Mexico which once produced a large proportion of the world supply have now been completely mined out or, in the case of Slovenia (Idrija) and Spain (Almadn), shut down due to the fall of the price of mercury. Nevadas McDermitt Mine, the last mercury mine in the United States, closed in 1992. The price of mercury has been highly volatile over the years and in 2006 was $650 per 76-pound (34.46 kg) flask.()Mercury is extracted by heating cinnabar in a current of air and condensing the vapor. The equation for this extraction is:HgS + O2  Hg + SO2In 2005, China was the top producer of mercury with almost two-thirds global share followed by Kyrgyzstan.() Several other countries are believed to have unrecorded production of mercury from copper electrowinning processes and by recovery from effluents.Because of the high toxicity of mercury, both the mining of cinnabar and refining for mercury are hazardous and historic causes of mercury poisoning. In China, prison labor was used by a private mining company as recently as the 1950s to create new cinnabar mercury mines. Thousands of prisoners were used by the Luo Xi mining company to establish new tunnels.( In addition, worker health in functioning mines is at high risk.The Union directive calling for compact bulbs to be made mandatory by 2012 has encouraged China to re-open deadly cinnabar mines to obtain the mercury required for CFL bulb manufacture. As a result, environmental dangers have been a concern, particularly in the southern cities of Foshan and Guangzhou, and in the Guizhou province in the south west.()Abandoned mercury mine processing sites often contain very hazardous waste piles of roasted cinnabar calcines. Water run-off from such sites is a recognized source of ecological damage. Former mercury mines may be suited for constructive re-use. For example, in 1976 Clara County, California purchased the historic Almaden Quicksilver Mine and created a county park on the site, after conducting extensive safety and environmental analysis of the property.()ChemistryMercury exists in two main oxidation states, I and II.  Higher oxidation states are unimportant, but have been detected, e.g., fluoride () but only under extraordinary conditions.()Compounds of mercury(I)Different from its lighter neighbors, cadmium and zinc, mercury forms simple stable compounds with metal-metal bonds. The mercury(I) compounds are diamagnetic and feature the dimeric cation, Hg.  Stable derivatives include the chloride and nitrate.  Treatment of Hg(I) compounds complexation with strong ligands such as sulfide, cyanide, etc. induces disproportionation to  and elemental mercury.() chloride, a colourless solid also known as calomel, is really the compound with the formula Hg2Cl2, with the connectivity Cl-Hg-Hg-Cl.  It is a standard in electrochemistry.  It reacts with chlorine to give mercuric chloride, which resists further oxidation.Indicative of its tendency to bond to itself, mercury forms polycations, which consist of linear chains of mercury centers, capped with a positive charge.  One example is Hg32+(AsF6-)2.()Compounds of mercury(II)Mercury(II) is the most common oxidation state and is the main one in nature as well.  All four mercuric halides are known. The form tetrahedral complexes with other ligands but the halides adopt linear coordination geometry, somewhat like Ag+ does. Best known is chloride, an easily sublimating white solid.  HgCl2 forms complexes that are typically tetrahedral, e.g. HgCl42-. oxide, the main oxide of mercury, arises when the metal is exposed to air for long periods at elevated temperatures.  It reverts to the elements upon heating near 400 C, as was demonstrated by Priestly in an early synthesis of pure oxygen.()  Hydroxides of mercury are poorly characterized, as they are for its neighbors gold and silver.  Being a soft metal, mercury forms very stable derivatives with the heavier chalcogens.  Preeminent is sulfide, HgS, which occurs in nature as the ore cinnabar and is the brilliant pigment vermillion.  Like ZnS, HgS crystallizes in two forms, the reddish cubic form and the black blende form.( selenide (HgSe) and telluride (HgTe) are also known, these as well as various derivatives, e.g. cadmium telluride and zinc telluride being semiconductors useful as detector materials.()Mercury(II) salts form a variety of complex derivatives with ammonia. These include Millons base (Hg2N+), the one-dimensional polymer (salts of HgNH2+)n), and fusible white precipitate or Hg(NH3)2Cl2. Known as Nesslers reagent, potassium tetraiodomercurate(II) (HgI42-) is still occasionally used to test for ammonia owing to its tendency to form the deeply colored iodide salt of Millons base.Mercury fulminate, (a detonator widely used in explosives);(Organomercury compoundsOrganic mercury compounds are historically important but are of little industrial value in the western world.  Mercury(II) salts are a rare examples of simple metal complexes that react directly with aromatic rings.  Organomercury compounds are always divalent and usually two-coordinate and linear geometry. Unlike organocadmium and organozinc compounds, organomercury compounds do not react with water.  They usually have the formula HgR2, which are often volatile, or HgRX, which are often solids, where R is aryl or alkyl and X is usually halide or acetate.  Methylmercury, a generic term for compounds with the formula CH3HgX  is a dangerous family of compounds that is found in some a polluted water.()  They arise by a process known as biomethylation.ApplicationsFile:Maximum thermometer close up 2.JPG|thumb|right|200px|The bulb of a thermometerMercury is used primarily for the manufacture of industrial chemicals or for electrical and electronic applications. It is used in some thermometers, especially ones which are used to measure high temperatures. A still increasing amount is used as gaseous mercury in lamps, while most of the other applications are slowly phased out due to health and safety regulations and is in some applications replaced with less toxic but considerably more expensive Galinstan alloy.MedicineFile:Germicidal UV discharge tube glow.jpg|thumb|200px|The deep violet glow of a mercury vapor discharge in a lamp, whose spectrum is rich in invisible ultraviolet radiation.Mercury and its compounds have been used in medicine, although they are much less common today than they once were, now that the toxic effects of mercury and its compounds are more widely understood. The element mercury is an ingredient in dental amalgams. Thiomersal (called Thimerosal in the United States) is an compound used as a preservative in vaccines, though this use is in decline.() Another mercury compound Merbromin (Mercurochrome) is a topical antiseptic used for minor cuts and scrapes is still in use in some countries.Since the 1930s some vaccines have contained the preservative thiomersal, which is metabolized or degraded to mercury. Although it was widely speculated that this mercury-based preservative can cause or trigger autism in children, scientific studies showed no evidence supporting any such link.( Erratum (2005). Pediatrics 115 (1): 200.  PMID 15630018.) Nevertheless thiomersal has been removed from or reduced to trace amounts in all U.S. vaccines recommended for children 6 years of age and under, with the exception of inactivated influenza vaccine.()Mercury in the form of one of its common ores, cinnabar, is used in various traditional medicines, especially in Chinese medicine. Review of its safety has found cinnabar can lead to significant mercury intoxication when heated, consumed in overdose or taken long term, and can have adverse effects at therapeutic doses, though this is typically reversible at therapeutic doses.  Although this form of mercury appears less toxic than others, its use in traditional Chinese medicine has not yet been justified as the therapeutic basis for the use of cinnabar is not clear.()Today, the use of mercury in medicine has greatly declined in all respects, especially in developed countries. Thermometers and sphygmomanometers containing mercury were invented in the early 18th and late 19th centuries, respectively. In the early 21st century, their use is declining and has been banned in some countries, states and medical institutions. In 2002, the Senate passed legislation to phase out the sale of non-prescription mercury thermometers. In 2003, Washington and Maine became the first states to ban mercury blood pressure devices.() Mercury compounds are found in some drugs, including topical antiseptics, stimulant laxatives, diaper-rash ointment, drops, and sprays. The FDA has inadequate data to establish general recognition of the safety and effectiveness, of the mercury ingredients in these products.() Mercury is still used in some diuretics, although substitutes now exist for most therapeutic uses.Production of chlorine and caustic sodaChlorine is produced from chloride (common salt, NaCl) using electrolysis to separate the metallic sodium from the chlorine gas. Usually the salt is dissolved in water to produce a brine. By-products of any such process are hydrogen (H2) and hydroxide (NaOH), which is commonly called caustic soda or lye. By far the largest use of mercury()() in the late 20th century was in the mercury cell process (also called the process) where metallic sodium is formed as an amalgam at a cathode made from mercury; this sodium is then reacted with water to produce sodium hydroxide.() Many of the industrial mercury releases of the 20th century came from this process, although modern plants claimed to be safe in this regard.( After about 1985, all new chloralkali production facilities that were built in the United States used either membrane cell or diaphragm cell technologies to produce chlorine.Laboratory usesSome medical thermometers, especially those for high temperatures, are filled with mercury; however, they are gradually disappearing. In the United States, non-prescription sale of mercury fever thermometers has been banned since 2003.()Mercury is also found in mirror telescopes. The mirror is formed by rotating liquid mercury on a disk, the parabolic form of the liquid thus formed reflecting and focusing incident light. Such telescopes are cheaper than conventional large mirror telescopes by up to a factor of 100, but the mirror cannot be tilted and always points straight up.()()()Liquid mercury is a part of popular secondary reference electrode (called the calomel electrode) in electrochemistry as an alternative to the hydrogen electrode. The calomel electrode is used to work out the potential of cells.() Last, but not least, the point of mercury, 38.8344 C, is a fixed point used as a temperature standard for the International Temperature Scale (ITS-90).(Niche usesFile:Mercuryvaporlamp.jpg|thumb|Skin tanner containing a low-pressure mercury vapor lamp and two infrared lamps, which act both as light source and ballastGaseous mercury is used in lamps and some sign type advertising signs and lamps. Those low-pressure lamps emit very spectrally narrow lines, which are traditionally used in spectroscopy for calibration of spectral position. Commercial calibration lamps are sold for this purpose; however simply reflecting some of the fluorescent-lamp ceiling light into a spectrometer is a common calibration practice.() Gaseous mercury is also found in some electron tubes, including ignitrons, thyratrons, and arc rectifiers.() It is also used in specialist medical care lamps for skin tanning and disinfection (see pictures).() Gaseous mercury is added to cathode argon-filled lamps to increase the ionization and conductivity. An argon filled lamp without mercury will have dull spots and will fail to light correctly. Lighting containing mercury can be bombarded/oven pumped only once. When added to neon filled tubes the light produced will be inconsistent red/blue spots until the initial burning-in process is completed; eventually it will light a consistent dull off-blue color.()CosmeticsMercury, as thiomersal, is widely used in the manufacture of mascara. In 2008, Minnesota became the first state in the US to ban intentionally added mercury in cosmetics, giving it a tougher standard than the federal government.()A study in geometric mean urine mercury concentration identified a previously unrecognized source of exposure (skin care products) to inorganic mercury among York City residents. Population-based biomonitoring also showed that mercury concentration levels are higher in consumers of seafood and fish meals.(McKelvey W, Jeffery N, Clark N, Kass D, Parsons PJ. 2010. Population-Based Inorganic Mercury Biomonitoring and the Identification of Skin Care Products as a Source of Exposure in New York City. Environ Health Perspect :-. doi:10.1289/ehp.1002396)Historic usesFile:Barometer mercury column hg.jpg|thumb|Mercury manometer to measure pressureMany historic applications made use of the peculiar physical properties of mercury, especially as a dense liquid and a liquid metal:*In Spain, it was used for filling decorative pools. Later, the American artist Calder built a fountain for the Spanish Pavilion at the 1937 World Exhibition in Paris. The fountain is now on display at the Joan Mir in Barcelona.()*Mercury was used inside wobbler lures. Its heavy, liquid form made it useful since the lures made an attractive irregular movement when the mercury moved inside the plug. Such use was stopped due to environmental concerns, but illegal preparation of modern fishing plugs has occurred.*The lenses of old lighthouses used to float and rotate in a bath of mercury which acted like a bearing.()*Mercury sphygmomanometers (blood pressure meter), barometers, pumps, coulometers, and many other laboratory instruments. As an opaque liquid with a high density and a nearly linear thermal expansion, it is ideal for this role.()*As an electrically-conductive liquid, it was used in switches (including home mercury light switches installed prior to 1970), tilt switches used in old fire detectors, and tilt switches in many modern home thermostats,()*Due to its acoustic properties, mercury was used as the propagation medium in delay line memory devices used in early digital computers of the mid-20th century.*Experimental vapor turbines were installed to increase the efficiency of fossil-fuel electrical power plants.() The South Meadow power plant in Hartford, CT employed mercury as its fluid, in a binary configuration with a secondary water circuit, or a number of years starting in the late 1920s in a drive to improve plant efficiency. Several other plants were built, including the Schiller Station in Portsmouth, NH, which went online in 1950. The idea did not catch on industry-wide due to the weight and toxicity of mercury, as well as the advent of supercritical steam plants in later years.()()*Similarly, liquid mercury was used as a coolant for some reactors; however, sodium is proposed for reactors cooled with liquid metal, because the high density of mercury requires much more energy to circulate as coolant.()*Mercury was a propellant for early engines in electric space propulsion systems. Advantages were mercurys high molecular weight, low ionization energy, low dual-ionization energy, high liquid density and liquid storability at temperature. Disadvantages were concerns regarding environmental impact associated with ground testing and concerns about eventual cooling and condensation of some of the propellant on the spacecraft in long-duration operations. The first spaceflight to use electric propulsion was a mercury-fueled ion thruster developed by NASA Lewis and flown on the Space Electric Rocket Test SERT-1 spacecraft launched by NASA at its Flight Facility in 1964. The SERT-1 flight was followed up by the SERT-2 flight in 1970. Mercury and caesium were preferred propellants for ion engines until Research Laboratory performed studies finding xenon gas to be a suitable replacement. Xenon is now the preferred propellant for ion engines as it has a high molecular weight, little or no reactivity due to its gas nature, and has a high liquid density under mild cryogenic storage.()()*Mercury has been used to produce mirror telescopes.()Others applications made use of the chemical properties of mercury:*Mercury was used for preserving wood, developing daguerreotypes, silvering mirrors, anti-fouling paints (discontinued in 1990), herbicides (discontinued in 1995), handheld maze games, cleaning, and road leveling devices in cars. Mercury compounds have been used in antiseptics, laxatives, antidepressants, and in antisyphilitics.*It was allegedly used by allied spies to sabotage German planes: a mercury paste was applied to bare aluminium, causing the metal to rapidly corrode; this would cause structural failures.()*process: The largest industrial use of mercury during the 20th century was in electrolysis for separating chlorine and sodium from brine; mercury being the anode of the process. The chlorine was used for bleaching paper (hence the location of many of these plants near paper mills) while the sodium was used to make sodium hydroxide for soaps and other cleaning products. This usage has largely been discontinued, replaced with other technologies that utilize membrane cells.()*As electrodes in some types of electrolysis, batteries (mercury cells), hydroxide and chlorine production, handheld games, catalysts, insecticides.*Mercury was once used as a gun barrel bore cleaner.()()*From the mid-18th to the mid-19th centuries, a process called carroting was used in the making of felt hats. Animal skins were rinsed in an orange solution (the term carroting arose from this color) of the mercury compound nitrate, Hg(NO3)22H2O.() This process separated the fur from the pelt and matted it together. This solution and the vapors it produced were highly toxic. The States Public Health Service banned the use of mercury in the felt industry in December 1941. The psychological symptoms associated with mercury poisoning are said by some to have inspired the phrase mad as a hatter.  Carrolls Hatter in his book Adventures in Wonderland was a play on words based on the older phrase, but the character himself does not exhibit symptoms of mercury poisoning.()*Gold and silver mining. Historically, mercury was used extensively in hydraulic gold mining in order to help the gold to sink through the flowing water-gravel mixture. Thin mercury particles may form mercury-gold amalgam and therefore increase the gold recovery rates.( Large scale use of mercury stopped in the 1960s. However, mercury is still used in small scale, often clandestine, gold prospecting. It is estimated that 45,000 metric tons of mercury used in California for mining have not been recovered.() Mercury was also used in silver mining.()Historic medicinal usesMercury(I) chloride (also known as calomel or mercurous chloride) has been used in medicine as a diuretic, topical disinfectant, and laxative. chloride (also known as mercuric chloride or corrosive sublimate) was once used to treat syphilis (along with other mercury compounds), although it is so toxic that sometimes the symptoms of its toxicity were confused with those of the syphilis it was believed to treat.() It is also used as a disinfectant. mass, a pill or syrup in which mercury is the main ingredient, was prescribed throughout the 19th century for numerous conditions including constipation, depression, child-bearing and toothaches.() In the early 20th century, mercury was administered to children yearly as a laxative and dewormer, and it was used in teething powders for infants. The mercury-containing organohalide merbromin (sometimes sold as Mercurochrome) is still widely used but has been banned in some countries such as the U.S.()Toxicity and safetyMercury and most of its compounds are extremely toxic and must be handled with care; in cases of spills involving mercury (such as from certain thermometers or light bulbs), specific cleaning procedures are used to avoid exposure and contain the spill.() Protocols call for physically merging smaller droplets on hard surfaces, combining them into a single larger pool for easier removal with an eyedropper, or for gently pushing the spill into a disposable container. Vacuum cleaners and brooms cause greater dispersal of the mercury and should not be used. Afterwards, fine sulfur, zinc, or some other powder that readily forms an amalgam (alloy) with mercury at ordinary temperatures is sprinkled over the area before itself being collected and properly disposed of.  Cleaning porous surfaces and clothing is not effective at removing all traces of mercury and it is therefore advised to discard these kinds of items should they be exposed to a mercury spill.Mercury can be inhaled and absorbed through the skin and mucous membranes, so containers of mercury are securely sealed to avoid spills and evaporation. Heating of mercury, or of compounds of mercury that may decompose when heated, is always carried out with adequate ventilation in order to avoid exposure to mercury vapor. The most toxic forms of mercury are its compounds, such as dimethylmercury and methylmercury. However, inorganic compounds, such as cinnabar are also highly toxic by ingestion or inhalation.() Mercury can cause both chronic and acute poisoning.Releases in the environmentPreindustrial deposition rates of mercury from the atmosphere may be about 4 ng /(1 L of ice deposit). Although that can be considered a natural level of exposure, regional or global sources have significant effects. Volcanic eruptions can increase the atmospheric source by 46 times.()Natural sources, such as volcanoes, are responsible for approximately half of atmospheric mercury emissions. The human-generated half can be divided into the following estimated percentages:(()()*65% from stationary combustion, of which coal-fired power plants are the largest aggregate source (40% of U.S. mercury emissions in 1999). This includes power plants fueled with gas where the mercury has not been removed. Emissions from coal combustion are between one and two orders of magnitude higher than emissions from oil combustion, depending on the country.(*11% from gold production. The three largest point sources for mercury emissions in the U.S. are the three largest gold mines. Hydrogeochemical release of mercury from gold-mine tailings has been accounted as a significant source of atmospheric mercury in eastern Canada.()*6.8% from metal production, typically smelters.*6.4% from cement production.*3.0% from disposal, including municipal and waste, crematoria, and sludge incineration. This is a significant underestimate due to limited information, and is likely to be off by a factor of two to five.*3.0% from soda production.*1.4% from iron and steel production.*1.1% from mercury production, mainly for batteries.*2.0% from other sources.The above percentages are estimates of the global human-caused mercury emissions in 2000, excluding biomass burning, an important source in some regions.()Current atmospheric mercury contamination in outdoor urban air is (0.010.02 g/m3) indoor concentrations are significantly elevated over outdoor concentrations, in the range 0.00650.523 g/m3 (average 0.069 g/m3).()Mercury also enters into the environment through the improper disposal (e.g., land filling, incineration) of certain products. Products containing mercury include: auto parts, batteries, fluorescent bulbs, medical products, thermometers, and thermostats.() Due to health concerns (see below), toxics use reduction efforts are cutting back or eliminating mercury in such products. For example, most thermometers now use pigmented alcohol instead of mercury. Mercury thermometers are still occasionally used in the medical field because they are more accurate than alcohol thermometers, though both are being replaced by electronic thermometers. Mercury thermometers are still widely used for certain scientific applications because of their greater accuracy and working range.The United States Clean Air Act, passed in 1990, put mercury on a list of toxic pollutants that need to be controlled to the greatest possible extent. Thus, industries that release high concentrations of mercury into the environment agreed to install maximum achievable control technologies (MACT). In March 2005 EPA rule() added power plants to the list of sources that should be controlled and a national cap and trade rule was issued. States were given until November 2006 to impose stricter controls, and several States are doing so. The rule was being subjected to legal challenges from several States in 2005 and decision was made in 2008. The Clean Air Mercury Rule was struck down by a Federal Appeals Court on February 8, 2008. The rule was deemed not sufficient to protect the health of persons living near coal-fired power plants. The court opinion cited the negative impact on human health from coal fired power plants mercury emissions documented in the EPA Study Report to Congress of 1998.()Historically, one of the largest releases was from the Colex plant, a lithium-isotope separation plant at Oak Ridge. The plant operated in the 1950s and 1960s. Records are incomplete and unclear, but government commissions have estimated that some two million pounds of mercury are unaccounted for.()A serious disasters was the dumping of mercury compounds into Minamata Bay, Japan. It is estimated that over 3,000 people suffered various deformities, severe mercury poisoning symptoms or death from what became known as disease.()Occupational exposureDue to the health effects of mercury exposure, industrial and commercial uses are regulated in many countries. The Health Organization, OSHA, and NIOSH all treat mercury as an occupational hazard, and have established specific occupational exposure limits. Environmental releases and disposal of mercury are regulated in the U.S. primarily by the States Environmental Protection Agency.control studies have shown effects such as tremors, impaired cognitive skills, and sleep disturbance in workers with chronic exposure to mercury vapor even at low concentrations in the range 0.742 g/m3.()() A study has shown that acute exposure (4  8 hours) to calculated elemental mercury levels of 1.1 to 44 mg/m3 resulted in chest pain, dyspnea, cough, hemoptysis, impairment of pulmonary function, and evidence of interstitial pneumonitis.() Acute exposure to mercury vapor has been shown to result in profound central nervous system effects, including psychotic reactions characterized by delirium, hallucinations, and suicidal tendency. Occupational exposure has resulted in broad-ranging functional disturbance, including erethism, irritability, excitability, excessive shyness, and insomnia. With continuing exposure, a fine tremor develops and may escalate to violent muscular spasms. Tremor initially involves the hands and later spreads to the eyelids, lips, and tongue. Long-term, low-level exposure has been associated with more subtle symptoms of erethism, including fatigue, irritability, loss of memory, vivid dreams, and depression.()()TreatmentResearch on the treatment of mercury poisoning is limited. Currently available drugs for acute mercurial poisoning include chelators N-acetyl-D, L-penicillamine (NAP), Anti-Lewisite (BAL), acid (DMPS), and acid (DMSA). In one small study including 11 construction workers exposed to elemental mercury, patients were treated with DMSA and NAP.() therapy with both drugs resulted in the mobilization of a small fraction of the total estimated body mercury. DMSA was able to increase the excretion of mercury to a greater extent than NAP.()FishFish and shellfish have a natural tendency to concentrate mercury in their bodies, often in the form of methylmercury, a highly toxic organic compound of mercury. Species of fish that are high on the chain, such as shark, swordfish, mackerel, tuna, and tilefish contain higher concentrations of mercury than others. As mercury and methylmercury are fat soluble, they primarily accumulate in the viscera, although they are also found throughout the muscle tissue.() When this fish is consumed by a predator, the mercury level is accumulated. Since fish are less efficient at depurating than accumulating methylmercury, fish-tissue concentrations increase over time. Thus species that are high on the chain amass body burdens of mercury that can be ten times higher than the species they consume. This process is called biomagnification. poisoning happened this way in Minamata, Japan, now called disease.RegulationsIn the United States, the Environmental Protection Agency is charged for regulating and managing mercury contamination. Several laws give the EPA this authority, including the Clean Air Act, the Water Act, the Conservation and Recovery Act, and the Drinking Water Act. Additionally, the and Rechargeable Battery Management Act, passed in 1996, phases out the use of mercury in batteries, and provides for the efficient and cost-effective disposal of many types of used batteries.() North America contributed approximately 11% of the total global anthropogenic mercury emissions in 1995.()In the Union, the directive on the Restriction of the Use of Certain Hazardous Substances in Electrical and Electronic Equipment (see RoHS) bans mercury from certain electrical and electronic products, and limits the amount of mercury in other products to less than 1000 ppm.( Article 4 Paragraph 1. e.g. Member States shall ensure that, from July 1, 2006, new electrical and electronic equipment put on the market does not contain lead, mercury, cadmium, hexavalent chromium, polybrominated biphenyls (PBB) or polybrominated diphenyl ethers (PBDE).) There are restrictions for mercury concentration in packaging (the limit is 100 ppm for sum of mercury, lead, chromium and cadmium) and batteries (the limit is 5 ppm).() In July 2007, the European Union also banned mercury in non-electrical measuring devices, such as thermometers and barometers. The ban applies to new devices only, and contains exemptions for the health care sector and a two year grace period for manufacturers of barometers.()Norway enacted a total ban on the use of mercury in the manufacturing and import/export of mercury products, effective January 1, 2008.() In 2002, several lakes in Norway were found to have a poor state of mercury pollution, with an excess of 1 mg/g of mercury in their sediment.()ReferencesExternal links*ATSDR  ToxFAQs: Mercury*Centers for Disease Control and Prevention  Mercury Topic*EPA fish consumption guidelines*Global Mercury Assessment report 2002 by the UNEP.*Global Mercury Project*Hg 80 Mercury*Japanese Sushi Lovers Shrug at Mercury*Material Safety Data Sheet  Mercury*Mercury Contamination in fish and Source Control, Oceana*Mercury (UK PID). National Poisons Information Service: Medical Toxicology Unit (London Centre)  Kolev, S.T. Bates, N.*Natural Resources Defense Council (NRDC): Mercury Contamination in Fish guide  NRDC*NLM Hazardous Substances Databank  Mercury*University of Calgary: How Mercury Causes Brain Neuron Degeneration*WebElements.com  Mercury*Chemistry in its element podcast (MP3) from the Society of Chemistrys World: Mercury*BBC  Earth News  Mercury turns wetland birds such as ibises homosexualaf:Kwikar:(elemento)(elementu)az:Civ()zh-min-nan:Chi-gnbe:bcl:Asugibs:ivabg:(element)cv:cs:Rtuco:Argentuvivucy:Mercwrida:Kvikslvde:QuecksilberTzhaniiet:Elavhbeel:myv:(elemento)eo:Hidrargo(elementua)fa:(element)(chimie)(element)(airgead beo)gv:Mercur(elemento)hak:Kngxal:ko:hy:hi:hr:ivaio:Merkurioid:Raksais:Kvikasilfur(elemento)he:kn:ka:kk:sw:Zebakikv:(eleman chimik)ku:Zbeqkoi:la:Hydrargyrumlv:Dzvsudrabslb:Queckslwerlt:Gyvsidabris(elemento)jbo:marguhu:Higanymk:()mi:Konuoimr:arz:ms:Raksanah:Yliamochitlmrj:nl:Kwikja:no:Kvikkslvnn:Kvikkslv(element)mhr:pa:pnb:ps:nds:Queckslverpl:Rt(elemento qumico)(element)qullqiru:(element)stq:Kwkslwer(elementu chmicu)(element)sk:Ortusrebrostrzybosr:sh:ivaraksafi:Elohopeasv:Kvicksilvertl:Asogeta:th:tr:Cvauk:ur:ngnwar:Asogeyi:(element)zh-yue:zh:
18632107
Prisoner_of_the_Daleks
Prisoner of the Daleks is a Books original novel written by Baxendale and based on the long-running British science fiction television series Who. It features the Doctor without a companion and was released on April 2, 2009, alongside of the Judoon and Slitheen Excursion.SynopsisThe TARDIS arrives on the planet Hurala. Whilst investigating the deserted site the Doctor makes his way to the bases computer data core room, where he is locked inside by the computer along with the corpse of another person previously trapped inside.Five days later, the bounty hunter ship Wayfarer lands on the planet, its crew of five hoping to use the fuel stores to refuel their ship. They soon come across the TARDIS, and then hear a repeating tapping noise.  One of them, called Scrum, realises that its a Morse code SOS message.  They quickly trace it to the computer data core room where they find and free the Doctor, who has been sending it out with a spoon. On the insistence of the Doctor and another of the bounty hunters, Stella, the group investigate the computers systems. They discover an override which, when activated, took control of the base and trapped the Doctor. Someone had used the computer to set a trap.  Who did is soon answered when the group are attacked by a Dalek patrol.The Doctor and the bounty hunters, who now reveal that they kill Daleks for a living, race back to the Wayfarer, escape to the TARDIS being blocked by Daleks.  They manage to take off but the Daleks blow up a refueling pump, sending debris flying into the ship through the open landing ramp, badly wounding Stella.  As the crew attempt to put her into cryo-freeze a Dalek manages to get into the ship through an air-lock, and exterminates Stella.  Before it can kill anyone else the Doctor freezes it using the emergency cryo-charge intended for Stella.  With the Dalek immobilized Stellas body is also frozen and the crew make a course for Auros, Stellas home world.  On the way, the Daleks eye stalk is removed so that the crew can claim the prize-money for killing it, and it is placed in the cargo hold.  Whilst talking with the crew the Doctor realizes that hes travelled back along the time line to before the Time War.  At this point in history the Daleks are locked in a huge galactic war with Earths first empire, at a moment when victory can go either way.  The Doctor also learns more about the crew.  Commanding the ship is Bowman, a former Earth trooper who has been fighting the Daleks for years.  Scrum is the crews technician, Cuttin Edge is a former Space Marine who was dishonorably discharged and Stella was the ships Medic. The other crew member, Koral, is a humanoid alien whose planet and people of Red Sky Lost were destroyed by the Daleks.Upon arriving at Auros the Doctor and the crew discover that the planets population are abandoning the planet as the Daleks are preparing to invade.  Using the Osterhagen Principle, they detonate a series of nuclear bombs and destroy the planet to prevent it falling to the Daleks.  The Doctor and Bowman realize that the Daleks will now ambush the retreating convoy.  They try to warn them but before they can the Daleks arrive, forcing the convoy to surrender and destroying its flagship as a warning to the other ships.Furious at the loss of Stella and her home world, the crew of the Wayfarer decide to interrogate the captured Dalek. With the Doctors reluctant help they disarm it, and then Koral uses its claws to open the casing. They then remove the creature inside and torture it, despite the Doctors protests. Eventually they give up when the Dalek tells them nothing. After theyve left the cargo hold, however, the Doctor returns and reveals to the dying Dalek who he is. The Dalek, amongst its predictable ranting, lets slip that the Daleks plan to eliminate all humanity from its very beginnings! Eventually the Dalek dies, and the Doctor works out what it meant.He reveals to the crew that the Daleks must be looking for the Arkeon Threshold, a schism in time and space which, if opened, will give the Daleks access to the Time Vortex. Deciding that the Doctor is telling the truth, Bowman orders the crew to head for the remains of the planet Arkeon, which had been destroyed at the start of the war.When they arrive they find that the planet has been split in two, with the surviving half still retaining a breathable atmosphere.  The Wayfarer lands and the Doctor and the crew disembark.  Whilst looking round the devastated landscape they encounter dozens of mutated Arkeonites, devolved by the radiation fallout.  They chase the crew to the very edge of the planet, where they are captured by Daleks.  After destroying their weapons the Daleks force the Doctor and the crew onto a lift, which descends down the side of the planet towards they core. Here the Doctor discovers that the Daleks, far from searching for Arkeon, have been on the planet for years. They have constructed a huge underground base where thousands of human prisoners from Auros are mining the core, looking for the Threshold. The base also contains experimentation labs, and the largest Dalek Prison outside of Skaro.The Doctor and the crew are taken into the base where they are scanned for suitability. Scrum is found to be of marginal use.  Cuttin Edge and Koral are both sentenced to work in the mines.  When Bowman is scanned its is discovered that he is in fact Space Major Jon Bowman, the designer of Earths defence system and high on the Daleks list of wanted people, causing the commander to be alerted. Upon being told by the Command Dalek that Bowman will be taken for brain excoriation, which will kill him, Koral, who is secretly in love with Bowman, lashes out at the nearest Dalek. In retaliation the Daleks kill Scrum, the weakest member of the group. As the Daleks prepare to take Bowman away the Doctor stops them and whispers something to the Command Dalek.  The Command Dalek, suddenly terrified, orders two of its minions to scan the Doctor.  They immediately identity him and prepare to exterminate him.  The Doctor persuades them to interrogate him first, however.  News of the Doctors capture is sent to the Supreme Dalek on Skaro, who sends the Primary Intelligence Unit, led by the Dalek Inquisitor General, to interrogate the Doctor.Cuttin Edge and Koral are sent to work in the mines. The Doctor is placed in the same cell as Bowman, who reveals to him that the Dalek Inquisitor General, called Dalek X by the Earth authorities, is second in command to the Supreme Dalek and is described as being the Devil in Dalek form.  Dalek X arrives at Arkeon aboard the Exterminator, the Dalek Empires most advanced ship, containing 500 Daleks and accompanied by a small fleet of Dalek saucers. Upon arrival Dalek X takes over command of the base, and exterminates one of the its mining Daleks for failing to meet its target. He then orders that every hour the weakest group of workers will be exterminated. Soon after the Doctor is brought to the interrogation room, where Dalek X measures the Doctors capacity for physical pain using a mind probe, simply out of curiosity. After an unknown length of time in pain the Doctor is released from the mind probe, and shown around the base by Dalek X. Meanwhile the Wayfarer is destroyed, and Bowman is taken to have his brain removed.Dalek X reveals to the Doctor that once the planetary core has been extracted, the Daleks will locate the Threshold using a Large Chronon Collider. They will then open it, access the time vortex and defeat the Time Lords. There is a chance that the collider wont work properly, however. To ensure success the Daleks need a control element; the Doctors TARDIS. The Doctor refuse to co-operate, but the Daleks threaten to exterminate a woman and her daughter from Cuttin Edges and Korals work force if he doesnt comply  Eventually, the Doctor agrees to help, but under the condition that Cuttin Edge, Koral and Bowman come with them to help him operate the TARDIS. The Daleks agree and Bowman is released, just before he is about to be killed. The Exterminator and its escort fleet head for Hurala, with the Doctor, the surviving Wayfarer crew members and the Dalek Temporal Research Team on board.  When they reach the TARDIS the Doctor claims to have lost the Key, saying it is in the room he was locked up in.  As they head for it, Cuttin Edge recognises the identification symbol on one of the Daleks.  It is the same one that killed Scrum. He lashes out at it and is exterminated by Dalek X, though he pulls another Dalek into the ray, destroying it. The Doctor, Koral and Bowman use the distraction to escape into a maintenance duct.  After escaping the Doctor reveals his plan. There is still enough astronic energy fuel on the planet to cause a huge explosion.  If they can detonate it they can destroy Dalek X, the Temporal Research Team and the orbiting Dalek fleet. They make their way to a silo that still contains fuel, and the Doctor starts to rig it to explode. Dalek X, enraged by the Doctors escape, catches up with them and prepares to exterminate the Doctor. Dalek X is attacked by Koral and Bowman, who eventually disable it and the push it over the edge of the gantry they are standing on. The Doctor is nearly finished, but realises that he cant stop the safety override by remote control. Someone will have to stay behind and hold the manual override lever down until the silo reaches critical. Bowman volunteers to stay behind, refusing to leave despite protests from Koral. Eventually he knocks out the protesting Koral so that the Doctor can take her back to the TARDIS and safety. The Doctor and Koral make it into the TARDIS just as the Daleks arrive. In the silo Bowman holds the lever down as the Daleks approach, and as the whole base beings to shake the Daleks retreat.  Finally the silo reaches critical mass and Bowman prepares to face death. He is saved at the last second by the Doctor, however, who materialises the TARDIS on the gantry. Bowman leaps into the TARDIS just as the Command Dalek tries to exterminate him. A second later the silo explodes, killing every Dalek on Hurala, as well as destroying the Exterminator and its escort fleet.Back on Earth Bowman and Koral report to the Earth authorities.  They learn that the Dalek fleet is in complete disarray thanks to them, and a task force is preparing to attack the Dalek base on Arkeon and release the prisoners. The Doctor leaves as Bowman and Koral prepare to go and meet Bowmans parents.The Doctor travels to Hurala, where it has been sealed off for 5,000 years due the radiation fallout. There he finds Dalek X, badly damaged but still alive. The Doctor informs it that Arkeon has been taken by the Earth forces, the Daleks are in full retreat on all fronts and that he has sealed off the Threshold. Regardless of the Doctors revelations, Dalek X rants that the Daleks are never defeated. The Doctor replies that the Daleks are always defeated, because they can never accept that every other form of life in the Universe is better than the Daleks. To prove this the Doctor points out that there is no form of life in the Universe that would volunteer to be a Dalek. As the Doctor prepares to leave Dalek X vows to hunt him down. The Doctor responds by simply stating that hell be waiting. The Doctor then finally departs Hurala, leaving Dalek X trapped on the planet, alone.AudiobookAn unabridged audiobook was released on September 3, 2009, read by Briggs, the voice of the Daleks. He uses his voice modulator to create the effect of the Daleks whenever he speaks their dialogue.See also*New Series Adventures Canonicity*WhoniverseExternal links*
18653410
Rock_Creek,_Baker_County,_Oregon
Rock Creek is an unincorporated community in Baker County, Oregon, States.  Rock Creek is west of Haines.Rock Creek was platted in 1903, probably due to mining claims in the nearby Elkhorn Mountains. By 1913, Rock Creek contained several stores and a butcher, but by the 1980s these were gone, with only a hall remaining, and probably failed due to the nearby successful cities of Haines and Baker.()References
18668388
Outline_of_mining
Mining is the extraction of valuable minerals or other geological materials from the earth, usually (but not always) from an ore body, vein or (coal) seam. Materials recovered by mining include bauxite, coal, copper, gold, silver, diamonds, iron, metals, lead, limestone, magnesite, nickel, phosphate, shale, rock salt, tin, uranium and molybdenum. Any material that cannot be grown from agricultural processes, or created artificially in a laboratory or factory, is usually mined.  Mining in a wider sense comprises extraction of any resource (e.g., petroleum, gas, or even water). The following outline is provided as an overview of and topical guide to mining: Essence of mining : Main article: Mining*metallurgy*exploration*engineering*Ore*dressing*genesis*Overburden*Prospecting*Tailings*extraction*(geology) Types of mining *mining*mining Mining techniques * Hydraulic Diggings* mining* cut* mining* Dredging* mining* Fire-setting* hole (petroleum production)* leaching* mining* leach* mining* mining* reclamation* removal mining* Hydraulic Diggings* mining* mining* Quarrying* reef mining* mining* and pillar* mining* mining* Stoping* mining* mining* mining (hard rock)* tower Materials mined Some examples of materials that are extracted from the earth by mining include:* Bauxite* Chromite* Coal* Copper* Diamonds* Iron* Lead* Limestone* Magnesite* Marble* Molybdenum* Nickel - see Nickel extraction and purification* Phosphate* metals** Gold - see mining** Silver - see mining* shale - see shale industry and oil extraction* Sand - see mining* Slate - see industry* Rock salt* Tin* Uranium Mining equipment * screw* classifier* engine* excavator* Dragline* Dredge* rig* Miners canary* Excavator* (equipment)* engine* and Surveying Radar* shovel - also see shovel* Pumpjack* lamp* Subsea* Trommel* Wellhead* tractor-scraper* engine Mining hazards and safety * mine drainage* mining* Claustrophobia* mining debate* (mining)** damp** damp** damp** damp** damp* law* disaster* exploration* fire* rescue* accident* Mining induced subsidence History of mining : Main article: History of mining* stamps* lamp* re metallica* Fire-setting* Freeminer* lamp* rush* of coal mining* Hurrying* Hushing* Mining innovations during the Industrial Revolution* of mines Mining, by country * Bentonite production, by country* Bismuth production, by country* Feldspar production, by country* Fluorite production, by country* Manganese production, by country* Mine production of gold, by country* Uranium production, by country The future of mining * mining* mining Other mining terms and topics * Biomining* Deformation monitoring* ore deposits* Mineral* Institute for Occupational Safety and Health* Mining Hall of Fame* grade Mining scholars * Agricola - author of re metallica* Schmitt - American geologist, astronaut, retired senator* Worsey* Redmayne* Hunt (scientist)* F. Tylecote* Walter Fox Leaders and innovators in mining * Archimedes &ndash; invented the screw* Steen* Guggenheim* Schieffelin* Stephenson &ndash; inventor of the lamp* Beecher Dierdorff &ndash; American inventor of mining equipment* Hoover* Austin Warner Tabor* Davy &ndash; inventor of the lamp* Guggenheim* Martinez* Boyce Thompson* Reid Clanny &ndash; inventor of the first safety lamp Mining lists : Main article: of mining topics*of diamond mines*of mining companies*of uranium mines See also * Elliot* Off* for Mined Land Rehabilitation* Route of Industrial Heritage* Coal Mining Museum for England* Mining Hall of Fame* Salt-concrete* drilling* drilling* mining External links * Mining 101* Glossary of terms* Introduction to Mining* What is mining?* Mining
18687810
Phoenix_Foundry
The Phoenix Foundry was a company that built locomotives and other industrial machinery in the city of Ballarat, Victoria, Australia. Over 30 years they built 352 locomotives for the Railways, of 38 different designs.()Historyclass locomotive.jpg|thumb|AA class locomotive of 1900The Phoenix Foundry was established in 1854 to build mining machinery and was incorporated as the Phoenix Foundry Co. Ltd. in 1870.()It was founded by ironfounder William Shaw, moulder Robert Holden, and enginesmiths Robert Carter and Threlfell. The business prospered and by November 1861 employed 96 men producing a wide range of products. From around 1858 the employees were working eight hour days while doing as much work as Englishmen did in ten hours.() In August 1871 the foundry successfully tendered for the first Victorian Government railway locomotive contracts, with the first one delivered on 27 February 1873, and by 1884 over 350 men were employed. Modernisation of the works was carried out after Shaw visited Britain in 1871 and 1885, becoming the most advanced workshops in the hemisphere. The hundredth locomotive was completed in April 1883, the two hundredth completed by October 1887.( The majority of locomotives built were duplicates of imported pattern engines designed and built overseas by other companies.() Issues arose in 1889 when Shaw attempted enforce a non-union shop resulting in conflict with employees.( Further trouble arose the foundrys relationships with the Railways, with a tender war erupting between Phoenix and the VR Workshops for the construction of the Dd class 4-6-0  light line locomotives.()  A Commission was appointed in October 1904 to resolve the question of the real costs of production. The Commission found in favour of Newport, who could produce a locomotive for 3,364 - some 497 cheaper than Phoenixs cost, and that Phoenix was making a 23 percent profit on each locomotive. Phoenix received no further orders beyond the seven members of the Dd class which were delivered in 1904. The works lasted another year until the directors entered voluntary liquidation.( Locomotivesclass at Ballarat.jpg|thumb|B class with original spark-arresting funnelLocomotives built by the Phoenix Foundry for the Victorian Railways included:()()* O class 0-6-0 goods: 131 to 143 (odd numbers). Built 1878-1879. Last one scrapped in 1922.* B class 2-4-0 passenger 186 and 188. Built 1880-81. Scrapped in 1914 and 1911 respectively.(Cave, et al., p. 51)* F class 2-4-0 passenger 126 to 144 (even numbers) and 166 to 184 (even numbers). Built 1876-1879. Last one scrapped in 1925.* Q class 0-6-0 goods: 83 to 101 (odd numbers). Built 1873, first locomotives by Phoenix. Last one sold in 1908.* U class 0-6-0 goods: 107 to 123 (odd numbers). Built 1874. Last one scrapped in 1908.* T class 0-6-0 goods: 249 to 283 (odd numbers). Built 1884.* 1st K class 2-4-0 passenger 114 to 124 (even numbers). Built 1874. Last one scrapped in 1905.* 1st H class 4-4-0 passenger 146 to 160 (even numbers). Built 1877. Last one scrapped in 1916.* M class 4-4-0 tank passenger 210 to 240 (even numbers) and 312 to 320 (even numbers). Built 1884-86. Last one scrapped in 1922.* Old R class 0-6-0 goods: 157 to 195 (odd numbers). Built 1881-86. Last one scrapped in 1944.* 1st C class 4-4-0 well tank passenger 42, 262 to 276 (even numbers) and 306 to 310 (even numbers). Built 1882-83. Last one scrapped in 1916.* 1st S class 4-6-0 goods: 197 to 215 (odd numbers). Built 1883. Last one rebuilt to W class in 1908.* D class 4-4-0 passenger: 82, 92, 122, 242, 244, 248, 250, 260, 322 to 344 (even numbers). Built 1887-88. Last one scrapped in 1928.* 1st X class 0-6-0 goods: 353 to 381 (odd numbers). Built 1886-87. Last one scrapped in 1920.* E class 2-4-2 tank suburban passenger: 346 to 394 (even numbers). Built 1889-90. Last one scrapped in 1920.* E class 2-4-2 tank suburban passenger: 12, 34, 36, 428 to 460 (even numbers). Built 1892-94.* New A class 4-4-0 passenger: 396 to 424 (even numbers). Built 1889-91. Last one scrapped in 1925.* Y class 0-6-0 goods: 383 to 441 (odd numbers). Built 1889.* Z class 2-4-0 tank passenger motor engine: 522 and 524. Built 1893, scrapped in 1910 and 1911.* E class (3rd series) 0-6-2 tank goods: 462 to 470 (even numbers). Built 1893 as EE class, reclassed as E class (3rd series) in late 1920s.* V class (2nd series) 2-8-0 goods: 501 to 529 (odd numbers). Built 1901-02, last scrapped in 1930.* AA class 4-4-0 passenger: 20 locomotives: 530 to 558, 562 to 570 (even numbers). Built 1900-03, last scrapped in 1940.()* Dd class 4-6-0: 7 locomotives, 602 to 610 (even numbers), 632, 634. Built 1904. Last one (Dd 634, renumbered D1 505) withdrawn in August 1941 and later scrapped.(Cave, et al., p. 202)ReferencesFurther reading* The Locomotive Builders of Ballarat Buckland, J.L. & anor Australian Railway Historical Society Bulletin, December, 1961
18702270
Simojovel
footnotes                Simojovel is one of the 119 of Chiapas, in southern Mexico.As of 2005, the municipality had a total population of 31,615.() It covers an area of 446.99 km.The municipal seat is the town of de Allende. Economa Until 1990 majority of the population worked on the harvest of coffee, nowadays mining and amber trade are the most important economic activities. It is also known for its extraordinary gastronomic traditions inherited from their ancient Mayan ancestors. Specially, for cooking zats a tree worm that grows in caulote trees typical of the region (known there as tapaculo), also the yervamora an exquisite seasonal vegetable, a chili variety simojovel native to the town region, and the infamous suy prepared food.Native inhabitants of Simojovel do not allow tourists or foreign visitors neither interviews, as a measure to protect their patrimony and non-ethical profit. However, people is warm and friendly if you happen to walk pass.Referencesde Allendede Allende(komunumo)de Allendept:Simojovelru:--
18712873
Battle_of_Al_Faw_(2003)
campaignboxIraq.jpg|thumb|right|HMAS Anzac firing on Iraqi positions at Al-Faw, 21 March 2003File:M1abrams UmmQasr.JPG|thumb|right|Abrams tank fires its 120mm cannon at Iraqi forces during fighting near Umm Qasr, 23 March 2003.File:GROM DN-SD-04-01612.JPEG|thumb|right|GROM commandos in the Umm Qasr port, 28 March 2003The Battle of Al Faw was one of the first battles of the Iraq War. One of the initial objectives of the Coalition campaign in Iraq was to capture the Gas and Oil Platforms (GOPLATs) in the Peninsula intact before it could be sabotaged or destroyed by the Iraqi military. This would prevent an ecological disaster similar to the Gulf War and enable a quicker resumption of oil exports which was vital to the rebuilding of Iraq after the war.The British Royal Marines Commando Brigade would also capture Qasr at the same time so that its only deep water port in Iraq could be used to bring in humanitarian supplies once the Khawr Abd Allah waterway was cleared by the Mine Counter Measures Task group. The United States Marine Corps placed Marine Expeditionary Unit under the command of 3 Commando Brigade so that the Brigade had the necessary force to capture both targets.Order of BattleCoalition forces()()()* Commando Brigade, Marines** Commando, Royal Marines** Commando, Royal Marines** Commando Regiment Royal Artillery** 59 Independent Commando Squadron Royal Engineers** Independent Commando Squadron Royal Engineers** Marine Expeditionary Unit, States Marine Corps** SEAL Teams 3, 8 and 10** GROM commando unit* Fleet support** HMS Ark Royal (helicopter transport)** HMS Ocean (amphibious assault ship)** HMS Richmond (gunfire support)** HMS Marlborough (gunfire support)** HMS Chatham (gunfire support)** RFA Sir Galahad (transport)** USS Valley Forge (command and control)** USS Rushmore (transport)** ORP Kontradmira Xawery Czernicki (logistic support)** HMAS Anzac (gunfire support)* Aviation support** USS Constellation*** F-14 Tomcat (air patrol)*** F/A-18 Hornet fighter-bombers*** MH-53 Pave Low (sniper overwatch for land assault units)*** HH-60H Seahawk (sniper overwatch for GOPLAT assault units)** A-10 Thunderbolt II (air support)** AC-130U Spectre gunship** Cobra attack helicoptersThe AssaultMarch 20Following days of bad weather, the assault on Al Faw was set for 2200 hours (local time) on 20 March 2003. US gunships and fighter-bombers attacked the known enemy positions on the peninsula in a short bombardment prior to the operation. In a classic airborne night assault, the Commando and US marines landed by helicopter, encountering light resistance. They captured their three strategic objectives without loss and capturing over 200 prisoners.At the same time, air and sea landings secured the gas and oil platforms out at sea. SEAL Teams 8 and 10 captured the Mina Al Bakr Oil Terminal and Polish GROM commandos captured the Khor Al-Amaya Oil Terminal. 32 Iraqi prisoners were also captured. Explosive Ordnance Disposal were then landed on the platforms to search for and remove explosive booby traps and demolition charges.A second assault by Commando followed at 2225 hours. The second assault was preceded by artillery and naval bombardment, the artillery fire came from three British and one US artillery batteries positioned on Island, the naval component from HMS Richmond, HMS Marlborough, HMS Chatham and HMAS Anzac. The Marines were preceded by USMC Cobra helicopters gunships and flown in by USMC helicopters to land just north of the town of Al Faw, destroying enemy artillery which could threaten the oil infrastructure and 40 Commandos flank.The insertion began badly with appalling visibility, worsened by fires and sand. The Headquarters of the Brigade Reconnaissance Force crashed in a US Sea Knight as the assault formation turned over the Brigade assembly area, killing the seven Royal Marines and four US marine Corps aviators aboard. The cloud base dropped even further and the insertion was aborted. A new insertion was planned, using RAF Chinook and Puma helicopters for dawn. The landings finally took place, six hours late and onto insecure landing zones, all the objectives were taken and secured.March 2115 MEU crossed the Iraq-Kuwait border in the early hours of the morning, bypassing the town of Umm Qasr and seizing the port.Plans to land British armour by hovercraft were abandoned once engineers discovered extensive mining of the beaches near Al Faw which posed too great a danger to heavy U.S. Navy hovercraft carrying UK Scimitars. The Scimitars of C Squadron Queens Dragoon Guards, which had been loaded Hovercraft aboard the USS Rushmore for the landing were instead landing back in Kuwait and finally crossed the waterway north of Umm Qasr twenty-four hours late. They then took up their positions on the salt marshes south of Basrah.March 22Saddam paramilitaries continued scattered fighting around Umm Qasr. Two Royal Navy Sea King helicopters collided, killing 7 people.March 2315 MEU achieved their main objectives of securing Umm Qasr ahead of schedule, within 48 hours of crossing the Iraqi border. They then pushed north along the west bank of the Khawr Abd Allah waterway encountering stiff resistance from Saddam.March 24An Iraqi armoured brigade attempted a counter attack on Al Faw. It was engaged and repelled by 40 Commando with many Iraqi armoured vehicles destroyed.(With the route to Umm Qasr declared safe and the Al Faw Peninsula largely in Coalition hands, this allowed the British 7th Armoured Brigade to press on to Basrah and US forces to advance on Baghdad without the threat of Iraqi forces near Basrah flanking through Al Faq and attacking Coalition supply lines.()ReferencesdAl Fawpod Al Faw (2003)  (2003)Faw ln th ba
18736399
Starship_Troopers:_Terran_Ascendancy
mouseStarship Troopers: Terran Ascendancy is a tactics game developed by Tongue Entertainment and published by Microprose on October 28, 2000. The game is based on both the 1997 movie Starship Troopers and the book Troopers by A. Heinlein.PlotThe game is divided into three acts following the players Mobile Infantry platoon from the start to the end of the war.Act 1On October 18, 2369, the players platoon is first deployed to Klendathu at the start of the war only for the mission to end with a general retreat. The players platoon, however gets stranded during the evacuation and is forced to deal with Plasma bugs to facilitate extraction, while saving any allied MI squads in the area. Shortly after Klendathu, on November 23, 2369, the players platoon is sent to Zegema Beach to extract a supply convoy in the area. Shortly after Zegema Beach, the players platoon is deployed to the Arachnid Quarantine Zone in Dentana to save the local civilians in the area, while capturing a live Arachnid specimen in the process on January 20, 2370. The last two missions for this act take place in Planet P on February 28 and March 1, 2370, where the player is deployed to secure Whiskey Outpost while capturing further bug specimens.  The act ends with the players platoon in a cave labeled Bug City, where the players platoon facilitates the capture of the Brain Bug.Act 2Five months have passed since the capture of the Brain Bug, and Arachnid Egg Fall Clusters have been attacking various planets in Terran-controlled space. The players platoon was tasked with escort missions for Internal Securitys officer Major Alexander Bishop, while repelling an Arachnid invasion of Mars, attempting to recapture a colony called New Wellington from the Arachnids for morale purposes, as well as learning the true nature of how the Arachnids were able to efficiently attack the Terrans especially with a key food processing facility and the loss of two key military research bases.  Bishop and the players platoon is deployed to Axel 6, a small mining outpost with very little strategic value to exfiltrate the commanding officer of the base as a potential witness. Major Bishop and the player learn that a high-ranking Federation officer, Colonel Holland, has been leaking intelligence of the major Terran bases to the Arachnids via the captured Brain Bug, in hopes of uniting humanity with the bugs. Bishop and the players platoon succeed in killing Holland and the captured Brain Bug while saving scientists who were witnesses to Hollands treachery. Despite the nature of Hollands behavior, the Terran Council decide to cover up Hollands death for morale purposes and finish the battle.Act 3As of September 20, 2371, the Federation has managed to create new weapons and technology for use against the Arachnids and has begun a counter-offensive against the Arachnids to ensure the end of the war. The players platoon was tasked with rescue missions for stranded Mobile Infantry troopers on Planet P, as well as students from a military academy used to train Psychics on the planet Sirius 3, and recovering ancient teleportation technology on Planet G. Shortly after the success of the mission, the player is sent to Klendathu for the second and last time to search for an Arachnid Queen. Utilizing psychic troopers to track the queen, as well as reverse-engineered teleportation devices for extraction, the players platoon fights through arachnid forces to plant Nova bombs in the hive and manages to escape the cavern before it explodes. The war ends on New Years Day of 2372, with the Terran military celebrating their victory.    
18751827
Trona,_San_Bernardino_County,_California
Trona is an unincorporated community in Bernardino County, California.  In 2000 it had a population of 2,742.(http://www.yellowecho.com/travel/trona.htm) Trona is at the western edge of Lake, a dry lake bed in Valley, southwest of Valley.  The town takes its name from the mineral trona, abundant in the lakebed.It is about  northeast of Angeles, on State Route 178.  The ZIP code is 93562.Trona is known for its isolation and desolation,(David Kelly, Solitary, Splendid Squalor, Angeles Times, October 4, 2006, Accessed May 16, 2009.) as well as the nearby Pinnacles.  The local school plays on a dirt football field because the searing heat and highly saline soil kills grass. At one point it boasted an 18 hole golf course that was all sand except for the greens, which were a softer grade of brown colored dirt.()Historyleft|thumb|Trona abuts the dry Searles Lake bedStarting in the late 1800s mining industry set up around Dry Lake to mine borax.Trona was officially established in 1913, as a self-contained town, wholly operated by its resident mining company to house employees.  Employees were paid in company scrip instead of cash.  The mining company also built a library, a scrip-accepting for-profit grocery store, a school, basic housing, and minimal recreation facilities.  The Railway was built in 191314 to provide the town with a rail connection to the Southern Pacific (now the Pacific) line at Searles.  The railway still operates today.Economic booms and busts followed.  Its most notable boom occurred during War I, when Trona was the only reliable American source of potash, an important element used in the production of gunpowder.Today, Valley Minerals Inc.s sod ash processing plant remains the largest firm in town. Other operations nearby include evaporative salt extraction from the lake beds surface, and a lime quarry.  Searles Valley Minerals is the largest employer in Trona, and many employees live in California, commuting daily to Trona.Trona also serves as the headquarters and base of operations for the Railway, a shortline railroad.right|thumb|Trona High Schools unique dirt football fieldHigh School has 162 students and competes as the Tornadoes.  It has the only dirt American football field in the States outside of Alaska.(A number of Hollywood films have been shot in the surrounding desert (particularly around the Trona Pinnacles), including Trek V: The Final Frontier and Planet of the Apes.( In the 2000s, the town itself served as the setting for two films, Trona (2005) and Just Add Water (2008). GeographyThe same collection of geologic forces which created the Searles Valley where Trona sits also created the natural resource of Searles Dry Lake, which contains rich deposits of chemicals, including dozens of minerals.()Located a few miles to the south are the Pinnacles, an unusual landscape consisting of more than 500 tufa spires, some as high as 140 feet, rising from the bed of the Searles Lake basin.ClimateTrona has an arid climate with cool winters and hot summers.  Average January temperatures are a maximum of  and a minimum of .  Average July temperatures are a maximum of  and a minimum of .  There are an average of 140.1 days with highs of  or higher and an average of 45.3 days with lows of  or lower.  The record high temperature was  on August 13, 1933; July 25, 1943; May 27, 1951; and June 29, 1956.  The record low temperature was  on December 23, 1990.Average annual precipitation is  and there an average of 18 days annually with measurable precipitation.  The wettest year was 1941 with  and the driest year was 1953 with .  The most precipitation in one month was  in January 1995.  The most precipitation in 24 hours was  on August 15, 1984.  Snowfall is very rare in Trona, averaging only , but there was  in January 1974.(http://www.wrcc.dri.edu/cgi-bin/cliMAIN.pl?ca9035)PoliticsIn the state legislature, Trona is located in the 18th Senate District, represented by Republican Ashburn, and in the 32nd Assembly District, represented by Republican Fuller. Federally, Searles Valley is located in 25th congressional district, which has a Cook PVI of R +7() and is represented by Republican Buck McKeon.Views of TronaImage:01-2007-Trona-in-Trona.jpg|Piles of lime dust sit just south of Trona on the Trona Railway.Image:Our Churches sign in Trona, California.jpg|Entrance to townImage:01-2007-Trona-02.jpg|Trona from the tourist rest stopImage:01-2007-The-Trona-T.jpg|A Monogram T sits on the hills above Trona.ReferencesExternal links* Trona on the Web* Trona California: portrait of a mining town (includes an aerial view)* Searles Lake, Trona, and the Pinnacles - slideshow* Searles Valley Timeline* The Searles Valley Historical Society* Trona and Searles Valley at blackturtle.us* TRONA, a film by Dave Fenster starring David Nordstrom set in Trona* Abandonment in Trona photosetthumb|center|600px|A dust storm forms over the dry Searles Lake bed, taken from the Trona tourist stop.(Kalifornien)ValleyValleyvo:Trona
18768064
Robert_Oskar_Julius_von_Grschen
right|thumb|Robert Oskar Julius von GrschenRobert Oskar Julius von Grschen (born 22 November 1829 in Aachen; died 10 January 1914 in Aachen) was one of the Aachen regions most successful business lawyers, and an initiator of many social and cultural institutions. In the service of Aachen and Munich insurance company After his law studies, von Grschen planned to pursue a career as a judge. He was already an assistant lawyer in the regional court when he decided, in 1861 to enter in the Aachen and Munich Fire Insurance Company, a predecessor organization of todays Aachen Mnchener Versicherungs-AG (a subsidiary company of the Generali). First, he took over for two years as head of the Subdirektion Berlin before he finally (in 1863) was appointed as a legal officer in the Aachen headquarters. He held this post for seventeen years and was already a consultative member of the of directors. On 9 April 1881, he was appointed as a full member and from 1887 until his death he served as Chairman of the Board of Directors. He was the representative of the insurance company both internally and externally, and under his leadership, the company developed a towering reputation.During this time, Robert von Grschen (thanks to his extraordinary gift of giving speeches, and numerous contacts) was instrumental in instigating a spate of tremendous achievements in the German and international businesses, this insurance company acquired. He was playing a key role in building until 1900, with over 56 new foreign representatives of his company, but also in the planning and implementation of projects for funding of social and cultural institutions in the region. In these early years of the industrial age, he worked vigorously for the social component of support from the Insurance Company. He ensured that each half of the annual profit should be reserved for social and cultural purposes, as the founder of the company, Hansemann (1790-1864), had decreed in 1824.Due to Robert von Grschens co-operation with General Director Friedrich Adolph Brggemann, it was also possible that the Friedrich-Wilhelm Foundation of the University of Aachen (today Aachen), could be founded (in 1866) and that a secure financial footing was guaranteed. The Friedrich-Wilhelm Foundation continues until the present day, awarding scholarships and prizes for research. In 1870, the university also received a guarantee fund in the amount of 1.3 million Mark (vereinsthaler) and a construction fund of a further one million Mark annually, and 10,000 Mark as earmarked grants. This enabled von Grschen and Friedrich Adolph Brggemann (on 10 October 1870) to found the organization Association for the advancement of capacity of work, a kind of labour office of that time. In addition, both also supported the fire insurance companies in many towns and cities throughout the Rhineland in 1870, in the acquisition of one free fire syringe engine for each (of the company Josef Beduwe, Feuerspritzen, Gelb- und Glockengieerei (fire engine, brass and bell foundry) from Aachen, which resulted in a sell of this equipment for over 5000 Marks. Robert von Gorschen and the subsequent directors of the insurance company, Richard Trostorff and Adolf Brggemann, were significantly responsible for ensuring that the Aachen Einhard-Gymnasium (on 1 May 1886) and the Aachen David Hansemann Monument, together with the area surrounding the monument (on 29 August 1888) and the Aachen Tower (on 22 August) could all be inaugurated. The services of the Eschweiler Coal Mining Company (EBV) Robert von Grschen, at the recommendation of his father (privy councillor Karl Heinrich von Grschen, (1784-1860)), became the chairman of the board of Eschweiler coal mining company (EBV), and he also became a member of the Executive Council of the EBV. On 26 October 1897 he was chosen to be a member of the Supervisory Board, and from 1907 to 1909 he became deputy chairman, and until his death in 1914 he filled the position of chairman of this body. At that time the various mines around Aachen and in neighbouring countries were individual companies and no longer competitive in the growing market. Due to Robert von Grschen, in 1907 a merger between the Associations for Mineral Coal Company (Vereinigungsgesellschaft fr Steinkohlenbau im Wurmrevier), further individual mines and the Eschweiler Coal Mining Company (EBV) the EBV became one of the biggest mine companies of Western Germany.He was also honoured in 1903 by the City Wrselen, by having the main shaft of the mine Gouley and according to Council Decision of 21 November 1953 an adjacent street named after him. Further activities and honours Robert von Grschen was, between 1884 to 1909 Municipal city councillor of Aachen. In addition, from 31 January 1864 he joined the Aachener Casino association and was (initially in 1886 and most recently from 1902 to 1909) its president. For his achievements, he was decorated as follows:* of the Red Eagle 3rd class with swords* Order of the Crown of Prussia, 2nd class* Merit Order of the St Michael of Bavaria, 2nd class* House Order of Henry the Lion of Brunswick, 2nd class* House Order of Vigilance or the White Falcon, 2nd, class Family Robert Oskar Julius von Grschen was born to the old German noble family Grschen. He originated from the estate Gut Klau in Aachen, and was married to Elise Helene Friederike Brggemann (1833-1917) and had with her four sons and two daughters. His son Walter Richard Ernst von Grschen became Vice-President in Aachen and another son, Bruno Hans Otto Friedrich von Grschen (1865-1939) became a Judicial and Legal councillor of justice, in 1914 a legal advisor in the Aachen and Munich Insurance Company, and in 1924 chairman of the Supervisory Board of Aachen Reinsurance Company. Sources and literature * Arens/Jansen: Geschichte des Clubs Aachener Casino (History of the Club Casino of Aachen); Nr. 486, page 170; 2nd Edition 1964 * Aachen and Munich Fire Insurance  Memorial about the 75-year-festivity of the corporate 1825-1900; Edition by Georgi, Aachen, 1900* Aachen and Munich Fire Insurance  Memorial about the 100-year-festivity of the corporate 1825-1925; Print corporate Aachen, 1925* Oskar Stegemann: 100 year coal mining company of Eschweiler and his prehistory; Edition 1938, Eschweiler External links * Meine Heimatstadt Alsdorf at www.alsdorf-online.deOskar Julius von Grschen
18785029
Berbeti
Berbeti is a town located in County, Romania, about 78 km south-west from Vlcea. It was granted town status by law in October 2003(). As of January 2009, it has a population of 5,635.The town administers five villages: Dmeni, Dealu Aluni, Roioara, Trgu Gnguleti and Valea Mare.Geography and climateSet on the lower course of the River, a tributary of Olte River, Berbeti is crossed by the parallel north. Berbeti is bordered by Mateeti commune to the north, Sineti commune to the south, Alunu to the west and Copceni to the east.EconomyThe main economic activity is coal mining that began in the 1970s. Following the economic reforms in the late 1990s, Berbeti saw an economic downturn similar to most of the mono-industrial towns in Romania( )().Notes(Vlcea)it:Berbeti(Vlcea megye)nl:Berbetiro:Berbeti
18807965
Devico_AS
Devico AS is the sole company to offer directional core drilling services worldwide. Devico AS also rents various borehole survey instruments for the mining industry and geotechnical projects. The head office is located in Melhus, Norway. The company have until now been operating in more than 30 countries worldwide.HistoryLaunched in 1988 by Mr. Viktor Tokle.IntroductionThe DeviDrill, Devico AS directional core barrel and steerable system, was launched in 1988. It was in use until 2001 when the wireline version of the DeviDrill was introduced. The new version was a big improvement since it allows the drill string to stay in the borehole during steering and coring. Devico AS has developed their own set of borehole survey instruments to be used together with the DeviDrill. In 2002 a miniature version of the survey tool was launched that made it possible to survey throughout the drill bit.To survey in magnetic environment, Devico has developed a gauge based survey tool named DeviFlex. This tool became available in 2004.Referenceswww.devico.comno:Devico
18826276
Petplan_USA
Petplan USA is a Philadelphia-based insurance company,(http://www.bizjournals.com/philadelphia/stories/2008/04/07/daily38.html) providing insurance for pet owners to cover veterinary bills. Since 2003, it has operated in partnership with Petplan UK,(http://www.cribcleaners.com/wbpc/pastwinners/02-03.php) a unit of what Bloomberg describes as Europes largest insurer, SE.(http://www.bloomberg.com/apps/news?pidnewsarchive&sidausmg1JnBOIM) Petplan USA holds the exclusive US license to use the Petplan name in marketing. It has also since 2007 operated in partnership with the Society of the United States (HSUS) to promote pet insurance as a key component in responsible pet ownership.(http://www.hsus.org/shop/petplan_pet_health_insurance.html) In the United States, American National Property and Casualty (ANPAC) underwrites Petplan.(http://www.gopetplan.com/About_PetPlan_Pet_Insurance/AllAbout_Petplan_Pet_Insurance.html)BackgroundThe company was founded in 2003 by Chris Ashton and his wife Natasha Ashton, who had seen the need when as students of the School of the of Pennsylvania they could not get coverage for their own sick pet.( Along with Alex Krooglik and Laura Bennett, they submitted a plan for a pet insurance company, then called PAWS, to the annual Wharton Business Plan Competition, winning the contests $20,000 grand prize.(The truth about cats and dogs: theyre costly Newsletter. (Spring 2003) Wharton Entrepreneurial Program. wharton.upenn.edu. Retrieved 2008-08-12.)(Changing times: Wharton Business Plan Competition Venture Fair Winner eschews high tech Newsletter. (Spring 2003) Wharton Entrepreneurial Program. wharton.upenn.edu. Retrieved 2008-08-12.) For several years, the company struggled with debt, as the Ashtons were unable to secure bank loans.(Witt, Louise. (2005-07-07) When entrepreneurs risk it all and lose New York Times. Retrieved 2008-08-12.)In 2006, Chris Ashton approached the Wharton Entrepreneurial Program for advice on a national marketing plan and was directed to visiting lecturer Alan Abrahams, who assigned Petplan USA as a data-mining test case to his students.(Dogging the data Newsletter. (Spring 2007) Wharton Entrepreneurial Program. wharton.upenn.edu. Retrieved 2008-08-12.) The students work helped determine marketing strategies for the company, providing information on potential areas of interest.  The main benefit of the data mining likely was the media coverage attracted(Walker, Peter. (2007-05-15) Doggedly pursuing a business answer CNN. Retrieved 2008-08-12.), because according to the peer-reviewed article published by Abrahams, the data mining was merely to find demographic features of zipcodes containing at least one vet.(Inducing a marketing strategy for a new pet insurance company using decision trees.)In April 2008, the company, which had nine employees in Spring of 2007 and 11 in February 2008,((Bick, Julie. (2008-02-10) For your pet, a policy all its own The New York Times. Retrieved 2008-08-12.) appointed Hill II, the founder and former president and CEO of Bancorp Inc., as chairman of the board.(ReferencesExternal links*Petplan USA
18839286
Sampit_conflict
The Sampit conflict was an outbreak of inter-ethnic violence in Indonesia, beginning in February 2001 and lasting throughout the year. The conflict started in the town of Sampit, Kalimantan Province, and spread throughout the province, including the capital, Palangkaraya. The conflict was between the indigenous people and the migrant Madurese from the island of Madura.() It broke out on 18 February 2001 when two Madurese were attacked by a number of Dayaks.() The conflict resulted in more than 500 deaths, with over 100,000 Madurese displaced from their homes.() Many Madurese were also found decapitated by the Dayaks.()BackgroundThe Sampit conflict in 2001 was not an isolated incident, as there had been previous incidents of violence between the Dayaks and the Madurese. The last major conflict occurred between December 1996 and January 1997, and resulted in more than 600 deaths.() The Madurese first arrived in Borneo in 1930 under the program initiated by the Dutch colonial administration, and continued by the Indonesian government.() In 2000, transmigrants made up 21% of the population in Central Kalimantan.( The Dayaks are said to be dissatisfied with the increased competition coming from the more aggressive Madurese. New laws had allowed the Madurese to assume control of many commercial industries in the province, such as logging, mining, and plantations.(There are a number of stories purportedly describing the incident that sparked the violence in 2001. One version claims that it was caused by an arson attack on a Dayak house. Rumours spread that the fire was caused by Madurese, and later a group of Dayaks began burning houses in a Madurese neighborhood.(Professor Usop of the Dayak Peoples Association claims that the massacres by the Dayaks were in self-defense, after Dayaks were attacked.() It was claimed that a Dayak was tortured and killed by a gang of Madurese following a gambling dispute in the nearby village of Kerengpangi on December 17, 2000.()Another version claims that the conflict started in a brawl between students of different races at the same school.( )DecapitationsAt least 100 Madurese were decapitated by Dayaks during the conflict.  The Dayaks have a history in the ritual practice of headhunting, though the practice was thought to have died out in the early 20th century.(()ResponseThe scale of the massacre made it difficult for the military and the police to control the situation in Central Kalimantan. Reinforcements were sent in to help existing personnel in the province. By February 18, the Dayaks assumed control over Sampit. Police arrested a local official believed to have been one of the masterminds behind the attacks. The masterminds are suspected of paying six men to provoke the riot in Sampit. The police also arrested a number of rioters following the initial murder spree. Later, on February 21, thousands of Dayaks surrounded a police station in Palangkaraya demanding the release of detainees. The police succumbed to this demand. By, February 28, the military had managed to clear the Dayaks off the streets,() but sporadic violence continued throughout the year.See also* program* Tarakan riot, a much smaller scale riot between Dayak Tidung and Bugis people in TarakanReferencesSampit
18859729
RNAD_Broughton_Moor
thumb|200px|altRNAD Broughton Moor|Sign at the entrance to RNAD Broughton MoorRNAD Broughton Moor is a decommissioned Naval Armaments Depot located between Great Broughton and Moor in the County of Cumbria, England.The site was decommissioned in 1992 at the end of the War. The States Navy used the site for storage of its armaments for its Atlantic Squadron. The site had a 2 ft 6 in (762 mm) gauge railway. Locomotives from this railway are preserved on the Almond Valley and Whipsnade railways. The weapons were taken by rail  out of the site to Workington. The large majority of the buildings and bunkers remain along with underground storage and an extensive network of storage sheds and other military buildings.  Ownership of the site was transferred from the Ministry of Defence to Allerdale Borough Council in 2008 who have yet to decide what to do with the site. The site was purchased by the Borough Council for 1. In October 2008 Cumbria County Council called for interest in the redevelopment of the site rebranded as Derwent Forest. As of yet there has been little interest due to the huge cost involved with cleaning up the site. There are ordnance and large amounts of asbestos as well as unmarked mine shafts when it was a colliery prior to War II. Furthermore, having previously ruled out allowing the site to be used for coal mining, Allerdale council later agreed to allow mining by any prospective future owners as a way to raise funding for any potiental tourism development.(http://coalintheuk.org/opencast-mining-on-broughton-moor-dump-is-only-solution/) It was announced on 13 Jan 2011 that the 2 shortlisted developers for the site would not mine the site, allaying fears about the environmental impact of the development of the site. A decision is due by the end of February 2011.(http://www.bbc.co.uk/news/uk-england-cumbria-12179936)AccidentsAn explosion occurred at RNAD Broughton Moor on the 18th January 1944 which resulted in the death of 11 people and left 70 people injured.  The coroners hearing was reported in the Cumberland Evening Star in February 1944.  The explosion appears to have occurred in one of the traverse laboratories, photos showing the aftermath include a 2 ft 6in gauge box van No. 267.Sale of Railway EquipmentThe railway equipment at RNAD Broughton Moor was sold by tender in April and July 1992 and consisted of approximately 3 miles of standard gauge track and 25 miles of narrow gauge (2 ft 6in) track. The sale also included 4 standard gauge locomotives built by Ruston & Hornsby and Hunslet, 27 narrow gauge locomotives by the same builders and 127 wagons, including 6 box vans, 4 brake vans (2 x 4tons & 2 x 6 tons) and 99 flat wagons.(Source: MOD Schedule of lots, T7038 (April 1992) & T8003 (July 1992).)In 1970 the locomotives in use at Broughton Moor consisted of:Navy Department Locomotives2 - Standard Gauge diesels: 1 x Hunslet 0-4-0DM.1 x Ruston & Hornsby 0-4-0DM Class 165DS.14  2 ft 6in gauge locomotives in use: 2 x Hunslet 0-4-0DM 25HP 4 x Hunslet 0-4-0DM 50HP 2 x Ruston & Hornsby 4wDM Class 20DL, (Nos. R1/2).6 x Ruston & Hornsby 4wDM Class 48DL, (Nos. R4/6/7/8/10/12).Ministry of Public Buildings & Works Locomotives4  2 ft 6in gauge locomotives:2 x Motor Rail 4wDM2 x Hunslet 4wDM  Industrial Railway Society, Pocket Book EL, Industrial Locomotives 1970, Part One - Second EditionReferences(External links* . Shows up well on aerial photographs.
18871453
Agariya_people
The Agariya are one of the Scheduled Tribes of India.  They live primarily in Pradesh and Pradesh.  Those in the vicinity of Mirzapur were involved in mining and smelting iron during the Raj.(http://books.google.com/books?idhHM6baknNRIC&pgPA1&lpgPA1&dqAgariya+tribe&sourceweb&otsuPQTuryHfA&sigtwQ0ND6VkhYwab4kwvWov6qCAd8&hlen&saX&oibook_result&resnum6&ctresult)The Agariya speak the language as well as Hindi and Chhattisgarhi.(http://www.ethnologue.com/show_language.asp?codeagi) There is a group known as the Agariya in Gujarat that are salt makers in the desert.  It is not clear if these Agariya have any relation to the others.(http://www.freedomfilmsindia.org/newsdetail.asp?NewsID44)In the early 20th century, the Agariya in Mirzapur were divided into totemic groups. They had been heavily influenced by Hinduism.  They called themselves Hindu but did not worship any of the major Hindu deities which other Hindus did.(http://books.google.com/books?idUD8TAAAAYAAJ&pgPA402&lpgPA402&dqAgariya+tribe&sourceweb&otsfPHDafy8aO&sigM4ubht_cQu8DrsS5sDo3eqbGPNQ&hlen&saX&oibook_result&resnum1&ctresult)Sources*http://www.ethnologue.com/show_language.asp?codeagi (hi:
18886372
Maybeury,_West_Virginia
blank1_info               1555071(Maybeury is an unincorporated place in McDowell County, Virginia, States, located on US Route 52 between Northfork and Bramwell. As of the 2010 census, its population was 234.In 1890, it was the largest town in McDowell County with a population of 875.  This was due to the coal mining start-ups in the town.  Maybeury was the 5th largest town/city south of the State Capital, Charleston, and listed as the 31st largest town/city in the entire state.(Some History of West Virginia by Jeff Miller, Largest West Virginia cities, by past censuses - 1890  http://jeff560.tripod.com/census.html)John F. Kennedy stopped in Maybeury at the Esso station during his presidential primary campaign in 1960.  During a speech in Canton, Ohio on September 27, 1960, he stated McDowell County mines more coal than it ever has in its history, probably more coal than any county in the United States and yet there are more people getting surplus food packages in McDowell County than any county in the United States. The reason is that machines are doing the jobs of men, and we have not been able to find jobs for those men.(The American Presidency Project  http://www.presidency.ucsb.edu/ws/index.php?pid74231)The now demolished Pocahontas Fuel Company Store was listed on the Register of Historic Places in 1992.()References(Virginia Occidental)
18902895
Reuben_Wells_Leonard
Lieutenant-Colonel Reuben Wells Leonard was a soldier, civil engineer, railroad and mining executive, and philanthropist.EducationFollowing a short stint as a teacher in Brant County, he studied engineering at the Royal Military College of Canada in Ontario, student # 87.  He graduated from RMC as the silver medallist in a class of 23 cadets.CareerHe worked as an engineer for the Pacific Railway. He left temporarily to serve as a transport officer in the Rebellion of 1885. In the period from 1886 to early 1906, he was involved mainly in railway and hydroelectric projects in central and eastern Canada. Among these, he worked on the construction of the first Falls power station, in 189293. A grubstaking venture in northern Ontario in 1905 led to the acquisition of a mineral-rich claim in the centre of Ontario. These mines, which contained cobalt, nickel), silver, and arsenic, made him wealthy.(http://www.biographi.ca/009004-119.01-e.php?&id_nbr7933&interval20&&PHPSESSID90gbana0a8hfa7312cp83n3jj4 Reuben Wells Leonard Biography)RailwayIn 1911, Robert Borden made him chairman of the National Transcontinental Railway Concern, the forerunner of the National Railways. He oversaw the construction of the line from New Brunswick, to Manitoba.Military serviceHe joined the Corps of Guides in 1904. During War I, he served in Europe with the Corps of Guides. He was promoted Lieutenant-Colonel in September 1915.(http://www.biographi.ca/009004-119.01-e.php?&id_nbr7933&interval20&&PHPSESSID90gbana0a8hfa7312cp83n3jj4 Reuben Wells Leonard Biography)PhilanthopyIn 1916, he established a philanthropic foundation and gave extensively to educational institutions, churches (low-church Anglican), hospitals, and other causes.Reuben Leonard was a philanthropist, and made monetary donations not only to Queens but also to the Guides of Canada, Canada, the of Toronto, the Gallery of Ontario, and many other organisations. He also established the Leonard Foundation in 1916, educational trust to provide financial assistance for children of ministers, soldiers, teachers and engineers.(http://www.leonardfnd.org/ Leonard Foundation) He gave generously to support the war effort.GovernanceFollowing the armistice, he served a year as president of the Engineering Institute of Canada in 1919-20. In 1920, he was to the Battlefields Memorials Commission.  He was appointed to boards of governance at the of Toronto, Wycliffe College in Toronto, Ridley College in St Catharines, Ontario the School of Mining and Agriculture and University in Ontario and the University of Canada.(http://www.biographi.ca/009004-119.01-e.php?&id_nbr7933&interval20&&PHPSESSID90gbana0a8hfa7312cp83n3jj4 Reuben Wells Leonard Biography)FamilyLieutenant-Colonel Reuben Wells Leonard and his wife Kate built a stately home, Springbank, which overlooked the old Canal in St Catharines. They did not have any children.(http://www.biographi.ca/009004-119.01-e.php?&id_nbr7933&interval20&&PHPSESSID90gbana0a8hfa7312cp83n3jj4 Reuben Wells Leonard Biography)HonoursQueens University, conferred an honorary doctorate in October 1930.Leonard Reef, St. Joseph Channel, Algoma, Ontario was named in honour of 87 Lieutenant Colonel Reuben Wells Leonard (RMC 1883), Chairman, National Transcontinental Railroad. Leonard Reef, St. Joseph Channel, District, Ontario was named in his honour. 46o 18 19 North 84o 4 10 West There is also a Leonard Township in the Timiskaming District, Ontario.(http://www.archive.org/stream/ontariohistory1011ontauoft/ontariohistory1011ontauoft_djvu.txt)LegacyIn 1923, he donated land to Queens University, on which Leonard Hall, and Leonard Field were named in his honour.(http://www.queensu.ca/secretariat/History/bldgs/leo.html)ControversyUnder the Leonard Foundation terms, boursaries were made available to students who were white, British subjects, and Protestant and no more than one-quarter of the moneys could be awarded to females. The goal was to provide financial assistance to needy students who showed the promise of becoming leading citizens of the British Empire. A complaint filed against the Leonard Foundation under the Ontario Human Rights Code in 1986 prompted litigation. The Ontario Court of Appeal held in 1990, that the trusts exclusionary terms relating to race , religion, nationality, and gender were contrary to law.External links* Leonard Foundation* Biography at the Dictionary of Canadian Biography OnlineReferencesBooks*Bruce Ziff Unforeseen legacies: Reuben Wells Leonard and the Leonard Foundation trust (Toronto, 2000)*4237 Dr. Adrian Preston & Peter Dennis (Edited) Swords and Covenants Rowman And Littlefield, London. Croom Helm. 1976.*H16511 Dr. Richard Arthur Preston To Serve Canada: A History of the Royal Military College of Canada 1997 Toronto, of Toronto Press, 1969.*H16511 Dr. Richard Arthur Preston Canadas RMC - A History of Royal Military College Second Edition 1982*H16511 Dr. Richard Preston R.M.C. and Kingston: The effect of imperial and military influences on a Canadian community 1968 Ontario.*H1877 R. Guy C. Smith (editor) As You Were! Ex-Cadets Remember. In 2 Volumes. Volume I: 1876-1918. Volume II: 1919-1984. RMC. Ontario. The R.M.C. Club of Canada. 1984
18913065
Bayan_Obo_Mining_District
 Bayan Obo Mining District, (; ), or Baiyun-Obo or Baiyunebo, is a mining town in the west of Mongolia, Peoples Republic of China. It is under the administration of Baotou City, more than  to the south.The mines north of the town are the largest deposits of rare earth metals yet found and, as of 2005, responsible for 45% of global rare earth metal production.()()()See also* District* MountainsReferences*de:Bayan-Obo-MineOboObo-gruvenObozh:
18930111
Ambre_Energy
Ambre Energy Limited is an Australian coal and shale company. It has offices in Brisbane and Lake City.HistoryAmbre Energy was founded in June 2005 by Edek Choros, a geologist and mining engineer. In September 2005, Ambre Energy filed a patent for the Hybrid Energy System, a method for processing low value coal and other carbonaceous materials. In April 2006, Ambre Energy started negotiations with American oil shale technology company Oil-Tech, Inc., incorporated in February 2000 in Utah. Oil-Tech, Inc. was a developer of the Oil-Tech staged electrically heated retort process for the oil shale pyrolysis. In October 2006, Ambre Energy and Oil-Tech established Millennium Synfuels, LLC, which take over property rights of the retorting technology. By 30 June 2007 Ambre Energy acquired 6% of Oil Tech and 17 October 2007 it acquired 35%. Further Oil Tech become a wholly owned subsidiary of Ambre Energy and as of 21 July 2008 was merged into Ambre Energy.Felton Clean Coal ProjectAmbre Energy is planning to build and operate a clean coal gasification plant at Felton Valley,  south west of Queensland. The plan includes construction of an open-pit coal mine, and capture facility.()  At the final stage, the plant is expected to produce enough gas for production of 2.8 million tonnes per year of ether and generate 650 MW of electricity. It is also expected to produce by-products for fertilizer production, and olefins and plastics manufacturing.Oil-Tech processAmbre Energy operates a small Oil-Tech-type of oil extraction pilot plant and  of oil shale leases, approximately  southeast of Utah. In Oil-Tech process, crushed oil shale is lifted by a conveyor system to the vertical retort, and is loaded into the retort from the top. The retort consists of a series of connected individual heating chambers, stacked atop each other. Heating rods extend into the centers of each of these chambers. The feed oil shale is heated to increasingly higher temperatures as it moves down the retort, attaining a temperature of  in the lowest chamber. The gases and vapors are vacuumed into a condensing unit. The spent shale is used for pre-heating feed oil shale.()()  The advantages of this technology are its modular design, which enhances its portability and adaptability, its low water requirements, its heating efficiency, and the relatively high quality of the resulting product.(ReferencesExternal links* Company website
18933632
Metadata
The term metadata is an ambiguous term which is used for two fundamentally different concepts (types). Although the expression data about data is often used, it does not apply to both in the same way. Structural metadata, the design and specification of data structures, cannot be about data, because at design time the application contains no data. In this case the correct description would be data about the containers of data. Descriptive metadata, on the other hand, is about individual instances of application data, the data content. In this case, a useful description (resulting in a disambiguating neologism) would be data about data contents or content about content thus metacontent. Descriptive, Guide and the Information Standards Organization concept of administrative metadata are all subtypes of metacontent.Metadata (metacontent) is traditionally found in the card catalogs of libraries. As information has become increasingly digital, metadata is also used to describe digital data using standards specific to a particular discipline. By describing the contents and context of data files, the quality of the original data/files is greatly increased. For example, a webpage may include metadata specifying what language its written in, what tools were used to create it, and where to go for more on the subject, allowing browsers to automatically improve the experience of users. Definition Metadata (metacontent) is defined as data providing information about one or more aspects of the data, such as:* Means of creation of the data* Purpose of the data* Time and date of creation* Creator or author of data* Placement on a network where the data was created* Standards used* The basic information of a piece of musicFor example, a image may include metadata that describes how large the picture is, the color depth, the image resolution, when the image was created, and other data. A text documents metadata may contain information about how long the document is, who the author is, when the document was written, and a short summary of the document.Metadata is data. As such, metadata can be stored and managed in a database, often called a registry or repository.(Hner, K.; Otto, B.; sterle, H.: Collaborative management of business metadata, in: International Journal of Information Management, 2011) However, it is impossible to identify metadata just by looking at it because a user would not know when data is metadata or just data.(METADATA STANDARDS AND METADATA REGISTRIES: AN OVERVIEW) Libraries Metadata has been used in various forms as a means of cataloging archived information. The Decimal System employed by libraries for the classification of library materials is an early example of metadata usage. Library catalogues used 3x5 inch cards to display a books title, author, subject matter, and a brief plot synopsis along with an abbreviated alpha-numeric identification system which indicated the physical location of the book within the librarys shelves.Such data helps classify, aggregate, identify, and locate a particular book. Another form of older metadata collection is the use by US Census Bureau of what is known as the Long Form. The Long Form asks questions that are used to create demographic data to create patterns and to find patterns of distribution.() The term was coined in 1968 by Philip Bagley, one of the pioneers of computerized document retrieval.()(The notion of metadata introduced by Bagley. ) Since then the fields of information management, information science, information technology, librarianship and GIS have widely adopted the term. In these fields the word metadata is defined as data about data.() While this is the generally accepted definition, various disciplines have adopted their own more specific explanation and uses of the term.For the purposes of this article, an object refers to any of the following:*A physical item such as a book, CD, DVD, map, chair, table, flower pot, etc.*An electronic file such as a digital image, digital photo, document, program file, database table, etc. Photographs Metadata may be written into a digital photo file that will identify who owns it, copyright & contact information, what camera created the file, along with exposure information and descriptive information such as keywords about the photo, making the file searchable on the computer and/or the Internet.  Some metadata is written by the camera and some is input by the photographer and/or software after downloading to a computer.Photographic Metadata Standards are governed by organizations that develop the following standards. They include, but are not limited to:*Information Interchange Model IIM (International Press Telecommunications Council),*IPTC Core Schema for XMP*XMP  Extensible Metadata Platform (an Adobe standard)*Exif  Exchangeable image file format, Maintained by CIPA (Camera & Imaging Products Association) and published by JEITA (Japan Electronics and Information Technology Industries Association)*Core (Dublin Core Metadata Initiative  DCMI)*PLUS (Picture Licensing Universal System). Video Metadata is particularly useful in video, where information about its contents (such as transcripts of conversations and text descriptions of its scenes) are not directly understandable by a computer, but where efficient search is desirable. Web pages Web pages often include metadata in the form of meta tags. Description and keywords meta tags are commonly used to describe the Web pages content. Most search engines use this data when adding pages to their search index. Creation of metadata Metadata can be created either by automated information processing or by manual work. Elementary metadata captured by computers can include information about when a file was created, who created it, when it was last updated, file size and file extension.  Metadata types The metadata application is manifold covering a large variety of fields of application there are nothing but specialised and well accepted models to specify types of metadata.  Bretheron & Singley (1994) distinguish between two distinct classes: structural/control metadata and guide metadata.() Structural metadata is used to describe the structure of computer systems such as tables, columns and indexes. Guide metadata is used to help humans find specific items and is usually expressed as a set of keywords in a natural language. According to Kimball metadata can be divided into 2 similar categoriesTechnical metadata and Business metadata. Technical metadata correspond to internal metadata, business metadata to external metadata. Kimball adds a third category named Process metadata. On the other hand, NISO distinguishes between three types of metadata: descriptive, structural and administrative.( Descriptive metadata is the information used to search and locate an object such as title, author, subjects, keywords, publisher; structural metadata gives a description of how the components of the object are organised; and administrative metadata refers to the technical information including file type. Two sub-types of administrative metadata are rights management metadata and preservation metadata. Metadata structures Metadata (metacontent), or more correctly, the vocabularies used to assemble metadata (metacontent) statements, is typically structured according to a standardized concept using a well defined metadata scheme, including: standards and metadata models. Tools such as controlled vocabularies, taxonomies, thesauri, data dictionaries and metadata registries can be used to apply further standardization to the metadata. Metadata syntax Metadata (metacontent) syntax refers to the rules created to structure the fields or elements of metadata (metacontent).() A single metadata scheme may be expressed in a number of different markup or programming languages, each of which requires a different syntax. For example, Dublin Core may be expressed in plain text, HTML, XML and RDF.()A common example of (guide) metacontent is the bibliographic classification, the subject, the Dewey Decimal class number. There is always an implied statement in any classification of some object. To classify an object as, for example, Dewey class number 514 (Topology) (e.g. a book has this number on the spine) the implied statement is: . This is a subject-predicate-object triple, or more importantly, a class-attribute-value triple. The first two elements of the triple (class, attribute) are pieces of some structural metadata having a defined semantic. The third element is a value, preferably from some controlled vocabulary, some reference (master) data. The combination of the metadata and master data elements results in a statement which is a metacontent statement i.e. metacontent  metadata + master data. All these elements can be thought of as vocabulary. Both metadata and master data are vocabularies which can be assembled into metacontent statements. There are many sources of these vocabularies, both meta and master data: UML, EDIFACT, XSD, Dewey/UDC/LoC, SKOS, ISO-25964, Pantone, Linnaean Binomial Nomenclature etc. Using controlled vocabularies for the  components of metacontent statements, whether for indexing or finding, is endorsed by ISO-25964: If both the indexer and the searcher are guided to choose the same term for the same concept, then relevant documents will be retrieved. This is particularly relevant when considering that the behemoth of the internet, Google, is simply indexing then matching text strings, there is no intelligence or inferencing occurring. Hierarchical, linear and planar schemata Metadata schema can be hierarchical in nature where relationships exist between metadata elements and elements are nested so that parent-child relationships exist between the elements.An example of a hierarchical metadata schema is the IEEE LOM schema where metadata elements may belong to a parent metadata element.Metadata schema can also be one dimensional, or linear, where each element is completely discrete from other elements and classified according to one dimension only.An example of a linear metadata schema is Dublin Core schema which is one dimensional.Metadata schema are often two dimensional, or planar, where each element is completely discrete from other elements but classified according to two orthogonal dimensions.( ) Metadata hypermapping In all cases where the metadata schemata exceed the planar depiction, some type of hypermapping is required to enable display and view of metadata according to chosen aspect and to serve special views. Hypermapping frequently applies to layering of geographical and geological information overlays.(THE DESIGN AND DEVELOPMENT OF A GEOLOGIC HYPERMAP PROTOTYPE) Granularity Granularity is a term that applies to data as well as to metadata. The degree to which metadata is structured is referred to as its granularity.  Metadata with a high granularity allows for deeper structured information and enables greater levels of technical manipulation however, a lower level of granularity means that metadata can be created for considerably lower costs but will not provide as detailed information. The major impact of granularity is not only on creation and capture, but moreover on maintenance. As soon as the metadata structures get outdated, the access to the referred data will get outdated. Hence granularity shall take into account the effort to create as well as the effort to maintain. Metadata standards International standards apply to metadata. Much work is being accomplished in the national and international standards communities, especially ANSI (American National Standards Institute) and ISO (International Organization for Standardization) to reach consensus on standardizing metadata and registries.The core standard is ISO/IEC 11179-1:2004 (ISO/IEC 11179-1:2004 Information technology - Metadata registries (MDR) - Part 1: Framework) and subsequent standards (see 11179). All yet published registrations according to this standard cover just the definition of metadata and do not serve the structuring of metadata storage or retrieval neither any administrative standardisation. It is important to note that this standard refers to metadata as data about containers of data and not to metadata (metacontent) as data about data contents. It should also be noted that this standard describes itself originally as a data element registry, describing disembodied data elements, and explicitly disavows the capability of containing complex structures. Thus the original term data element is more applicable than the later applied buzzword metadata. Metadata usage  Data Virtualization Data Virtualization has emerged as the new software technology to complete the virtualization stack in the enterprise. Metadata is used in Data Virtualization servers which are enterprise infrastructure components, along side with Database and Application servers. Metadata in these servers is saved as persistent repository and describes business objects in various enterprise systems and applications. SVN Checkout Metadata  .SVN hidden files created in the web root folder which can reveal crucial information of the code repositories. Statistics and census services Standardization work has had a large impact on efforts to build metadata systems in the statistical community. Several metadata standards are described, and their importance to statistical agencies is discussed. Applications of the standards at the Census Bureau, Environmental Protection Agency, Bureau of Labor Statistics, Statistics Canada, and many others are described. Emphasis is on the impact a metadata registry can have in a statistical agency. Library and information science Libraries employ metadata in catalogues, most commonly as part of an Integrated Library Management System. Metadata is obtained by cataloguing resources such as books, periodicals, DVDs, web pages or digital images. This data is stored in the integrated library management system, ILMS, using the MARC metadata standard. The purpose is to direct patrons to the physical or electronic location of items or areas they seek as well as to provide a description of the item/s in question.More recent and specialized instances of library metadata include the establishment of digital libraries including e-print repositories and digital image libraries. While often based on library principles the focus on non-librarian use, especially in providing metadata means they do not follow traditional or common cataloging approaches. Given the custom nature of included materials metadata fields are often specially created e.g. taxonomic classification fields, location fields, keywords or copyright statement. Standard file information such as file size and format are usually automatically included.Standardization for library operation has been a key topic in international standardization (ISO) for decades. Standards for metadata in digital libraries include Core, METS, MODS, DDI, ISO standard Digital Object Identifier (DOI), ISO standard Uniform Resource Name (URN), PREMIS schema, Metadata Language, and OAI-PMH. Leading libraries in the world give hints on their metadata standards strategies.(Library of Congress Washington DC on metadata)(Deutsche Nationalbibliothek Frankfurt on metadata) Metadata and the law  United States Problems involving metadata in litigation in the States are becoming widespread. Courts have looked at various questions involving metadata, including the discoverability of metadata by parties. Although the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure have only specified rules about electronic documents, subsequent case law has elaborated on the requirement of parties to reveal metadata.() In October 2009, the Supreme Court has ruled that metadata records are public record.()Document Metadata has proven particularly important in legal environments in which litigation has requested metadata, which can include sensitive information detrimental to a party in court.Using removal tools to clean documents can mitigate the risks of unwittingly sending sensitive data. This process partially (see remanence) protects law firms from potentially damaging leaking of sensitive data through Discovery. Metadata in healthcare Australian researches in medicine started a lot of metadata definition for applications in health care. That approach offers the first recognised attempt to adhere to international standards in medical sciences instead of defining a proprietary standard under the WHO umbrella first.The medical community yet did not approve the need to follow metadata standards despite respective research.(M. Lbe, M. Knuth, R. Mcke TIM: A Semantic Web Application for the Specification of Metadata Items in Clinical Research, CEUR-WS.org, urn:nbn:de:0074-559-9) Metadata and data warehousing warehouse (DW) is a repository of an organizations electronically stored data. Data warehouses are designed to manage and store the data whereas the Intelligence (BI) focuses on the usage of data to facilitate reporting and analysis.(Inmon, W.H. Tech Topic: What is a Data Warehouse? Prism Solutions. Volume 1. 1995.)The purpose of a data warehouse is to house standardized, structured, consistent, integrated, correct, cleansed and timely data, extracted from various operational systems in an organization. The extracted data is integrated in the warehouse environment in order to provide an enterprise wide perspective, one version of the truth. Data is structured in a way to specifically address the reporting and analytic requirements.An essential component of a warehouse/intelligence system is the metadata and tools to manage and retrieve metadata. Kimball(Kimball,The Data Warehouse Lifecycle Toolkit, Second Edition. New York, Wiley, 2008, ISBN 978-0-470-14977-5, page 10, 115117, 131132, 140, 154155)  describes metadata as the DNA of the data warehouse as metadata defines the elements of the warehouse and how they work together.Kimball et al.(Kimball et al., The Data Warehouse Lifecycle Toolkit, Second Edition. New York, Wiley, 2008, ISBN 978-0-470-14977-5, 116117) refers to three main categories of metadata: Technical metadata, business metadata and process metadata. Technical metadata is primarily definitional while business metadata and process metadata are primarily descriptive. Keep in mind that the categories sometimes overlap.* Technical metadata defines the objects and processes in a DW/BI system, as seen from a technical point of view. The technical metadata includes the system metadata which defines the data structures such as: Tables, fields, data types, indexes and partitions in the relational engine, and databases, dimensions, measures, and data mining models. Technical metadata defines the data model and the way it is displayed for the users, with the reports, schedules, distribution lists and user security rights.* Business metadata is content from the data warehouse described in more user-friendly terms. The business metadata tells you what data you have, where it comes from, what it means and what its relationship is to other data in the data warehouse. Business metadata may also serves as documentation for the DW/BI system. Users who browse the data warehouse are primarily viewing the business metadata.* Process metadata is used to describe the results of various operations in the data warehouse. Within the ETL process all key data from tasks are logged on execution. This includes start time, end time, CPU seconds used, disk reads, disk writes and rows processed. When troubleshooting the ETL or query process, this sort of data becomes valuable. Process metadata is the fact measurement when building and using a DW/BI system. Some organizations make a living out of collecting and selling this sort of data to companies - in that case the process metadata becomes the business metadata for the fact and dimension tables. Process metadata is in interest of business people who can use the data to identify the users of their products, which products they are using and what level of service they are receiving. Metadata on the Internet The HTML format used to define web pages allows for the inclusion of a variety of types of metadata, from basic descriptive text, dates and keywords to further advanced metadata schemes such as the Core, e-GMS, and AGLS(National Archives of Australia, AGLS Metadata Standard, accessed 7 January 2010, http://www.naa.gov.au/records-management/create-capture-describe/describe/AGLS/index.aspx) standards. Pages can also be geotagged with coordinates. Metadata may be included in the pages header or in a separate file. Microformats allow metadata to be added to on-page data in a way that users do not see, but computers can readily access.Interestingly, many search engines are cautious about using metadata in their ranking algorithms due to exploitation of metadata and the practice of search engine optimization, SEO, to improve rankings. See element article for further discussion. Metadata on the broadcast industry In broadcast industry, metadata are linked to audio and video media to:* identify the media: clip or playlist names, duration, timecode, etc.* describe the content: notes regarding the quality of video content, rating, description (for example, during a sport event, keywords like goal, red card will be associated to some clips)* classify media: metadata allow to sort the media or to easily and quickly find a video content (a news could urgently need some archive content for a subject).These metadata can be linked to the video media thanks to the video servers. All last broadcasted sport events like World Cup or Games use these metadata to distribute their video content to stations through keywords. Its often the host broadcaster(HBS is the FIFA host broadcaster) who is in charge of organizing metadata through its International Broadcast Centre and its video servers. Those metadata are recorded with the images and are entered by metadata operators (loggers) who associate in live metadata available in metadata grids through software (such as Multicam(LSM) or IPDirector used during World Cup or Games).(Host Broadcast Media Server and Related Applications)(logs during sport events) Geospatial metadata Metadata that describe geographic objects (such as datasets, maps, features, or simply documents with a geospatial component) have a history dating back to at least 1994 (refer MIT Library page on FGDC Metadata). This class of metadata is described more fully on the metadata page. Ecological & environmental metadata Ecological and environmental metadata are intended to document the who, what, when, where, why, and how of data collection for a particular study.  Metadata should be generated in a format commonly used by the most relevant science community, such as Core, Metadata Language(<http://knb.ecoinformatics.org/software/eml/eml-2.0.1/index.html), or Core. Metadata editing tools exist to facilitate metadata generation (e.g. Metavist(http://metavist.djames.net/), Metadata Search System, Morpho(http://knb.ecoinformatics.org/morphoportal.jsp)).  Metadata should describe  provenance of the data (where it originated, as well as any transformations the data underwent) and how to give credit for (cite) the data products.  Metadata on CDs and DVDs CDs such as recordings of music will carry a layer of metadata about the recordings such as dates, artist, genre, copyright owner, etc.  The metadata, not normally displayed by CD players, can be accessed and displayed by specialized music playback and/or editing applications. Cloud applications With the availability of Cloud applications, which include those to add metadata to content, metadata is increasingly available over the Internet. Metadata administration and management  Metadata storage Metadata can be stored either internally, in the same file as the data, or externally, in a separate file. Metadata that is embedded with content is called embedded metadata. A data repository typically stores the metadata detached from the data. Both ways have advantages and disadvantages:* Internal storage allows transferring metadata together with the data it describes; thus, metadata is always at hand and can be manipulated easily. This method creates high redundancy and does not allow holding metadata together.* External storage allows bundling metadata, for example in a database, for more efficient searching. There is no redundancy and metadata can be transferred simultaneously when using streaming. However, as most formats use URIs for that purpose, the method of how the metadata is linked to its data should be treated with care. What if a resource does not have a URI (resources on a local hard disk or web pages that are created on-the-fly using a content management system)? What if metadata can only be evaluated if there is a connection to the Web, especially when using RDF? How to realize that a resource is replaced by another with the same name but different content?Moreover, there is the question of data format: storing metadata in a human-readable format such as XML can be useful because users can understand and edit it without specialized tools. On the other hand, these formats are not optimized for storage capacity; it may be useful to store metadata in a binary, non-human-readable format instead to speed up transfer and save memory. Database management Each database system has its own mechanisms for storing metadata. Examples of relational-database metadata include:* Tables of all tables in a database, their names, sizes and number of rows in each table.* Tables of columns in each database, what tables they are used in, and the type of data stored in each column.In database terminology, this set of metadata is referred to as the catalog. The SQL standard specifies a uniform means to access the catalog, called the schema, but not all databases implement it, even if they implement other aspects of the SQL standard. For an example of database-specific metadata access methods, see metadata. Programmatic access to metadata is possible using APIs such as JDBC, or SchemaCrawler.() See also * OneSource* International Information System for the Agricultural Sciences and Technology* scheme* (metadata)* Dictionary (aka metadata repository)* Core* Folksonomy*  Generic Earth Observation Metadata Standard* 11179* IPDirector* tag* element* Multicam(LSM)* Metadata from Wikiversity* discovery* facility for Java* Metadata Access Point Interface* publishing* registry* METAFOR Common Metadata for Climate Modelling Digital Repositories* Metadata Search System* Microcontent* Microformat* (computer science)* statistics* Metadata* SDMX* Web*SGML* Metadata Company* Data Element Framework*XSD*DataONE References  External links * Mercury: Metadata Management, Data Discovery and Access, managed by Oak Ridge National Laboratory Active Archive Center* Metacrap: Putting the torch to seven straw-men of the meta-utopia  Doctorows opinion on the limitations of metadata on the Internet, 2001* Retrieving Meta Data from Documents and Pictures Online - AnonWatch* Understanding Metadata - NISO, 2004* DataONE Investigator Toolkit* * * AFC2IC Vocabulary OneSource Tool* On metadata and metacontentaz:Metaverilnlrbg:ca:Metadadescs:Metadatada:Metadatade:Metadatenet:Metaandmedel:es:Metadatoeo:Meta-datenofa:fr:Mtadonneko:hr:Metapodatciid:Metadatait:Metadatohe:Metadatakn:lv:Metadatihu:Metaadatml:ms:Metadatanl:Metadataja:no:Metadatapl:Metadanept:Metadadosro:Metadatru:simple:Metadatask:Metadtasl:Metapodateksr:Metapodacifi:Metatietosv:Metadatath:uk:ur:Metadatad liuzh:
18950479
Economy_of_Antigua_and_Barbuda
cianame  acAntigua and Barbudas economy is service-based, with tourism and government services representing the key sources of employment and income. Tourism accounts directly or indirectly for more than half of GDP and is also the principal earner of foreign exchange in Antigua and Barbuda. However, a series of violent hurricanes since 1995 resulted in serious damage to tourist infrastructure and periods of sharp reductions in visitor numbers. In 1999 the budding offshore financial sector was seriously hurt by financial sanctions imposed by the States and Kingdom as a result of the loosening of its money-laundering controls. The government has made efforts to comply with international demands in order to get the sanctions lifted. The dual island nations agricultural production is mainly directed to the domestic market; the sector is constrained by the limited water supply and labor shortages that reflect the pull of higher wages in tourism and construction. Manufacturing comprises enclave-type assembly for export with major products being bedding, handicrafts, and electronic components. Prospects for economic growth in the medium term will continue to depend on income growth in the industrialized world, especially in the US, which accounts for about one-third of all tourist arrivals. Estimated overall economic growth for 2000 was 2.5%. Inflation has trended down going from above 2 percent in the 1995-99 period and estimated at 0 percent in 2000.To lessen its vulnerability to natural disasters, Antigua has been diversifying its economy. Transportation, communications and financial services are becoming important.Antigua is a member of the Caribbean Currency Union (ECCU). The Caribbean Central Bank (ECCB) issues a common currency (the Caribbean dollar) for all members of the ECCU. The ECCB also manages monetary policy, and regulates and supervises commercial banking activities in its member countries.Antigua and Barbuda is a beneficiary of the U.S. Basin Initiative. Its 1998 exports to the U.S. were valued at about US $3 million and its U.S. imports totaled about US $84 million. It also belongs to the predominantly English-speaking Caribbean Community (CARICOM). Economic History Prior to colonization, several Amerindian groups inhabited Antigua and Barbuda, all of which relied on a subsistence lifestyle.  British colonists established settlements in the islands in 1632.  After fighting off the Caribs, Dutch, and French to stabilize their colonies, settlers grew tobacco, indigo, cotton, and ginger as cash crops.  As on many other Caribbean islands, sugar cultivation became the most profitable enterprise, quickly surpassing other crops in economic importance.  Due to the vast tracts of land needed for large-scale sugar production, rainforests on the islands were decimated. Timber from the rainforests was used in shipbuilding and repair.With the shift to a economy, slaves were imported from Africa.  Even after the abolition of slavery in 1834, former slaves continued working in servitude due to laws designed to keep providing plantations with cheap labor.  As the sugar industry began to wane, the plantation economy came to an end.Primary industriesAgricultureSome 30% of land on Antigua is under crops or potentially arable, with 18% in use. Sea-island cotton is a profitable export crop. A modest amount of sugar is harvested each year, and there are plans for production of ethanol from sugarcane. Vegetables, including beans, carrots, cabbage, cucumbers, plantains, squash, tomatoes, and yams, are grown mostly on small family plots for local markets. Over the past 30 years, agricultures contribution to the GDP has fallen from over 40% to 12%. The decline in the sugar industry left 60% of the countrys  under government control, and the Ministry of Agriculture is encouraging self-sufficiency in certain foods in order to curtail the need to import food, which accounts for about 25% by value of all imports. Crops suffer from droughts and insect pests, and cotton and sugar plantings suffer from soil depletion and the unwillingness of the population to work in the fields. Mango production in 2004 was 1,430 tons.Animal husbandryLivestock estimates in 2004 counted 14,300 head of cattle, 19,000 sheep, and 36,000 goats; there were some 5,700 hogs in the same year. Most livestock is owned by individual households. Milk production in 2004 was an estimated 5,350 tons. The government has sought to increase grazing space and to improve stock, breeding Nelthropp cattle and Black Belly sheep. There is a growing poultry industry. In 1992, the European Development Bank provided $5 million US to the government to help develop the livestock industry.FishingMost fishing is for local consumption, although there is a growing export of the lobster catch to the United States and of some fish to Guadeloupe and Martinique. Antiguans annually consume more fish capita (46 kg/101.4 lb) per year live weight than any other nation or territory in the Caribbean. The main fishing waters are near shore or between Antigua and Barbuda. There are shrimp and lobster farms operating, and the Smithsonian Institution has a Caribbean king crab farming facility for the local market. The government has encouraged modern fishing methods and supported mechanization and the building of new boats. Fish landings in 2000 were 1,481 tons; the lobster catch, 42 tons. Exports of fish commodities in 2000 were valued at US$1.5 million.ForestryAbout 11% of the land is forested, mainly by plantings of cedar, mahogany, cedar, and acacia. A reforestation program was begun in 1963, linked with efforts to improve soil and conservation.MiningFew of the islands mineral resources, which included limestone, building stone, clay, and barite, were exploited until recently. Limestone and volcanic stone have been extracted from Antigua for local construction purposes, and the manufacture of bricks and tiles from local clay has begun on a small scale. Barbuda produced a small amount of salt, while phosphate has been collected from Redonda.Secondary industriesIndustrial activity has shifted from the processing of local agriculture produce to consumer and export industries using imported raw materials. Industrial products include rum, refined petroleum, paints, garments, furniture, and electrical components. The government encourages investment in manufacturing establishments, and most industries have some government participation.Industry accounted for 19% of GDP in 2001. Manufacturingwhich accounts for approximately 5% of GDPcomprises enclave-type assembly for export with major products being bedding, handicrafts, and electronic components. Prospects for economic growth depend on income growth in the industrialized world, especially in the US, which accounts for about half of all tourist arrivals. The industrial park, located in the Coolidge Area, produces a range of products such as paints, furniture, garments, and galvanized sheets, mainly for export.Tertiary industriesTourismTourism is the mainstay of the economy of Antigua and Barbuda and is the leading sector in terms of providing employment and creating foreign exchange. In 1999 it contributed 60 percent of GDP and more than half of all jobs. According to the Americas Review 1998, tourism contributed 15 percent directly and around 40 percent indirectly to the GDP in 1998. Real growth in this sector has moved from an average of 7 percent for the period 1985-89 to 8.24 percent for the period 1990-95. There was slow growth between 1995 and 1998.Figures released by the East Caribbean Central Bank (ECCB) in 2000 show that total visitor arrivals increased steadily from 470,975 in 1995 to 613,990 in 1998. In 1999 total visitor arrivals declined by about 4.1 percent to 588,866, yet the number of visitors staying at least 1 night or more increased by 1.9 percent over 1998 to total 207,862. Arrivals via cruise ships in 1999 dropped to 325,195, a fall of 3.4 percent over 1998. The fall-off in cruise passengers was mainly the result of one of the larger cruise ships being out of service for a brief period. Most of the tourists in 1999 came from the United Kingdom and the United States. Visitor expenditures have increased steadily since 1990, with total expenditures of EC$782.9 million.To combat increasing competition from other Caribbean destinations, the government and the Antigua Hotel and Tourist Association have established a joint fund to market the countrys appeal as a tourist destination. The Association has agreed to match the proceeds from a 2 percent hotel guest levy introduced by the government.At the start of March 2001, the Antigua Workers Union (AWU), the trade union which represents close to 7,000 workers in the tourism industry, described tourism as an industry in crisis. The AWU claimed the industry is on the decline because some airlines are pulling out of the country, and government was not spending enough money to promote tourism. While the government has conceded that it was not spending enough on marketing because of cash flow problems, it has rejected the AWUs contention that the industry is in crisis.Financial servicesAntigua and Barbuda is advertised as an attractive offshore jurisdiction. The country were thene first of sign the United Nations anti-money laundering act. This agreement came out of a conference in 1999 which urged worldwide offshore financial centers to introduce laws to tighten their policing of money laundering activities. The Kingdom exerted considerable pressure on Antigua and Barbuda to reform laws to combat money laundering, even issuing an advisory in April 1999 to British financial institutions that Antigua and Barbudas anti-money laundering laws were wanting. Antigua and Barbuda responded to this concern, and a subsequent joint United States and United Kingdom review reported they were satisfied that the country had taken positive steps to check illegal activity in this sector. In September 2000 the government of Antigua and Barbuda announced that it had strengthened its surveillance of laundering and trafficking.  In March 2009, the Financial Group, based in Antigua was found by regulators there and in the United States, of  be operating a massive scheme.  The international bank controlled by the Stanford group is now in receivership pending the outcome of an investigationbut they can have  big and small of all they can haveRetailThe retail sector is dominated by the sale of food and beverages, clothing and textiles, and vegetables. The main markets are located in the capital, St. Johns. There are many street vendors and shops. The government has been taking steps to improve this sector. A US$43.5 million vendors mall and market has been built to provide better facilities for retailers in the capital. In addition, a US$27 million fisheries complex now provides improved facilities for fish processing and retailing. A growing area of computer business on Antigua is Internet casinos.StatisticsGDP: power parity - $1.61 billion (2008 est.):country comparison to the world: 189GDP - real growth rate: 2.1% (2008 est.):country comparison to the world: 161GDP - per capita: purchasing power parity - $19,000 (2008 est.):country comparison to the world: 64GDP - composition by sector:agriculture:3.8% industry:22% services:74.3% (2002 est.)Inflation rate (consumer prices):1.5% (2007 est.):country comparison to the world: 14Labor force:30,000 (1991):country comparison to the world: 197Unemployment rate: 11% (2001 est.):country comparison to the world: 130Budget:revenues:$123.7 million expenditures:$145.9 million (2000 est.)Central bank discount rate: 6.5% (January 2008):country comparison to the world: 57Agriculture - products: cotton, fruits, vegetables, bananas, coconuts, cucumbers, mangoes, sugarcane; livestockIndustries: tourism, construction, light manufacturing (clothing, alcohol, household appliances)Electricity - production: 105 million kWh (2006):country comparison to the world: 188Electricity - consumption: 97.65 million kWh (2006):country comparison to the world: 189Electricity - exports: 0 kWh (2007)Electricity - imports: 0 kWh (2007)Oil - production:  (2007):country comparison to the world: 116Oil - consumption:  (2006 est.):country comparison to the world: 169Oil - exports:  (2005):country comparison to the world: 132Oil - imports:  (2005):country comparison to the world: 161Oil - proved reserves:  (1 January 2006 est.):country comparison to the world: 99Natural gas - production: 0 cu m (2007 est.):country comparison to the world: 209Natural gas - consumption: 0 cu m (2007 est.):country comparison to the world: 209Natural gas - exports: 0 cu m (2006 est.):country comparison to the world: 206Natural gas - imports: 0 cu m (2006):country comparison to the world: 205Natural gas - proved reserves: 0 cu m (1 January 2006 est.):country comparison to the world: 206Exports: $84.3 million (2007 est.):country comparison to the world: 199Exports - commodities: petroleum products 48%, manufactures 23%, machinery and transport equipment 17%, food and live animals 4%, other 8%Exports - partners: Spain 34%, Germany 20.7%, Italy 7.7%, Singapore 5.8%, UK 4.9% (2006)Imports: $522.8 million (2007 est.):country comparison to the world: 189Imports - commodities: food and live animals, machinery and transport equipment, manufactures, chemicals, oilImports - partners: US 21.1%, China 16.4%, Germany 13.3%, Singapore 12.7%, Spain 6.5% (2006)Debt - external: $359.8 million (June 2006):country comparison to the world: 169Economic aid - recipient: $7.23 million (2005)Currency: 1 Caribbean dollar (EC$)  100 centsExchange rates:East Caribbean dollars per US dollar - 2.7 (2007), 2.7 (2007), 2.7 (2006), 2.7 (2005), 2.7 (2004), 2.7 (2003) note: fixed rate since 1976year:1 April - 31 March References * *   de Antigua y BarbudadAntigua-et-Barbudade Antiga e Barbudadi Antigua e BarbudadAntigua e Barbudada Antgua e Barbuda  t Antigua v Barbuda
18952975
Atacama_Desert
Image:fox pan de azucar.JPG|thumb|A chilla in de Azcar National Park on the coast of the Atacama Desert.The Atacama Desert is a  plateau in America, covering a  strip of land on the Pacific coast, west of the Andes mountains. The Atacama desert is, according to NASA, National Geographic and many other publications, the driest desert in the world,(http://ngm.nationalgeographic.com/ngm/0308/feature3/)(http://www.extremescience.com/DriestPlace.htm)(http://quest.nasa.gov/challenges/marsanalog/egypt/AtacamaAdAstra.pdf) due to various reasons.() The Atacama occupies () in northern Chile, composed mostly of salt basins (salares), sand, and felsic lava flows towards the Andes. Setting The Atacama Desert ecoregion, as defined by the Fund for Nature (WWF), extends from a few kilometers south of the Peru-Chile border to about 30 south latitude.() To the north lies the Peruvian Desert ecoregion, whilst to the south is the Matorral ecoregion, close to the region Aske. The Geographic Society, by contrast, considers the coastal area of southern Peru to be part of the Atacama Desert.(Viking Mission May Have Missed Mars Life, Study Finds)(Giant Penguins Once Roamed Peru Desert, Fossils Show) It includes in this definition the deserts south of the Region in Peru.To the east lies the less arid Andean dry puna ecoregion. The drier portion of this ecoregion is located south of the River between the parallel Vicua Mackenna and Domeyko. To the north of the mentioned river lies the del Tamarugal. Aridity Atacama Desert is commonly known as the driest place in the world, especially surroundings of the abandoned Yungay town(Yungay - the driest place in the world, Wondermondo) (in Region, Chile).() The average rainfall in the Chilean region of Antofagasta is just  per year. Some weather stations in the Atacama have never received rain. Evidence suggests that the Atacama may not have had any significant rainfall from 1570 to 1971.( It is so arid that mountains that reach as high as  are completely free of glaciers and, in the southern part from 25S to 27S, may have been glacier-free throughout the Quaternary, though permafrost extends down to an altitude of  and is continuous above . Studies by a group of British scientists have suggested that some river beds have been dry for 120,000 years.() However, some locations in the Atacama receive a marine fog known locally as the Camanchaca, providing sufficient moisture for hypolithic algae, lichens and even some cacti. Geographically, the aridity can be explained by the following reasons:* The desert is located on the leeward side of the Coast Range, so little moisture from the Pacific Ocean can reach the desert.* The Andes is so high that it blocks convective clouds, which may bring precipitation, formed above the Amazon Basin from entering the desert from the east.* An inversion layer is created by the cold current and the Pacific High.Noteworthily, an extreme Antarctic cold front broke through the shadow bringing 80 cm (31.5 in) of snow to the plateau in July 2011, stranding residents across the region, particularly in Bolivia where many drivers became stuck in snow drifts and emergency crews became overtaxed with a large number of rescue calls.()Comparison to MarsIn a region about  south of Antofagasta which averages  height, the soil has been compared to that of Mars. Due to its otherworldly appearance, the Atacama has been used as a location for filming Mars scenes, most notably in the television series Odyssey: Voyage To The Planets. In 2003, a team of researchers published a report in the journal Science titled Mars-like Soils in the Atacama Desert, Chile, and the Dry Limit of Microbial Life in which they duplicated the tests used by the 1 and 2 Mars landers to detect life and were unable to detect any signs in Atacama Desert soil.(Mars-Like Soils in the Atacama Desert, Chile, and the Dry Limit of Microbial Life Science 7 November 2003: Vol. 302. no. 5647, pp. 10181021) The region may be unique on Earth in this regard and is being used by NASA to test instruments for future Mars missions. The team duplicated the Viking tests in Mars-like Earth environments and found that they missed present signs of life in soil samples from Antarctic dry valleys, the Atacama Desert of Chile and Peru, and other locales.In 2008, the Mars Lander detected perchlorates on the surface of Mars at the same site where water was first discovered.(Thompson, Andrea. Scientists Set Record Straight on Martian Salt Find. http://www.space.com/scienceastronomy/080805-phoenix-perchlorate-update.html. Retrieved 6 August 2008) Perchlorates are also found in the Atacama and associated nitrate deposits have contained organics, leading to speculation that signs of life on Mars are not incompatible with perchlorates.  The Atacama is also a testing site for the NASA-funded Cave Detection Program.(Earth-Mars Cave Detection Program) Human occupation thumb|Atacama roadThe Atacama is sparsely populated, with most cities located along the Pacific coast.(South America physical map)  In interior areas, oases and some valleys have been populated for millennia, being the seat of the most advanced Pre-Columbian societies found in Chile. These oases have had little population growth and urban development, and have, since the 20th century, faced conflicts over water resources that are needed for the coastal cities and the mining industry.Pedro de Atacama, at about  elevation, is a typical example. Its church was built by the Spanish in 1577. In pre-Hispanic times, before the Inca empire, the extremely arid interior was inhabited mainly by the Atacameo tribe. The tribe is noted for the construction of fortified towns called pucars, one of which can be seen a few kilometers from San Pedro de Atacama.The coastal cities originated in the 16th, 17th, and 18th centuries during the time of the Empire, when they emerged as shipping ports for silver produced in Potos and other mines. During the 19th century the desert came under control of Bolivia, Chile, and Peru, and soon became a zone of conflict due to unclear borders and the discovery of nitrate deposits. After the of the Pacific, in which Chile annexed most of the desert, cities along the coast developed into international ports, and many Chilean workers migrated there. With the guano and saltpeter booms of the 19th century the population grew immensely, mostly due to immigration from central Chile. In the 20th century the nitrate industry declined and at the same time the largely male population of the desert became increasingly problematic for the Chilean state. Anarchist and communist ideas gained currency among the mine workers, and protest spread throughout the region.The Atacama desert again became a source of wealth from the 1950s onwards due to copper mining. The Escondida and Chuquicamata copper mines are located within the Atacama Desert. Abandoned nitrate mining towns The desert has rich deposits of copper and other minerals, and the worlds largest natural supply of nitrate, which was mined on a large scale until the early 1940s. The border dispute over these resources between Chile and Bolivia began in the 19th century.Now the desert is littered with approximately 170 abandoned nitrate (or saltpetre) mining towns, almost all of which were shut down decades after the invention of synthetic nitrate in Germany at the turn of the 20th century (see process).  The towns include Chacabuco, Humberstone, Santa Laura, Pedro de Valdivia, Puelma and Maria Elena and Oficina Anita. Astronomical observatories Because of its high altitude, nearly non-existent cloud cover, dry air, and lack of light pollution and radio interference from the very widely spaced cities, the desert is one of the best places in the world to conduct astronomical observations. The Southern Observatory operates two major observatories in the Atacama:* The Silla Observatory* The Observatory, which includes the Large TelescopeA new astronomy telescope, called ALMA, built by Europe, Japan, the States, Canada and Chile in the Llano de Chajnantor Observatory officially opened on 3 October 2011.( accessdate  )  A number of radio astronomy projects, such as the CBI, the ASTE and the ACT, among others, have been operating in the Chajnantor area since 1999. Gallery Image:Chajnantor Plateau Panoramic.jpg| Chajnantor Plateau in the Chilean Andes. This location is home to the Large Millimeter ArrayImage:Atacama desert.jpg|Map of the Atacama Desert (Chilean area) from the World FactbookImage:Atacama1.jpg|Atacama DesertImage:Valle de la luna san pedro chile.jpg|Scene from Valle de la Luna (Moon Valley) near San Pedro de AtacamaImage:Solar Evaporation Ponds, Atacama Desert.jpg|Solar Evaporation Ponds in the Atacama DesertImage:Sailing Atacama Desert.jpg|Paranal Observatory Protected areas * de Azcar National Park* del Tamarugal National Reserve* Chimba National Reserve Legends * Alicanto* Giant See also * Grande, Chile* Copiap mining accident* border dispute* de Atacama* of deserts by area* Llano de Chajnantor Observatory References Notes Bibliography * Braudel, Fernand, The Perspective of the World, ISBN 0-520-08116-1, vol. III of Civilization and Capitalism 1984 (originally published in French, 1979).* Sagaris, Lake. Bone and dream : into the worlds driest desert.  1st ed.  Toronto : A.A. Knopf Canada, c2000. ISBN 0-676-97223-3 External links * Last Frontier Ex - Atacama Desert* SanPedrodeAtacama.Net & Org* News article on Mars-like Soils in the Atacama Desert, Chile, and the Dry Limit of Microbial Life* National Geographic feature about Atacama* Autonomous Robot Finds Life in Atacama Desert* Photos of Atacama Desert landscape, flora and fauna* Atacamas Super-Dry Historyaf:Atacamawoestynar:be:be-x-old:bs:Atacama()dAtacamacs:Atacamada:Atacamarkenende:Atacamawsteet:Atacamael:de Atacamaeo:Atakamobasamortuafa:dAtacamagd:Atacamado Atacamahr:AtacamaAtacamais:Atacamadi Atacamaka:ku:Atacamalt:Atakamahu:Atacama-sivatagmk:Atacama(woestijn)ja:no:Atacamarkenennn:Atacamapl:Atakamade AtacamaAtacamaqu:Atakamaru:sq:AtakamaDesertsk:Atacamasl:Atacamasr:sh:Atacamafi:Atacamasv:Atacamaknenth:luk:mc Atacamazh:
18956303
Wee_Bin
Wee Bin born in China in 1823, was a far-sighted and enterprising Chinese migrant of the mid nineteenth century who, in his time, founded,(One Hundred Years History of the Chinese in Singapore by Ong Siang Song, 1923) Singapores largest Chinese shipping firm.(Family and State: The Formation of a Sino-Thai Tin-mining Dynasty, 1797-1932 By Jennifer Wayne Cushman, Craig J. Reynolds Contributor Craig J. Reynolds Published by Oxford University Press, 1991; ISBN 0195889665, 9780195889666; p. 63, 67, 172)(Records and Recollections (1889-1934): Chinese Women, Prostitution & a Welfare Organisation By Neil Jin Keong Khor, Keat Siew Khoo, Izrin Muaz Md. Adnan Published by Malaysian Branch of the Royal Asiatic Society, 2004; ISBN 9679948323, 9789679948325; p. 58)(Home port Singapore: a history of Straits Steamship Company Limited, 1890-1965 By K. G. Tregonning, Published by Oxford University Press for Straits Steamship Co. ltd., 1967)(Chinese business enterprise, Volume 4 by Rajeswary Ampalavanar Brown, Published by Taylor & Francis, 1996, ISBN 0415142938, ISBN 9780415142939, p 57) In 1856 at the age of thirty-three, Wee Bin was founder of Bin & Co. chop Hong Guan, in Market Street, a firm that was rapidly becoming prominent in Singapore in the 1860s(Asian culture, Issue 28 by Singapore Society of Asian Studies, published by Xinjiapo Yazhou yan jiu xue hui, 2004) and ran the firm according to Western business practices.(Family and state: the formation of a Sino-Thai Tin-mining dynasty, 1797-1932 South-East Asian historical monographs by Jennifer Wayne Cushman, Craig J. Reynolds, published by the Oxford University Press, 1991, ISBN 0195889665, ISBN 9780195889666) Wee Bin through his firm, carried on business as Merchants and Shipowners.( He incorporated Western practices in his business.( Wee Bin at first began business relations with various houses in Bali in the Dutch Indies, and eventually became the greatest importer of products from that port. He also traded in all kinds of earthenware, and later on built up a fleet of over twenty vessels for the Chinese and Dutch Indies trade. With increasing interest in the tin mining industry and the need for more and more people to work the mines, Wee Bin was also responsible for carrying migrant workers from China to work in the Straits Settlements.(An Official Guide to Eastern Asia, Trans-continental Connections Between Europe and Asia ... By Japan Dept. of Railways, Japan Tetsudin, Japan Teikoku Tetsudch Published by s.n., 1915 Item notes: v.4; p. 32) Wee Bin married the daughter of Kong Tuan and died in 1868 at the age of 45, leaving an only son, Boon Teck, and an only daughter who became the wife of Ho Puah who would later take over his firm before passing it on to Wee Bins ultimate heir, Peng Siang (the fourth son of Lim Ho Puah),(Twentieth century impressions of British Malaya: its history, people, commerce, industries, and resourcesAuthor: Wright, Arnold (Publication Info: London, Durban, Colombo, Perth (W. A.), Singapore, Hongkong, and Shanghai by Lloyds Greater Britain Publishing Company, limited)) one of the greatest Chinese entrepreneurs and capitalists of his time.(ReferencesFurther reading#Engines of Empire: steamshipping and state formation in colonial Indonesia by Joseph Norbert Frans Marie  Campo, published by Uitgeverij Verloren, 2002, ISBN 9065507388, ISBN 9789065507389#Koninklijke Paketvaart Maatschappij: stoomvaart en staatsvorming in de Indonesische archipel 1888-1914 - Volume 3 of Publikaties van de Faculteit der Historische en Kunstwetenschappen By Joseph Norbert Frans Marie  Campo, published by Verloren, 1992, ISBN 9065504036, ISBN 9789065504036#The Economic Growth of Singapore: Trade and Development in the Twentieth Century by W. G. Huff, published by  Cambridge University Press, 1997, ISBN 0521629446, ISBN 9780521629447#Opium and empire: Chinese society in Colonial Singapore, 1800-1910 - Asia, East by South - Food Systems and Agrarian Change by Carl A. Trocki, published by Cornell University Press, 1990. ISBN 0801423902, ISBN 9780801423901#Chinese society in nineteenth century Singapore - East Asian historical monographs by Poh Ping Lee, published by the Oxford University Press, 1978, ISBN 0195803841, ISBN 9780195803846#The Foochows of Sitiawan: a historical perspective by Toong Siong Shih, published by Persatuan Kutien Daerah Manjung, 2004, ISBN 9834182406, ISBN 9789834182403#Toponymics: a study of Singapore street names - Geography & environment research by Victor R. Savage, Brenda S. A. Yeoh, Published by the Eastern Universities Press, 2003, ISBN 9812102051, ISBN 9789812102058#The Great circle: journal of the Australian Association for Maritime History, Volumes 6-9 by the Australian Association for Maritime History, published by The Association, 1984#Nautical Magazine, Volumes 163-164, Published 1950#Parliamentary papers, Volume 108 by Great Britain. Parliament. House of Commons, published by HMSO, 1906 ( Item notes: v. 108 - 1906)#Parliamentary papers, Volume 93 by Great Britain. Parliament. House of Commons published by HMSO (His/Her Majestys Stationery Office), 1909#Corporate behaviour and political risk: Dutch companies in China, 1903-1941 - Issue 102 of CNWS publications - Volume 2 of Studies in overseas history by Frans-Paul van der Putten, Published by the Research School of Asian, African and Amerindian Studies, Leiden University, 2001, ISBN 9057890615, ISBN 9789057890611#Rumah Baba: life in a peranakan house, by Peter Lee, Jennifer Chen, Published by the National Heritage Board, Singapore History Museum, 1998, ISBN 9810099924, ISBN 9789810099923#Socits et compagnies de commerce en Orient et dans locan Indien - Volume 6 of Bibliothque gnrale de lcole pratique des hautes tudes, Bibliothque gnrale de lcole pratique des hautes tudes. Sciences conomiques et sociales, Bibliothque gnrale de lcole des hautes tudes en sciences sociales by Michel Mollat, Published by S.E.V.P.E.N., 1970#De schatten van Lombok: honderd jaar Nederlandse oorlogsbuit uit Indonesi, Edition 2, by Ewald Vanvugt, Published by Jan Mets, 1995, ISBN 9053301607, ISBN 9789053301609#Perdagangan dan politik di Nusa Tenggara, 18151915, by I Gde Parimartha, Published by Perwakilan KITLV, 2002, ISBN 9794284475, ISBN 9789794284476#Ethnic Chinese in Singapore and Malaysia: a dialogue between tradition and modernity by Leo Suryadinata, Published by the Times Academic Press, 2002, ISBN 9812101861, ISBN 9789812101860#Twentieth century impressions of British Malaya: its history, people, commerce, industries, and resources Author: Wright, Arnold (Publication Info: London, Durban, Colombo, Perth (W. A.), Singapore, Hong Kong, and Shanghai by Lloyds Greater Britain Publishing Company, limited)
18974628
English_language_in_England
The English language in England refers to the language as spoken in England. These forms of English are a subsection of English, as spoken throughout Great Britain. Other terms used to refer to the English language as spoken in England include:English English,(English, a. and n. The Oxford English Dictionary. 2nd ed. 1989. OED Online. Oxford University Press. 4 Apr. 2000 http://dictionary.oed.com/cgi/entry/50075365.)(Trudgill (2002), p 2.)Anglo-English,(Tom McArthur, The Concise Oxford Companion to the English Language. Retrieved via encyclopedia.com.)(http://books.google.com/books?idHdROMWryvOQC&pgPA45&dq%22anglo+english%22&sigUENob4PbcJ3UOLk1uYBzT253ObE#PPA45,M1) English in England.(Tom McArthur, The Concise Oxford Companion to the English Language.  Retrieved via encyclopedia.com.) The related term English has all the ambiguities and tensions in the word British and as a result can be used and interpreted in two ways, more broadly or more narrowly, within a range of blurring and ambiguity(According to Tom McArthur in the Oxford Guide to World English (p. 45)) but is usually reserved to describe the features common to English English, English, English, and Hiberno-English.General featuresThere are many different accents and dialects throughout England and people are often very proud of their local accent or dialect. However, accents and dialects also highlight class differences, rivalries, or other associated prejudices as illustrated by Bernard Shaws comment:: It is impossible for an Englishman to open his mouth without making some other Englishman hate or despise him.()For the English language in England (English English), three major dialect groupings are recognized: Southern English dialects, Midlands English dialects, and Northern English dialects. The most prominent isogloss is the footstrut split, which runs roughly from mid-Shropshire (on the Welsh border) to south of Birmingham and then to Wash. South of the isogloss, in the Midlands and Southern dialects, the Middle English phoneme  split into  (as in cut, strut) and  (put, foot); this change did not occur north of the isogloss.The accent best known to many people outside the United Kingdom as English English, is that of Pronunciation (RP). Until recently, RP English was widely considered to be more educated than other accents and was referred to as the Queens (or Kings) English, or even BBC English (because for many years of broadcasting it was rare to hear any other dialect on the BBC), even though this was not the accent held by the majority of English people. Since the 1970s regional accents have become increasingly accepted in mainstream media, and are frequently heard. RP is also sometimes called Oxford English, and the Dictionary gives RP pronunciations for each word.Native English speakers can often tell quite accurately where a person comes from, frequently down to within a few miles. Historically, such differences could be a major impediment to understanding between people from different areas. There are also many cases where a large city has a very different accent from the rural area around it (e.g. Bristol and Avon, Hull and the East Riding, Liverpool and Lancashire). But modern communications and mass media have reduced these differences in some parts of the country.(Voices 2005: Accent  a great leveller? BBC 15 August 2005. Interview with Professor Paul Kerswill who stated The difference between regional accents is getting less with time.)(Liverpool Journal; Baffling Scouse Is Spoken Here, So Bring a Sensa Yuma Herald Tribune, 15 March 2005. While most regional accents in England are growing a touch less pronounced in this age of high-speed travel and 600-channel satellite systems, it seems that the Liverpool accent is boldly growing thicker. ... migrating London accents are blamed for the slight changes in regional accents over the past few decades.  ... That said, the curator of English accents and dialects at the British Library said the Northeast accents, from places like Northumberland and Tyneside, were also going stronger.) Speakers may also change their pronunciation and vocabulary, particularly towards Pronunciation and English when in public.British Isles varieties of English, including English English, are discussed in C. Wells (1982).  Some of the features of English English are that:* Most versions of this dialect have non-rhotic pronunciation, meaning that r is not pronounced in coda position. Nonrhoticism is also found elsewhere in the English speaking world, including in English,  Zealand English, and African English, as well as most nonnative varieties spoken throughout the Commonwealth of Nations.(Trudgill and Hannah, p 138.)  Rhotic accents exist in the Country, parts of Lancashire, the far north of England and in the town of Corby, both of which have a large Scottish influence on their speech.* As noted above, Northern versions of the dialect lack the footstrut split, so that there is no distinction between  and , making put and putt homophones as .* In the Southern varieties, words like bath, cast, dance, fast, after, castle, grass etc. are pronounced with the long vowel found in calm (that is,  or a similar vowel) while in the Midlands and Northern varieties they are pronounced with the same vowel as trap or cat, usually .  For more details see Trapbath split.  There are some areas of the West Country that use  in both the TRAP and BATH sets.  The Bristol area, although in the south of England, uses the short  in BATH.(p.348-349, Accents of English 2 John C Wells, Cambridge University Press, Cambridge, 1992)* Many varieties undergo h dropping, making harm and arm homophones.  This is a feature of working-class accents across most of England, but was traditionally stigmatised (a fact the comedy musical Fair Lady was quick to exploit) but less so now.(Trask (1999), pp104106.)  This was geographically widespread, but the linguist A.C. Gibson stated that it did not extend to the far north, nor to East Anglia, Essex, Wiltshire or Somerset.(A.C. Gibson in Collins English Dictionary, 1979, page xxiv)  In the past, working-class people were often unsure where an h ought to be pronounced, and, when attempting to speak properly, would often preface any word that began with a vowel with an h (e.g. henormous instead of enormous, hicicles instead of icicles); this was referred to as the hypercorrect h in the of English Dialects, and is also referenced in literature (e.g. the policeman in the Champion of the World).* A stop for intervocalic  is now common amongst younger speakers across the country; it was originally confined to some areas of the south-east and East Anglia.* The distinction between  and  in wine and whine is lost in most varieties, wh being pronounced consistently as .* Most varieties have the horsehoarse merger.  However some northern accents retain the distinction, pronouncing pairs of words like for/four, horse/hoarse and morning/mourning differently.(Wells 1982, section 4.4.)* The consonant clusters , , and  in suit, Zeus, and lute are preserved by some.* Many Southern varieties have the badlad split, so that bad  and lad  do not rhyme.* In most of the eastern half of England, plurals and past participle endings which are pronounced  and  (with the vowel of kit) in RP may be pronounced with a schwa .  This can be found as far north as Wakefield and as far south as Essex.  This is unusual in being an east-west division in pronunciation when English dialects generally divide between north and south.  Another east-west division involves the rhotic ; it can be heard in the speech of country folk (particularly the elder), more or less west of the course of the Roman era road known as Street (the modern A5), which at one time divided King Alfreds Wessex and English Mercia from the Danish kingdoms in the east.  The rhotic  is rarely found in the east.* Sporadically, miscellaneous items of generally obsolete vocabulary survive: come in the past tense rather than came; the use of thou and/or ye for you.Change over timeThere has been academic interest in dialects since the late 19th century. The main works are On Early English Pronunciation by A.J. Ellis, English Dialect Grammar by Joseph Wright, and the Dialect Dictionary also by Joseph Wright. The Test was developed by Joseph Wright so he could hear the differences of the vowel sounds of a dialect by listening to different people reading the same short passage of text.In the 1950s and 1960s the of English Dialects was undertaken to preserve a record of the traditional spectrum of rural dialects that merged into each other. The traditional picture was that there would be a few changes in lexicon and pronunciation every couple of miles, but that there would be no sharp borders between completely different ways of speaking. Within a county, the accents of the different towns and villages would drift gradually so that residents of bordering areas sounded more similar to those in neighbouring counties.Because of greater social mobility and the teaching of Standard English in schools, this model is no longer very accurate. There are some English counties in which there is little change in accent/dialect, and people are more likely to categorise their accent by a region or county than by their town or village. As agriculture became less prominent, many rural dialects were lost. Some urban dialects have also declined; for example, traditional Bradford dialect is now quite rare in the city, and call centres have seen Bradford as a useful location for the very fact there is a lack of dialect in potential employees.()() Some call centres state that they were attracted to Bradford because it has a regional accent which is relatively easy to understand.()But working in the opposite direction concentrations of migration may cause a town or area to develop its own accent. The two most famous examples are Liverpool and Corby. Liverpools dialect is influenced heavily by Irish and Welsh, and it sounds completely different from surrounding areas of Lancashire. Corbys dialect is influenced heavily by Scots, and it sounds completely different from the rest of Northamptonshire. The Voices 2006 survey found that the various ethnic minorities that have settled in large populations in parts of Britain develop their own specific dialects. For example, many residents of east London, even if they are not from Bangladesh, may have a Bangladeshi influence on their accent so sometimes urban dialects are now just as easily identifiable as rural dialects. In the traditional view, urban speech was just seen as a watered-down version of that of the surrounding rural area. Historically, rural areas had much more stable demographics than urban areas, but there is now only a small difference. It has probably never been true since the Revolution caused an enormous influx to cities from rural areas.Southern EnglandIn general, Southern English accents are distinguished from Northern English accents primarily by not using the short a in words such as bath.  In the south-east, the A is normally used before a ,  or : words such as cast and bath are pronounced  rather than .  This sometimes occurs before : it is used in command and demand but not in brand or grand.In the south-west, an  sound in used in these words but also in words that take  in RP; there is no split but both are pronounced with an extended fronted vowel.(C Wells, Accents of English, Cambridge, 1983, p.352)  Bristol is an exception to the bath-broadening rule: it uses  in the trap and bath sets, just as is the case in the North and the Midlands.(C Wells, Accents of English, Cambridge, 1983, p.348)Accents originally from the upper-class speech of the LondonOxfordCambridge triangle are particularly notable as the basis for Pronunciation.Southern English accents have three main historical influences:*The London accent, in particular, Cockney.  London has continuously absorbed migrants throughout its history, and its accent has always been prone to change quickly*Received Pronunciation (R.P.).*Southern rural accents, of which the West Country, Kent and Anglian accents are examples.Relatively recently, the first two have increasingly influenced southern accents outside London via class mobility and the expansion of London. From some time during the 19th century, middle and upper-middle classes began to adopt affectations, including the RP accent, associated with the upper class. In the late 20th and 21st century other social changes, such as middle-class RP-speakers forming an increasing component of rural communities, have accentuated the spread of RP.  The south-east coast accents traditionally have several features in common with the West country; for example, rhoticity and the a: sound in words such as bath, cast, etc.  However, the younger generation in the area is more likely to be non-rhotic and use the London/East Anglian A: sound in bath.After the Second World War, about one million Londoners were relocated to new and expanded towns throughout the south east, bringing with them their distinctive London accent (and possibly sowing the seed of English).South West EnglandThe West Country dialects accents are generic terms applied to any of several English dialects and accents used by much of the indigenous population of West England, the area popularly known as the Country.This region encompasses Bristol, Cornwall, Devon, Dorset and Somerset, while Gloucestershire, Herefordshire and Wiltshire are usually also included, although the northern and eastern boundaries of the area are hard to define and sometimes even wider areas are encompassed.  The West Country accent is said to reflect the pronunciation of the Anglo-Saxons far better than other modern English Dialects.In the nearby counties of Berkshire, Hampshire and the of Wight, it was possible to encounter comparable accents and, indeed, distinct local dialects until perhaps the 1960s. There is now limited use of such dialects amongst older people in local areas. Although natives of such locations, especially in western parts, can still have West Country influences in their speech, the increased mobility and urbanisation of the population have meant that local Berkshire, Hampshire and Isle of Wight dialects (as opposed to accents) are today essentially extinct.Academically the regional variations are considered to be dialectal forms.  The of English Dialects captured manners of speech across the West Country that were just as different from Standard English as anything from the far North. Close proximity has completely different languages such as Cornish, which is a Celtic language related to Welsh, and more closely to Breton.East AngliaNorfolkThe dialect is spoken in the traditional county of Norfolk and areas of north Suffolk. Famous speakers include Nelson and Skipper.The group FOND (Friends Of Norfolk Dialect) was formed to record the countys dialect and to provide advice for TV companies using the dialect in productions.It is also spoken on the borders with Cambridgeshire. There, it is characterized by being very softly spoken, all vowels and consonants pronounced, extremely long vowels and rhotic Rs.Midlands* As in the North, Midlands accents generally do not use a A, so that cast is pronounced kast rather than the  pronunciation of most southern accents. The northern limit of the  in many words crosses England from mid-Shropshire to Wash, passing just south of Birmingham.* Midlands speech also generally uses the northern short U, so putt is pronounced the same as put. The southern limit of this pronunciation also crosses from mid-Shropshire to the Wash, but dipping further south to the northern part of Oxfordshire.* The West Midlands accent is often described as having a pronounced nasal quality, the East Midlands accent much less so.* Old and cold may be pronounced as owd and cowd (rhyming with loud in the West Midlands and ode in the East Midlands), and in the northern Midlands home can become wom.* Whether Derbyshire should be classed as the West or East Midlands in terms of dialect is debatable.  Ellis, a dialect expert, said in 1985 that it was more like the West Midlands, but it is often grouped with the East and is part of the region Midlands.* Cheshire, although part of the North-West region, is usually grouped the Midlands for the purpose of accent and dialect.West Midlands* The best known accents in the West Midlands area are the Birmingham accents (see Brummie) and the Black Country accent (Yam Yam).* Dialect verbs are used, for example am for are, ay for is not (related to aint), bay for are not, bin for am or, emphatically, for are. Hence the following joke dialogue about bay windows: What sort of windas am them? Theym bay windas. Well if they bay windas wot bin them?. There is also humour to be derived from the shop-owners sign of Mr. E. A. Wright (that is, He ay isnt right, a phrase implying someone is saft soft in the jed head). Saft also may mean silly as in, Stop bein so saft.* The Birmingham and Coventry accents are quite distinct, even though the cities are only 19 miles/30 km apart.  Coventry being slightly closer to an East Midlands accent. * The g sound may be emphatically pronounced where it occurs in the combination ng, in words such as ringing and fang.* Around Stoke-on-Trent, the short i can sound rather like a short e, so milk and biscuit become something like melk and bess-kit.  Strong Potteries accents can even render the latter as bess-keet. The Potteries accent is perhaps the most distinctly northern of the West Midlands accents, given that the urban area around Stoke-on-Trent is close to the Cheshire border.* Herefordshire and parts of Worcestershire and Shropshire have a accent somewhat like the West Country, and in some parts mixing with the accent, particularly when closer to the English/Welsh border.East Midlands* East Midlands accents are generally non-rhotic, instead drawing out their vowels, resulting in the Midlands Drawl, which can to non-natives be mistaken for dry sarcasm.  * Yod dropping, as in East Anglia, can be found in some areas, for example new as , sounding like noo.* The u vowel of words like strut is often , with no distinction between putt and put.  In Lincolnshire, such sounds are even shorter than in the North.* In Leicester, words with short vowels such as up and last have a northern pronunciation, whereas words with vowels such as down and road sound rather more like a south-eastern accent. The vowel sound at the end of words like border (and the name of the city) is also a distinctive feature.(http://www.bbc.co.uk/voices/recordings/individual/leicester-football-lees-anita.shtml)* In north Nottinghamshire ee found in short words is pronounced as two syllables, for example feet being , sounding like fee-yut (and also in this case ending with a stop).* Lincolnshire also has a marked northsouth split in terms of accent.  The north shares many features with Yorkshire, such as the open a sound in car and park or the replacement of take and make with tek and mek.  The south of Lincolnshire is close to Received Pronunciation, although it still has a short Northern a in words such as bath.* Mixing of the words was and were when the other is used in Standard English.* In Northamptonshire, crossed by the North-South isogloss, residents of the north of the county have an accent similar to that of Leicestershire and those in the south an accent similar to rural Oxfordshire.* The town of Corby in northern Northamptonshire has an accent with some originally Scottish features, apparently due to immigration of Scottish steelworkers.(http://www.joensuu.fi/fld/methodsxi/abstracts/dyer.html)  It is common in Corby for the GOAT set of words to be pronounced with .  This pronunciation is used across Scotland and most of Northern England, but Corby is alone in the Midlands in using it.(Language in the British Isles, page 67, ed. David Britain, Cambridge University Press, 2007)South-East MidlandsThe traditional dialects of Bedfordshire, Huntingdonshire and south Northamptonshire are closer to Received Pronunciation than any other dialects in Britain.  This is because the upper-class who migrated into London during the 15th century were mostly from the counties just north of London  .  However, there are still a number of differences between their dialects and R.P.:* This area traditionally used  in words where an was followed by ,  or .  Younger speakers in the area are more likely to use the R.P. .(The Linguistic Atlas of England, Maps Ph1 and Ph2)* The isogloss for the vowel in cup, strut, such, etc. is another traditional north-south marker, but the isogloss is slightly further south for this.  Much of the area uses .  Some parts of this area, such as Peterborough, would use the southern pronunciation for bath but the northern pronunciation for suck.(The Linguistic Atlas of England, Maps Ph127a, Ph128a and Ph158)* The TRAP vowel (corresponding to RP ) is realised as , as is the case in all of England except the south-east and East Anglia.(Peter Trudgill, The Dialects of England, Blackwell, Oxford, 2000, page 32)* In common with the south-east, the vowel in about, pound, sound, etc may be  rather than .(The Linguistic Atlas of England, Maps 147, 148 and 149)* It is common for residents of this area to pronounce the -shire in county names as  rather than the more common , which is used in the Oxford Dictionary.(In the 1993 Oxford Dictionary, Derbyshire, Wiltshire and Yorkshire are all listed as pronounced with )* In some areas, an  can turn into an  sound.  For example, nineteen ninety-five would be said as noineteen noientee foive.Northern EnglandThere are several accent features which are common to most of the accents of northern England (Wells 1982, section 4.4).* Northern English tends not to have  (strut, but, etc.) as a separate vowel.  Most words that have this vowel in RP are pronounced with  in Northern accents, so that put and putt are homophonous as . But some words with  in RP can have  in the more conservative Northern accents, so that a pair like luck and look may be distinguished as  and .* The accents of Northern England generally do not use a . so cast is pronounced  rather than the  pronunciation of most southern accents. This pronunciation is found in the words that were affected by the split.* For many speakers, the remaining instances of RP  instead becomes : for example, in the words palm, cart, start, tomato.* The vowel in dress, test, pet, etc. is slightly more open, transcribed by Wells as  rather than .* The short a vowel of cat, trap is normally pronounced  rather than the  found in traditional Received Pronunciation and in many forms of English.* In most areas, the letter y on the end of words as in happy or city is pronounced , like the i in bit, and not .  This was considered RP until the 1990s.  The longer  is found in the far north and in the Merseyside area.* The phonemes  (as in face) and  (as in goat) are often pronounced as monophthongs (such as  and ).  However, the quality of these vowels varies considerably across the region, and this is considered a greater indicator of a speakers social class than the less stigmatised aspects listed above.Some dialect words used across the North are listed in extended editions of the Oxford Dictionary with a marker North England: for example, the words ginnell and snicket for specific types of alleyway, the word fettle for to organise, or the use of while to mean until. The best-known Northern words are nowt, owt and summat, which are included in most dictionaries.  For more localised features, see the following sections.The present historical is named after the speech of the region, but it is often used in many working class dialects in the south of England too.  Instead of saying I said to him, users of the rule would say, I says to him.  Instead of saying, I went up there, they would say, I goes up there.In the far north of England, the local speech is indistinguishable from Scots.  Wells said that northernmost Northumberland though politically English is linguistically Scottish.(Accents of English, Cambridge, 1983, p.351)Liverpool (Scouse)The Liverpool accent, known as Scouse colloquially, is quite different from the accent of surrounding Lancashire. This is because Liverpool has had many immigrants in recent centuries, particularly of Irish people. Irish influences on Scouse speech include the pronunciation of unstressed my as me, and the pronunciation of th sounds like t or d (although they remain distinct as dental  ). Other features include the pronunciation of non-initial  as , and the pronunciation of r as a tap .YorkshireHeights is one of the few classic works of English literature to contain a substantial amount of dialect.  Set in Haworth, the servant Joseph speaks in the traditional dialect of the area, which many modern readers struggle to understand.  This dialect was still spoken around Haworth until the late 1970s, but there is now only a minority of it still in everyday use.(K.M. Petyt, Emily Bronte and the Haworth Dialect, Hudson History, Settle, 2001.)Middlesbrough areaThe accents for Middlesbrough and the surrounding towns are sometimes grouped with Yorkshire and sometimes grouped with the North-East of England, for they share characteristics with both.  As this urban area grew in the early 20th century, there are fewer dialect words that date back to older forms of English; Teesside speak is the sort of modern dialect that Peter Trudgill identified in his The Dialects of England.  There is a Lower Tees Dialect group() A recent study found that most people from Middlesbrough do not consider their accent to be Yorkshire, but that they are less hostile to being grouped with Yorkshire than to being grouped with the Geordie accent.()Some examples of traits that are shared with parts of Yorkshire include:* H dropping.* An  sound in words such as start, car, park, etc.* In common with the east coast of Yorkshire, words such as bird, first, nurse, etc. have an  sound.  It is difficult to represent this using the alphabet, but could be written bare-d, fare-st, nare-ss.  vowel sound also occurs in Liverpool and Birkenhead.Examples of traits shared with the North-East include:* Absence of article reduction.* Glottal stops for ,  and  can all occur.The vowel in goat is an  sound, as is found in both Durham and rural North Yorkshire.  In common with this area of the country, Middlesbrough is a non-rhotic accent.LancashireCumbria* People from the Furness peninsula in south Cumbria tend to have a more Lancashire-orientated accent, whilst the dialect of Barrow-in-Furness itself is a result of migration from the likes of Strathclyde and Tyneside. Barrow grew on the shipbuilding industry during the 19th and 20th centuries, and many families moved from these already well established shipbuilding towns to seek employment in Barrow.North-East England*Dialects in this region are often known as Geordie or Mackem. The dialects across the region are broadly similar however some differences do exist. For example, with words ending -re/-er, such as culture and father, the end syllable is pronounced by a Newcastle native as a short a, such as in fat and back, therefore producing cultcha and fatha for culture and father respectively. The Sunderland area would pronounce the syllable much more closely to that of other accents. Similarly, Geordies pronounce make in line with standard English: to rhyme with take. However, a Mackem would pronounce make to rhyme with mack or tack (hence the origin of the term Mackem). For other differences, see the respective articles. For an explanation of the traditional dialects of the mining areas of Durham and Northumberland see Pitmatic.* A feature of the North East accent, shared with Scots and English, is the pronunciation of the consonant cluster -lm in coda position. As an example, film is pronounced as fillum.Examples of accents used by public figures*Pronunciation(RP): The Queens accent has changed slightly over the years but she still speaks a conservative form of RP.(http://www.phon.ucl.ac.uk/home/estuary/queen.htm http://itre.cis.upenn.edu/~myl/languagelog/archives/003859.html See here for discussion of how the Queens speech has changed slightly.)  Thatcher, Benn and the Coward films are examples of old-fashioned RP, whereas Cameron, Johnson, McDonald, Cleese and Dimbleby are examples of contemporary RP.*Berkshire (a southern rural accent): poet Ayres is from Reading, comedian Gervais is also from Reading.*Birmingham (Brummie): the rock musician Osbourne (although he sometimes Americanises his speech), Carrot and Halford. See Brummie for more examples.*Bristol: Professor Pillinger of the 2 project, comedy writer, actor, radio DJ and director Merchant. Presenter and Comedian Lee Collins.*Coventry: the actor Owen, in the films Sin City and King Arthur*Gloucestershire: Lee, ruralist*Hampshire (a southern rural accent): the late Arlott, sports presenter and gardener Dimmock.*Hertfordshire: comedian and writer Newman*Lancashire: comedian Kay, McFly singer and guitarist Jones and Radio 1 DJ Kay as well as Wrigley have degrees of broad Bolton accents.  The actress, Holmes, has a Rochdale accent, which is similar to the western fringe of Yorkshire and she has featured mostly in Yorkshire dramas. Hesmondhalgh, Entwistle and Haworth, actresses in the soap opera Street, have East Lancashire accents which have a slightly different intonation and rhythm and also feature clear rhoticity.*Leicester: The band Kasabian have good examples of the Leicester accent.*London: listen to old recordings by Clark, Andrews, Rolling Stones, and Who (although many of these contain affected patterns). For a clear example, see actor Holloway (Eliza Doolittles father in Fair Lady), or footballer Beckham.**Cockney: the actors Hoskins, Caine. Winstone has quite an old-fashioned Cockney accent, and his replacement of an initial  with a  has been stigmatised.  More examples can be heard in the movies Snatch and Stock, and Two Smoking Barrels. The Pistols had Cockney accents, with Steve Jones having the strongest.**Mockney: used by Ritchie and many musicians, it is a variant of the London regional accent characterised by a non-standard mixture of linguistic and class characteristics.**West London: the journalist Street Porter.**Estuary: athlete Gunnell, the model Jordan (Katie Price).*Manchester: Oasis members Liam and Gallagher, Hermits, actor Monaghan, broadcaster/podcaster Pilkington.*Merseyside**Liverpool (Scouse): Liverpool footballers Gerrard and Carragher are often cited as having particularly strong scouse accents.  Recordings by Beatles (Harrisons accent was the strongest of the four), & The Pacemakers, and the Bunnymen. Also the singer Black and the actors Charles and Tomlinson. The British soap Brookside was set in Liverpool so the majority of the cast, including Philip Olivier and Ellison, had scouse accents.**St Helens: Comedian Vegas.  The comedy band the Lancashire Hotpots sing in a traditional rhotic St Helens accent.**Wirral: Comedian and TV presenter OGrady alias Savage is from Birkenhead, pop singer Burns of Dead or Alive is from the village Sunlight.*Salford: actor Eccleston, bands Mondays and Order.*Stoke-on-Trent or Potteries: pop star Williams, TV presenter Turner, ex pop star and TV presenter Wilkes has a strong Potteries accent.*Sunderland (Mackem): the accent of the rock group Futureheads and ex-footballer Waddle, is easily detected on recordings and live performances*Tyneside (Geordie): former Cabinet members Milburn MP and Brown MP, the actors Green and Tim Healy, the footballer Shearer, actor and singer Nail, rock singer Johnson, television personalities and Dec, Air, Middlemiss. Singer Tweedy of Aloud has a strong Newcastle accent.*Country: Vicar of Dibley was set in Oxfordshire, and many of the characters had West Country accents.*West Midlands: Drabble, presenter of Man and His Dog.*Yorkshire:**Barnsley: in the 1969 film Kes, the lead characters, David Bradley and Fletcher, both have very broad Barnsley accents, which are less likely to be heard nowadays. Street actress Katherine Kelly, Sam Nixon from Pop Idol 2003, Top Of The Pops Saturday and Reloaded and Level Up also has a Barnsley accent.  Also, chat show host Parkinson and ex-union leader Scargill have slightly reduced Barnsley accents.**Bradford: singers Gates, Malik of Direction and Walsh of Aloud.  In Sue and Bob Too, Bob has a Bradford accent whilst Rita and Sue sound more like Lancashire.**Hemsworth: cricketer Boycott has an accent similar to those found in many old coal-mining towns**Valley: Actor Sallis, of of the Summer Wine and and Gromit**Kingston-upon-Hull: Radio DJ and former leader of Housemartins and Beautiful South, Heaton.**Leeds: Brown of the Girls and Callard who plays McDonald in Street, singer Bailey Rae , the band Chiefs, model McAndrew, actress Griffin, Radio DJ Moyles, Comedian Francis alias Lemon**Wakefield, singer and actress McDonald, Hollyoaks actress Cooper, actor Dinsdale, Street Worth, the band Cribs**Scarborough: the film Little Voice**Sheffield: Bean, the band Pulp.  The film Full Monty, the band MonkeysRadio and TV featuring regional English accentsMisrepresentations can also appear in the media.  The soap Emmerdale is set in Yorkshire, yet some of the actors have Lancashire accents.  Street is set in Lancashire, yet some of the actors speak with Yorkshire accents.Archers has had characters with a variety of different West Country accents (see Mummerset). Also, CBBC show Grove is set in Byker, Newcastle whereas the actors in recent series often have Sunderland accents.The shows of La Frenais and Clement have often included a variety of regional accents, the most notable being Wiedersehen Pet about working class men in Germany. Other programmes by them include Porridge featuring London and Cumberland accents, and Likely Lads, featuring north east England.The programmes of Lane such as Liver Birds and Bread also feature Scouse accents.In the 2005 version of the fiction programme Who, various Londoners wonder that if the Doctor (played by Eccleston) is an alien, why does he sound as if he comes from the North? (Eccleston used his own Salford accent in the role; the usual response is Lots of planets have a North!) Other accents in the same series include Cockney (used by actress Piper) and Estuary (used by actress Tate).A television reality programme School was set in Suffolk in its second series, providing lots of examples of the Suffolk dialect.See also*in the United Kingdom*English Society*accents of English speakers*and British English differences*EnglishNotesReferences* Peters, Pam (2004). The Cambridge Guide to English Usage. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 0-521-62181-X.* McArthur, Tom (2002). Oxford Guide to World English. Oxford: Oxford University Press. ISBN 0-19-866248-3 hardback, ISBN 0-19-860771-7 paperback.* Trask, Larry (1999). Language: The Basics, 2nd edition. London: Routledge. ISBN 0-415-20089-X.* Trudgill, Peter (1984). Language in the British Isles. Cambridge, Cambridge University Press. ISBN 0-521-28409-0.* Trudgill, Peter and Jean Hannah. (2002). International English: A Guide to the Varieties of Standard English, 4th ed. London: Arnold. ISBN 0-340-80834-9.* Wells, J. C. (1982). Accents of English 2: The British Isles. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 0-521-28540-2.External links* IANA language tag for eng-GB-oed* British National Corpus. (Official website for the BNC.)*English Accents and Dialects: searchable free-access archive of 681 English English speech samples, wma format with linguistic commentary including phonetic transcriptions in X-SAMPA, British Library Collect Britain website.* Online British English and American English pronunciation courses* . (Advocates -ise spellings.)*For the Yorkshire dialect, see http://www.yorksj.ac.uk/dialect/*For Scottish English, see http://www.scots-online.org/grammar/sse.htmengelskinglsengelskath:
18993668
Mediterranean_U-boat_Campaign_(World_War_I)
The Mediterranean U-boat Campaign in the Sea was fought by Austria-Hungary and Empire (with some support by the Empire) against the Allies during War I. It was characterised by the ability of the Powers to raid with near impunity during the first years of the war, causing substantial shipping losses, until the introduction of the convoy system allowed the Allies to drastically cut their losses from 1917 on.(First World War - Willmott, H.P., Kindersley, 2003, Page 186-187)History1914: Initial stagesAt the outbreak of World War I , with Italys decision to remain neutral, the naval strength of the Powers was represented by the navy of the Empire, the KuK Kriegsmarine, whose only access to the sea was through the Adriatic coast. The Entente powers moved swiftly to blockade the Adriatic, sending a fleet to take station at the of Otranto.The initial phase of the U-boat campaign in the Mediterranean comprised the actions by the KuKs U-boat force against the French. At the start of hostilities, the KuK had seven U-boats in commission; five operational, two training; all were of the coastal type, with limited range and endurance, suitable for operation in the Adriatic.Nevertheless, they had a number of successes. On 21 December 1914,  torpedoed the French battleship , Admiral Lapeyreres flagship. She was saved from sinking, but was forced to retire with a damaged bow. This setback dissuaded the French capital ships from penetrating too far into the Adriatic. On 27 April 1915,  sank the French cruiser , with a heavy loss of life.But the KuK boats were unable to offer any interference to allied traffic in the Mediterranean beyond the Straits of Otranto.1915Operations at the DardanellesIn April 1915, the Imperial German Navy sent their first submarines to the Mediterranean in response to the Anglo-French Dardanelles campaign, after it became obvious that their Austro-Hungarian allies could do little against it with their small submarine force, which nevertheless was successful in defending the Adriatic.The first U-boat sentachieved initial success, sinking the Royal Navy predreadnought battleships  and  on 25 and 27 May respectively on her way to Constantinople, but ran into severe limitations in the Dardanelles, where swarms of small craft and extensive anti-submarine netting and booms restricted their movements. In addition, the Germans dispatched a number of UB and UC Type boats; these were sent in sections by rail to Pola where they were assembled for transit to Constantinople. One was lost, but by the end of 1915 the Germans had established a force of seven U-boats at Constantinople, misleadingly named the Mediterranean U-Boat Division.The Pola flotillaAt the same time, the Germans determined to establish a force in the Adriatic to open the commerce war against Allied trade in the Mediterranean.By the end of June 1915, the Germans had assembled a further three pre-fabricated Type UB I submarines at Pola in Istria, two of them intended for transfer to the Austrian Navy. They were also assembling three Type UC I minelaying submarines, which were ordered converted into transports to carry small quantities of critical supplies to Turkey. However, the UB submarines were hindered by their short operational range and the Dardanelles currents, and in July U-21the only U-boat with a decent operating rangewas damaged by a mine and confined to Constantinople.On 21 July, the ocean-going submarines  and  were detached from service in the Baltic and sent to Cattaro (in present-day Montenegro), the Germans deciding to make use of Austrian bases rather than Constantinople, since there were better supply and repair facilities in the Adriatic and it avoided submarines having to negotiate the dangerous passage through the Dardanelles. In August,  and  joined the German Flotilla stationed at Cattaro, following pleas from the German military attach in Constantinople, who reported that the Royal Navys close naval support was inflicting heavy losses on Turkish forces at the Gallipoli beachheads.The war on commerceThe Mediterranean was an attractive theatre of operations for the German Admiralstabs war on Allied commerce; a significant proportion of British imports passed through it, it was critical to French and Italian trade, and submarines would be able to operate effectively in it even in the northern-hemisphere autumn and winter, when poor weather hampered naval operations in the Atlantic and the North Sea. Additionally, there were certain choke points through which shipping had to pass, such as the Canal, Malta, Crete, and Gibraltar. Finally, the Mediterranean offered the advantage that fewer neutral ships would be encountered, such as U.S. vessels, and fewer American citizens travelled the waters.(Halpern, p. 381)The German campaign in the Mediterranean is generally agreed to have properly begun in October 1915, when U-33 and U-39, followed later by U-35, were ordered to attack the approaches to Salonika and Kavalla. That month, 18 ships were sunk, for a total of . It was decided the same month that further reinforcements were called for, and a further large U-boatsailed for Cattaro. Since Germany was not yet at war with Italy, even though Austria was, the German submarines were ordered to refrain from attacking Italian shipping in the eastern Mediterranean where the Italians might expect hostile action only from German submarines. When operating in the west, up to the line of Matapan, the German U-boats flew the Austrian flag, and a sinking without warning policy was adopted, since large merchant ships could be attacked on the suspicion of being transports or auxiliary cruisers.The German Admiralty also decided that the Type UB II submarine would be ideal for Mediterranean service. Since these were too large to be shipped in sections by rail to Pola like the Type UB I, the materials for their construction and German workers to assemble them were sent instead. This meant a shortage of workers to complete U-boats for service in home waters, but it seemed justified by the successes in the Mediterranean in November, when 44 ships were sunk, for a total of . The total in December fell to 17 ships () which was still over  the total tonnage sunk in all theaters of operation at the time.The Ancona incidentIn November 1915, U-38sailing under the Austrian flag and commanded by Kapitanleutnant (K/L) Valentinercaused a diplomatic incident when she sank the Italian passenger liner  off the coast of Tunisia. Anconabound from Messina to Yorkwas fully booked and over 200 lives were lost, including nine Americans. Coming as it did six months after the sinking of the British liner  off Ireland, the Ancona incident added to a growing outrage in the U.S. over unrestricted submarine warfare, and U.S. Secretary of State Lansing despatched a sternly-worded protest to Vienna.()In December 1915, Valentiner caused further outrage when he sank the passenger liner  without warning. 343 lives were lost.In a further incident in March 1916, the German minelayer  was blown up by its own mines while laying a mine field off Taranto harbor. Italian divers inspected the wreck and established its identity. The knowledge that Germanytechnically their allywas assiduously mining their naval bases was a contributing factor in Italys decision in May 1916 to declare war on Germany.(Kemp p 17)1916: The commerce war continuesDuring 1916, the commerce war continued unabated. Allied countermeasures were largely ineffective; the complex arrangements for co-operation between the various navies meant a fragmented and unco-ordinated response, while the main remedy favored by the Allies for the U-boat menace was to establish an anti-submarine barrier across the Straits of Otranto, the Barrage. This too was ineffective; the Straits were too wide and deep for such a barrage to be successful, and consumed a huge effort and tied up many of the  patrol vessels the Allies possessed. It also acted as a target for surface attacks, being the target for a number of raids by KuK forces. Just two U-boats were caught in the barrage in all the time it was in operation; meanwhile the merchant ships continued to suffer huge losses. In 1916, the Allies lost 415 ships, of ,  of all allied ships sunk in all theaters.Eight of the top 12 U-boat aces served in the Pola flotillaincluding the highest scoring commander of all, K/L Arnauld de la Perire.1917: Unrestricted submarine warfareIn January 1917, following the German decision to resume unrestricted submarine warfare, Foreign Secretary Zimmermann led a delegation to Vienna to secure the collaboration of Austria-Hungary. Grand Admiral Haus wholly supported the proposal, but Foreign Minister Ottokar Czernin had misgivings, as did the emperor, I of Austria. Haus and the German delegates finally won the debate, partly by listing several instances where Allied submarines had sunk unarmed Austro-Hungarian ships in the Adriatic. The negotiations over the terms of the new Mediterranean submarine campaign were aided by the fact that Italy had declared war on Germany on 28 August 1916, making it no longer necessary for German U-boats to masquerade as Austrian vessels when attacking Italian shipping.(Venzon, p. 55)Shipping losses to U-boats reached a peak in April 1917, when the Central Powers had 28 boats operating, with as many as 10 at sea at any one time. While not a single submarine was sunk, they caused 94 ship losses in that one month, and severely endangered and delayed shipping. However, by that time, the Italian Navy had instituted convoy operations, with the British following on the Alexandria-Malta route in May 1917.Japanese participationBeginning in April 1917, Japan, an ally of Great Britain, sent a total of 14 destroyers to the Mediterranean with cruiser flagships which were based at Malta and played an important part in escorting convoys to guard them against enemy submarines. The Japanese ships were very effective in patrol and anti-submarine activity.() However, of the nine Austro-Hungarian navy submarines lost to enemy action, five were sunk by Italian navy units (U-13, U-10, U-16, U-20, and U-23), one by Italian and French units (U-30), one by Royal Navy units (U-3), while none were sunk by the Japanese navy, which lost one destroyer (, torpedoed by U-27).1918: Final stagesAlthough convoys had been introduced between Malta and Alexandria in May 1917, the Allies were unable to introduce a comprehensive system until later in the year. The number of routes, and divided responsibilities made this complicated, while a continued belief in offensive measures, such as the Otranto barrage, kept up a shortage of escort ships elsewhere. Throughout the year U-boats were still able to find and sink ships sailing independently. By 1918, however, the U-boats successes began to drop. In January 1918, German U-boats sank  and the Austrians sank a further  while two Pola boats were sunk.(Halpern p396)Allied losses continued to fall during the year, while U-boat losses mounted. In May 1918, Allied losses dropped below  and did not rise above this again, while the Pola flotilla lost four boats, its worst month ot the war.Dnitzwho would go on to command the German U-boat force in World War II, was commander of UB-68, operating in the Mediterranean. On 4 October, this boat was sunk by British forces and Dnitz was taken prisoner on the island of Malta.By October 1918, the end of the campaign, Allied losses for the year stood at . The Pola flotilla had lost 11 Boats, and the KuK a further 3.(Tarrant P75-76) In October, the Powers were on the verge of collapse; Bulgaria and the Ottomans had sued for peace, and the Austrians were about to do the same. The Germans elected to abandon the Mediterranean; nine U-boats sailed from their bases on the Adriatic to return to Germany and a further 10 boats were scuttled. Two shipsMercia and Suradawere torpedoed on the way, the last Allied ships to be sunk in the Mediterranean, and three U-boats were attacked.  was damaged and forced to run for Barcelona, where she was interned;(Grey p223)  was destroyed.( The last action of the Mediterranean force came on 9 November 1918, just two days before the Armistice:  torpedoed and sank the British battleship  off Trafalgar.(Grey p223-224)Bases and areas of operationsMost of the German (and all of the Austro-Hungarian) U-boats operated out of the Adriatic, with their main base at Cattaro. Another German U-boat base was located at Constantinople in the Empire. The U-boats also laid minefields, spread between such different locations like outside of Toulon, France to near Alexandria, Egypt.(TableSee also*Campaign*Campaign of World War I*Barrage*Campaign (World War I)NotesReferences****E Grey The Killing Time (1972) ISBN 0 85422 070 4*VE Tarrant The U-Boat offensive 1914-1945 (1989) ISBN 0 85368 928 8U-boot nel Mediterraneo (1914-1918)
19009110
Rain
File:FoggDam-NT.jpg|altBlack storm clouds under which a grey sheet of rain is falling on grasslands.|thumb|right|300 px|A rain shaft at the base of a thunderstormRain is liquid precipitation, as opposed to non-liquid kinds of precipitation such as snow, hail and sleet. Rain requires the presence of a thick layer of the atmosphere to have temperatures above the melting point of water near and above the Earths surface. On Earth, it is the condensation of atmospheric vapor into drops of water heavy enough to fall, often making it to the surface. Two processes, possibly acting together, can lead to air becoming saturated leading to rainfall: cooling the air or adding water vapor to the air. Virga is precipitation that begins falling to the earth but evaporates before reaching the surface; it is one of the ways air can become saturated. Precipitation forms via collision with other rain drops or ice crystals within a cloud. Rain drops range in size from oblate, pancake-like shapes for larger drops, to small spheres for smaller drops. Moisture moving along three-dimensional zones of temperature and moisture contrasts known as fronts is the major method of rain production. If enough moisture and upward motion is present, precipitation falls from convective clouds (those with strong upward vertical motion) such as cumulonimbus (thunderstorms) which can organize into narrow rainbands. In mountainous areas, heavy precipitation is possible where flow is maximized within windward sides of the terrain at elevation which forces moist air to condense and fall out as rainfall along the sides of mountains.  On the leeward side of mountains, desert climates can exist due to the dry air caused by downslope flow which causes heating and drying of the mass. The movement of the trough, or convergence zone, brings rainy seasons to savannah climes. Rain is the primary source of freshwater for most areas of the world, providing suitable conditions for diverse ecosystems, as well as water for hydroelectric power plants and crop irrigation.  Rainfall is measured through the use of gauges. Rainfall amounts are estimated actively by radar and passively by satellites.The heat island effect leads to increased rainfall, both in amounts and intensity, downwind of cities.  warming is also causing changes in the precipitation pattern globally, including wetter conditions across eastern America and drier conditions in the tropics. Precipitation is a major component of the cycle, and is responsible for depositing most of the water on the planet. The globally averaged annual precipitation is .  Climate classification systems such as the climate classification system use average annual rainfall to help differentiate between differing climate regimes. Antarctica is the Earths driest continent. Rain is also known or suspected on other worlds, composed of methane, iron, neon, and acid rather than water.Formation Water-saturated air Air contains water vapor and the amount of water in a given mass of dry air, known as the Mixing Ratio, is measured in grams of water per kilogram of dry air (g/kg).()() The amount of moisture in air is also commonly reported as humidity; which is the percentage of the total water vapor air can hold at a particular air temperature.() How much water vapor a parcel of air can contain before it becomes saturated (100% relative humidity) and forms into a cloud (a group of visible and tiny water and ice particles suspended above the Earths surface)() depends on its temperature. Warmer air can contain more water vapor than cooler air before becoming saturated. Therefore, one way to saturate a parcel of air is to cool it. The point is the temperature to which a parcel must be cooled in order to become saturated.( )  There are four main mechanisms for cooling the air to its dew point: adiabatic cooling, conductive cooling, radiational cooling, and evaporative cooling. Adiabatic cooling occurs when air rises and expands.() The air can rise due to convection, large-scale atmospheric motions, or a physical barrier such as a mountain (lift). Conductive cooling occurs when the air comes into contact with a colder surface,() usually by being blown from one surface to another, for example from a liquid water surface to colder land. Radiational cooling occurs due to the emission of infrared radiation, either by the air or by the surface underneath.()  Evaporative cooling occurs when moisture is added to the air through evaporation, which forces the air temperature to cool to its temperature, or until it reaches saturation.()The main ways water vapor is added to the air are: wind convergence into areas of upward motion,() precipitation or virga falling from above,() daytime heating evaporating water from the surface of oceans, water bodies or wet land,() transpiration from plants,() cool or dry air moving over warmer water,() and lifting air over mountains.()  Water vapor normally begins to condense on condensation nuclei such as dust, ice, and salt in order to form clouds. Elevated portions of weather fronts (which are three-dimensional in nature)() force broad areas of upward motion within the Earths atmosphere which form clouds decks such as altostratus or cirrostratus.()  Stratus is a stable cloud deck which tends to form when a cool, stable air mass is trapped underneath a warm air mass. It can also form due to the lifting of advection fog during breezy conditions.()CoalescenceCoalescence occurs when water droplets fuse to create larger water droplets, or when water droplets freeze onto an ice crystal, which is known as the process. Air resistance typically causes the water droplets in a cloud to remain stationary. When air turbulence occurs, water droplets collide, producing larger droplets. As these larger water droplets descend, coalescence continues, so that drops become heavy enough to overcome air resistance and fall as rain. Coalescence generally happens most often in clouds above freezing, and is also known as the warm rain process.()  In clouds below freezing, when ice crystals gain enough mass they begin to fall. This generally requires more mass than coalescence when occurring between the crystal and neighboring water droplets. This process is temperature dependent, as supercooled water droplets only exist in a cloud that is below freezing. In addition, because of the great temperature difference between cloud and ground level, these ice crystals may melt as they fall and become rain.()Raindrops have sizes ranging from  to  mean diameter, above which they tend to break up. Smaller drops are called cloud droplets, and their shape is spherical. As a raindrop increases in size, its shape becomes more oblate, with its largest cross-section facing the oncoming airflow.   Large rain drops become increasingly flattened on the bottom, like hamburger buns; very large ones are shaped like parachutes.()  Contrary to popular belief, their shape does not resemble a teardrop.() The biggest raindrops on Earth were recorded over Brazil and the Islands in 2004 &mdash; some of them were as large as . The large size is explained by condensation on large smoke particles or by collisions between drops in small regions with particularly high content of liquid water.() Intensity and duration of rainfall are usually inversely related, i.e., high intensity storms are likely to be of short duration and low intensity storms can have a long duration.()( )  Rain drops associated with melting hail tend to be larger than other rain drops.()  Raindrops impact at their velocity, which is greater for larger drops due to their larger mass to drag ratio. At sea level and without wind,  drizzle impacts at , while large  drops impact at around .() The sound of raindrops hitting water is caused by bubbles of air oscillating underwater.()()  The METAR code for rain is RA, while the coding for rain showers is SHRA.() Causes  Frontal activity Stratiform (a broad shield of precipitation with a relatively similar intensity) and dynamic precipitation (convective precipitation which is showery in nature with large changes in intensity over short distances) occur as a consequence of slow ascent of air in synoptic systems (on the order of cm/s), such as in the vicinity of fronts and near and poleward of surface fronts. Similar ascent is seen around cyclones outside of the eyewall, and in comma-head precipitation patterns around cyclones.()  A wide variety of weather can be found along an occluded front, with thunderstorms possible, but usually their passage is associated with a drying of the air mass. Occluded fronts usually form around mature low-pressure areas.()  What separates rainfall from other precipitation types, such as pellets and snow, is the presence of a thick layer of air aloft which is above the melting point of water, which melts the frozen precipitation well before it reaches the ground. If there is a shallow near surface layer that is below freezing, freezing rain (rain which freezes on contact with surfaces in subfreezing environments) will result.()  Hail becomes an increasingly infrequent occurrence when the freezing level within the atmosphere exceeds  above ground level.() Convection Convective rain, or showery precipitation, occurs from convective clouds, e.g., cumulonimbus or congestus. It falls as showers with rapidly changing intensity. Convective precipitation falls over a certain area for a relatively short time, as convective clouds have limited horizontal extent. Most precipitation in the tropics appears to be convective; however, it has been suggested that stratiform precipitation also occurs.(() Graupel and hail indicate convection.()  In mid-latitudes, convective precipitation is intermittent and often associated with baroclinic boundaries such as fronts, lines, and warm fronts.() Orographic effects Orographic precipitation occurs on the windward side of mountains and is caused by the rising air motion of a large-scale flow of moist air across the mountain ridge, resulting in adiabatic cooling and condensation. In mountainous parts of the world subjected to relatively consistent winds (for example, the winds), a more moist climate usually prevails on the windward side of a mountain than on the leeward or downwind side. Moisture is removed by orographic lift, leaving drier air (see wind) on the descending and generally warming, leeward side where a shadow is observed.(In Hawaii, Waialeale, on the island of Kauai, is notable for its extreme rainfall, as it has the second highest average annual rainfall on Earth, with .()  Systems known as storms affect the state with heavy rains between October and April.(Steven Businger and Thomas Birchard, Jr. A Bow Echo and Severe Weather Associated with a Kona Low in Hawaii. Retrieved on 2007-05-22.)  Local climates vary considerably on each island due to their topography, divisible into windward (Koolau) and leeward (Kona) regions based upon location relative to the higher mountains. Windward sides face the east to northeast winds and receive much more rainfall; leeward sides are drier and sunnier, with less rain and less cloud cover.()  In South America, the Andes mountain range blocks Pacific moisture that arrives in that continent, resulting in a desertlike climate just downwind across western Argentina.()  The Sierra Nevada range creates the same effect in North America forming the Basin and Deserts.()() Within the tropics File:Cairns climate.svg|altChart showing an Australian city with as much as 450 mm of rain in the winter months and less than 50 mm in the summer.|right|thumb|250 px|Rainfall distribution by month in Cairns showing the extent of the wet season at that locationThe wet, or rainy, season is the time of year, covering one or more months, when most of the average annual rainfall in a region falls.()  The term green season is also sometimes used as a euphemism by tourist authorities.()  Areas with wet seasons are dispersed across portions of the tropics and subtropics.()  Savanna climates and areas with monsoon regimes have wet summers and dry winters. Tropical rainforests technically do not have dry or wet seasons, since their rainfall is equally distributed through the year.()  Some areas with pronounced rainy seasons will see a break in rainfall mid-season when the convergence zone or trough move poleward of their location during the middle of the warm season.()  When the wet season occurs during the warm season, or summer, rain falls mainly during the late afternoon and early evening hours. The wet season is a time when quality improves,() freshwater quality improves,()() and vegetation grows significantly.  cyclones, a source of very heavy rainfall, consist of large air masses several hundred miles across with low pressure at the centre and with winds blowing inward towards the centre in either a clockwise direction (southern hemisphere) or counter clockwise (northern hemisphere).()  Although cyclones can take an enormous toll in lives and personal property, they may be important factors in the precipitation regimes of places they impact, as they may bring much-needed precipitation to otherwise dry regions.()  Areas in their path can receive a years worth of rainfall from a tropical cyclone passage.()Human influenceImage:Atlanta thermal.jpg|thumb|right|Image of Georgia showing temperature distribution, with blue showing cool temperatures, red warm, and hot areas appear white.The fine particulate matter produced by car exhaust and other human sources of pollution forms condensation nuclei, leads to the production of clouds and increases the likelihood of rain. As commuters and commercial traffic cause pollution to build up over the course of the week, the likelihood of rain increases: it peaks by Saturday, after five days of weekday pollution has been built up. In heavily populated areas that are near the coast, such as the United States Seaboard, the effect can be dramatic: there is a 22% higher chance of rain on Saturdays than on Mondays.()  The urban heat island effect warms cities  to  above surrounding suburbs and rural areas. This extra heat leads to greater upward motion, which can induce additional shower and thunderstorm activity. Rainfall rates downwind of cities are increased between 48% and 116%. Partly as a result of this warming, monthly rainfall is about 28% greater between  to  downwind of cities, compared with upwind.()  Some cities induce a total precipitation increase of 51%.()altWorld map of temperature distribution shows the northern hemisphere was warmer than the souther hemisphere during the periods compared.|thumb|right|200 px|Mean surface temperature anomalies during the period 1999 to 2008 with respect to the average temperatures from 1940 to 1980Increasing temperatures tend to increase evaporation which can lead to more precipitation.  Precipitation generally increased over land north of 30N from 1900 through 2005 but has declined over the tropics since the 1970s.  Globally there has been no statistically significant overall trend in precipitation over the past century, although trends have varied widely by region and over time. Eastern portions of North and South America, northern Europe, and northern and central Asia have become wetter. The Sahel, the Mediterranean, southern Africa and parts of southern Asia have become drier. There has been an increase in the number of heavy precipitation events over many areas during the past century, as well as an increase since the 1970s in the prevalence of droughtsespecially in the tropics and subtropics. Changes in precipitation and evaporation over the oceans are suggested by the decreased salinity of mid- and high-latitude waters (implying more precipitation), along with increased salinity in lower latitudes (implying less precipitation and/or more evaporation). Over the contiguous United States, total annual precipitation increased at an average rate of 6.1 percent since 1900, with the greatest increases within the East North Central climate region (11.6 percent per century) and the South (11.1 percent). Hawaii was the only region to show a decrease (-9.25 percent).()The most successful attempts at influencing weather involve seeding which include techniques used to increase winter precipitation over mountains and suppress hail.()Characteristics Patterns Image:Sturmfront auf Doppler-Radar-Schirm.jpg|200 px|thumb|right|Band of thunderstorms seen on a radar displayRainbands are cloud and precipitation areas which are significantly elongated. Rainbands can be stratiform or convective,(Glossary of Meteorology (2009). Rainband. Retrieved on 2008-12-24.) and are generated by differences in temperature. When noted on radar imagery, this precipitation elongation is referred to as banded structure.(Glossary of Meteorology (2009). Banded structure. Retrieved on 2008-12-24.)  Rainbands in advance of warm fronts and fronts are associated with weak upward motion,(Owen Hertzman (1988). Three-Dimensional Kinematics of Rainbands in Midlatitude Cyclones. Retrieved on 2008-12-24) and tend to be wide and stratiform in nature.(Yuh-Lang Lin (2007). Mesoscale Dynamics. Retrieved on 2008-12-25.)Rainbands spawned near and ahead of fronts can be lines which are able to produce tornadoes.(Glossary of Meteorology (2009). Prefrontal squall line. Retrieved on 2008-12-24.)  Rainbands associated with cold fronts can be warped by mountain barriers perpendicular to the fronts orientation due to the formation of a low-level jet.(J. D. Doyle (1997). The influence of mesoscale orography on a coastal jet and rainband. Retrieved on 2008-12-25.)  Bands of thunderstorms can form with breeze and breeze boundaries, if enough moisture is present. If sea breeze rainbands become active enough just ahead of a cold front, they can mask the location of the cold front itself.(A. Rodin (1995). Interaction of a cold front with a sea-breeze front numerical simulations. Retrieved on 2008-12-25.)  Once a cyclone occludes, a trough of warm air aloft, or trowal for short, will be caused by strong southerly winds on its eastern periphery rotating aloft around its northeast, and ultimately northwestern, periphery (also known as the warm conveyor belt), forcing a surface trough to continue into the cold sector on a similar curve to the occluded front. The trowal creates the portion of an occluded cyclone known as its comma head, due to the comma-like shape of the mid-tropospheric cloudiness that accompanies the feature. It can also be the focus of locally heavy precipitation, with thunderstorms possible if the atmosphere along the trowal is unstable enough for convection.() Banding within the comma head precipitation pattern of an cyclone can yield significant amounts of rain.(David R. Novak, Lance F. Bosart, Daniel Keyser, and Jeff S. Waldstreicher (2002). A Climatological and composite study of cold season banded precipitation in the Northeast United States. Retrieved on 2008-12-26.) Behind extratropical cyclones during fall and winter, rainbands can form downwind of relative warm bodies of water such as the Lakes. Downwind of islands, bands of showers and thunderstorms can develop due to low level wind convergence downwind of the island edges. Offshore California, this has been noted in the wake of cold fronts.(Ivory J. Small (1999). An observation study of island effect bands: precipitation producers in Southern California. Retrieved on 2008-12-26.)Rainbands within tropical cyclones are curved in orientation. Tropical cyclone rainbands contain showers and thunderstorms that, together with the eyewall and the eye, constitute a hurricane or tropical storm. The extent of rainbands around a tropical cyclone can help determine the cyclones intensity.(of WisconsinMadison (1998).Objective Dvorak Technique. Retrieved on 2006-05-29.) Acidity thumb|rightThe pH of rain varies, especially due to its origin.  On Americas East Coast, rain that is derived from the Atlantic Ocean typically has a pH of 5.0-5.6; rain that comes across the continental from the west has a pH of 3.8-4.8; and local thunderstorms can have a pH as low as 2.0.()  Rain becomes acidic primarily due to the presence of two strong acids, acid (H2SO4) and acid (HNO3).  Sulfuric acid is derived from natural sources such as volcanoes, and wetlands (sulfate reducing bacteria); and anthropogenic sources such as the combustion of fossil fuels, and mining where H2S is present.  Nitric acid is produced by natural sources such as lightning, soil bacteria, and natural fires; while also produced anthropogenically by the combustion of fossil fuels and from power plants.  In the past 20 years the concentrations of nitric and sulfuric acid has decreased in presence of rainwater, which may be due to the significant increase in ammonium (most likely as ammonia from livestock production), which acts as a buffer in acid rain and raising the pH.()Kppen climate classificationImage:World Koppen Map.png|thumb|right|400px|Updated Kppen-Geiger climate map( (direct:Final Revised Paper))The Kppen classification depends on average monthly values of temperature and precipitation. The most commonly used form of the Kppen classification has five primary types labeled A through E. Specifically, the primary types are A, tropical; B, dry; C, mild mid-latitude; D, cold mid-latitude; and E, polar. The five primary classifications can be further divided into secondary classifications such as forest, monsoon, savanna, subtropical, continental, climate, climate, steppe, climate, tundra, ice cap, and desert.Rain forests are characterized by high rainfall, with definitions setting minimum normal annual rainfall between  and .()  A tropical savanna is a grasslandbiome located in semi-arid to semi-humid climate regions of subtropical and tropical latitudes, with rainfall between  and  a year. They are widespread on Africa, and are also found in India, the northern parts of America, Malaysia, and Australia.()  The humid subtropical climate zone where winter rainfall is associated with large storms that the westerlies steer from west to east. Most summer rainfall occurs during thunderstorms and from occasional tropical cyclones.()  Humid subtropical climates lie on the east side continents, roughly between latitudes 20 and 40 degrees away from the equator.()An oceanic (or maritime) climate is typically found along the west coasts at the middle latitudes of all the worlds continents, bordering cool oceans, as well as southeastern Australia, and is accompanied by plentiful precipitation year round.()  The Mediterranean climate regime resembles the climate of the lands in the Basin, parts of western America, parts of Western and Australia, in southwestern Africa and in parts of central Chile. The climate is characterized by hot, dry summers and cool, wet winters.()  A steppe is a dry grassland.()  Subarctic climates are cold with continuous permafrost and little precipitation.() Measurement  Gauges The standard way of measuring rainfall or snowfall is the standard rain gauge, which can be found in 100-mm (4-in) plastic and 200-mm (8-in) metal varieties.() The inner cylinder is filled by  of rain, with overflow flowing into the outer cylinder. Plastic gauges have markings on the inner cylinder down to  resolution, while metal gauges require use of a stick designed with the appropriate  markings. After the inner cylinder is filled, the amount inside it is discarded, then filled with the remaining rainfall in the outer cylinder until all the fluid in the outer cylinder is gone, adding to the overall total until the outer cylinder is empty.()  Other types of gauges include the popular wedge gauge (the cheapest rain gauge and most fragile), the tipping bucket rain gauge, and the weighing rain gauge.()  For those looking to measure rainfall the most inexpensively, a can that is cylindrical with straight sides will act as a rain gauge if left out in the open, but its accuracy will depend on what ruler you use to measure the rain with. Any of the above rain gauges can be made at home, with enough know-how.()When a precipitation measurement is made, various networks exist across the United States and elsewhere where rainfall measurements can be submitted through the Internet, such as CoCoRAHS or GLOBE.()()  If a network is not available in the area where one lives, the nearest local weather or met office will likely be interested in the measurement.()One millimeter of rainfall is the equivalent of one liter of water per square meter. This makes computing the water requirements of crops simple.(FAO.org)Remote sensingright|thumb|200px|Twenty-four hour rainfall accumulation on the Val dIrne radar in Eastern Canada. Zones without data in the east and southwest are caused by beam blocking from mountains. (Source: Environment Canada)One of the main uses of weather radar is to be able to assess the amount of precipitations fallen over large basins for hydrological purposes.()  For instance, river flood control, sewer management and dam construction are all areas where planners use rainfall accumulation data. Radar-derived rainfall estimates compliment surface station data which can be used for calibration. To produce radar accumulations, rain rates over a point are estimated by using the value of reflectivity data at individual grid points. A radar equation is then used, which is,: Z  A R^b ,where Z represents the radar reflectivity, R represents the rainfall rate, and A and b are constants.()  Satellite derived rainfall estimates use passive microwave instruments aboard orbiting as well as geostationary satellites to indirectly measure rainfall rates.()  If one wants an accumulated rainfall over a time period, one has to add up all the accumulations from each grid box within the images during that time.IntensityRainfall intensity is classified according to the rate of precipitation:* Light rain &mdash; when the precipitation rate is   per hour,() or between  and  per hour(* Violent rain &mdash; when the precipitation rate is >  per hour( Return period The likelihood or probability of an event with a specified intensity and duration, is called the period or frequency.() The intensity of a storm can be predicted for any return period and storm duration, from charts based on historic data for the location.()  The term 1 in 10 year storm describes a rainfall event which is rare and is only likely to occur once every 10 years, so it has a 10 percent likelihood any given year. The rainfall will be greater and the flooding will be worse than the worst storm expected in any single year. The term 1 in 100 year storm describes a rainfall event which is extremely rare and which will occur with a likelihood of only once in a century, so has a 1 percent likelihood in any given year. The rainfall will be extreme and flooding to be worse than a 1 in 10 year event. As with all probability events, it is possible, though improbable, to have multiple 1 in 100 Year Storms in a single year.() Forecasting File:Rita5dayqpf.gif|thumb|right|300 px|Example of a five day rainfall forecast from the Prediction CenterThe Quantitative Precipitation Forecast (abbreviated QPF) is the expected amount of liquid precipitation accumulated over a specified time period over a specified area.()  A QPF will be specified when a measurable precipitation type reaching a minimum threshold is forecast for any hour during a QPF valid period. Precipitation forecasts tend to be bound by synoptic hours such as 0000, 0600, 1200 and 1800 GMT. Terrain is considered in QPFs by use of topography or based upon climatological precipitation patterns from observations with fine detail.()   Starting in the mid to late 1990s, QPFs were used within hydrologic forecast models to simulate impact to rivers throughout the United States.()  Forecast models show significant sensitivity to humidity levels within the boundary layer, or in the lowest levels of the atmosphere, which decreases with height.()  QPF can be generated on a quantitative, forecasting amounts, or a qualitative, forecasting the probability of a specific amount, basis.()  Radar imagery forecasting techniques show higher skill than model forecasts within 6 to 7 hours of the time of the radar image. The forecasts can be verified through use of rain gauge measurements, weather radar estimates, or a combination of both. Various skill scores can be determined to measure the value of the rainfall forecast.()Impact Effect on agriculture Image:Heavy Rains in Southern Japan.gif|thumb|Rainfall estimates for southern Japan and the surrounding region from July 2027, 2009.Precipitation, especially rain, has a dramatic effect on agriculture. All plants need at least some water to survive, therefore rain (being the most effective means of watering) is important to agriculture. While a regular rain pattern is usually vital to healthy plants, too much or too little rainfall can be harmful, even devastating to crops.  Drought can kill crops and increase erosion,() while overly wet weather can cause harmful fungus growth.()  Plants need varying amounts of rainfall to survive. For example, certain cacti require small amounts of water,() while tropical plants may need up to hundreds of inches of rain per year to survive.In areas with wet and dry seasons, soil nutrients diminish and erosion increases during the wet season.(  Animals have adaptation and survival strategies for the wetter regime. The previous dry season leads to food shortages into the wet season, as the crops have yet to mature.(Roberto Frisancho (1993). Human Adaptation and Accommodation. University of Michigan Press, pp. 388. ISBN 978-0-472-09511-7. Retrieved on 2008-12-27.)  Developing countries have noted that their populations show seasonal weight fluctuations due to food shortages seen before the first harvest, which occurs late in the wet season.()  Rain may be harvested through the use of tanks; treated to potable use or for non-potable use indoors or for irrigation,.() Excessive rain during short periods of time can cause flash floods.() In culture Cultural attitudes towards rain differ across the world. In temperate climates, people tend to be more stressed when the weather is unstable or cloudy, with its impact greater on men than women.()  Rain can also bring joy, as some consider it to be soothing or enjoy the aesthetic appeal of it. In dry places, such as India,() or during periods of drought,() rain lifts peoples moods. In Botswana, the Setswana word for rain, pula, is used as  the name of the national currency, in recognition of the economic importance of rain in this desert country.()  Several cultures have developed means of dealing with rain and have developed numerous protection devices such as umbrellas and raincoats, and diversion devices such as gutters and drains that lead rains to sewers.()  Many people find the scent during and immediately after rain pleasant or distinctive. The source of this scent is petrichor, an oil produced by plants, then absorbed by rocks and soil, and later released into the air during rainfall.() Global climatology Approximately  of water falls as precipitation each year across the globe with  of it over the oceans.() Given the Earths surface area, that means the globally averaged annual precipitation is . Deserts are defined as areas with an average annual precipitation of less than  per year,()(According to What is a desert?, the 250 mm threshold definition is attributed to Meigs.) or as areas where more water is lost by evapotranspiration than falls as precipitation.()Desertsthumb|300px|Largest desertsThe northern half of Africa is primarily desert or arid, containing the Sahara. Across Asia, a large annual rainfall minimum, composed primarily of deserts, stretches from the desert in Mongolia west-southwest through western Pakistan (Balochistan) and Iran into the desert in Saudi Arabia. Most of Australia is semi-arid or desert,() making it the worlds driest inhabited continent. In South America, the Andes mountain range blocks Pacific moisture that arrives in that continent, resulting in a desertlike climate just downwind across western Argentina.(  The drier areas of the United States are regions where the desert overspreads the Desert Southwest, the Great Basin and central Wyoming.()Polar DesertSince rain only falls as liquid, in frozen temperatures, rain can not fall. As a result, very cold climates see very little rainfall and are often known as deserts. A common biome in this area is the tundra which has a short summer thaw and a long frozen winter. caps see no rain at all, making Antarctica the worlds driest continent.RainforestsRainforests are areas of the world with very high rainfall. Both tropical and temperate rainforests exist. Tropical rainforests occupy a large band of the planet mostly along the equator. Most temperate rainforests are located on mountainous west coasts between 45 and 55 degrees latitude, but they are often found in other areas.Around 40-75% of all biotic life is found in rainforests. Rainforests are also responsible for 28% of the worlds oxygen turnover.MonsoonsThe equatorial region near the Convergence Zone (ITCZ), or monsoon trough, is the wettest portion of the worlds continents. Annually, the rain belt within the tropics marches northward by August, then moves back southward into the Hemisphere by February and March.()  Within Asia, rainfall is favored across its southern portion from India east and northeast across the Philippines and southern China into Japan due to the monsoon advecting moisture primarily from the Ocean into the region.()  The monsoon trough can reach as far north as the 40th parallel in East Asia during August before moving southward thereafter. Its poleward progression is accelerated by the onset of the summer monsoon which is characterized by the development of lower air pressure (a low) over the warmest part of Asia.()()  Similar, but weaker, monsoon circulations are present over America and Australia.()(of Meteorology. Climate of Giles. Retrieved on 2008-05-03.)  During the summer, the Southwest monsoon combined with of California and of Mexico moisture moving around the ridge in the Atlantic ocean bring the promise of afternoon and evening thunderstorms to the southern tier of the United States as well as the Plains.(  The eastern half of the contiguous United States east of the 98th meridian, the mountains of the Northwest, and the Sierra Nevada range are the wetter portions of the nation, with average rainfall exceeding  per year.(NationalAtlas.gov Precipitation of the Individual States and of the Conterminous States. Retrieved on 2008-03-09.)  cyclones enhance precipitation across southern sections of the United States,() as well as Rico, the States Virgin Islands,(Intelligence Agency. The World Factbook &ndash; Virgin Islands. Retrieved on 2008-03-19.) the Mariana Islands,(BBC. Weather Centre - World Weather - Country Guides - Northern Mariana Islands. Retrieved on 2008-03-19.) Guam, and Samoa.Impact of the WesterliesWesterly flow from the mild north Atlantic leads to wetness across western Europe, in particular the Kingdom, where the western coasts can receive between , at sea-level) and , on the mountains) of rain per year. In Bergen, Norway is one of the more famous European rain-cities with its yearly precipitation of  on average. During the fall, winter, and spring, Pacific storm systems bring most of Hawaii and the western United States much of their precipitation.(J. Horel. Normal Monthly Precipitation, Inches. Retrieved on 2008-03-19.)      Over the top of the ridge, the jet stream brings a summer precipitation maximum to the Lakes. Large thunderstorm areas known as mesoscale convective complexes move through the Plains, Midwest, and Great Lakes during the warm season, contributing up to 10% of the annual precipitation to the region.(Walker S. Ashley, Thomas L. Mote, P. Grady Dixon, Sharon L. Trotter, Emily J. Powell, Joshua D. Durkee, and Andrew J. Grundstein. Distribution of Mesoscale Convective Complex Rainfall in the United States. Retrieved on 2008-03-02.)The Nio-Southern Oscillation affects the precipitation distribution, by altering rainfall patterns across the western United States,(John Monteverdi and Jan Null. Western Region Technical Attachment NO. 97-37 November 21, 1997: El Nio and California Precipitation. Retrieved on 2008-02-28.) Midwest,()() the Southeast,(Prediction Center. El Nio (ENSO) Related Rainfall Patterns Over the Tropical Pacific. Retrieved on 2008-02-28.) and throughout the tropics. There is also evidence that warming is leading to increased precipitation to the eastern portions of North America, while droughts are becoming more frequent in the tropics and subtropics.Wettest known locationsCherrapunji, situated on the southern slopes of the Eastern Himalaya in Shillong, India is one of the wettest places on Earth, with an average annual rainfall of . The highest recorded rainfall in a single year was  in 1861. The 38-year average at nearby Mawsynram, Meghalaya, India is .( )   The wettest spot in Australia is Bellenden Ker in the north-east of the country records an average of  per year, with over  of rain recorded during 2000.()  Waialeale on the island of Kauai in the Islands averages more than  of rain over the last 32 years, with a record  in 1982. Its summit is considered one of the rainiest spots on earth. It has been promoted in tourist literature for many years as the wettest spot in the world.(accessdate  2008-12-11)  Llor, a town situated in Choc, Colombia, is probably the place with the largest measured rainfall in the world, averaging  per year.()  The Department of Choc is extraordinarily humid. Tutunendo, a small town situated in the same department, is one of the wettest estimated places on Earth, averaging  per year; in 1974 the town received , the largest annual rainfall measured in Colombia. Unlike Cherrapunji, which receives most of its rainfall between April and September, Tutunendo receives rain almost uniformly distributed throughout the year.( ) Quibd, the capital of Choc, receives the most rain in the world among cities with over 100,000 inhabitants:  per year.( Storms in Choc can drop  of rainfall in a day. This amount is more than falls in many cities in a years time. Outside of Earth On Titan, Saturns largest moon, infrequent methane rain is thought to carve the moons numerous surface channels.() On Venus, sulfuric acid virga evaporates  from the surface.() There is likely to be rain of various compositions in the upper atmospheres of the giants, as well as precipitation of liquid neon in the deep atmospheres.()()  Extrasolar planet OGLE-TR-56b  in the constellation Sagittarius is reported to have iron rain.() See also *Johad*dancing*sensor*Rainbow*animals*dust*rain in Kerala*sewer overflow*precipitation*resources*WeatherNotes*  The value given is continents highest and possibly the worlds depending on measurement practices, procedures and period of record variations.*  The official greatest average annual precipitation for South America is 354 inches at Quibdo, Colombia. The 523.6 inches average at Lloro, Colombia miles SE and at a higher elevation than Quibdo is an estimated amount.*  Approximate elevation.*  Recognized as The Wettest place on Earth by the Book of World Records.(UFL - Dispute between Mawsynram and Cherrapunji for the rainiest place in the world) References  External links *What are clouds, and why does it rain?*BBC article on the weekend rain effect*BBC article on rain-making*BBC article on the mathematics of running in the rainaf:Renam:ang:Renar:an:Pleviaarc:ast:Lluviagn:Amaay:Jalluaz:Leysanbm:Sanjibn:zh-min-nan:Hba:be:be-x-old:bo:bs:Kiabr:Glavbg:ca:Plujacs:Dcy:Glawda:Regnde:Regenet:Vihmel:es:Lluviaeo:Pluvoeu:Eurifa:fr:Pluie(delslach)ga:Fearthainngv:Fliagheygd:Uisge-adhairgl:Chuviagan:glk:gu:()hi:hr:Kiaio:Pluvoid:Hujaniu:/miniis:Rigningit:Pioggiahe:jv:Udankn:kk:sw:Mvuaht:Lapliku:Baranla:Pluvialv:Lietuslt:Lietus(mi)lmo:Pivahu:Esmk:mg:Oranaml:mr:mzn:ms:Hujanmn:nah:Quiyahuitl(neerslag)nds-nl:Regenne:(  )ja:no:Regnnn:Regnnrm:Pllieoc:Plujapnb:koi:pms:Pieuvapl:Deszczpt:Chuvaro:Ploaiequ:Pararue:ru:sah:sco:Rainsq:Shiu(chiuvuta)si:simple:Rainsk:Dsl:Deso:Roobsr:sh:Kiasu:Hujanfi:Sadesv:Regntl:Ulanta:tt:te:th:tg:chr:tr:Yamuruk:ur:ug:vec:Pivavi:Mafiu-vro:Vihmwa:Plouvewar:Uranwuu:yi:yo:jzh-yue:bat-smg:Ltoszh:
19023836
Japan_Oil,_Gas_and_Metals_National_Corporation
, also known as JOGMEC, is a Japanese government Administrative Institution which was created in 2004 when the former Japan National Oil Corporation merged with the former Metal Mining Agency of Japan.( Japan Oil, Gas and Metals National Corporation (JOGMEC):  About us, overview.)HistoryJOGMEC integrates corollary functions in one administrative entity.  The former National Oil Corporation (JNOC) had been tasked with securing a stable supply of oil and natural gas for Japans use.  The former Mining Agency of Japan (MMAJ) had been tasked with ensuring a stable supply of nonferrous metal and mineral resources for Japans use.  Greater efficiencies were realized by combining two bureaucracies with similar missions.  JOGMEC was established in 2004 pursuant to the  2002 Law Concerning the Japan Oil, Gas and Metals National Corporation.(JOGMEC:  About us, history.)ActivitiesJOGMECs Geological Remote Satellite Sensing Centre in Lobatse, Botswana was created in partnership with the southern African nations Department of Geological Survey in July 2008.  The Japan-Botswana partnership will work together in developing the exploration of minerals through methods such as sensing technology.(Botswana Press Agency (BOPA):  Geological satellite centre welcome. March 24, 2009.)JOGMEC manages rare metal stockpiles in conjunction with private companies.(National Research Council (US). (2008).  Minerals, Critical Minerals, and the U.S. Economy, p. 186.)See also* in Japan* law* of Independent Administrative Institutions (Japan)NotesReferences* National Research Council (US). (2008).  Minerals, Critical Minerals, and the U.S. Economy. Washington, D.C.: Academies Press. 10-ISBN 0309112826; 13-ISBN 9780309112826; OCLC 180691105External links*  JOGMEC websiteja:
19046864
Rita_Hosking
thumb|altRita alt Rita|Rita HoskingRita Hosking is an American composer and musician based in California.  She plays Americana and bluegrass styles of music with both standards and original songs.(Rita Hosking and Cousin Jack)  Since the release of Are You Ready?, she has been performing around the country at concerts, festivals, and other venues.(Rita Hosking homepage)(Article about benefit performance in Napa by Rita Hosking & Cousin Jack)Hoskings music isnt like the polished, over-produced music found in pop culture. Hers is a minimalist sound that reflects a simpler time and place: a little country town, rather than a big city. (Channeling simpler times - Folksinger records her own life and upbringing in old-style ballads by Landon Christensen)Leading up to her 2010 performance tour of Great Britain, she has gotten increasing attention on the East Side of the pond.   Reviewer Paul Kerr of Americana-UK remarked that she is . . . a very talented artist with the ability to step up to that pantheon of great female country folk singers and writers.  ( Review by Paul Kerr in Americana-UK, Superb country folk from a brilliant singer/songwriter 2010)   In the summer of 2010, Hosking played to packed venues in England, Wales, and Cornwall.(Review of Hosking and Feders performance on July 22, 2010, at No8 Cafe in Launceton, Cornwall)Influences and inspirationsHosking grew up in a rural area in County, California.  Her father worked the night shift at a sawmill as part of the areas logging industry. Her great grandfather, from Cornwall, southwest of England, was an underground coal miner in the region. And her grandmothers family had headed there in a covered wagon on the Oregon Trail, from Virginia.Hosking says old-time music was strong in her mountain area, as well as country. She grew up hearing neighbors play their simple instruments by ear, as a group called the Mountaineers. And the school cook took several girls from the school, taught them songs and they performed as the Farmerettes; with the Farmerettes, Hosking played washboard and sang her first solo.( Article by Patrick S. Pemberton, The Tribune, San Luis Obispo, California.   Friday, June 18, 2010.)Im no expert on the Appalachians at all, but I figure there are similarities -- the economy and some traditions, logging and mining. So, as a songwriter, you focus on that. You take the human struggle to survive, particularly in a beautiful place they love, and youve pinned down a lot of artistic inspiration.(California singer understands folk roots)PerformancesBy invitation, she has appeared at the White Crow Conservatory of Music in Saginaw, Michigan,(Rita Hosking brings mountain music, California style, to Saginaws White Crow by Janet I. Martineau, The Saginaw News) the 17th Annual Midsummer in the Northwoods Bluegrass Festival in Wisconsin, high in the Colorado Rockies at the Telluride Bluegrass Festival, and many other locations.On July 16, 2010, she performed at the Larmer Tree Festival in England, at the famed Victorian pleasure garden near Royal (about 16 miles west of Salisbury), on the Wiltshire/Dorset border.   On July 22, 2010, she was the featured guest on the BBC radio show Bob Harris Country.(Bob Harris Country on BBC Radio)Hosking has also performed at the Strawberry Music Festival, Live Oak Music Festival, Kate Wolf Music Festival, and many more well known festivals. On November 3, 2010, Rita performed at Freight and Salvage Coffeehouse in Berkeley, California.(Announcement of Freight & Salvage performance of November 3, 2010)Recognition and awardsRita was the 2007 Emerging Artist Winner at the Bluegrassin In The Foothills festival in California.(Homepage of the annual music festival in Plymouth, California Bluegrassin in the Foothills)On September 6, 2008, Rita was selected the winner of the nationally respected Dave Carter Memorial Songwriting Contest at the Sisters Folk Festival in Oregon.(Sisters Folk Festival homepage)On June 18, 2009, Rita performed as a finalist at the acclaimed Telluride Troubadour Competition, held in conjunction with the Bluegrass Festival.  The Competition judges songs based on composition, vocal delivery, and overall performance.(Telluride Bluegrass competitions.)Come Sunrise was nominated in November 2009 as one of the five finalists for Album of the Year in the category of country music by the 9th annual Independent Music Awards.( Artist Spotlight, nominee for Country Music album of the year, 9th Annual Independent Music Awards.)   Hosking won the 9th annual Independent Music Awards Vox Pop / Peoples Choice / Best Country Album award for Come Sunrise.Soloist and with groupsRita is versatile, performing either as a soloist, or in duos, trios or quartets.(Overview of Rita Hosking and her music on the Rita Hosking Homepage)Rita is sometimes supported by a back-up group named Cousin Jack(Article about Rita Hosking and Cousin Jack in Sacramento News & Review)(video of Rita Hosking and Cousin Jack performing in Berkeley, California) that includes:* Bill Dakin - bass, guitar, vocals* Sean Feder - banjo, dobro, bass, percussion, vocals* Andy Lenz - fiddleSongs written by Rita HoskingThe following singles were written by Rita Hosking and performed by others:*Kati Penn  Im Going Home on the album My Turn to Cry produced by Ickes(Page showing Kati Penns album My Turn to Cry)Come SunriseDuring the spring of 2008 at the Strawberry Music Festival Rita heard a performance of Mississippi native Herring.  Hosking bought Herrings album and discovered that Rich Brotherton, longtime mandolin and guitar player in Earl Keens band, had produced it.  I loved it, says Hosking, so I My Spaced him and said, Hi, my name is Rita. Would you be interested in producing my next album? He wrote right back and said, Sure.   In addition to Brotherton, she was backed by such musicians as Maines (father of Chicks lead singer Natalie Maines and a well-known musician and record producer), Warren Hood of the Waybacks,(Homepage of the Waybacks) and Tom Van Schaik and Marty Muse from Keens band.(Pop Music: Rita Hosking: Down from the mountains, Davis singer-songwriters sound mines a rich, generations-old vein, By Dixie Reid, Published: Friday, Jan. 02, 2009)This collaboration evolved into Come Sunrise, which was released in June 2009 and is available through CD Baby, Digstation, and iTunes.   It was recorded and produced at Ace Recording (Ace Recording homepage) in Austin, Texas.As described by Stuart Mason:    On her new release Come Sunrise, singer-songwriter Rita Hosking reflects her upbringing in rural Shasta County. Her breed of Nor Cal country folk aint quite old-timey, and it aint quite bluegrass, but damn its sweet. For fans of Emmylou and Gillian, this ones a safe bet. The songs of Rita Hoskings are as fragile as a newborn baby, and defiant as a West Virginia coal miner.(Review of Come Sunrise on the Fiddlefreak Folk Music Blog, October 21, 2009)As described by Neil Spencer of the Guardian (UK):   Hosking . . . hits impressive form on this album.  Her songs are compassionate tales about ordinary folk from her north Californian background  loggers, miners, the mothers of lost sons  but there is anger as well as warmth in her voice. Montgomery Creek Blues and Promise Land in particular meld the personal and political to become state-of-the-nation songs.(Review of Come Sunrise in the Music Section of the Guardian (UK), January 3, 2010)In July 2009 Come Sunrise placed Number 12 on the national Freeform American Roots Chart.(Freeform American Roots Chart of July 2009)Come Sunrise was selected as one of five contenders for the country music album of the year of the 9th annual Independent Music Awards, announced in November 2009 (see description under Recognition and Awards).Discography*Come Sunrise (2009) self released.(Review of Come Sunrise on Twang Nation)(Review of Come Sunrise by Bob Gottlieb on The Folk and Acoustic Music Exchange)::. . . a mellow slice of Americana with deep Appalachian roots. Ritas a gifted songwriter with a strong clear voice straight from the mountains . . . .  (Hal Bogerd, review in Hickorywind)* Silver Stream (2007) self released.::Loaded with verve, spirit and out of the box energy, you dont have to be a hardcore bluegrass fan to play this often and loud.  A top shelf recording all the way.(RITA HOSKING/Silver Stream Volume 31/Number 96, February 4, 2008, MIDWEST RECORD, CHRIS SPECTOR, Editor and Publisher)*Are You Ready? (2005) self released.(Are You Ready? Rita Hosking, Reviewed by: B Hough)(Review of Are you Ready on website The Shy Writer)In addition she has provided vocals for other recordings such as the Loose Acoustic Trios album Sorrow Be Gone.(The Loose Acoustic Trio)Notes and references(External links* Website dedicated to Rita Hosking* Rita Hoskings Myspace homepage* Rita Hosking YOUTUBE Channel* Rita Hosking Twitter page* Facebook page of Rita Hosking* Touring Schedule of Rita Hosking
19062382
Arnold_Jung_Lokomotivfabrik
Image:ArnoldJung.JPG|thumb|Factory plate on a locomotiveImage:Fabrikschild 99 5902.jpg|thumb|Factory plate on locomotive 99 5902 of the HSBThe Arnold Jung Lokomotivfabrik (Arnold Jung Locomotive Works) was a locomotive manufacturer, in particular of Feldbahn locomotives, in Kirchen, Rheinland-Pfalz, Germany.The firm was founded on 13 February 1885 as Jung & Staimer OHG by Jung and Christian Staimer. On 3 September 1885 the first locomotive was delivered. In 1913 the company was renamed Arnold Jung Lokomotivfabrik GmbH, Jungenthal. In 1976 locomotive production was stopped in favour of other products such as tools, transporters, plating, cranes and bridgelayers.Jung built more than 12,000 locomotives. In the 1950s it built 51 Class 23 2-6-2 locomotives,  including in 1959, number 23 105, the last new steam locomotive supplied to the  Deutsche Bundesbahn Jung also made boilers for other uses such as rollers.By the 1950s Jung was also building locomotives, such as the 42 gauge Republic Railways 4211 class shunters in 195356.()Production ceased on 30 September 1993 and the factory closed, but the firm continues to exist as Jungenthal Systemtechnik GmbH.Preserved LocomotivesGalleryFile:Arnold Jung Lokomotive Tsumeb anagoria.JPG|Arnold Jung Locomotive from 1905 of the Mining and Railway Company in Tsumeb, Namibiaimage:AJ_Dampflock1.JPG|Jung Steam locomotiveimage:Losheim Diesellok.jpg|Jung Diesel locomotiveimage:Vuurloze locomotief.jpg|Jung firelessimage:Lok Jung.jpg|Feldbahn locomotive built by the Arnold Jung LokomotivfabrikReferencesExternal links* Description of the firm of Jung at www.werkbahn.de* There is a relevant English-language forum at Railways of GermanyJung LokomotivfabrikJung Lokomotivfabrik
19079882
Capitlio
|thumb|right|250px|Location of Capitlio on a map of the state of Minas GeraisCapitlio is a Brazilian municipality located in the southwest of the state of Gerais. Its population as of 2007 was 7,634 people living in a total area of 522 km. The city belongs to the meso-region of Sul e Sudoeste de Minas and to the micro-region of Passos.  It became a municipality in 1948.(IBGE)The slogan for the city is Queen of the Lakes, in reference to its proximity to the Furnas reservoir.  With the flooding of the lake part of the old town of Capitlio was submerged.  When the water goes down more than 10 meters the old church of the ruins of the town of Guap can be seen.LocationThe city center of Capitlio is located at an elevation of 766 meters east of Passos and bordering on the northern edge of the Furnas reservoir.   Neighboring  municipalities are:  Bonita (NW),  Piumhi (N), Pimenta (E), Guap (SE and S), Jos da Barra (SW), and Joo Batista do Glria (W).(Citybrazil)Distances*Horizonte: 270 km on MG-050*Piumhi: 17 km to the northeast*Passos: 76 km (10 km north to junction with MG-50, then west on MG-050 for 66 km)*Uberaba 290 km*Preto: 225 km*Formiga: 82 km*Other neighboring municipalities: Pimenta 43 km, Divinpolis 160 km, Alpinpolis 71 km, Lavras 208 km, Guap 30 km, Ibiraci 140 km, Cssia 120 km, Ita de Minas 90 km, Pratpolis 106 km, and Delfinpolis 150 km.(DERMG)(A onde fica)Economic activitiesThe economy is based on services and agriculture, especially cattle raising for dairy production.  The region is famous for a type of stone called pedra mineira, and there are quarries for its mining.  Tourism, due to the Furnas reservoir, has been growing in recent years.  The GDP in 2005 was approximately R$58 million, with 30 million reais from services, 6 million reais from industry, and 17 million reais from agriculture.  There were 475 rural producers on 22,000 hectares of land.  69 farms had tractors (2006).  Approximately 1300 persons were occupied in agriculture.  The main crops are coffee, soybeans, and corn.  There were 18,000 head of cattle, of which 3,000 were milk cows (2006).(IBGE)There was one bank (2007).  In the vehicle fleet there were 1,797 automobiles, 122 trucks, 246 pickup trucks, 13 buses, and 741 motorcycles (2007).(IBGE)Health and educationIn the health sector there were 7 health establishments: 6 public clinics and 1 private hospital with 27 beds (2005).  Patients with more serious health conditions are transported to Passos.  Educational needs of 1,650 students were met by 7 primary schools, 1 middle school, and 4 pre-primary schools.(IBGE)*Municipal Development Index: 0.785 (2000)*State ranking: 96 out of 853 municipalities as of 2000*National ranking: 941 out of 5,138 municipalities as of 2000*Literacy rate: 89%*Life expectancy: 74 (average of males and females)(Frigoletto)In 2000 the per capita monthly income of R$252.00 was below the state average of R$276.00 and below the national average of R$297.00.  de Caldas had the highest per capita monthly income in 2000 with R$435.00.  The lowest was Setubinha with R$73.00.The highest ranking municipality in Minas Gerais in 2000 was de Caldas with 0.841, while the lowest was Setubinha with 0.568.  Nationally the highest was Caetano do Sul in So Paulo with 0.919, while the lowest was Setubinha.  In more recent statistics (considering 5,507 municipalities) Manari in the state of Pernambuco has the lowest rating in the country0,467putting it in last place.(Frigoletto)TourismTourism is very important and there are several hotels in the city.  The most important are the Balnerio do Lago Hotel, Cyrilos Palace Hotel, Hotel Capitlio, Hotel Escarpas do Lago, Hotel Fazenda Engenho da Serra, Hotel Minastur, and Laras Hotel.(Prefeitura municipal de Capitlio)Places to visit*Furnas Lake:  Created by the Furnas dam, the reservoir has an area of 1,440 km.   It is known as the Sea of Minas.*Praia Artificial de Capitlio:  The artificial beach lies in the city limits and has an area of 24,895.12 square meters.  It is on the Rio Piumhi and was inaugurated in 1988.  It has public bathrooms, a covered area for festivals, two sports courts, a covered court and an area for walking.  It is here where the carnival celebrations take place.*Cachoeira Lagoa Azul: It is located 31 km from the urban area.  There is clear water with natural pools.*Morro do Chapu: This is a mountain with an elevation of 1,293 meters.  On the top one can find a plateau with tropical vegetation and springs of water that form waterfalls as they descend the slopes.  There are still animals such as wolves, armadillos and tamandus.  From the heights one can see the immense lake below and the cities of Capitlio, Guap, Alpinpolis and Nova Barra.*Canyons: in Furnas Lake there are rock formations with a height of more than 20 meters.(Prefeitura municipal de Capitlio)See also* of municipalities in Minas GeraisReferences(External links*Prefeitura municipal de Capitlioeo:Capitlioit:Capitliomg:Capitlionl:Capitliono:Capitliopl:Capitlio(Minas Gerais)ro:Capitlio(-)vo:Capitliowar:Capitlio
19088009
Bougainvillean_presidential_election,_2008
Presidential elections were held in Bougainville (an autonomous region of New Guinea) from November 30 to December 18, 2008.() Voters elected the new of the Autonomous Region of Bougainville, following the death of President Kabui while in office, on June 7.The potential resumption of controversial mining activities, which were at the root of Bougainvilles civil war in the 1990s, was reportedly a key issue in this election.()The two main candidates appeared to be New Guineas former mining minister Akoitai and former rebel soldier Kaouna.(http://www.abc.net.au/news/stories/2008/12/05/2438890.htm) In total, 14 candidates stood in the election.()Tanis, a former separatist who came third in the 2005 election behind Kabui and the former governor Momis, won the election, as announced on 28 December 2008.() He was sworn in on 6 January 2009.()References
19102944
List_of_Cornish_dialect_words
This is a select list of Cornish dialect words in English--some of these terms are obsolete, but some are in current use.(Phillipps, K. C. (1993) A Glossary of the Cornish Dialect ISBN 0907018912)(Cornish dialect dictionary) Many Cornish dialect words have their origins in the language while others belong to the West Saxon group of dialects. The words listed are in some cases not exclusive to Cornwall and may be found in use in other western counties.__NOTOC__A*Addled - empty, cracked or broken*Aglets - hawthorn berries*Alt - cliff (a place-name element)*Arm - are em/arent they*Ay? - I beg your pardon?B*Backalong - in former times*Bal - mine*maiden - a woman working at a mine*Bar - (a place-name element) top*Bean - (a place-name element) little (vean when second element)*Berrin - funeral (burying)*Better fit - it would be better if...*Bobber lip - bruised and swollen lip*Bos - (a place-name element) homestead (older form also: bod) *Brae or Brer - Quite a lot*Brea - (a place-name element) hill (pronounced bray; in Bray Down spelled thus) *Bron - (a place-name element) hill *Browse - undergrowth*Bulhorns - snails*Bully - large pebble*Burd - (second person singular) bud as in buddy.*Burrow - heap of (usually) mining related waste, but sometimes used simply to mean pile*Buster - someone full of fun and mischief*Buzza - large salting pot, also found in phrase dafter than a buzza very daft*By - boy, (second person singular) like sirC*Caer - (a place-name element) stronghold or enclosure*Cakey - soft, feeble minded*Carn - (a place-name element) heap of stones *Catchpit - a place in the home where everything is dropped*Caunse - paved way*Chacking - thirsty*Chacks - cheeks*Cheel - child especially girl a boy or a cheel*Cheldern - children*Chirks - remnants of fire, embers; chirk burrows where used coal was found near mines*Chy - (a place-name element) house*Clacky - sticky and chewy food*Clip - sharp in speaking, curt, having taken offence*Cloam - crockery, pottery, earthenware.*Cos - (a place-name element) wood (also sometimes: quite, from old form coit)  *Crease - childrens truce term (west Cornwall) (Opie, Iona & Peter (1959) The Lore and Language of Schoolchildren. Oxford: Clarendon Press; map on p. 149) (from the Cornish word for peace)*Crib - a mid-morning break for a snack (see below also)(The Oxford English Dictionary (2nd ed.) has Food, provisions, light meal, etc. (dialectal) as one of the meanings of crib giving several examples including quotations from M. A. Courtneys Glossary (1880) and Rowses Cornish Childhood (1942).)*Croust (or Crowst) - a mid-morning break for a snack (usually west Cornwall)(In An Gerlyver Meur croust is given as meaning picnic lunch, meal taken to work, snack, and says it is attested in Origo Mundi, line 1901 (written in the 14th century). It also says it comes from Middle English crouste, which in turn came from Old French crouste. So it appears that the word was indeed a loan from Middle English but it was in use as part of the Cornish language long before the language died out, and seems to have entered the Anglo-Cornish dialect from the Cornish language.)*Cummas zon - come on, hurry up*Cundard - a drainD*Dag - short hatchet or axe (miners dag); also in phrase Face like a dag*Denner - dinner, evening meal*Dinas - (a place-name element) fort*Dishwasher - water-wagtail*Dobeck - somebody stupid (great dobeck)*Dreckley / Dreckly - at some point in the future; soon, but not immediately; like maana, but less urgent (derives from English directly but differs in meaning)*Dreckzel-  threshold of a doorway*Du - (a place-name element) black*Durns - door frameE*e - contraction of he but used in place of it*Ee - contraction of thee*Eeval - farmers fork implement*Emmet  - ant or more recently tourist (mildly derogatory)*Enys -  (a place-name element) island*Ess - yesF*Fains - childrens truce term (east Cornwall)(Opie, Iona & Peter (1959) The Lore and Language of Schoolchildren. Oxford: Clarendon Press; map on p. 149 & fains or fainites, p. 151)*Figgy hobbin - lump of dough, cooked with a handful of raisins (raisins being figs and figs broad raisins)*Fizzogg - face*Flam-new - brand new*Fly, Flies - hands of a dial or clock*Fitty - proper, properly*Fradge - repairG*Gad - a pick, especially a miners *Gelly - (a place-name element) copse*Giss on! - dont talk rubbish!*Grammersow - woodlouse*Greeb - (a place-name element) crest*Grushans - dregs, especially in bottom of tea cup *Gwidgee-gwee - a blister, often caused by a misdirected hammer blowH*Hayle (a place-name element) - (saltwater) estuary*Heller - Child who plays their parents up*Henting - raining hard (ees henting out there)J*Jowse - shake or rattleK*Kiddlywink - unlicensed beer shop*Knockers - Spirits that dwell underground L*Lan - (a place-name element) enclosure or monastic enclosure (in place-names usually the site of an early Christian cell though the meaning in Cornish is enclosure) *Larrups - rags, shreds, bits*Launder - guttering, originally a trough in tin mining*Lawn - a field*Laze - (a place-name element) green*Linhay - lean-to (of a building)*Louster - to work hard*Lowance out - to set limits financially (from allowance)M*Made/mehdy/Mehd - mate*Maen - (a place-name element) stone ((vaen when second element e.g. kistvaen)*Maid - girl, girl-friend (see also Bal maiden)*Maund - large basket*Mazed - mad, angry*Me ansum - friendly form of address*Meor - (a place-name element) great*Milky-dashel - milk thistle*Mind - remember*Minching - skiving minching off school *Murrian - (Cornish) ant or more recently a tourist. (Mainly west Cornwall) (cp. Emmet)N*Nans - (a place-name element) valley*Nip  - narrow path or short steep riseO*Oggy - pasty*Oss - HorseP*Padgypaw - a newt*Pard - friend (partner)*Party - a young woman*Pen - (a place-name element) headland or top*Piggy Widden -The runt of the litter*Pisky - pixie*Pilth - small balls found in over-rubbed cotton*Planching/Planchen - a wooden or planked floor*Pol - (a place-name element) pool or inlet*Porth - (a place-name element) cove or bay*Praze - (a place-name element) meadow or common*Proper - satisfactory; proper jobQ*Quilkin - frog (language word)*Quin - (a place-name element) whiteR*Red - (a place-name element) ford*Right on - an informal way of saying goodbye*Roar - weep loudly*Ros - (a place-name element) moor or heath (or peninsula, Roseland)*Ruan - (a place-name element) river*Rumped (up) - huddled up, usually from the cold; phrase rumped up like a winnardS*Sans - (a place-name element) holy (as in Pensans, Penzance)*Scat - to hit or break Scat abroad  Smashed up, musical beat (es two scats behind)*Shippon - farm building for livestock (derived from sheep pen)*Shram - chill (as in Shrammed as a winnard)*Slab - a Cornish range*Slock - to coax, entice or tempt slock un round*Some - very, extremely (e d look some wisht, tis some hot today)*Sowpig - woodlouse*Spence - larder in house; crowded  House full, spence full *Splatt - Patch of grass*Spriggan - spirit*Squall - to cry*Squallass, squallyass - crybaby*Stagged - Muddy*Steeved - frozen*Stripped Up - dressed appropriately*Stuggy - broad and sturdy (of a persons build)T*Teasy - bad-tempered*Tob - A piece of turf*Tol - (a place-name element) hole*Towan - sandhill or dune*Tre - (a place-name element) house or settlement (properly a farmstead)U*Upcountry - a generalised geographical term meaning anywhere which is in England, except for Cornwall and the Isles of Scilly.*Un - him/her (used in place of it accusative)*Urts - whortleberries, bilberriesV*Vau - (a place-name element) cave*Vellan - VilainW*Wasson - whats going on?*Wheal - (a place-name element) mine or shaft*Winnard - falcon*Wisht - hard-done-by, weak, faint, pale; e.g. Youre looking wisht today*Wilky (Quilkin) - a frogZ*Zackley - exactly*Zam-zoodled - half cooked or over cooked*Zawn - (a place-name element) chasmSee also* language* Cornish units of measurementReferences(*Richards, Mark (1974) Walking the North Cornwall Coastal Footpath. Gloucester: Thornhill Press ISBN 0 904110 12 5; p. 129 (source for the entries with (a place-name element))
19128114
List_of_Top_25_albums_for_1990_in_Australia
These are the Top 25 albums of 1990 in Australia from the Recording Industry Association (ARIA) End of Year Albums Chart.()(){| classwikitable|- ! # !! stylewidth:400px;|Title !! Artist!!  Highest pos. reached!! weeks at No. 1|-| 1. || Chain Reaction || Farnham || 1 || 5()|-| 2. || In Concert || Three Tenors || 1 || 2()|-| 3. || Sky Mining  || Oil || 1 || 2()|-| 4. || Fires || Barnes || 1 || 5()|-| 5. || Immaculate Collection || Madonna || 1 || 5groupnb|-| 6. || Woman || Soundtrack || 1 || 4()|-| 7. || All or Nothing || Vanilli || 1 || 5()|-| 8. || with the Past || John || 2 || |-| 9. || Myles || Myles || 2 || |-| 10. || Provider || Bolton || 1 || 3()|-| 11. || Both Ways || Estefan || 1 || 2()|-| 12. || Anniversary - Ultimate Collection || Clearwater Revival || 3 || |-| 13. || Safety in Numbers || Urlich || 5 || |-| 14. || Seriously || Collins || 1 || 3groupnb|-| 15. || Very Best of Elton John || John || 1 || 1groupnb|-| 16. || Fight Fate || Dayne || 7 || |-| 17. || The Razors Edge || AC/DC || 3 || |-| 18. || in Spinner || TV Soundtrack Knight & Jones || 4 || |-| 19. || Pump || Aerosmith || 1 || 3()|-| 20. || Your Girl || Abdul || 1 || 1()|-| 21. || Cafe de Wheels || Blakeley || 3 || |-| 22. || Best of Van Morrison || Morrison || 1 || 3()|-| 23. || Salvation || The Angels || 1 || 2()|-| 24. || Horses || Carlisle || 6 || |-| 25. || Thing || B-52s || 1 || 3(|}Peak chart positions from 1990 are from the Charts, overall position on the End of Year Chart is calculated by ARIA based on the number of weeks and position that the records reach within the Top 50 albums for each week during 1990.(Notes(References
19150873
FNX
FNX may refer to:* WFNX, an alternative rock radio station from Boston, Massachusetts* FNX Mining, a mining company based out of Toronto* Herstal FNX, a model of autoloading semi-automatic pistol available in various calibers
19161879
Frantiek_Gellner
thumb|rightFrantiek Gellner (19 June 1881  disappeared September 1914) was a Czech poet, short story writer, artist and anarchist.BiographyFrantiek Gellner was born to a poor Jewish family in Boleslav, Bohemia. His father was a seller and a keen socialist.( Lexikon esk literatury, vol.I, Academia, Praha 2000, pp.795797, 80-200-0797-0 and Slovnk eskch spisovatel, eskoslovensk spisovatel, Praha 1964, p.112 http://www.mzm.cz/mzm/osobnosti/frantisek_gellner.htm ) His student room above his fathers shop was the place of his first writing attempts  he covered the walls with his provocative poems and caricatures.( He studied at the gymnasium in Mlad Boleslav where he contributed to the student journals Lpa, Lucerna, Ple-Mle and Mld with poems, translations and drawings. He went to Vienna to study at the Polytechnic Institute but left after two years with just one exam in drawing. Gellners Bohemian lifestyle brought him to the anarchist movement.( His flat was searched several times by police.( Mgr. Vclav Trantina: Frantiek Gellner  student Bsk akademie v Pbrami, spisovatel a bsnk; Hornick muzeum Pbram http://slon.diamo.cz/hpvt/2004/T/T10_Trantina.htm ) He wrote to Nov kult journal. In 1901 he started studying at the Mining Academy in Pbram and often went to Prague to join anarchist parties with Neumann, Toman, rmek and Majerov. He started compulsory military service in 1904 but dropped out after a year. He went to Munich to study painting in 1905 and a year later to Paris where he drew caricatures for such journals as Rire, Cri de Paris, and Le temps nouveau. In 1908 he returned to Bohemia (his father was ill) and in 1909 went to Dresden and again to Paris. In 1911 he settled in Brno and started to work for noviny as a caricaturist and a reporter. At the beginning of War I Gellner was recruited to the army and went to Galicia.( The last report about him was that he was relaxing on a path between Zamo and Tomaszw.( On September 13, 1914 he was claimed missing and never found.( Poetry His first poems are full of irony in Heines style. His poem Patnct lahv koaku (Fifteen bottles of cognac) which he wrote at the age of 15 was published in vanda dudk journal (edited by Herrmann).( esk rozhlas 85 http://www.rozhlas.cz/ctenarskydenik/autori/_zprava/486003 ) In 1901 he published his first collection called Po ns a pijde potopa! (After Us Let the Floods Come!) in which he used especially sexual motifs without any embellishments.( The next collection Radosti ivota (Joys of Life) shifted the point of view from subject to object and throws the disbelief more on society. The rhythm of the poems is close to vaudeville verses or chansons.( Nov vere (New Verses, published posthumously in 1919) are not so pathetic as if seen from a distance with a lot of nonchalance.(  He also wrote satirical poems in Havlek Borovsks style which were published mostly in papers and journals.( He also illustrated Havleks Kest sv. Vladimra.(One of his best-known poems was published in Po ns a pijde potopa (1901):Another piece from the book Bsn z pozstalosti that is typical for Gellners Bohemian lifestyle begins with this strophe: References GellnerGellnerGellnerGellner
19180012
Cradle_(mining)
A cradle, or rocker, was a mechanical contrivance used in mining in the 19th century. It consisted of a box on rockers and moved by hand, and was used by miners to process gold-bearing soil, washing out the dirt and leaving the gold behind in the box. It does indeed resemble a childs cradle.It must be manipulated carefully, to prevent losing the gold. Although big, and difficult to move, the rocker can pick up double the gravel, and therefore more gold in one day than an ordinary gold mining pan.The rocker, like the pan, is used extensively in small-scale placer work, in sampling, and for washing sluice concentrates and material cleaned by hand from bedrock in other placer operations. One to three cubic yards, bank measure, can be dug and washed in a rocker per man-shift, depending upon the distance the gravel or water has to be carried, the character of the gravel, and the size of the rocker. Rockers are usually homemade and display a variety of designs. A favourite design consists essentially of a combination washing box and screen, a canvas or carpet apron under the screen, a short sluice with two or more riffles, and rockers under the sluice. The bottom of the washing box consists of sheet metal with holes about 1/2 inch in diameter punched in it, or a l/2-inch-mesh screen can be used. Dimensions shown are satisfactory but variations are possible. The bottom of the rocker should be made of a single wide, smooth board, which will greatly facilitate cleanups. The materials for building a rocker cost only a few dollars, depending mainly upon the source of lumber.References*
19193101
Baker_Street_and_Waterloo_Railway
The Baker Street and Waterloo Railway (BS&WR), also known as the Bakerloo tube, was a railway company established in 1893 that constructed a deep-level underground tube railway in London.(A tube railway is an underground railway constructed in a cylindrical tunnel by the use of a shield, usually deep below ground level.) Although construction began in 1898, the company struggled to fund the work and was then hit by the financial collapse in 1900 of its  parent company, the London & Globe Finance Corporation, through the fraud of its main shareholder, Wright. In 1902, the BS&WR became a subsidiary of the Electric Railways Company of London (UERL) controlled by American financier Yerkes. The UERL quickly raised the funds, mainly from foreign investors.When opened in 1906, the BS&WRs line served nine stations and ran completely underground in a pair of tunnels for  between its northern terminus at Street and its southern terminus at and Castle with a depot on a short spur nearby at London Road.(Length of line calculated from distances given at) Extensions between 1907 and 1913 took the northern end of the line to the terminus of the Western Railway (GWR) at Paddington. Between 1915 and 1917, it was further extended to Queens Park, where it came to the surface and connected with the and North Western Railway (LNWR), and to Watford; a total distance of .(Within the first year of opening it became apparent to the management and investors that the estimated passenger numbers for the BS&WR and the other UERL lines were over-optimistic. Despite improved integration and cooperation with the other tube railways and the later extensions, the BS&WR struggled financially.  In 1933, the BS&WR was taken into ownership along with the UERL. Today, the BS&WRs tunnels and stations operate as the Undergrounds line.EstablishmentOrigin, 189193In November 1891, notice was given of a private bill that would be presented to Parliament for the construction of the Baker Street and Waterloo Railway (BS&WR).() The railway was planned to run entirely underground from the junction of New Street (now Melcombe Street) and Dorset Square west of Baker Street to James Street (now Spur Road) on the south side of Waterloo station. From Baker Street, the route was to run eastwards beneath Road, then curve to the south under Park Crescent and follow Place, Langham Place and Street to Circus. It was then to run under Haymarket, Square and Avenue before passing under the Thames to Waterloo station. A decision had not been made between the use of cable haulage or electric traction as the means of pulling the trains.( The promoters of the BS&WR were motivated by the recent success of the and South London Railway (C&SLR), the worlds first deep-tube railway. This had opened in November 1890 and had seen large passenger numbers in its first year of operation.groupnote One of the benefits put forward by the railway company was its use by West End businessmen as a way to get quickly to Cricket Ground north of Baker Street after work for the last hour of play.Bills for three similarly inspired new underground railways were also submitted to Parliament for the 1892 session, and, to ensure a consistent approach, a Joint Select Committee was established to review the proposals. The committee took evidence on various matters regarding the construction and operation of deep-tube railways, and made recommendations on the diameter of tube tunnels, method of traction, and the granting of wayleaves. After rejecting the construction of stations on land owned by the Estate and the Duke of Portland between Circus and Baker Street, the Committee allowed the BS&WR bill to proceed for normal parliamentary consideration.The route was approved and the bill received Assent on 28 March 1893 as the Baker Street and Waterloo Railway Act, 1893.() Stations were permitted at Baker Street, Oxford Circus, Piccadilly Circus, Trafalgar Square, Embankment and Waterloo. The depot would have been at the south end of the line at James Street and Marsh.Search for finance, 18931903Although the company had permission to construct the railway, it still had to raise the capital for the construction works. The BS&WR was not alone; four other new tube railway companies were looking for investors  the and City Railway (W&CR), the Cross, Euston and Hampstead Railway (CCE&HR) and the Northern and City Railway (GN&CR) (the three other companies that had been put forward bills in 1892) and the Central London Railway (CLR, which had received assent in 1891).groupnote The original tube railway, the C&SLR, was also raising funds to construct extensions to its existing line. Only the W&CR, which was the shortest line and was backed by the and South Western Railway with a guaranteed dividend, was able to raise its funds without difficulty. For the BS&WR and the rest, and others that came later, much of the remainder of the decade saw a struggle to find finance in an uninterested market.File:Whitaker Wright 2.png|thumb|left|Mining speculator Wright who took over the BS&WR in 1897|altHead and shoulders caricature of heavy-set male with goatee beard, small round spectacles and bald head looking to rightLike most legislation of its kind, the act of 1893 imposed a time limit for the compulsory purchase of land and the raising of capital.(Time limits were included in such legislation to encourage the railway company to complete the construction of its line as quickly as possible. They also prevented unused permissions acting as an indefinite block to other proposals.) To keep the powers alive, the BS&WR announced a new bill in November 1895,() which included an application for an extension of time. The additional time was granted when the Baker Street and Waterloo Railway Act, 1896 received Royal Assent on 7 August 1896.()In November 1897, the BS&WR did a deal with the London & Globe Finance Corporation (L&GFC) a mining finance company operated by mining speculator Wright and chaired by Lord Dufferin. The L&GFC was to fund and manage the construction; taking any profit from the process. The cost of construction was estimated to be 1,615,000 (equivalent to approximately  today).() The L&GFC replaced the BS&WRs directors with its own and let construction contracts. Wright had made fortunes in America and Britain by promoting gold and silver mines and saw the BS&WR as a way of diversifying the L&GFCs holdings.In 1899, Wright fraudulently concealed large losses by one of the corporations mines by manipulating the accounts of various L&GFC subsidiary companies. Expenditure for the BS&WR was also high, with the L&GFC having paid-out approximately 650,000 ( today) by November 1900.(Expenditure is recorded as 654,705 10s 7d in a prospectus issued by the BS&WR in November 1900  ) In December 1900, Wrights fraud was discovered and the L&GFC and many of its subsidiaries collapsed.The BS&WR struggled on for a time, funding the construction work by making calls on the unpaid portion of its shares, but activity eventually came to a stop. In March 1902, Yerkes consortium came to the rescue of the BS&WR when it purchased the company for 360,000 plus interest ( today). American financier Yerkes, who had been lucratively involved in the development of Chicagos tramway system in the 1880s and 1890s, had come to London in 1900 and purchased a number of the struggling underground railway companies.groupnote The BS&WR became a subsidiary of the Electric Railways Company of London (UERL) which Yerkes had formed to raise funds to build the tube railways and to electrify the District Railway. The UERL was capitalised at 5 million with the majority of shares sold to overseas investors.groupnote Further share issues followed, which raised a total of 18 million by 1903 (equivalent to approximately  today) for use across all of the UERLs projects.groupnotePlanning the route, 18931904BS&WR bill, 1896While the BS&WR raised money, it continued to develop the plans for its route. The November 1895 bill sought powers to modify the planned route of the tunnels at the Baker Street end of the line and extend them approximately  beyond their previous end point at the south-eastern corner of Dorset Square to the south-eastern corner of Harewood Square.(Harewood Square was to be the site of station, the new London terminus of the Sheffield and Lincolnshire Railways extension from the Midlands then under construction.Approval for the extension and a new station at Marylebone were included in the Baker Street and Waterloo Railway Act, 1896.(New Cross & Waterloo Railway bill, 1898On 26 November 1897, details of a bill proposed for the 1898 parliamentary session were published by the New Cross and Waterloo Railway (NC&WR), an independent company promoted by James Heath MP, which planned two separate sections of tube line which would connect directly to the BS&WR; extending the line south-east from Waterloo and east from around Marylebone Road.()The southern of the NC&WRs two extensions was planned to connect with the BS&WR tunnels under Belvedere Road to the west of Waterloo station and head east under the mainline station to its own station under Sandell Street adjacent to Waterloo East station. The route was then planned to run under Waterloo Road, Georges Circus and London Road to and Castle. The route then followed Kent Road and Kent Road as far as the Brighton and South Coast Railways Old Kent Road station (closed in 1917). Intermediate stations were to be constructed at St Georges Circus, Elephant and Castle (where the NC&WR station would interchange with the C&SLRs station below ground and link to the London, Chatham and Dover Railways station above ground), in New Kent Road at Munton Road, at the junction of New Kent Road and Old Kent Road, and on Old Kent Road at the junctions with Mina Road, Bowles Road and Commercial Road (now Commercial Way). A power station was planned on the south side of Old Kent Road where it crossed the Surrey Canal (now filled-in) at the junction with St Jamess Road. This would have provided a delivery route for fuel and a source of water. Tunnels were also planned to connect the BS&WRs proposed depot at Waterloo to the NC&WRs route enabling trains to enter and exit in two directions.The NC&WRs other planned extension was to branch from the BS&WRs curve under Park Crescent. It was then to curve eastwards under Park and then run under Longford Street and Drummond Street to end at a station on the west side of Seymour Street (now Eversholt Street) under Euston station. An intermediate station was planned for the junction of Drummond Street and Hampstead Road.The bill was deposited in Parliament, but no progress was made in the 1898 session and it disappeared afterwards, although the BS&WR presented a modified version of the Euston branch in a bill for the 1899 session.BS&WR bill, 1899Construction work began in August 1898, although the BS&WR was continuing to develop new route plans. The bill for 1899, published on 22 November 1898, requested more time for the construction works and proposed two extensions to the railway and a modification to part of the previously approved route.() The first extension, like the NC&WRs plan from the year before, was to branch from the already approved route under Park Crescent, but then followed a more northerly route than the NC&WR, running under Park to cross the parks Outer Circle between Chester Road and Cumberland Gate where a station was to be constructed. The route then followed Cumberland Street West (now Nash Street), Market, Cumberland Street East and Edward Street (both now Varndell Street), before ending at a station under Cardington Street on the west side of Euston station.The second extension was to continue the line west from Marylebone; running under Great James Street and Bell Street (now both Bell Street) to Corlett Street then turning south to reach the Junction Canals Basin to the east of the GWRs Paddington station. A station was to be located directly under the east-west arm of the basin before the line turned north-west, running between the mainline station and the basin, before the two tunnels merged into one. The single tunnel was then to turn north-east, passing under the Canal to the east of Little Venice, before coming to the surface where a depot was to be built on the north side of Blomfield Road. The BS&WR also planned a power station at Paddington. The final change to the route was a modification at Waterloo to move the last section of the line southwards to end under Addington Street.The Railway (MR), Londons first underground railway which had been operating between Paddington and Euston over the northern section of the Inner Circle since 1863,(The Metropolitan Railway opened on 10 January 1863, running in a mainly and cover tunnel dug under the road between Paddington and Farringdon. By 1899, it had been extended far out into Middlesex, Hertfordshire and Buckinghamshire.) saw the BS&WRs two northern extensions as competition for its own service and strongly objected. Parliament accepted the objections; when the Baker Street and Waterloo Railway Act, 1899 received Royal Assent on 1 August 1899, only the extension of time and the route change at Waterloo were approved()BS&WR bill, 1900In November 1899, the BS&WR announced a bill for the 1900 session.() Again, an extension was proposed from Marylebone to Paddington, this time terminating to the east of the mainline station at the junction of Bishops Road (now Bishops Bridge Road) and Gloucester Terrace. A station was planned under Bishops Road, linked to the mainline station by a subway under Eastbourne Terrace. From Waterloo, an extension was planned to run under Bridge Road and Georges Road to terminate at Elephant and Castle. The BS&WR would connect there to the CS&LRs station as the NC&WR had planned two years earlier. A spur was to be provided to a depot and power station that were to be constructed on the site of the School for the Indigent Blind south of St Georges Circus.The Paddington extension was aligned to allow a westward extension to continue to Royal Oak or Willesden, areas already served by the MR, which again opposed the plans. This time, the BS&WR was successful and Royal Assent for the extensions was granted in the Baker Street and Waterloo Railway Act, 1900 on 6 August 1900.()Minor changes, 190204To make up for the time lost following the collapse of the L&GFC and to restore the BS&WRs finances, the company published a bill in November 1901, which sought another extension of time and permission to change its funding arrangements.() The bill was approved as the Baker Street and Waterloo Railway Act, 1902 on 18 November 1902.()For the 1903 parliamentary session, the UERL announced bills for the BS&WR and its other tube railways, seeking permission to merge the three companies by transferring the BS&WRs and CCE&HRs powers to the Northern, Piccadilly and Brompton Railway (GNP&BR). The BS&WR bill also included requests for a further extension of time and for powers to compulsorily purchase land for an electrical sub-station at Lambeth.() The merger was rejected by parliament, but the land purchase and extension of time were permitted separately in the Baker Street and Waterloo Railway Act, 1903 and the Baker Street and Waterloo Railway (Extension of Time) Act, 1903, both given assent on 11 August 1903.()For the 1904 parliamentary session, the BS&WR bill, sought permission to add new stations at Lambeth, Regents Park and Edgware Road.() The new stations were permitted in the Baker Street and Waterloo Railway Act, 1904 given assent on 22 July 1904.()Construction, 18981906Construction commenced in August 1898 from a substantial temporary pier erected in the River Thames near Bridge. Caissons were sunk into the river bed from which the tunnels were constructed in each direction using shields operated in an atmosphere of compressed air to prevent water leaking into the excavations. Occasionally air escaped through the river bed causing water spouts in the river. The tunnel linings were formed from cast iron segments  inch (2.22 cm) thick, which locked together to form a ring with an internal diameter of . Once a ring was completed, grout was injected through holes in the segments to fill any voids between the outside edge of the ring and the excavated ground beyond, reducing subsidence.File:Oxford Circus tube station - Bakerloo line entrance.jpg|thumb|220px|left|Oxford Circus station, an example of the Green design used for the BS&WRs stations|altA corner view showing both elevations of a red glazed terracotta building. The first storey above ground features two wide, storey height semi-circular windows on each elevation above which is a dentil cornice. Below the windows, the station name, Oxford Circus, is displayed in gold lettering moulded into the terracotta panels. Above the first two storeys the building has been extended as offices with an ornate Portland stone faade.By November 1899 the northbound tunnel had reached Trafalgar Square and work on some of the station sites had been started, but the collapse of the L&GFC in 1900 led to works gradually coming to a halt. When the UERL was constituted in April 1902, 50 per cent of the tunnelling and 25 per cent of the station work had been completed.() With funds in place, work restarted and proceeded at a rate of  per week, so that by February 1904 virtually all of the tunnels and underground parts of the stations between Elephant & Castle and Marylebone were complete and works on the station buildings were under way.() The additional stations were incorporated as work continued elsewhere and Oxford Circus station had to be altered below ground following a of Trade inspection, but, at the end of 1905, the first test trains began running on the system. Although the BS&WR had permission to continue to Paddington, no work was undertaken beyond Edgware Road.The BS&WR used a Westinghouse automatic signalling system operated through electrified circuits. This controlled signals based on the presence or absence of a train on the track ahead. Signals incorporated an arm that was raised when the signal was red. If a train failed to stop at a red signal, the arm would activate a tripcock on the train; applying the brakes automatically.Stations were provided with surface buildings designed by architect Green in the UERL house-style. This consisted of two-storey steel-framed buildings faced with red glazed terracotta blocks, with wide semi-circular windows on the upper floor.(Trafalgar Square and Regents Park stations were built with subway access from the street instead of surface buildings. Waterloo station was provided with a simple archway entrance in the UERL style without the normal station building.) Except for Embankment, which had a sloping passageway down to the platforms, each station was provided with between two and four lifts and an emergency spiral staircase in a separate shaft.groupnote At platform level, the wall tiling featured the station name and an individual geometric pattern and colour scheme designed by Green.OpeningThe official opening of the BS&WR by Sir Edwin Cornwall, chairman of the County Council, took place on 10 March 1906. Shortly after the lines opening, the London Evening News coined the abbreviated name Baker-loo, which quickly caught-on and began to be used officially from July 1906, appearing on contemporary maps of the tube lines.()The railway had stations at:*Baker Street*Regents Park*Oxford Circus*Piccadilly Circus*Trafalgar Square (now Charing Cross)*Embankment*Waterloo*Kennington Road (later Westminster Bridge Road, now Lambeth North)*Elephant & Castle, opened 5 August 1906The section to Edgware Road was completed and brought into service in two stages:*Great Central (now Marylebone),groupnote on 27 March 1907*Edgware Road, on 15 June 1907While construction was being finished, trains operated out of service beyond Baker Street; reversing at a crossover to the east of the station under construction at Marylebone.Rolling StockThe service was provided by a fleet of 108 carriages manufactured for the UERL in the United States by the Car and Foundry Company and assembled in Manchester. The carriages operated as multiple unit trains without the need for separate locomotives. Passengers boarded and left the trains through folding lattice gates at each end of cars; these gates were operated by Gate-men who rode on an outside platform and announced station names as trains arrived. The design was subsequently used for the GNP&BR and the CCE&HR, and became known on the Underground as the 1906 stock or Gate stock. Trains for the line were stabled at the London Road depot south of Kennington Road station.(Trains entered service by running north into Kennington Road station.)Co-operation and consolidation, 190610Despite the UERLs success in financing and constructing the railway, its opening did not bring the financial success that had been expected. In the Bakerloo Tubes first twelve months of operation it carried 20.5 million passengers, less than sixty per cent of the 35 million that had been predicted during the planning of the line. The UERLs pre-opening predictions of passenger numbers for its other new lines proved to be similarly over-optimistic, as did the projected figures for the newly electrified MDR  in each case, numbers achieved only around fifty per cent of their targets.groupnoteThe lower than expected passenger numbers were partly due to competition between the tube and sub-surface railway companies, but the introduction of electric trams and motor buses, replacing slower, horse-drawn road transport, took a large number of passengers away from the trains. The problem was not limited to the UERL; all of Londons seven tube lines and the sub-surface MDR and Metropolitan Railway were affected to some degree. The reduced revenues generated from the lower passenger numbers made it difficult for the UERL and the other railways to pay back the capital borrowed, or to pay dividends to shareholders.From 1907, in an effort to improve their finances, the UERL, the C&SLR, the CLR and the GN&CR began to introduce fare agreements. From 1908, they began to present themselves through common branding as the Underground. The W&CR was the only tube railway that did not participate in the arrangement as it was owned by the mainline L&SWR.The UERLs three tube railway companies were still legally separate entities, with their own management, shareholder and dividend structures. There was duplicated administration between the three companies and, to streamline the management and reduce expenditure, the UERL announced a bill in November 1909 that would merge the Bakerloo, the Hampstead and the Piccadilly Tubes into a single entity, the London Electric Railway (LER), although the lines retained their own individual branding.()(The merger was carried out by transferring the assets of the BS&WR and the CCE&HR to the GNP&BR and renaming the GNP&BR as the London Electric Railway.) The bill received assent on 26 July 1910 as the London Electric Railway Amalgamation Act, 1910.()ExtensionsPaddington, 190613Having planned a westward extension in 1900 to Willesden Junction, the company had been unable to decide on a route beyond Paddington and had postponed further construction while it considered options. In November 1905, the BS&WR announced a bill for 1906 that replaced the route from Edgware Road to Paddington approved in 1900 with a new alignment.() This had the tunnels crossing under the Paddington basin with the station under London Street. The tunnels were to continue south-east beyond the station as sidings, to end under the junction of Grand Junction Road and Devonport Street (now Sussex Gardens and Sussex Place). The changes were permitted in the Baker Street and Waterloo Railway Act, 1906 on 4 August 1906,() but the south-east alignment did not represent a suitable direction to continue the railway and no effort was made to construct the extension.In 1908, the Bakerloo Tube attempted to make the hoped for extension into north-west London using the existing powers of the West London Railway (NWLR), an unbuilt tube railway with permission to build a line from Cricklewood to Victoria station. The NWLR announced a bill in November 1908 seeking to construct a  connection between its unbuilt route beneath the Edgware Road and the Bakerloo Tubes Edgware Road station.() The NWLR route to Victoria was to be abandoned south of the connection and the Bakerloo Tubes planned route to Paddington was to be built as a shuttle line from Edgware Road, which was to be provided with two additional platforms for shuttle use. The Bakerloo Tube was to construct the extension and operate the service over the combined route, which was to have stations at St Johns Wood Road, Abercorn Place, Belsize Road, (close to the LNWR station), Brondesbury (to interchange with the North London Railways station and close to the MRs Kilburn station), Minster Road and Cricklewood. The Bakerloo Tube announced its own bill to make the necessary changes to its existing plans.()The GWR objected to the reduction of the Bakerloo Tubes Paddington connection to a shuttle and the MR objected to the connection of the two lines which would be in competition with its line through Kilburn. Parliament rejected the proposed connection and the changes to the NWLRs route and the companys permissions eventually expired without any construction work being carried out. The Bakerloo Tube bill was withdrawn.In November 1910, the LER (of which the Bakerloo Tube was now part), revived plans for the Paddington extension when it published a bill for the 1911 parliamentary session.() The new route, ran , in a tight curve from Edgware Road station; initially heading south before turning to the north-west, which provided a more practical direction for a future extension. The bill was supported by the GWR with funding of 18,000. The London Electric Railway Act, 1911 received Royal Assent on 2 June 1911.() Construction started in August 1911,() and was completed in a little over two years. The extension opened on 1 December 1913, with the single new station at Paddington. Following their successful introduction at Earls Court in 1911, the station was the first on the line to be designed to use escalators instead of lifts.Queens Park and Watford, 191117In 1907, the LNWR obtained parliamentary permission to improve its mainline services into London by the construction of a pair of new, electrified tracks alongside its existing line between Watford Junction in Hertfordshire and Queens Park, Kilburn and a new tube section beneath its lines from there to its terminus at Euston. At Euston, the tube tunnel was to end with an underground station located on a  long loop beneath the mainline station.The LNWR began construction work on the surface section of the new tracks in 1909. By 1911, it had modified the plans to omit the underground section and to split its proposed electrified services into three. The first section was to follow the existing surface route into Euston on newly electrified tracks, the second section was to connect with the North London Railways tracks at Farm and continue on electrified tracks from there to Broad Street station in the of London. The third section involved the extension of the Bakerloo Tube from Paddington to Queens Park.park tube station.jpg|thumb|left|220px|Kilburn Park station, with the red glazed terracotta faade of the earlier buildings, but without the upper storey|altSingle storey red glazed terracotta station building with tall arched windows. Glass shaded lamps project from the faade on ornate brackets and the words, Kilburn Park, Entrance, Exit and Underground are displayed in black on a white moulded tile band above the window arches.With the extension to Paddington still under construction, the LER published a bill in November 1911 for the continuation to Queens Park.() The extension was to continue north from Paddington, running past Little Venice, to Maida Vale before curving north-west to Kilburn and then west to parallel the LNWR main line, before coming to the surface a short distance to the east of Queens Park station. Three intermediate stations were to be provided: on Warwick Avenue at the junction with Warrington Avenue, Clifton Villas and Clifton Gardens, at the junction of Elgin and Randolph Avenues (named Maida Vale) and on Cambridge Avenue (named Kilburn Park). The LNWR gave a 1 million loan to the LER at 4% interest in perpetuity to help finance the extension. The bill received Assent on 7 August 1912 as the London Electric Railway Act, 1912.()Progress on the section from Paddington to Queens Park was slowed by the start of World War I, so the line was not finished until early 1915. As at Paddington, the three below ground stations were built to use escalators. Maida Vale and Kilburn Park were provided with buildings in the style of the earlier Leslie Green stations but without the upper storey; no longer required for housing lift gear. Warwick Avenue was accessed from a subway under the street. The LNWR rebuilt Queens Park station with additional platforms for the Bakerloo Tubes and its own electric services and constructed two train sheds for rolling stock, one each side of the station.Although the tracks were completed to Queens Park, delays to the completion of the stations caused the extension to open in stages:*Warwick Avenue, on 31 January 1915*Maida Vale, on 6 June 1915*Kilburn Park, on 31 January 1915*Queens Park, on 11 February 1915North of Queens Park, the LNWR had opened its new lines between Willesden Junction and Watford during 1912 and 1913, together with new stations at Harlesden, Stonebridge Park, North Wembley, Kenton and Headstone Lane. The new tracks between Queens Park and Willesden Junction opened on 10 May 1915, when Bakerloo Tube services were extended there. On 16 April 1917, the tube service was extended to Watford Junction. North of Queens Park, the Bakerloo Tube served the following stations:Lane stn building.JPG|thumb|230px|Headstone Lane station, an example of the new stations built by the LNWR for the electric service|altA small single-storey red brick building with cream stone window surrounds, mullions and transoms. An awning projects above the doorway and a slated pitched roof is topped with two finials.*Kensal Green*Willesden Junction*Harlesden*Stonebridge Park*Wembley for Sudbury (now Wembley Central)*North Wembley*Kenton*Harrow & Wealdstone*Headstone Lane*Pinner & Hatch End (later Hatch End for Pinner, now Hatch End)*Carpenders Park, opened 5 May 1919*Bushey & Oxhey (now Bushey)*Watford High Street*Watford JunctionFor the extension to Queens Park, the LER supplemented the existing rolling stock with 14 new carriages ordered from Traction and Forge Company plus spare Gate stock carriages from the GNP&BR. These carriages, the 1914 stock, were the first to have doors in the sides of the carriages as well as the ends. For the longer extension to Watford, the LER and the LNWR ordered 72 new tube carriages from the Metropolitan Railway Carriage and Wagon Company. Manufacture of this rolling stock was delayed by the war, and, while it was waiting for delivery, the Bakerloo Tube used spare 1915 stock carriages ordered for an unfinished extension of the CLR to Ealing Broadway and more spare Gate stock carriages from the GNP&BR. Delivery of the carriages for the Watford service, known as the Watford Joint stock because ownership was shared with the LNWR, began in 1920; they were painted in the LNWRs livery to distinguish them from trains operating only on the Bakerloo Tubes tracks.Camberwell and south-east LondonThe southern termination of the line at Elephant & Castle always presented the opportunity for the line to be extended further, to serve Camberwell and other destinations in south-east London. In 1913, the Mayor of London announced a proposal for the Bakerloo Tube to be extended to Crystal Palace via Green, Dulwich and Hill, but nothing was done to implement the plan. In 1921, the LER costed an extension to Camberwell, Dulwich and Sydenham and, in 1922, plans for an extension to Orpington via Loughborough Junction and Catford were considered. In 1928, a route to Green via Dulwich was suggested. Again, no action was taken, although the and Home Counties Traffic Advisory Committee approved an extension to Camberwell in 1926.In 1931, an extension to Camberwell was approved as part of the London Electric Metropolitan District and Central London Railway Companies (Works) Act, 1931.()() The route was to follow Road and Road south from Elephant and Castle, with stations at Albany Road and under Denmark Hill road at Camberwell. Elephant & Castle station was also to be reconstructed with a third platform, a new ticket hall and escalators. Financial constraints prevented any work from being started.Improvements, 191428Circus ticket hall.JPG|thumb|230px|The circular concourse at Piccadilly Circus station|altView of part of circular concourse with cream tiled floor, coffered flat ceiling and travertine stone walls. Faceted orange columns support bronze light fittings.Overcrowding was a major problem at many stations where interchanges were available with other Underground lines and efforts were made in a number of places to improve passenger movements. In 1914, work was carried out to provide larger ticket halls and install escalators at Oxford Circus, Embankment and Baker Street. In 1923, further work at Oxford Circus provided a combined Bakerloo and CLR ticket hall and added more escalators serving the CLR platforms. In 1926, Trafalgar Square and Waterloo received escalators, the latter in conjunction with expansion of the station as part of the CCE&HRs extension to Kennington. Between 1925 and 1928, Piccadilly Circus station saw the greatest reconstruction. A large circular ticket hall was excavated below the road junction with multiple subway connections from points around the Circus and two flights of escalators down to the Bakerloo and Piccadilly platforms were installed.Move to public ownership, 192333Despite closer co-operation and improvements made to the Bakerloo stations and to other parts of the network,groupnote the Underground railways continued to struggle financially. The UERLs ownership of the highly profitable General Omnibus Company (LGOC) since 1912 had enabled the UERL group, through the pooling of revenues, to use profits from the bus company to subsidise the less profitable railways.groupnote However, competition from numerous small bus companies during the early 1920s eroded the profitability of the LGOC and had a negative impact on the profitability of the whole UERL group.To protect the UERL groups income, its chairman Lord Ashfield lobbied the government for regulation of transport services in the London area. Starting in 1923, a series of legislative initiatives were made in this direction, with Ashfield and Labour County Councillor (later MP and Minister of Transport) Morrison, at the forefront of debates as to the level of regulation and public control under which transport services should be brought. Ashfield aimed for regulation that would give the UERL group protection from competition and allow it to take substantive control of the LCCs tram system; Morrison preferred full public ownership. After seven years of false starts, a bill was announced at the end of 1930 for the formation of the Passenger Transport Board (LPTB), a public corporation that would take control of the UERL, the Metropolitan Railway and all bus and tram operators within an area designated as the London Passenger Transport Area.()  The Board was a compromise  public ownership but not full nationalisation  and came into existence on 1 July 1933. On this date, the LER and the other Underground companies were liquidated.Legacy:For a history of the line after 1933 see lineThe plan for the extension to Camberwell was kept alive throughout the 1930s and, in 1940, the permission was used to construct sidings beyond Elephant & Castle. After the Second World War, the plans were revised again, with stations located under Walworth Road and Camberwell Green, and the extension appeared on tube maps in 1949.() Rising construction costs caused by difficult ground conditions and restricted funds in the post-war austerity period, led the scheme to be cancelled again in 1950. Various proposals have been evaluated since, including an extension to Peckham considered in the early 1970s, but the costs have always out-weighed the benefits.One of the LPTBs first acts in charge of the Bakerloo line was the opening of a new station at South Kenton on 3 July 1933. As part of the LPTBs Works Programme announced in 1935, new tube tunnels were constructed from Baker Street to the former MR station at Finchley Road and the Bakerloo line took over the stopping service to Wembley Park and the MRs Stanmore branch. The service opened in November 1939 and remained part of the Bakerloo line until 1979 when it transferred to the line.The Bakerloo lines Watford service frequency was gradually reduced and, from 1965 ran only during rush hours. In 1982, the service beyond Stonebridge Park was ended as part of the fall-out of the cancellation of the GLCs Fares Fair subsidies policy. A peak hours service was restored to Harrow & Wealdstone in 1984 and a full service was restored in 1989.Notes and referencesNotesReferencesBibliography******External links* London Transport Museum Photographic Archive  Bakerloo Tube imagesStreet & Waterloo Railway
19206244
Lake_City,_Nevada_County,_California
footnotes                 Lake City (originally Painesville) is an unincorporated community in Nevada County, California, States, east of Columbia, California and west of Bloomfield, CaliforniaGeographyLake City, near the South River, is located at 39.35861N, -120.94056W, and the elevation is  above level.()HistoryThe town was settled in 1853 as a result of the Gold Rush and subsequent mining at Malakoff Diggins.() Within four years, more than 300 people lived in town. A hotel was built in 1855.() The name was bestowed in 1857.(In 1877, it was included on the route of the worlds long-distance telephone line.()By 1880, the population had dropped to 100.()ReferencesExternal links*Photo, 1954
19224105
William_O._Hotchkiss
For the Distinguished Service Cross recipient, see Hotchkiss (United States Army).William Otis Hotchkiss (September 17, 1878- June 20, 1954) was the third president of Technological University and the tenth president of Polytechnic Institute.() BiographyHe was born in Claire, Wisconsin on September 17, 1878. He earned a geology degree in 1903, a engineering degree in 1908 and a Ph.D. in 1916, all from the of WisconsinMadison.(William O. Hotchkiss)He served as state geologist in Wisconsin from 1909 to 1925. He wrote publications including Rural Highways of Wisconsin, Limestone Road Materials of Wisconsin, and Geological and Road Map of Wisconsin and served on several state and federal geology committees, as well as president of the of American State Geologists.(History of the Wisconsin Geological and Natural History Survey: Part 2) The Wisconsin state highway commission was created during his tenure and he served on it between 1911-1925.(Takes R.P.I. Post Tuesday, New York Times, September 1, 1935) In 1925, he was appointed president of the Michigan Mining School. During his tenure, the school added programs in chemical, civil, electrical and mechanical engineering and a program in forestry.(MichiganTech History) In 1927, the school changed its name to the Michigan College of Mining and Technology and is now known as Michigan Technological University.(Michigan Tech Magazine, December 2005)In 1935, he was appointed president of Rensselaer. In 1943, he retired at the age of 65 but remained president emeritus. He died on June 20, 1954.                                                                        References
19235703
Ariconium
Ariconium was a road station of Britain mentioned in Iter XIII of the Iter Britanniarum of the Antonine Itineraries. It was located at Bury Hill in the parish of under Penyard, about  east of on Wye, Herefordshire, and about  southeast of Hereford. The site existed prior to the Roman era, and then came under Roman control.  It was abandoned, perhaps shortly after 360, but precisely when and under what circumstances is unknown.Discovered as a result of efforts to map the stations of the Antonine Itineraries, research and excavation have provided the only information on its history, to date showing it to have been a place of bloom furnaces, forges, and iron working throughout its existence. Context The of Dean and nearby areas were an ancient source of ore and charcoal. There is evidence of early mining and smelting, and there were many sites consisting of groups of forges.() The site of Ariconium was on the rise of a hill, where airflow is increased due to the terrain. This favoured the establishment of bloomeries, an ancient process that produced imperfect iron, together with cinders, dirt, and unreduced oxide. A Roman contribution was the use of bellows, causing an air blast that was hotter and produced better but unforgeable iron, requiring a further refining by reheating, and using a great deal of charcoal. The cinder refuse or scoriae was dumped in great piles at such sites.()    Discovery of the siteIn the early years of serious research into the locations of stations on the Antonine Itineraries, the location of Ariconium was in doubt, and Camden (1551&ndash;1623) suggested Magnis, the site of modern Kenchester, some  northwest of modern Hereford. Later analysis of the Antonine Itineraries, notably by John Horsley (1685&ndash;1732), refined previous estimates and ultimately placed Ariconium at Bury Hill, Weston under Penyard,   west-northwest of Glevum (at modern Gloucester), and  northeast of Blestium (at modern Monmouth). With confidence that the overgrown ruins near Weston under Penyard were actually the site of Ariconium, local people began clearing away the brush, revealing the enormous magnitude of the cinder piles, and further revealing the walls of buildings. Stories emerged of significant Roman-era relics, and there were unverified stories that existing relics having no provenance had actually been found in Ariconium.()() Such capable modern research as has been done so far supports the characterisation of a large iron working site with massive refuse piles covering approximately , pottery remnants, and numerous artifacts.()()()  Finds have included pre-Roman British coins, including one minted by Cunobelin, and  coins from the Roman arrival until 360, after which there are no coins found.( History The site was occupied by the pre-Roman Britons, likely as part of an iron working industry.  It was continually occupied throughout the Roman era, and the scale of industrial activity increased over the period.  It is clear that there was a focus of settlement activity near Bromsash, but the area appears to some archaeologists to have contained dispersed centres of activity and settlement rather than a Roman town.( Ariconiums only documented significance is as a station on Iter XIII of the Iter Britanniarum, with the single mention there( Britannia, Iter XIII) being its only mention in classical history.  It seems to have been abandoned shortly after 360. Its sudden abandonment is consistent with a violent end, and may be related to the collapse of authority and widespread marauding at that time, as reported by Ammianus, a situation that lasted for almost a decade, and from which parts of Britain never recovered. Evidence of later occupation of the site has not been found. The name The origin of the name Ariconium is uncertain, as is its pre-Roman name. The Romans often named a place in recognition of some feature of the terrain, or in recognition of the people then living in the area. There is a similarity to other Roman place-names such as Viroconium (post-Roman Welsh: Caer Guricon), also known as Uriconium, but as yet no established connection to them.It is generally believed that Ariconium is the origin of the name of the post-Roman kingdom of Ergyng, although Ariconium was located outside the later boundaries of Ergyng. It is plausible that both derive from an earlier name for a wider area.  In turn, Ergyng is believed to have given its name to Archenfield.()()()Since 2008, it has been used as the generic name for an united benefice of six Church of England parishes in the area - Aston Ingham, Hope Mansel, Lea, Linton, Upton Bishop and Weston-under-Penyard. In literature As with many other places in Britain, there have been speculative articles written that connect Ariconium to the characters in Arthurian tales. Some are careful with their wording and state that they are not asserting historical facts;( (for example)) others are less careful and propagate fiction in the guise of hypothesis.There are occasional mentions of Ariconium in poetic works,( (for example)) but there is nothing to connect them with the Ariconium of this article. They may be references to Kenchester at a time when Camden placed the site there, or to a similar-sounding word such as Uriconium, or to some other place or person; or as works of poetry, they may refer to nothing in particular at all. References Bibliography******* (HTML version of the proprietary Microsoft doc format, which is available here)**Notes
19247735
William_R._Boggs
William Robertson Boggs (March 18, 1829 &ndash; September 11, 1911) was a general in the States Army during the Civil War. He was noted as a engineer who constructed the military fortifications that protected some of the Confederacys most important seaports.Early life and careerBoggs was born in Georgia. Comparatively little is known of his early youth, but it is known he studied at the Augusta Academy.(Boggs, p. ix.) Two of his brothers would also serve in the Confederate Army. They spent their summers at the Sand Hills near what is now South Carolina, a popular tourist resort. At the age of twenty in July 1849, he entered the States Military Academy at West Point as a cadet from Georgia. He graduated four years later among the first five in his class. Among Boggs classmates were B. McPherson, H. Sheridan, and M. Schofield, later Union generals, and B. Hood of the Confederate service.On graduation he was brevetted as a second lieutenant and assigned to the Topographical Bureau. He spent some time in the office of the Pacific Railroad Surveys. In 1854 he was transferred to the Ordnance Corps and was made assistant at the Arsenal in New York. In December of the same year he became second lieutenant and in 1856 he was promoted to the rank of first lieutenant. While at Watervliet Arsenal, on December 19, 1855, he married Mary Sophia, daughter of Col. John Symington, the commandant. To them were born five children&ndash;William R., Jr., a mining engineer who was murdered in Mexico in 1907; Elizabeth McCaw, John Symington, Edith Allston,and Henry Patterson Boggs.(Boggs, pp. xxii-xxiii.) (For some unknown reason a sixth child, Archibald Boggs (18601881) was omitted from the biographical data published for General Boggs.)In 1857 Boggs was transferred to the Louisiana Arsenal at Rouge, Louisiana. In 1859 he became inspector of ordnance at Point Isobel, Texas. On December 14, 1859, he took part in an engagement with Cortinos Mexican marauders near Brown, for which he was given honorable mention by General Scott. Soon after, he was transferred to the Alleghany Arsenal at Pennsylvania, to which his father-in-law Colonel Symington had also been assigned.(Boggs, p. xi.)Civil War serviceBoggs resigned from the U.S. Army the very day that the Georgia Convention adopted its of secession.(Boggs, p. xii.) However, his father-in-law stayed in the Federal service. Early in the war, Boggs was appointed by Governor E. Brown as the purchasing agent to procure arms, ammunition, and supplies for Georgias state troops. Later, in the Provisional Confederate Army, Boggs duties were again as an engineer and ordnance officer, given primarily to staff duty for such officers as Bragg. He was never given the command of troops in combat, although he commanded all engineers and artillery in Florida. His major accomplishments were to pefect and complete fortifications and supply depots in 1861 (including the defenses of South Carolina, and Pensacola); to engineer Smiths invasion of Kentucky in 1862; and to assist Smiths military administration west of the River from 1863 to 1865.(Boggs, pp. xii-xiii.)In 1862, he was appointed Colonel, Chief Engineer of the State of Georgia. In recognition of his efforts in constructing the fortifications that defended Georgia, one of the earthworks was named Fort Boggs. During the Kentucky campaign, Colonel Boggs, by then back in the Confederate national service, won the confidence of his superiors. On General Kirby Smiths recommendation, he was promoted to the rank of brigadier general and became Chief of Staff under him in the Department in the spring of 1863.(Boggs, p. xix.) Late in the war, Boggs resigned after a quarrel with Smith. For a short time thereafter, he commanded the District of Louisiana, but was soon superseded by Brig. Gen. T. Hays and he subsequently awaited orders at Louisiana.Early in 1865 he enlisted in an expedition to enter military service in Mexico. Finding that the purpose of its leaders was to fight for Maximilian, rather than Juarez, he withdrew his name and returned to the Confederate army. With the collapse of the Confederate armies in the East, Kirby Smith moved his headquarters to Texas. The surrender of his army was made by Smiths subordinates, in which General Boggs participated, the parole of Boggs being dated June 9, 1865.(Boggs, p. xxi.)Postbellum careerAfter the war, Boggs engaged in the profession of engineering, participating to a great extent in railroad construction in the West. In 1875 he was appointed Professor of Mechanics in the Polytechnic Institute at Blacksburg, a position he held until a reorganization of the faculty in 1881. One of his colleagues wrote, He was highly valued by his associates as a man of force and culture; was esteemed by the student body as an attractive and honest teacher; by the people of the community as an upright, genial, agreeable gentleman. Politics was alone responsible for his removal.(Boggs, p. xxii.) The later years of his life were spent in North Carolina, where he died at the age of eighty-two. He was buried in Salem Cemetery.(Find A Grave)One of his nephews, Major Butt, perished in the sinking of the British cruise liner, RMS Titanic.(Boggs, p. viii.)See also*List of American Civil War generalsNotesReferences* Boggs, William R., Military Reminiscences of Gen. Wm. R. Boggs, C.S.A. Durham, North Carolina: The Seeman Printery, 1913.External links*Military Reminiscences of Gen. Wm. R. Boggs, C.S.A. Durham, N.C.: The Seeman Printery, 1913.*Robertson Boggs
19261726
Freinet_classification
The Freinet classification (To organise everything) is used in the libraries of some schools, and was invented by Freinet (Education Through Work: A Model for Child-centered LearningBy Clestin Freinet,  John SivellTranslated by John SivellPublished by Edwin Mellen Press, 1993ISBN 0-7734-9303-4, 978-0-7734-9303-2) to facilitate the easy finding of documents, and the use of the de Travail.The principles are simple: Everything is split into 12 major divisions. 12 subdivisions along the principles of the decimal system are then divided into 10, and then 10 again.Because of its logical classifications based on school work, this classification is seen by some educators (Titles in series: A handbook for librarians and studentsBy Eleanora A. BaerPublished by Scarecrow Press, 19641530 page) to be more natural and more logical to students than official classifications based on organizational criteria. The last revision took place in 1984. It is still used, in addition to keywords, in IT and some data information organization systems (Piagetian Research: Compilation and CommentaryBy Sohan Modgil, Celia ModgilPublished by NFER, 1976ISBN 0-85633-106-6, 978-0-85633-106-0).The 12 divisions0. Reference* 00 General* 01 English Dictionaries* 02 Dictionaries in languages* 03 Bilingual, trilingual, ... dictionaries* 04 Other Dictionaries (proper names, places, ...)* 05 Encyclopedias* 06 Repertory, bibliographies* 07 works (textbooks)1. Natural Environment* 11 Land (geology)* 12 Relief* 13 Freshwater* 14 The oceans and seas* 15 The climates and vegetation* 16 Heaven (astronomy)* 17 Nature and Life (ecology)2. Plants* 21 Study of the plant* 22 The plants* 23 The plants without flowers or seeds* 24 The microscopic beings3. Animals* 30 General study of the body (in humans and animals)* 31 The health of humans* 32 Mammals (except humans)* 33 Birds* 34 Reptiles and amphibians* 35 Fish* 36 Insects (articulated)* 37 Other articulated* 38 Shellfish* 39 Other animals4. Other sciences* 41 Mathematics* 42 Physical Sciences* 43 Chemistry* 44 Technology5. Food and Agriculture* 51 Working the earth* 52 Cultures* 53 Livestock* 54 Forestry* 55 Fishing* 56 Hunting* 57 industry* 58 Foods* 59 Drinks6. Labor and Industry* 60 General* 61 Sources of energy and engines* 62 Mining and quarrying* 63 Metals* 64 Chemical Industry* 65 Textile and clothing industry* 66 Building industry, housing and furniture* 67 Other Industries7. The city and stock exchanges* 71 The city, the municipality* 72 Trade* 73 Road Transport* 74 Rail transport* 75 Inland waterway transport* 76 Maritime Transport* 77 Air transportation and space* 78 Post, Telecommunications and IT* 79 Travel and Tourism8. Society* 81 People* 82 Contracts (environmental and social issues)* 83 Administrative organization of society* 84 Organisation of social policy* 85 Reports from nations9. Culture and Recreation* 91 Education and instructions* 92 Languages* 93 Literature and Philosophy* 94 Religions* 95 Arts & Entertainment* 96 Sports and GamesG. Geography* G0 The study of geography* G1 General Geography* G2 Geography locally and regionally* G3 Our country* G4 Europe* G5 Asia* G6 Africa* G7 America* G8 Oceania* G9 The Polar WorldH. History* H1 Prehistory* H2 The East, Greece* H3 Rome and the Middle Ages (from 700 to 987)* H4 Ages (from 987 to 1492)* H5 monarchy (1492 to 1789)* H6 Struggles for Democracy (1789 to 1848)* H7 Organization of the Republic (1848 to 1914)* H8 Contemporary history (1914present)ReferencesExternal links*Internet links based on the Freinet classification from lcole des Bruyres at Louvain-la-Neuve, Belgium*Organising everything at the website of lcole Bizu, FranceFreinet
19283361
New_Deal
File:NewDeal.jpg|thumb|right|350px|Top left: The Valley Authority, part of the New Deal, being signed into law in 1933.Top right: Franklin Delano Roosevelt, who was responsible for initiatives and programs collectively known as the New Deal. Bottom: A public mural from one of the artists employed by the New Deal.The New Deal was a series of economic programs implemented in the States between 1933 and 1936. They were passed by the U.S. Congress during the first term of President D. Roosevelt. The programs were responses to the Great Depression, and focused on what historians call the 3 Rs: Relief, Recovery, and Reform. That is, Relief for the unemployed and poor; Recovery of the economy to normal levels; and Reform of the financial system to prevent a repeat depression. The New Deal produced a political realignment, making the Democratic Party the majority (as well as the party which held the White House for seven out of nine Presidential terms from 1933 to 1969), with its base in liberal ideas, big city machines, and newly empowered labor unions, ethnic minorities, and the white South. The Republicans were split, either opposing the entire New Deal as an enemy of business and growth, or accepting some of it and promising to make it more efficient. The realignment crystallized into the Deal Coalition that dominated most American elections into the 1960s, while the opposition Coalition largely controlled Congress from 1938 to 1964.Historians distinguish a First New Deal (1933) and a Second New Deal (193436). Some programs were declared unconstitutional, and others were repealed during War II. The First New Deal (1933) dealt with diverse groups, from banking and railroads to industry and farming, all of which demanded help for economic recovery. A Second New Deal in 193436 included the Wagner Act to promote labor unions, the Progress Administration (WPA) relief program, the Social Security Act, and new programs to aid tenant farmers and migrant workers. The final major items of New Deal legislation were the creation of the States Housing Authority and Security Administration, both in 1937, then the Labor Standards Act of 1938, which set maximum hours and minimum wages for most categories of workers(Kennedy, Freedom from Fear (1999) ch 12) and the Adjustment Act of 1938.Despite Roosevelt campaigning heavily against anti-New Deal Republicans and anti-New Deal Democrats, Republicans gained many seats in Congress in the 1938 midterm elections and the Democrats opponents of the New Deal retained their seats,(Paul S. Boyer, et al. The Enduring Vision: A History of the American People, Volume 2. Wadsworth Cengage. 2010. p. 575) resulting in the WPA, CCC and other relief programs being shut down during World War II by the Coalition (i.e., the opponents of the New Deal in Congress); they argued the return of employment made them superfluous. As a Republican President in the 1950s, D. Eisenhower left the New Deal largely intact. In the 1960s, B. Johnsons Society took New Deal policies further. After 1974, faire views grew in support, calling for deregulation of the economy and ending New Deal regulation of transportation, banking and communications in the late 1970s and early 1980s.(Martha Derthick, The Politics of Deregulation (1985)) Several New Deal programs remain active, with some still operating under the original names, including the Deposit Insurance Corporation (FDIC), the Crop Insurance Corporation (FCIC), the Housing Administration (FHA), and the Valley Authority (TVA). The largest programs still in existence today are the Social Security System and the and Exchange Commission (SEC).OriginsThe New Deal represented a significant shift in political and policy in the USA, its more lasting changes being increased federal government regulation of the economy. It also marked the beginning of complex social programs and growing power of labor unions. The effects of the New Deal remain a source of controversy and debate amongst economists and historians.()Economists debate whether the causes of the depression and the effect of the 1929 stock market crash can be seen as a signal of the underlying economic issues, as opposed to a trigger for the crisis. Federal Reserve policy, the monetary rigidity of the standard, and overproduction are offered as possible factors in turning a cyclical downturn into a worldwide depression.From 1929 to 1933, unemployment in the U.S. increased from 4% to 25%, and manufacturing output decreased by one third. Prices fell by 20%, causing a deflation which made the repayments of debts much harder. The mining, lumber, construction, and farming sectors were hit especially hard, along with railroads and heavy industries such as steel and automobiles. The impact was much less severe in the white-collar and service sectors.Upon accepting the 1932 Democratic nomination for president, Franklin Roosevelt promised a new deal for the American people.(The phrase was perhaps borrowed from the title of Chases book A New Deal published earlier that year.):The Great Depression had devastated the nation. As Roosevelt took the oath of office at noon on March 4, 1933, the state governors had closed every bank in the nation; no one could cash a check or get at their savings.(March 4 was a Saturday and banks were not open on weekends. On Monday FDR officially closed all banks. Arthur Schlesinger, Jr. The Coming of the New Deal (1959), p. 3; Brands, Traitor to his class (2008) p. 288.)The rate was 25% and higher in major industrial and mining centers. Farm income had fallen by over 50% since 1929. 844,000 nonfarm mortgages had been foreclosed, 193033, out of five million in all.(Jonathan Alter, The Defining Moment: FDRs Hundred Days and the Triumph of Hope, esp. ch 31. (2007); Bureau of the Census, Historical Statistics of the United States (1977) series K220, N301.) Political and business leaders feared revolution and anarchy. P. Kennedy, Sr., who remained wealthy during the Depression, stated years later that in those days I felt and said I would be willing to part with half of what I had if I could be sure of keeping, under law and order, the other half.()Roosevelt entered office without a specific set of plans for dealing with the Great Depression; so he improvised as Congress listened to a very wide variety of voices.(Leuchtenburg pp 3335.) The First New Deal (193334) encompassed the proposals offered by a wide spectrum of groups. (Not included was the Socialist Party, whose influence was all but destroyed.)(Leuchtenburg p. 188.) This first phase of the New Deal was also characterized by fiscal conservatism (see Act, below) and experimentation with several different, sometimes contradictory, cures for economic ills. The consequences were uneven. Some programs, especially the Recovery Administration (NRA) and the silver program, have been widely seen as failures.(Bernard Bellush, The Failure of the NRA (1975))(Arthur Crawford, Monetary management under the new deal (1940) p 240) Other programs lasted about a decade; some became permanent. The economy shot upward, with FDRs first term marking one of the fastest periods of GDP growth in history. However a downturn in 193738 raised questions about just how successful the policies were, with the great majority of economists and historians agreeing they were an overall benefit.The New Deal policies drew from many different ideas proposed earlier in the 20th century.  Assistant Attorney General Arnold led efforts that hearkened back to an anti-monopoly tradition rooted in American politics by figures such as Andrew Jackson and Thomas Jefferson. Supreme Court Justice Brandeis, an influential adviser to many New Dealers, argued that bigness (referring, presumably, to corporations) was a negative economic force, producing waste and inefficiency. However, the anti-monopoly group never had a major impact on New Deal policy.(Leuchtenburg p. 34.) Other leaders such as Hugh Johnson of the NRA took ideas from the Wilson Administration, advocating techniques used to mobilize the economy for War I. They brought ideas and experience from the government controls and spending of 191718. Other New Deal planners revived experiments suggested in the 1920s, such as the TVA.Among Roosevelts more famous advisers was an informal Trust: a group that tended to view pragmatic government intervention in the economy positively. Richberg, the second head of the NRA, said A nationally economy is the only salvation of our present situation and the only hope for the future.(Leuchtenburg p. 58.)The New Deal faced some vocal conservative opposition. The first organized opposition in 1934 came from the Liberty League led by conservative Democrats such as 1924 and 1928 presidential candidates W. Davis and Smith. There was also a large but loosely affiliated group of New Deal opponents, who are commonly called the Old Right. This group included politicians, intellectuals, writers, and newspaper editors of various philosophical persuasions including liberals and conservatives, both Democrats and Republicans.World comparisonsEurope*Britain was unable to agree on major programs to stop its depression. This led to the collapse of the Labour Party government and its replacement in 1931 by a National Coalition dominated by Conservatives. However, the Depression affected Britain less than most countries due to Britains exit from the gold standard in 1931 (which deal crisis and the Third Republic very much contested.)*In France, the Front Populaire government, led by Blum, in power 19361938, instigated major social reforms. As the coalition united representatives from the center-left to the communist party, right-wing opposition was very strong and social turmoil marred the Front Populaire term. This division left the country bitterly divided in 19381939.*In Germany during the Republic, the economy spiraled down, leading to a political crisis and the rise to power of the Nazis in January 1933. Economic recovery was pursued through autarky, wage controls, price controls, and spending programs such as works and, especially, military spending.*Spain endured mounting political crises that led in 1936 to civil war.*In Mussolinis Italy, the economic controls of his corporate state were tightened.*The Union was mostly isolated from the world trading system during the 1930s.*Roosevelts deal helped foreign economies recover, as well as the USs.Canada & the Caribbean*In Canada, Between 1929 and 1939, the gross national product dropped 40%, compared to 37% in the U.S. Unemployment reached 28% at the depth of the Depression in 1933. Many businesses closed, as corporate profits of C$396 million in 1929 turned into losses of $98 million in 1933. Exports shrank by 50% from 1929 to 1933. Worst hit were areas dependent on primary industries such as farming, mining and logging, as prices fell and there were few alternative jobs. Families saw most or all of their assets disappear and their debts became heavier as prices fell. Local and provincial government set up relief programs but there was no nationwide New-Deal-like program. The  Conservative government of Prime Minister B. Bennett retaliated against the SmootHawley tariff by raising tariffs against the U.S. but lowered them on British Empire goods. Nevertheless the economy suffered. In 1935, Bennett proposed a series of programs that resembled the New Deal; the proposals were all rejected and led to his defeat in the elections of 1935.(Allen, Ralph (1961), Ordeal by Fire: Canada, 19101945,  ch 37.)*The Caribbean saw its greatest unemployment during the 1930s because of a decline in exports to the U.S., and a fall in export prices.Asia*China was at war with Japan during most of the 1930s, in addition to internal struggles between Kai Sheks nationalists and Zedongs communists.* Japans economy expanded at the rate of 5% of GDP per year after the years of modernization. Manufacturing and mining came to account for more than 30% of GDP, more than twice the value for the agricultural sector. Most industrial growth, however, was geared toward expanding the nations military power. Beginning in 1937 with significant land seizures in China, and then to a much greater extent after 1941, which saw annexations and invasions all across Southeast Asia and the Pacific, Japan seized and developed natural resources such as: sugarcane in the Philippines; petroleum from the Dutch East Indies and Burma; tin and bauxite from the Dutch East Indies and Malaya; and coal in China (where production increased from  in 1936, to  in 1942) . During the early stages of Japans expansion, its economy expanded considerably. Iron production rose from  in 1937 to  in 1943 . Steel production rose from  to  over the same time period. In 1941, Japanese aircraft industries had capacity to manufacture 10,000 aircraft  per year. From 1941September 1944, defense production (including airplanes and vessels) rose by 94% .Australia & New Zealand*In Australia, 1930s conservative and Labor-led governments concentrated on cutting spending and reducing the national debt. It was not until World War II that the Australian government (first conservative, then Labor) introduced Keynesian policies similar to the New Deal; increasing taxes in order to fund stimulative spending, economic oversight/regulation, and rationing of petroleum products are prominent examples of an evolving view of the role of government in Australia throughout that period.  Many progressive policies remained in place after the end of World War II. Labor Prime Minister Chifley outlined these policies in his light on the hill speech.*In Zealand, a series of economic and social policies similar to the New Deal were adopted after the election of the first Labour Government in 1935.()The First Hundred DaysRoosevelt entered office with enormous capital. Americans of all political persuasions were demanding immediate action, and Roosevelt responded with a remarkable series of new programs in the first hundred days of the administration, in which he met with Congress for 100 days. During those 100 days of lawmaking, Congress granted every request Roosevelt asked, and passed a few programs (such as the FDIC to insure bank accounts) that he opposed. Ever since, presidents have been judged against FDR for what they accomplished in their first 100 days.Bank and monetary reformsWith strident language Roosevelt took credit for dethroning the bankers he alleged had caused the debacle. On March 4, 1933, in his first inaugural address, he proclaimed:He closed all the banks in the country and kept them all closed until he could pass new legislation.() On March 9, Roosevelt sent to Congress the Banking Act, drafted in large part by Hoovers top advisors. The act was passed and signed into law the same day. It provided for a system of reopening sound banks under Treasury supervision, with federal loans available if needed. Three-quarters of the banks in the Reserve System reopened within the next three days. Billions of dollars in hoarded currency and gold flowed back into them within a month, thus stabilizing the banking system. By the end of 1933, 4,004 small local banks were permanently closed and merged into larger banks. (Their depositors eventually received on average 86 cents on the dollar of their deposits; it is a common false myth that they received nothing back.) In June 1933, over Roosevelts objections, Congress created the Deposit Insurance Corporation (FDIC), which insured deposits for up to $2,500 beginning January 1, 1934; this amount was increased to $5,000 on July 1, 1934.To deal with deflation, the nation went off the gold standard. In March and April in a series of laws and executive orders, the government suspended the standard for United States currency.(Under the gold standard, the Federal Reserve was prevented from lowering interest rates and was instead forced to raise rates to protect the dollar.) Anyone holding significant amounts of gold coinage was mandated to exchange it for the existing fixed price of US dollars, after which the US would no longer pay gold on demand for the dollar, and gold would no longer be considered valid tender for debts in private and public contracts. The dollar was allowed to float freely on exchange markets with no guaranteed price in gold, only to be fixed again at a significantly lower level a year later with the passage of the Reserve Act in 1934. Markets immediately responded well to the suspension, in the hope that the decline in prices would finally end.()The economy had hit bottom in March 1933 and then started to expand. Economic indicators show the economy reached nadir in the first days of March, then began a steady, sharp upward recovery. Thus the Federal Reserve Index of Industrial Production sank to its lowest point of 52.8 in July 1932 (with 193539  100) and was practically unchanged at 54.3 in March 1933; however by July 1933, it reached 85.5, a dramatic rebound of 57% in four months. Recovery was steady and strong until 1937. Except for employment, the economy by 1937 surpassed the levels of the late 1920s. The of 1937 was a temporary downturn. Private sector employment, especially in manufacturing, recovered to the level of the 1920s but failed to advance further until the war. Chart 2 below shows the growth in employment without  adjusting for population growth. The U.S. population was 124,840,471 in 1932 and 128,824,829 in 1937, an increase of 3,984,468.() The ratio of these numbers, times the number of jobs in 1932, means there was a need for  938,000 more 1937 jobs to maintain the same employment level.thumb|400px|Chart 2: Total employment in the U.S. from 1920 to 1940, excluding farms and WPA.Economy ActThe Act, drafted by Budget Director Christian McDonald was passed on March 14, 1933. The act proposed to balance the regular (non-emergency) federal budget by cutting the salaries of government employees and cutting pensions to veterans by fifteen percent. It saved $500 million per year and reassured deficit hawks such as Douglas that the new President was fiscally conservative. Roosevelt argued there were two budgets: the regular federal budget, which he balanced, and the emergency budget, which was needed to defeat the depression; it was imbalanced on a temporary basis.(Leuchtenburg p. 4546; Robert Paul Browder and Thomas G. Smith, Independent: A Biography of Lewis W. Douglass (1986))Roosevelt was initially in favor of balancing the budget, but he soon found himself running spending deficits in order to fund the numerous programs he created. Douglas, however, rejecting the distinction between a regular and emergency budget, resigned in 1934 and became an outspoken critic of the New Deal. Roosevelt strenuously opposed the Bonus Bill that would give World War I veterans a cash bonus. Finally, Congress passed it over his veto in 1936, and the Treasury distributed $1.5 billion in cash as bonus welfare benefits to 4 million veterans just before the 1936 election.(Leuchtenburg p. 171; Raymond Moley, The First New Deal (1966))New Dealers never accepted the Keynesian argument for government spending as a vehicle for recovery. Most economists of the era, along with Henry Morgenthau of the Treasury Department, rejected Keynesian solutions and favored balanced budgets.(Leuchtenburg p. 171, 2456; Herbert Stein, Presidential economics: The making of economic policy from Roosevelt to Reagan and beyond (1984))Women and the New DealAt first the New Deal created programs primarily for men. It was assumed that the husband was the breadwinner (the provider) and if they had jobs, whole families would benefit. It was the social norm for women to give up jobs when they married; in many states there were laws that prevented both husband and wife holding regular jobs with the government. So too in the relief world, it was rare for both husband and wife to have a relief job on FERA or the WPA.(Children in the family were allowed to hold CCC or NYA jobsindeed, CCC jobs were normally given to young men whose fathers were on relief. Young women were eligible for NYA jobs which began in 1935.) This prevailing social norm of the breadwinner failed to take into account the numerous households headed by women, but it soon became clear that the government needed to help women as well.(Susan Ware, Beyond Suffrage: Women in the New Deal (1987))Many women were employed on FERA projects run by the states with federal funds. The first New Deal program to directly assist women was the Works Progress Administration (WPA), begun in 1935. It hired single women, widows, or women with disabled or absent husbands. While men were given unskilled manual labor jobs, usually on construction projects, women were assigned mostly to sewing projects. They made clothing and bedding to be given away to charities and hospitals. Women also were hired for the WPAs school lunch program. Both men and women were hired for the arts programs (such as music, theater and writing). The Social Security program was designed to help retired workers and widows, but did not include domestic workers, farmers or farm laborers, the jobs most often held by blacks. Social Security however was not a relief program and it was not designed for short-term needs, as very few people received benefits before 1942.Artist ProgramsAn unusual branch of the WPA, Federal One, gave jobs to writers, musicians, artists, and theater personnel. Under the Federal Writers Project, a detailed guide book was prepared for every state, local archives were catalogued, and writers such as Walker, Neale Hurston, and Yezierska were hired to document folklore. Other writers interviewed elderly ex-slaves and recorded their stories. Under the Federal Theater Project, headed by charismatic Flanagan, actresses and actors, technicians, writers, and directors put on stage productions. The tickets were inexpensive or sometimes free, making theater available to audiences unaccustomed to attending plays.(Lorraine Brown, Federal Theatre: Melodrama, Social Protest, and Genius, U.S. Library of Congress Quarterly Journal, 1979, Vol. 36 Issue 1, pp 1837) One Federal Art Project paid 162 trained woman artists on relief to paint murals or create statues for newly built post offices and courthouses. Many of these works of art can still be seen in public buildings around the country, along with murals sponsored by the Treasury Relief Art Project of the Treasury Department.(Hemming, Heidi and Julie Hemming Savage, Women Making America, Clotho Press, 2009, pp. 24344.)(Sue Bridwell Beckham, Depression Post Office Murals and Southern Culture: A Gentle Reconstruction (1989))thumb|WPA employed 2 to 3 million unemployed at unskilled laborFarm and rural programsMany rural people lived in severe poverty, especially in the South. Major programs addressed to their needs included the Administration (RA), the Electrification Administration (REA), rural welfare projects sponsored by the WPA, NYA, Forest Service and CCC, including school lunches, building new schools, opening roads in remote areas, reforestation, and purchase of marginal lands to enlarge national forests. In 1933, the Administration launched the Valley Authority, a project involving dam construction planning on an unprecedented scale in order to curb flooding, generate electricity, and modernize the very poor farms in the Valley region of the United States.Roosevelt was keenly interested in farm issues and believed that true prosperity would not return until farming was prosperous. Many different programs were directed at farmers. The first 100 days produced the Farm Security Act to raise farm incomes by raising the prices farmers received, which was achieved by reducing total farm output. The Adjustment Act created the Adjustment Administration (AAA) in May 1933. The act reflected the demands of leaders of major farm organizations, especially the Bureau, and reflected debates among Roosevelts farm advisers such as Secretary of Agriculture A. Wallace, Wilson, Tugwell, and Peek.(Schlesinger, Coming of the New Deal p p2784)The aim of the AAA was to raise prices for commodities through artificial scarcity. The AAA used a system of domestic allotments, setting total output of corn, cotton, dairy products, hogs, rice, tobacco, and wheat. The farmers themselves had a voice in the process of using government to benefit their incomes. The AAA paid land owners subsidies for leaving some of their land idle with funds provided by a new tax on food processing. The goal was to force up farm prices to the point of parity, an index based on 19101914 prices. To meet 1933 goals,  of growing cotton was plowed up, bountiful crops were left to rot, and six million baby pigs were killed and discarded.(Ronald L. Heinemann, Depression and New Deal in Virginia. (1983) p. 107) The idea was the less produced, the higher the wholesale price and the higher income to the farmer. Farm incomes increased significantly in the first three years of the New Deal, as prices for commodities rose. Food prices remained well below 1929 levels.(Badger, New Deal pp 89. 15357. for price data and farm income see Statistical Abstract 1940 online) A Poll printed in the Post revealed that a majority of the American public opposed the AAA.(Barry Cushman, Rethinking the New Deal Court (1998) p. 34)The AAA established an important and long-lasting federal role in the planning on the entire agricultural sector of the economy and was the first program on such a scale on behalf of the troubled agricultural economy. The original AAA did not provide for any sharecroppers or tenants or farm laborers who might become unemployed, but there were other New Deal programs especially for them.In 1936, the Supreme Court declared the AAA to be unconstitutional, stating that a statutory plan to regulate and control agricultural production, is a matter beyond the powers delegated to the federal government... The AAA was replaced by a similar program that did win Court approval. Instead of paying farmers for letting fields lie barren, this program instead subsidized them for planting soil enriching crops such as alfalfa that would not be sold on the market. Federal regulation of agricultural production has been modified many times since then, but together with large subsidies it is still in effect in 2010.The last major New Deal legislation concerning farming was in 1937, when the Farm Tenancy Act was created which in turn created the Security Administration (FSA), replacing the Resettlement Administration.A major new welfare program was the Food Stamp Plan established in 1939. It survives into the 21st century with little controversy because it benefits the urban poor, food producers, grocers and wholesalers, as well as farmers, thereby winning support from both liberal and conservative Congressmen.(Rachel Louise Moran, Consuming Relief: Food Stamps and the New Welfare of the New Deal, Journal of American History, March 2011, Vol. 97 Issue 4, pp 10011022 online)Repeal of ProhibitionIn a measure that garnered substantial popular support for his New Deal, Roosevelt, on March 13, 1933, moved to put to rest one of the most divisive cultural issues of the 1920s. Just nine days later he signed the bill to legalize the manufacture and sale of alcohol, an interim measure pending the repeal of Prohibition, for which a constitutional amendment (the 21st) was already in process. The repeal amendment was ratified later in 1933. States and cities gained additional new revenue, and Roosevelt secured his popularity in the cities, which were overwhelmingly wet, for supporting or permitting the legal production and sale of alcoholic beverages.(Leuchtenburg, Franklin D. Roosevelt and the New Deal pp 4647)Puerto RicoA separate set of programs operated in Rico, headed by the Rico Reconstruction Administration. It promoted reform and helped small farms; it set up farm cooperatives, promoted crop diversification, and helped local industry. The Puerto Rico Reconstruction Administration was directed by Pablo Montoya Sr. from 1935 to 1937.Tax increasesIn 1935, Roosevelt called for a tax program called the Tax Act to redistribute wealth, in which he proposed to increase inheritance tax, a gift tax, a severely graduated income tax, and a corporate income tax scaled according to income. However, Congress watered it down, by dropping the inheritance tax and only mildly increased the corporate tax.(David Edwin Harrell, Edwin S. Gaustad, John B. Boles. Unto a Good Land, Volume 2: A History of the American People: From 1865. Wm. B. Eerdmans Publishing, 2005. p. 914)A tax called the profits tax was enacted in 1936. The idea was to force businesses to distribute profits in dividend and wages, instead of saving or reinvesting them. Business profits were taxed on a sliding scale; if a company kept 1% of their net income, 10% of that amount would be taxed under the UP Tax. If a company kept 70% of their net income, the company would be taxed at a rate of 73.91% on that amount.(Jim Powell, FDRs Folly: How Roosevelt and His New Deal Prolonged the Great Depression (2003), p.80) Facing widespread and fierce criticism, the tax was reduced to 2% in 1938 and completely eliminated in 1939.(Benjamin Graham. Security Analysis: The Classic 1940 Edition. McGraw-Hill Professional, 2002. pp. 386287)ReformBusiness, labor, and government cooperationBesides all the programs for immediate relief, the federal government embarked quickly on an agenda of long-term reform aimed at avoiding another depression. The New Dealers responded to demands to inflate the currency by a variety of means.(Leuchtenburg pp, 1578) Another group of reformers sought to build consumer and farmer co-ops as a counterweight to big business. The consumer co-ops did not take off, but the Electrification Administration used co-ops to bring electricity to rural areas, many of which still operate.(Deward Clayton Brown, Electricity for Rural America: The Fight for the REA (1980))From 1929 to 1933, the industrial economy had been suffering from a vicious cycle of deflation. Since 1931, the Chamber of Commerce, the voice of the nations organized business, promoted an anti-deflationary scheme that would permit trade associations to cooperate in government-instigated(Robert J. Samuelson, The Great Depression. The Concise Encyclopedia of Economics.) cartels to stabilize prices within their industries. While existing antitrust laws clearly forbade such practices, organized business found a receptive ear in the Roosevelt Administration.(Bernard Bellush, The Failure of the NRA, (1976)) The Roosevelt Administration, packed with reformers aspiring to forge all elements of society into a cooperative unit (a reaction to the worldwide specter of business-labor class struggle), was fairly amenable to the idea of cooperation among producers.(Leuchtenburg p. 3337) FDR closed national banks on March 6, 1933, a day before he was officially inaugurated, to help stabilize the economy. Then three days later on March 9, he passed the Emergency Banking Relief Act to jumpstart money to flow in the economy.The administration insisted that business would have to ensure that the incomes of workers would rise along with their prices. The product of all these impulses and pressures was the Industrial Recovery Act (NIRA) which was passed by Congress in June 1933. The NIRA established the Planning Board, also called the National Resources Planning Board (NRPB), to assist in planning the economy by providing recommendations and information. Fredric A. Delano, the presidents uncle, was appointed head of the NRPB.(Leuchtenburg p. 5358)The NIRA guaranteed to workers the right of collective bargaining and helped spur some union organizing activity, but much faster growth of union membership came before the 1935 Act. The NIRA established the Recovery Administration (NRA), which attempted to stabilize prices and wages through cooperative code authorities involving government, business, and labor. The NRA allowed business to create a multitude of regulations imposing the pricing and production standards for all sorts of goods and services. Most economists were dubious because it was based on fixing prices to reduce competition; the NRA was ended by the Supreme Court in 1935, and no one tried to revive it.(Parker; Bellush (1976))To prime the pump and cut unemployment, the NIRA created the Works Administration (PWA), a major program of public works. From 1933 to 1935 PWA spent $3.3 billion with private companies to build 34,599 projects, many of them quite large.(Leuchtenburg p. 70, 13334; Jason Scott Smith, Building New Deal Liberalism: The Political Economy of Public Works, 19331956 (2005))NRA Blue Eagle campaignImage:NewDealNRA.jpg|thumb|NRA EagleRoosevelt believed that the severity of the Depression was due to excessive business competition that lowered wages and prices, which he believed lowered demand and employment.( He argued that government economic planning was necessary to remedy this:...A mere builder of more industrial plants, a creator of more railroad systems, an organizer of more corporations, is as likely to be a danger as a help. Our task is not ... necessarily producing more goods. It is the soberer, less dramatic business of administering resourcesand plants already in hand.New Deal economists argued that cut-throat competition had hurt many businesses and that with prices having fallen 20% and more, deflation exacerbated the burden of debt and would delay recovery. They rejected a strong move in Congress to limit the workweek to 30 hours. Instead their remedy, designed in cooperation with big business, was the NIRA. It included stimulus funds for the WPA to spend, and sought to raise prices, give more power for unions (so the workers could purchase more) and reduce harmful competition. At the center of the NIRA was the National Recovery Administration (NRA), headed by former General Hugh Johnson, who had been a senior economic official in World War I. Johnson called on every business establishment in the nation to accept a stopgap blanket code: a minimum wage of between 20 and 45 cents per hour, a maximum workweek of 3545 hours, and the abolition of labor. Johnson and Roosevelt contended that the blanket code would raise consumer purchasing power and increase employment.(Arthur Schlesinger, Jr. The Coming of the New Deal (1959), 87-135)To mobilize political support for the NRA, Johnson launched the NRA Eagle publicity campaign to boost what he called industrial self-government. The NRA brought together leaders in each industry to design specific sets of codes for that industry; the most important provisions were anti-deflationary floors below which no company would lower prices or wages, and agreements on maintaining employment and production. In a remarkably short time, the NRA announced agreements from almost every major industry in the nation. By March 1934, industrial production was 45% higher than in March 1933.(Federal Reserve System, National Summary of Business Conditions (1936)) Donald Richberg, who soon replaced Johnson as the head of the NRA said:There is no choice presented to American business between intelligently planned and uncontrolled industrial operations and a return to the gold-plated anarchy that masqueraded as rugged individualism ... Unless industry is sufficiently socialized by its private owners and managers so that great essential industries are operated under public obligation appropriate to the public interest in them, the advance of political control over private industry is inevitable.(Arthur Meier Schlesinger, Jr. The Coming of the New Deal, Houghton Mifflin Books (2003), p. 115)By the time NRA ended in May 1935, industrial production was 55% higher than in May 1933. On May 27, 1935, the NRA was found to be unconstitutional by a unanimous decision of the U.S. Supreme Court in the case of v. United States. On that same day, the Court unanimously struck down the Frazier-Lemke Act portion of the New Deal as unconstitutional. Libertarian Ebeling believes these and other rulings striking down portions of the New Deal prevented the U.S. economic system from becoming a economy corporate state.(When the Supreme Court Stopped Economic Fascism in America. By Richard Ebeling, president of for Economic Education. Oct. 2005.) Governor Long of Louisiana said, I raise my hand in reverence to the Supreme Court that saved this nation from fascism.(Arthur Meier Schlesinger, Jr. The Politics of Upheaval: 19351936, the Age of Roosevelt, Volume III, Houghton Mifflin Books, page 284)However, soon after, on June 27, 1935, the NLRA was passed, which gave even more power to unions. It forced employees to join unions if a majority of employers voted in favor of unionizing and prohibited business management from declining to engage in collective bargaining with the unions. The Act also established the National Labor Relations Board (NLRB) to enforce the rules of the NLRA and enforce wage agreements.Image:US Manufacturing Employment Graph - 1920 to 1940.svg|thumb|400px|Chart 3: Manufacturing employment in the United States from 1920 to 1940(Data was obtained from the U.S. Census Bureau, Statistical Abstract and converted into SVG format by me. The numbers come from this U.S. Census document, page 17, column 127. Note that the graph only covers factory employment.)Employment in private sector factories recovered to the level of the late 1920s by 1937 but did not grow much bigger until the war came and manufacturing employment leaped from 11 million in 1940 to 18 million in 1943.Housing SectorThe New Deal had an important impact in the housing field. The New Deal followed and increased President Hoovers lead and seek measures. The New Deal sought to stimulate the private home building industry and increase the number of individuals who owned homes.(KENNEDY, DAVID M. 2009. What the New Deal Did. Political Science Quarterly 124, no. 2: 251268.) The New Deal implemented two new housing agencies; Owners Loan Corporation (HOLC) and the Federal Housing Administration (FHA). HOLC facilitated nation-wide lending and encouraged uniform national appraisal methods.( The Housing Administration (FHA) created national standards for home construction. The New Deal helped increase the number of Americans who owned homes. Before the New Deal only four out of 10 Americans owned homes; this was because the standard mortgage lasted only five to 10 years and had interest as high as 8%. These conditions severely limited the accessibility to housing for most Americans. Under the New Deal, Americans had access to 30-year mortgages, the standardized appraisal and construction standards helped open up the housing market to more Americans. Forty years after the implementation of the New Deal,  of Americans were home owners.(Legislative successes and failuresIn the spring of 1935, responding to the setbacks in the Court, a new skepticism in Congress, and the growing popular clamor for more dramatic action, the Administration proposed or endorsed several important new initiatives. Historians refer to them as the Second New Deal and note that it was more radical, more pro-labor and anti-business than the First New Deal of 193334. The Labor Relations Act, also known as the Act, revived and strengthened the protections of collective bargaining contained in the original NIRA. The result was a tremendous growth of membership in the labor unions composing the Federation of Labor. Labor thus became a major component of the New Deal political coalition. Roosevelt nationalized unemployment relief through the Progress Administration (WPA), headed by close friend Hopkins. It created hundreds of thousands of low-skilled blue collar jobs for unemployed men (and some for unemployed women and white collar workers). The Youth Administration was the semi-autonomous WPA program for youth. Its Texas director, Baines Johnson, later used the NYA as a model for some of his Society programs in the 1960s.The most important program of 1935, and perhaps the New Deal as a whole, was the Social Security Act, which established a system of universal retirement pensions, unemployment insurance, and welfare benefits for poor families and the handicapped.(Sitkoff, ed. Fifty Years Later: The New Deal Evaluated (1984)) It established the framework for the U.S. welfare system. Roosevelt insisted that it should be funded by payroll taxes rather than from the general fund; he said, We put those payroll contributions there so as to give the contributors a legal, moral, and political right to collect their pensions and unemployment benefits. With those taxes in there, no damn politician can ever scrap my social security program. One of the last New Deal agencies was the States Housing Authority, created in 1937 with some Republican support to abolish slums.Defeat: court packing and executive reorganizationRoosevelt, however, emboldened by the triumphs of his first term, set out in 1937 to consolidate authority within the government in ways that provoked powerful opposition. Early in the year, he asked Congress to expand the number of justices on the Supreme Court so as to allow him to appoint members sympathetic to his ideas and hence tip the ideological balance of the Court. This proposal provoked a storm of protest.In one sense, however, it succeeded: Justice Owen Roberts switched positions and began voting to uphold New Deal measures, effectively creating a liberal majority in Coast Hotel Co. v. Parrish and Labor Relations Board v. Jones & Laughlin Steel Corporation, thus departing from the v. New York era and giving the government more power in questions of economic policies. Journalists called this change switch in time that saved nine. Recent scholars have noted that since the vote in Parrish took place several months before the court-packing plan was announced, other factors, like evolving jurisprudence, must have contributed to the Courts swing. The opinions handed down in the spring of 1937, favorable to the government, also contributed to the downfall of the plan. In any case, the court packing plan, as it was known, did lasting political damage to Roosevelt() and was finally rejected by Congress in July.Government role: balance labor, business, and farmingImage:William_Gropper_-_Construction_of_a_Dam_1939.jpg|right|framed|The federal government commissioned a series of public murals from the artists it employed. Groppers Construction of a Dam (1939), is characteristic of much of the art of the 1930s, with workers seen in heroic poses, laboring in unison to complete a great public project.The number of unemployed in 1929 was estimated at less than 4%, but by 1933 the unemployment rate had jumped up to approximately 25%.The New Deal was designed for complete economic recovery during the depression. However, the New Deal did not achieve full economic recovery. It actually had a limited economic impact. The New Deal failed to lower the unemployment rate below 14%. However, the New Deal did help maintain an average of 17% level the unemployment throughout the 1930s.(Fearon, Peter. 2007. Kansas History and the New Deal Era. Kansas History 30, no. 3: 192223) Most scholars believe that there were three versions of the New Deal in between 1933 and 1940. The first New Deal took place between 1933 and 1935 and was focused on both farm and factory. The second New Deal was introduced in 1935. In this New Deal, the countrys welfare system was dramatically changed and expanded. One example of the New Deals new welfare programs was the Works Progress Administration (WPA), which was created to return the unemployed to the work force.(During the New Deal period, the federal government evolved into an arbitrator in the competition among elements and classes of society, acting as a force to help some groups and limit the power of others. This elevated and strengthened newer interest groups which allowed these to compete more effectively.By the end of the 1930s, business found itself competing for influence with an increasingly powerful labor movement, with an organized agricultural economy, and occasionally with aroused consumers. This was accomplished by creating a series of government institutions that greatly and permanently expanded the role of the federal government. Thus, perhaps the strongest legacy of the New Deal was to make the federal government a protector of interest groups and a supervisor of competition among them.As a result of the New Deal, political and economic life became more competitive than before, with workers, farmers, consumers, and others now able to press their demands upon the government in ways that in the past had been available only to the corporate world. Hence the frequent description of the government the New Deal created as the broker state, a state brokering the competing claims of numerous groups. If there was more political competition, there was less market competition. Farmers were not allowed to sell for less than the official price. The transportation industry was tightly regulated so that every firm had a guaranteed market and management and labor had high profits and high wages, all at the cost of high prices and much inefficiency . Quotas in the oil industry were fixed by the Commission of Texas with Connallys federal Hot Oil Act of 1935, which guaranteed that illegal hot oil would not be sold.(The Handbook of Texas Online: Connally Hot Oil Act of 1935) To the New Dealers, the free market meant cut-throat competition and they considered that evil. It was not until the 1970s and 1980s that most of the New Deal regulations were relaxed.African Americansthumb|left|The New Deal set up numerous agencies to help impoverished farmers, but in the long run moving to the cities was the trend. This is an FSA photo of a Texas sharecroppers shack.Although many Americans suffered economically during the Great Depression, African Americans also had to deal with social ills, such as racism, discrimination, and segregation.Many leading New Dealers, including Roosevelt, Harold Ickes, Aubrey Williams, and Flores Sr. worked to ensure blacks received at least 10% of welfare assistance payments.(Sitkoff (2008)) There was no attempt whatsoever to end segregation, or to increase black rights in the South. Roosevelt appointed an unprecedented number of blacks to second-level positions in his administration; these appointees were collectively called the Cabinet. Roosevelt and Hopkins worked with several big city mayors to encourage the transition of black political organizations from the Republican Party to the Democratic Party from 1934 to 1936, most notably in Chicago.  The black community responded favorably, so that by 1936 the majority who voted (usually in the North) were voting Democratic. This was a sharp realignment from 1932, when most African Americans voted the Republican ticket. New Deal policies helped establish a political alliance between blacks and the Democratic Party that survives into the 21st century.(Sitkoff (2008); Nancy J. Weiss, Farewell to the Party of Lincoln: Black Politics in the Age of FDR (1983))The WPA, NYA, and CCC relief programs allocated 10% of their budgets to blacks (who comprised about 10% of the total population, and 20% of the poor). They operated separate all-black units with the same pay and conditions as white units.(However, these benefits were small in comparison to the economic and political advantages that whites received. Social Security was denied to blacks, and most unions excluded blacks from joining. Enforcement of anti-discrimination laws in the South was virtually impossible, especially since most blacks worked in hospitality and agricultural sectors.(Ira Katznelson, When Affirmative Action was White (2005).)Recession of 1937 and recoveryThe Roosevelt Administration was under assault during FDRs second term, which presided over a new dip in the Great Depression in the fall of 1937 that continued through most of 1938. Production declined sharply, as did profits and employment. Unemployment jumped from 14.3% in 1937 to 19.0% in 1938. Keynesian economists speculated that this was a result of a premature effort to curb government spending and balance the budget, while conservatives said it was caused by attacks on business and by the huge strikes caused by the organizing activities of the of Industrial Organizations (CIO) and the Federation of Labor (AFL).(Leuchtenburg p. 2423)Roosevelt rejected the advice of Morgenthau to cut spending and decided big business were trying to ruin the New Deal by causing another depression that voters would react against by voting Republican.(Kennedy p 352) It was a capital strike said Roosevelt, and he ordered the Bureau of Investigation to look for a criminal conspiracy (they found none).( Roosevelt moved left and unleashed a rhetorical campaign against monopoly power, which was cast as the cause of the new crisis.( Ickes attacked automaker Ford, steelmaker Tom Girdler, and the superrich Sixty Families who supposedly comprised the living center of the modern industrial oligarchy which dominates the United States.( Left unchecked, Ickes warned, they would create big-business Fascist Americaan enslaved America. The President appointed Robert Jackson as the aggressive new director of the antitrust division of the Justice Department, but this effort lost its effectiveness once World War II began and big business was urgently needed to produce war supplies.(But the Administrations other response to the 1937 dip that stalled recovery from of the Great Depression had more tangible results.(Leuchtenburg p. 24446) Ignoring the requests of the Treasury Department and responding to the urgings of the converts to economics and others in his Administration, Roosevelt embarked on an antidote to the depression, reluctantly abandoning his efforts to balance the budget and launching a $5 billion spending program in the spring of 1938, an effort to increase mass purchasing power.(Leuchtenburg p. 2567) The New Deal had in fact engaged in deficit spending since 1933. Now they had a theory to justify what they were doing. Roosevelt explained his program in a fireside chat in which he told the American people that it was up to the government to create an economic upturn by making additions to the purchasing power of the nation.Business-oriented observers explained the recession and recovery in very different terms from the Keynesians. They argued that the New Deal had been very hostile to business expansion in 193537, had encouraged massive strikes which had a negative impact on major industries such as automobiles, and had threatened massive anti-trust legal attacks on big corporations. All those threats diminished sharply after 1938. For example, the antitrust efforts fizzled out without major cases. The CIO and AFL unions started battling each other more than corporations, and tax policy became more favorable to long-term growth.(Leuchtenburg p. 27274)When the Gallup poll in 1939 asked, Do you think the attitude of the Roosevelt administration toward business is delaying business recovery? the American people responded yes by a margin of more than two-to-one. The business community felt even more strongly so.(Reed, Lawrence W. Great Myths of the Great Depression Mackinac Center for Public Policy.) Treasury Secretary Henry Morgenthau, angry at the Keynesian spenders, confided to his diary May 1939: We have tried spending money. We are spending more than we have ever spent before and it does not work. And I have just one interest, and now if I am wrong somebody else can have my job. I want to see this country prosper. I want to see people get a job. I want to see people get enough to eat. We have never made good on our promises. I say after eight years of this administration, we have just as much unemployment as when we started.(Unemployment in fact fell by half, from 22% in 1932 to 11% in 1939. Gene Smiley, Recent Unemployment Rate Estimates for the 1920s and 1930s, The Journal of Economic History, Vol. 43, No. 2 (Jun., 1983), pp. 487493, esp. p 488) And enormous debt to boot.World War II and the end of the Great DepressionThe Depression continued with decreasing effect until the U.S. entered World War II in December 1941. Under the special circumstances of war mobilization, massive war spending doubled the GNP (National Product).(GNP was $99.7 billion in 1940 and $210.1 billion in 1944.Historical Statistics (1976) series F1.) Civilian unemployment was reduced from 14% in 1940 to less than 2% in 1943 as the labor force grew by ten million. Millions of farmers left marginal operations, students quit school, and housewives joined the labor force. The effect continued into 1946, the first postwar year, where federal spending remained high at $62 billion (30% of GNP).(Harold G. Vatter, The U.S. Economy in World War II (1988))The emphasis was for war supplies as soon as possible, regardless of cost and efficiencies.  Industry quickly absorbed the slack in the labor force, and the tables turned such that employers needed to actively and aggressively recruit workers. As the military grew, new labor sources were needed to replace the 12 million men serving in the military. These events magnified the role of the federal government in the national economy. In 1929, federal expenditures accounted for only 3% of GNP. Between 1933 and 1939, federal expenditure tripled, but the national debt as percent of GNP hardly changed. However, spending on the New Deal was far smaller than spending on the war effort, which passed 40% of GNP in 1944. The war economy grew so fast after deemphasizing free enterprise and imposing strict controls on prices and wages, as a result of government/business cooperation, with government subsidizing business, directly and indirectly.(Vatter, The U.S. Economy in World War II)A major result of the full employment at high wages was a sharp, permanent decrease in the level of income inequality. The gap between rich and poor narrowed dramatically in the area of nutrition, because food rationing and price controls provided a reasonably priced diet to everyone. White collar workers did not typically receive overtime thus the gap between white collar and blue collar income narrowed. Large families that had been poor during the 1930s had four or more wage earners, and these families shot to the top one-third income bracket. Overtime provided large paychecks in war industries.(Kennedy, Freedom from Fear ch 18)Critical interpretations of New Deal economic policiesMany historians argue that Roosevelt restored hope and self-respect to tens of millions of desperate people, built labor unions, upgraded the national infrastructure and saved capitalism in his first term when he could have destroyed it and easily nationalized the banks and the railroads.(Sitkoff (1984)) Some critics from the left, however, have denounced Roosevelt for rescuing capitalism when the opportunity was at hand to nationalize banking, railroads and other industries.(Paul K. Conkin) Still others have complained that he enlarged the powers of the federal government,(Ira Katznelson and Mark Kesselman, The Politics of Power, 1975) built up labor unions, slowed long-term economic growth, and weakened the business community. In his 1968 memoir The Brains Trust, Tugwell (a member of Roosevelts Trust) wrote that many New Deal laws were tortured interpretations of a document intended to prevent them.(Root, Damon (2011-02-11)Are We All Originalists Now?, Reason)Keynesian and monetarist interpretationsthumb|400px|national debt/ GNP climbs from 20% to 40% under Hoover; levels off under FDR; soars during WW2 from Historical States US (1976).The New Deal tried public works, farm subsidies, and other devices to reduce unemployment, but Roosevelt never completely gave up trying to balance the budget. Unemployment remained high throughout the New Deal years though greatly reduced from the much higher rates before the New Deal; business simply would not hire more people, especially the low skilled and supposedly untrainable men who had been unemployed for years and lost any job skill they once had. Keynesians later argued that by spending vastly more money  using policy  the government could provide the needed stimulus through the effect. Critics of Keynesian economic theories said that government spending would crowd out private investment and spending and thus not have any effect on the economy, a proposition known as the view, which Keynesian economics reject.In recent years more influential among economists has been the monetarist interpretation of Friedman, which did include a full-scale monetary history of what he calls the Great Contraction. Friedman concentrated on the failures before 1933, particularly those of the Reserve, and in his memoirs said the relief programs were an appropriate response.Historians generally agree that apart from building up labor unions, the New Deal did not substantially alter the distribution of power within American capitalism. The New Deal brought about limited change in the nations power structure.(Quote from Mary Beth Norton, et al. A People and a Nation: A History of the United States (1994), 2:783. See also Arthur M. Schlesinger, Jr. The Coming of the New Deal, 19331935 (1958) p. ix; Seymour Martin Lipset and Gary Marks, How FDR Saved Capitalism, in It Didnt Happen Here: Why Socialism Failed in the United States (2001); Eric Rauchway, The Great Depression and the New Deal (2007), p. 86, 937; Cass R. Sunstein, The Second Bill of Rights: FDRs Unfinished Revolution, (2006) pp 12930; C. Wright Mills, The Power Elite (1959) 27274; David Edwin Harrell, Jr. et al. Unto a Good Land: A History of the American People (2005) p. 921; William Leuchtenburg, The White House Looks South (2005) p. 121; Robert S. McElvaine, The Great Depression: America, 19291941 (1993) p. 168; Alan Brinkley, Liberalism and Its Discontents (1998) p. 66.)Keynes visited the White House in 1934 to urge President Roosevelt to increase spending. Roosevelt afterwards complained that, he left a whole rigmarole of figures  he must be a mathematician rather than a political economist.(W. Elliot Brownlee, Federal Taxation in America: A Short History (2004) p, 103)thumb|380px|Conservative critics attacked New Deal policies as Spend-and-Spend; Tax-and-Tax; Elect-and-Elect.Fiscal conservatismJulian Zelizer (2000) has argued that fiscal conservatism was a key component of the New Deal.  A fiscally conservative approach was supported by Street and local investors and most of the business community; mainstream academic economists believed in it, as apparently did the majority of the public. Conservative southern Democrats, who favored balanced budgets and opposed new taxes, controlled Congress and its major committees. Even liberal Democrats at the time regarded balanced budgets as essential to economic stability in the long run, although they were more willing to accept short-term deficits. Public opinion polls consistently showed public opposition to deficits and debt. Throughout his terms, Roosevelt recruited fiscal conservatives to serve in his Administration, most notably Douglas the Director of Budget in 19331934, and Morgenthau Jr., Secretary of the Treasury from 1934 to 1945. They defined policy in terms of budgetary cost and tax burdens rather than needs, rights, obligations, or political benefits. Personally the President embraced their fiscal conservatism. Politically, he realized that fiscal conservatism enjoyed a strong wide base of support among voters, leading Democrats, and businessmen. On the other hand, there was enormous pressure to act  and spending money on high visibility work programs with millions of paychecks a week.Douglas proved too inflexible, and he quit in 1934. Morgenthau made it his highest priority to stay close to Roosevelt, no matter what. Douglass position, like many of the Old Right, was grounded in a basic distrust of politicians and the deeply ingrained fear that government spending always involved a degree of patronage and corruption that offended his Progressive sense of efficiency. The Economy Act of 1933, passed early in the Hundred Days, was Douglas great achievement. It reduced federal expenditures by $500 million, to be achieved by reducing veterans payments and federal salaries. Douglas cut government spending through executive orders that cut the military budget by $125 million, $75 million from the Post Office, $12 million from Commerce, $75 million from government salaries, and $100 million from staff layoffs. As Freidel concludes, The economy program was not a minor aberration of the spring of 1933, or a hypocritical concession to delighted conservatives. Rather it was an integral part of Roosevelts overall New Deal.(Freidel 1990, p. 96) Revenues were so low that borrowing was necessary (only the richest 3% paid any income tax between 1926 and 1940.(U.S. Bureau of the Census. Statistical Abstract of the United States: 1946. p. 321.)) Douglas therefore hated the relief programs, which he said reduced business confidence, threatened the governments future credit, and had the destructive psychological effects of making mendicants of self-respecting American citizens.(Zelizer) Roosevelt was pulled toward greater spending by Hopkins and Ickes, and as the 1936 election approached he decided to gain votes by attacking big business.Morgenthau shifted with FDR, but at all times tried to inject fiscal responsibility; he deeply believed in balanced budgets, stable currency, reduction of the national debt, and the need for more private investment. The Wagner Act met Morgenthaus requirement because it strengthened the partys political base and involved no new spending. In contrast to Douglas, Morgenthau accepted Roosevelts double budget as legitimate  that is a balanced regular budget, and an emergency budget for agencies, like the WPA, PWA and CCC, that would be temporary until full recovery was at hand. He fought against the veterans bonus until Congress finally overrode Roosevelts veto and gave out $2.2 billion in 1936. His biggest success was the new Social Security program; he managed to reverse the proposals to fund it from general revenue and insisted it be funded by new taxes on employees. It was Morgenthau who insisted on excluding farm workers and domestic servants from Social Security because workers outside industry would not be paying their way.(Zelizer 2000; Savage 1998)Prolonged/worsened the DepressionFile:This farmer is not on government relief.jpg|thumb|Anti-relief protest sign, near Iowa, 1940, Rothstein.In a survey of economic historians conducted by Robert Whaples, Professor of Economics at Forest University, Whaples sent out anonymous questionnaires to members of the Economic History Association. Members were asked to either disagree, agree, or agree with provisos with the statement that read: Taken as a whole, government policies of the New Deal served to lengthen and deepen the Great Depression. While only 6% of economic historians who worked in the history department of their universities agreed with the statement, 27% of those that work in the economics department agreed. Almost an identical percent of the two groups (21% and 22%) agreed with the statement with provisos (a conditional stipulation), while 74% of those who worked in the history department, and 51% in the economic department disagreed with the statement outright.(Robert Whaples, Where Is There Consensus Among American Economic Historians? The Results of a Survey on Forty Propositions, Journal of Economic History, Vol. 55, No. 1 (Mar., 1995), pp. 139154 in JSTOR)UCLA economists Harold L. Cole and Lee E. Ohanian are among those who believe the New Deal caused the Depression to persist longer than it would otherwise have, concluding in a study that the New Deal labor and industrial policies did not lift the economy out of the Depression as President Roosevelt and his economic planners had hoped, but that the New Deal policies are an important contributing factor to the persistence of the Great Depression. They claim that the New Deal cartelization policies are a key factor behind the weak recovery. They say that the abandonment of these policies coincided with the strong economic recovery of the 1940s.(Cole, Harold L and Ohanian, Lee E. New Deal Policies and the Persistence of the Great Depression: A General Equilibrium Analysis, 2004.) Cole and Ohanian claimed that FDRs policies prolonged the Depression by 7 years.(FDRs Policies Prolonged Depression by 7 Years, UCLA Economists Calculate, ucla.edu, 8/10/2004) However, Cole and Ohanians argument relies on hypotheticals, including an unprecedented growth rate necessary to end the Depression by 1936,()() and by not counting workers employed through New Deal programs. Such programs built or renovated 2,500 hospitals, 45,000 schools, 13,000 parks and playgrounds, 7,800 bridges,  of roads, 1,000 airfields and employed 50,000 teachers through programs that rebuilt the countrys entire rural school system.()(Darby, Michael R. Three-And-A-Half Million U.S. Employees Have Been Mislaid: Or, An Explanation of Unemployment, 19341941. Journal of Political Economy, Vol. 84, No. 1, (February 1976), pp. 116)()Lowell E. Gallaway and Richard K. Vedder argue that the Great Depression was very significantly prolonged in both its duration and its magnitude by the impact of New Deal programs. They suggest that without Social Security, work relief, unemployment insurance, mandatory minimum wages, and without special government-granted privileges for labor unions, business would have hired more workers and the unemployment rate during the New Deal years would have been 6.7% instead of 17.2%.(Gallaway, Lowell E. and Vedder, Richard K. Out of Work: Unemployment and Government in Twentieth-Century America, New York University Press; Updated edition (July 1997).) In reply, Brad DeLong, economics professor and Deputy Assistant Secretary of the United States Department of the Treasury in the Clinton Administration under Lawrence Summers wrote that there is literally nothing to the arguments made by Gallaway and Vedder, and the duo made flawed conclusions based on flawed foundations, and the entire foundation is made out of mud.()Contemporary public and business views about the economic effects of the New Deal were mixed and varied. In Gallup Organizations May 1936 and March 1939 American Institute of Public Opinion (AIPO) polls, more than half of Americans reported that they felt the administrations policies were aiding recovery overall. Fortunes Roper poll found in May 1939 that 39% of Americans thought the administration had been delaying recovery by undermining business confidence, while 37% thought it had not. But it also found that opinions on the issue were highly polarized by economic status and occupation. In addition, AIPO found in the same time that 57% believed that business attitudes toward the administration were delaying recovery, while 26% thought they were not emphasizing that fairly subtle differences in wording can evoke substantially different polling responses.(Hadley Cantril and Mildred Strunk, Public Opinion, 19351946 (Princeton: Princeton University Press, 1951), pp. 6164. Polls from 1937 to 1938 have not been included here because of ambiguities introduced by the recession-within-the-Depression then.)Left-wing criticismHistorians on the left have denounced the New Deal as a conservative phenomenon that let slip the opportunity to radically reform capitalism. Since the 1960s, Left historians have been among the New Deals harsh critics.(For a list of relevant works, see the list of suggested readings appearing toward the bottom of the article.) Barton J. Bernstein, in a 1968 essay, compiled a chronicle of missed opportunities and inadequate responses to problems. The New Deal may have saved capitalism from itself, Bernstein charged, but it had failed to help  and in many cases actually harmed  those groups most in need of assistance. Paul K. Conkin in The New Deal (1967) similarly chastised the government of the 1930s for its policies toward marginal farmers, for its failure to institute sufficiently progressive tax reform, and its excessive generosity toward select business interests. Zinn, in 1966, criticized the New Deal for working actively to actually preserve the worst evils of capitalism.Since the 1970s, research on the New Deal has been less interested in the question of whether the New Deal was a conservative, liberal, or revolutionary phenomenon than in the question of constraints within which it was operating. Political sociologist Skocpol, in a series of articles, has emphasized the issue of state capacity as an often-crippling constraint. Ambitious reform ideas often failed, she argued, because of the absence of a government bureaucracy with significant strength and expertise to administer them. Other more recent works have stressed the political constraints that the New Deal encountered. Conservative skepticism about government remained strong both in Congress and among certain segments of the population. Thus some scholars have stressed that the New Deal was not just a product of its liberal backers, but also a product of the pressures of its conservative opponents.Charges of communismCertain critics have complained that the New Deal was infiltrated with communists. The most influential group was in the Department of Agriculture; its leaders fired in 1934, but one of them Hiss went on to senior positions in foreign policy, while spying for the Soviet Union.(Schrecker, The Age of McCarthyism: A Brief History With Documents (2002); Tanenhaus. Whittaker Chambers: A Biography (1997))(  isbn  0736911758)Outside government, the far-left was exerting considerable influence in the labor movement (it dominated parts of the new of Industrial Organizations) and appealed to activists and intellectuals in building a network of front organizations that advocated policies approved by the Kremlin. Thus the League Against War and Fascism was formed in 1933 and, in 1937, became the American League for Peace and Democracy. There followed the America Youth Congress, 1934; League of American Writers, 1935; National Negro Congress, 1936; and the American Congress for Democracy and Intellectual Freedom, 1939. All had significant Communist elements, and fought furious battles with the anti-communist left.(Leuchtenburg (1963) 2813; Irving Howe, Lewis A. Coser, and Julius Jacobson, The American Communist Party: a critical history, 19191957 (1957); James R. Barrett, William Z. Foster and the Tragedy of American Radicalism (2002).)Charges of fascismIn the 1930s fascism was considered a legitimate political ideology, combining an intense, authoritarian nationalism with a economy and corporativism exemplified by the economic plans of Mussolini in Italy. Enemies of the New Deal sometimes called it fascist, but meant very different things. Communists, for example, meant control of the New Deal by big business. Classical liberals and conservatives meant control of big business by bureaucrats (also labeled with the term of socialism, as in von Mises book, The Free and Prosperous Commonwealth).Former President Herbert Hoover argued that some (but not all) New Deal programs were fascist:(Herbert Hoover, Memoirs 3:420)Among the early Roosevelt fascist measures was the National Industry Recovery Act (NRA) of June 16, 1933 .... These ideas were first suggested by Gerald Swope (of the General Electric Company)... and the United States Chamber of Commerce. During the campaign of 1932, I. Harriman, president of that body, urged that I agree to support these proposals, informing me that Mr. Roosevelt had agreed to do so. I tried to show him that this stuff was pure fascism; that it was a remaking of Mussolinis corporate state and refused to agree to any of it. He informed me that in view of my attitude, the business world would support Roosevelt with money and influence. That for the most part proved true.In 1934, Roosevelt defended himself against his critics, and attacked them in his fireside chat radio audiences. Some people, he said:will try to give you new and strange names for what we are doing. Sometimes they will call it Fascism, sometimes Communism, sometimes Regimentation, sometimes Socialism. But, in so doing, they are trying to make very complex and theoretical something that is really very simple and very practical.... Plausible self-seekers and theoretical die-hards will tell you of the loss of individual liberty. Answer this question out of the facts of your own life. Have you lost any of your rights or liberty or constitutional freedom of action and choice?(Kennedy 1999, p 246.)In September 1934, Roosevelt defended a more powerful national government which he believed was necessary to control the economy, by quoting conservative Republican Root:The tremendous power of organization had said has combined great aggregations of capital in enormous industrial establishments... so great in the mass that each individual concerned in them is quite helpless by himself.... The old reliance upon the free action of individual wills appears quite inadequate.... The intervention of that organized control we call government seems necessary.... Men may differ as to the particular form of governmental activity with respect to industry or business, but nearly all are agreed that private enterprise in times such as these cannot be left without assistance and without reasonable safeguards lest it destroy not only itself but also our process of civilization.(Other scholars reject linking the New Deal to fascism as overly simplistic. As a leading historian of fascism explains, What Fascist corporatism and the New Deal had in common was a certain amount of state intervention in the economy. Beyond that, the only figure who seemed to look on Fascist corporatism as a kind of model was Hugh Johnson, head of the National Recovery Administration,(Stanley Payne, History of Fascism (1995) p. 230.) Johnson had been distributing copies of a Fascist tract called The Corporate State by one of Mussolinis favorite economists, including giving one to Labor Secretary Perkins and asking her give copies to her cabinet.(Goldberg, Jonah. Liberal Fascism. Random House, 2008. p. 156.) Johnson strenuously denied any association with Mussolini, saying the NRA is being organized almost as you would organize a business. I want to avoid any Mussolini appearancethe President calls this Act industrial self-government.(Hugh S. Johnson, The Blue Eagle, from Egg to Earth (1935), p. 223.) Donald Richberg eventually replaced Johnson as head of NRA, and speaking before a Senate committee said A nationally economy is the only salvation of our present situation and the only hope for the future.( Historians such as Hawley (1966) have examined the origins of the NRA in detail, showing the main inspiration came from Senators Black and F. Wagner and from American business leaders such as the Chamber of Commerce. The main model was Woodrow Wilsons Industries Board, in which Johnson had been involved.The works of art and musicThe Progress Administration subsidized artists, musicians, painters and writers on relief with a group of projects called One. While the WPA program was by the most widespread, it was preceded by three programs administered by the US Treasury which hired commercial artists at usual commissions to add murals and sculptures to federal buildings. The first of these efforts was the short-lived Works of Art Project, organized by Edward Bruce, an American businessman and artist. Bruce also led the Treasury Departments of Painting and Sculpture (later renamed the Section of Fine Arts) and the Treasury Relief Art Project (TRAP). The Administration (RA) and Security Administration (FSA) had major photography programs. The New Deal arts programs emphasized regionalism, realism, conflict, proletarian interpretations, and audience participation. The unstoppable collective powers of common man, contrasted to the failure of individualism, was a favorite theme.(Mathews 1975)(William E. Leuchtenbrg. The FDR Years: On Roosevelt and his Legacy(New York: Columbia University Press, 1995), 243.)thumb|Created Equal: Act I Scene 3 Spirit of 1776: Boston (Federal Theater Project, 1935).Post Office murals and other public art, painted by artists in this time, can still be found at many locations around the U.S.(M.J.Heale. Franklin. D. Roosevelt: The New Deal and War (London, 1999)36) The New Deal particularly helped American novelists. For journalists, and the novelists who wrote non-fiction, the agencies and programs that the New Deal provided, allowed these writers to describe about what they really saw around the country.(John Braeman, Robert H. Bremner, David Brody. The New Deal: The National Level (Columbus: Ohio State University Press, 1975)310.)Many writers chose to write about the New Deal, and whether they were for or against it, and if it was helping the country out. Some of these writers were Ruth McKenney, Edmund Wilson, and Scott Fitzgerald.(John Braeman, Robert H. Bremner, David Brody. The New Deal: The National Level (Columbus: Ohio State University Press, 1975)312.) Another subject that was very popular for novelists was the condition of labor. They ranged from subjects on social protest, to strikes.(John Braeman, Robert H. Bremner, David Brody. The New Deal: The National Level (Columbus: Ohio State University Press, 1975)314.)Under the WPA, the Federal Theatre project flourished. Countless theatre productions around the country were staged. This allowed thousands of actors and directors to be employed, among them were Orson Welles, and John Huston.(The FSA photography project is most responsible for creating the image of the Depression in the U.S. Many of the images appeared in popular magazines. The photographers were under instruction from Washington as to what overall impression the New Deal wanted to give out. Director Strykers agenda focused on his faith in social engineering, the poor conditions among cotton tenant farmers, and the very poor conditions among migrant farm workers; above all he was committed to social reform through New Deal intervention in peoples lives. Stryker demanded photographs that related people to the land and vice versa because these photographs reinforced the RAs position that poverty could be controlled by changing land practices. Though Stryker did not dictate to his photographers how they should compose the shots, he did send them lists of desirable themes, such as church, court day, barns.(Cara A. Finnegan. Picturing Poverty: Print Culture and FSA Photographs (Smithsonian Books, 2003) pp 4344) Films of the late New Deal era such as Kane (1941) ridiculed so-called great men, while class warfare (typified by new taxes on the rich(William Chafe, The achievement of American liberalism: the New Deal and its legacies (2003) p. 32)) appeared in numerous movies, such as The Grapes of Wrath (1940). Thus in Capras famous films, including Smith Goes to Washington (1939), John Doe (1941) and  a Wonderful Life (1946), the common people come together to battle and overcome villains who are corrupt politicians controlled by very rich, greedy capitalists.(Harry M. Benshoff, Sean Griffin, America on film: representing race, class, gender, and sexuality at the movies (2003) pp 1724)By contrast there was also a smaller but influential stream of anti-New Deal art. Thus Borglums sculptures on Rushmore emphasized great men in history (his designs had the approval of Coolidge). Stein and Hemingway disliked the New Deal and celebrated the organic autonomy of perfected written work in opposition to the New Deal trope of writing as performative labor. The Agrarians celebrated a premodern regionalism and opposed the TVA as a modernizing, disruptive force.  Gilbert, a conservative who believed architecture should reflect historic traditions and the established social order, designed the new Supreme Court building (1935). Its classical lines and small size contrasted sharply with the gargantuan modernistic federal buildings going up in the Washington Mall that he detested.(Geoffrey Blodgett, Cass Gilbert, Architect: Conservative at Bay, Journal of American History, Dec 1985, Vol. 72 Issue 3, pp 615636 in JSTOR) Hollywood managed to synthesize liberal and conservative streams, as in Berkeleys Gold Digger musicals, where the storylines exalt individual autonomy while the spectacular musical numbers show abstract populations of interchangeable dancers securely contained within patterns beyond their control.(Szalay 2000)LegaciesImage:FDR-LBJ.png|thumb|The New Deal was the inspiration for President B. Johnsons Society in 1960s. Johnson (on right) headed the Texas NYA and was elected to Congress in 1938.Analysts agree the New Deal produced a new political coalition that sustained the Democratic Party as the majority party in national politics for more than a generation after its own end.During Roosevelts 12 years in office, there was a dramatic increase in the power of the federal government as a whole. Roosevelt also established the presidency as the prominent center of authority within the federal government. Roosevelt created a large array of agencies protecting various groups of citizens  workers, farmers, and others  who suffered from the crisis, and thus enabled them to challenge the powers of the corporations. In this way, the Roosevelt Administration generated a set of political ideas  known as New Deal liberalism  that remained a source of inspiration and controversy for decades and that helped shape the next great experiment in liberal reform, the Great Society of the 1960s.The wartime FEPC executive orders that forbade job discrimination against African Americans, women, and ethnic groups was a major breakthrough that brought better jobs and pay to millions of minority Americans. Historians usually treat FEPC as part of the war effort and not part of the New Deal itself.Political metaphorSince 1933, politicians and pundits have often called for a new deal regarding an object. That is, they demand a completely new, large-scale approach to a project. As Arthur A. Ekirch Jr. (1971) has shown, the New Deal stimulated utopianism in American political and social thought on a wide range of issues. In Canada, Conservative Prime Minister Richard B. Bennett in 1935 proposed a new deal of regulation, taxation, and social insurance that was a copy of the American program; Bennetts proposals were not enacted, and he was defeated for reelection in October 1935. In accordance with the rise of the use of U.S. political phraseology in Britain, the Labour Government of Blair has termed some of its employment programs new deal, in contrast to the Conservative Partys promise of the British Dream.New Deal ProgramsThe New Deal had many programs and new agencies, most of which were universally known by their initials. They included the following. Most were abolished during World War II; others remain in operation today:*Finance Corporation (RFC) a Hoover agency expanded under Holman Jones to make large loans to big business. Ended in 1954.*Emergency Relief Administration (FERA) a Hoover program to create unskilled jobs for relief; replaced by WPA in 1935.*States bank holiday, 1933: closed all banks until they became certified by federal reviewers*Abandonment of standard, 1933: gold reserves no longer backed currency; still exists*Conservation Corps (CCC), 19331942: employed young men to perform unskilled work in rural areas; under States Army supervision; separate program for Native Americans*Homeowners Loan Corporation (HOLC) helped people keep their homes, the government bought properties from the bank allowing people to pay the government instead of the banks in installments they could afford, keeping people in their homes and banks afloat.*Valley Authority (TVA), 1933: effort to modernize very poor region (most of Tennessee), centered on dams that generated electricity on the River; still exists*Adjustment Act (AAA), 1933: raised farm prices by cutting total farm output of major crops and livestock; replaced by a new AAA because the Supreme Court ruled it unconstitutional.*Industrial Recovery Act (NIRA), 1933: industries set up codes to reduce unfair competition, raise wages and prices; ended 1935. The US Supreme Court ruled the NIRA unconstitutional*Works Administration (PWA), 1933: built large public works projects; used private contractors (did not directly hire unemployed). Ended 1938.*Deposit Insurance Corporation (FDIC) insures bank deposits and supervises state banks; still exists* Act regulates investment banking; repealed 1999*Act of 1933, created the SEC, 1933: codified standards for sale and purchase of stock, required awareness of investments to be accurately disclosed; still exists*Works Administration (CWA), 193334: provided temporary jobs to millions of unemployed*Reorganization Act, 1934: moved away from assimilation; policy dropped*Social Security Act (SSA), 1935: provided financial assistance to: elderly, handicapped, paid for by employee and employer payroll contributions; required 7 years contributions, so first payouts were in 1942; still exists*Progress Administration (WPA), 1935: a national labor program for more than 2 million unemployed; created useful construction work for unskilled men; also sewing projects for women and arts projects for unemployed artists, musicians and writers; ended 1943.*Labor Relations Act (NLRA) / Wagner Act, 1935: set up National Labor Relations Board to supervise labor-management relations; In the 1930s, it strongly favored labor unions. Modified by the Act (1947); still exists*Reorganization Bill, 1937: gave the President power to appoint a new Supreme Court judge for every judge 70 years or older; failed to pass Congress*Crop Insurance Corporation (FCIC), 1938: Insures crops and livestock against loss of production or revenue. Was restructured during the creation of the Management Agency in 1996 but continues to exist.thumb*Surplus Commodities Program (1936); gives away food to poor; still exists as Food Stamp Program*Labor Standards Act 1938: established a maximum normal work week of 44 hours and a wage of 40 cents/hour and outlawed most forms of child labor; still exists, hours have been lowered to 40 hours over the years.*Electrification Administration, (REA)one of the federal executive departments of the United States government charged with providing public utilities (electricity, telephone, water, sewer) to rural areas in the U.S. via public-private partnerships. still exists.*Administration (RA), Resettled poor tenant farmers; replaced by Farm Security Administration in 1935.*Security Administration (FSA), Helped poor farmers by a variety of economic and educational programs; still exists as Farmers Home Administration.Depression statisticsMost indexes worsened until the summer of 1932, which may be called the low point of the depression economically and psychologically.(Mitchell, p. 404.) Economic indicators show the American economy reached nadir in summer 1932 to February 1933, then began recovering until the recession of 19371938. Thus the Federal Reserve Production Index hit its low of 52.8 on 1932-07-01 and was practically unchanged at 54.3 on 1933-03-01; however by 1933-07-01, it reached 85.5 (with 193539  100, and for comparison 2005  1,342).()In Roosevelts 12 years in office, the economy had an 8.5% compound annual growth of GDP,(Historical Statistics of the United States (1976) series F31) the highest growth rate in the history of any industrial country,(Angus Maddison, The World Economy: Historical Statistics (OECD 2003); Japan is close, see p 174) however, recovery was slow; by 1939, Domestic Product (GDP) per adult was still 27% below trend.(*(1) in 1929 dollars*(2) 193539  100*Darby counts WPA workers as employed; Lebergott as unemployed*Source: Historical Statistics US (1976) series D-86; Smiley 1983(Smiley, Gene, Recent Unemployment Rate Estimates for the 1920s and 1930s, Journal of Economic History, June 1983, 43, 48793.)Relief statisticsSee also*West Virginia, New Deal planned community.*group democracy*Liberalism*in the United States*economy*liberalism in the United States*liberalism*safety net*New Deal and the arts in New Mexico*of the Great Depression*States welfare state*Welfare*economics*stateReferencesFurther reading*Alswang, John. The New Deal and American Politics (1978), voting analysis*Alter, Jonathan. The Defining Moment: FDRs Hundred Days and the Triumph of Hope (2006), popular account*Badger, Anthony J. The New Deal: The Depression Years, 19331940. (2002) general survey from British perspective*Badger, Anthony J. FDR: The First Hundred Days (2008)*Badger, Anthony J. New Deal / New South: An Anthony J. Badger Reader (2007)*Beasley, Maurine H., Holly C. Shulman, Henry R. Beasley. The Eleanor Roosevelt Encyclopedia (2001)*Bernstein, Barton J. The New Deal: The Conservative Achievements of Liberal Reform. In Barton J. Bernstein, ed., Towards a New Past: Dissenting Essays in American History, pp. 26388. (1968), an influential New Left attack on the New Deal.*Bernstein, Irving. Turbulent Years: A History of the American Worker, 19331941 (1970), cover labor unions*Best, Gary Dean. The Critical Press and the New Deal: The Press Versus Presidential Power, 19331938 (1993) ISBN 027594350X*Best, Gary Dean. Pride, Prejudice, and Politics: Roosevelt Versus Recovery, 19331938. (1990) ISBN 0275935248*Best, Gary Dean. Retreat from Liberalism: Collectivists versus Progressives in the New Deal Years (2002) ISBN 0275946568*Blumberg Barbara. The New Deal and the Unemployed: The View from New York City (1977).*Brands, H.W. Traitor to His Class: The Privileged Life and Radical Presidency of Franklin Delano Roosevelt (2008)*Bremer William W. Along the American Way: The New Deals Work Relief Programs for the Unemployed. Journal of American History 62 (December 1975): 636652. online at JSTOR in most academic libraries*Brock William R. Welfare, Democracy and the New Deal (1988), a British view*Brinkley, Alan. The End Of Reform: New Deal Liberalism in Recession and War. (1995) what happened after 1937*Burns, Helen M. The American Banking Community and New Deal Banking Reforms, 19331935 (1974)*Chafe, William H. ed. The Achievement of American Liberalism: The New Deal and its Legacies (2003)*Charles, Searle F. Minister of Relief: Harry Hopkins and the Depression (1963)*Cobb, James and Michael Namaroto, eds. The New Deal and the South (1984).*Cohen, Adam, Nothing to Fear: FDRs Inner Circle and the Hundred Days that Created Modern America (2009)*Conkin, Paul K. The New Deal. (1967), a brief New Left critique.* Conklin, Paul K. The Myth of New Deal Radicalism. In Myth America: A Historical Anthology, Volume II. 1997. Gerster, Patrick, and Cords, Nicholas. (editors.) Brandywine Press, ISBN 1-881-089-97-5* Domhoff, G. William,  and Michael J. Webber. Class and Power in the New Deal: Corporate Moderates, Southern Democrats, and the Liberal-Labor Coalition (Stanford University Press; 2011) 304 pages; uses class dominance theory to examine the Agricultural Adjustment Act, the National Labor Relations Act, and the Social Security Act.*Dubofsky, Melvyn, ed. The New Deal: Conflicting Interpretations and Shifting Perspectives. (1992), reader*Eden, Robert, ed. New Deal and Its Legacy: Critique and Reappraisal (1989), essays by scholars*Ekirch Jr., Arthur A. Ideologies and Utopias: The Impact of the New Deal on American Thought (1971)*Folsom, Burton. New Deal or Raw Deal? : How FDRs Economic Legacy has Damaged America (2008) ISBN 1416592229*Fraser, Steve and Gary Gerstle, eds., The Rise and Fall of the New Deal Order, (1989), essays focused on the long-term results.*Garraty, John A. The New Deal, National Socialism, and the Great Depression, American Historical Review, 78, 4 (1973), pp. 90744. in JSTOR*Goldman, Eric F. Rendezvous with Destiny: A History of Modern American Reform. New York: Alfred A. Knopf (1952) ISBN 1566633699*Gordon, Colin. New Deals: Business, Labor, and Politics, 19201935 (1994)*Graham, Otis L. and Meghan Robinson Wander, eds. Franklin D. Roosevelt: His Life and Times. (1985). An encyclopedic reference.*Grant, Michael Johnston. Down and Out on the Family Farm: Rural Rehabilitation in the Great Plains, 19291945 (2002)*Hawley, Ellis W. The New Deal and the Problem of Monopoly (1966)*Higgs, Robert. Crisis and Leviathan: Critical Episodes in the Growth of American Government (1987), libertarian critique*Howard, Donald S. The WPA and Federal Relief Policy (1943)*Huibregtse, Jon R. American Railroad Labor and the Genesis of the New Deal, 19191935; (University Press of Florida; 2010; 172 pages)*Ingalls, Robert P. Herbert H. Lehman and New Yorks Little New Deal (1975)*Jensen, Richard J. The Causes and Cures of Unemployment in the Great Depression, Journal of Interdisciplinary History 19 (1989) 55383. in JSTOR*Kennedy, David M., What the New Deal Did, Political Science Quarterly, 124 (Summer 2009), 25168.*Kennedy, David M. Freedom From Fear: The American People in Depression and War, 19291945. (1999), survey*Kirkendall, Richard S. The New Deal As Watershed: The Recent Literature, The Journal of American History, Vol. 54, No. 4. (Mar., 1968), pp. 839852. in JSTOR, historiography*Ladd, Everett Carll and Charles D. Hadley. Transformations of the American Party System: Political Coalitions from the New Deal to the 1970s (1975), voting behavior*Leff, Mark H. The Limits of Symbolic Reform: The New Deal and Taxation (1984)*Leuchtenburg, William E. Franklin D. Roosevelt and the New Deal, 19321940. (1963). A standard interpretive history.*Lindley, Betty Grimes and Ernest K. Lindley. A New Deal for Youth: The Story of the National Youth Administration (1938)*Lowitt, Richard. The New Deal and the West (1984).*McElvaine Robert S. The Great Depression 2nd ed (1993), social history*Neil M. Maher, Natures New Deal: The Civilian Conservation Corps and the Roots of the American Environmental Movement (New York: Oxford University Press, 2008).*Manza; Jeff. Political Sociological Models of the U.S. New Deal Annual Review of Sociology: 2000, 26 (2000): 297322.*Mathews, Jane De Hart. Arts and the People: The New Deal Quest for a Cultural Democracy, Journal of American History 62 (1975): 31639, in JSTOR*Malamud; Deborah C. Who They Areor Were: Middle-Class Welfare in the Early New Deal University of Pennsylvania Law Review v 151 #6 2003. pp 2019+.*McKinzie, Richard. The New Deal for Artists (1984), well illustrated scholarly study*Meriam; Lewis. Relief and Social Security The Brookings Institution. 1946. Highly detailed analysis and statistical summary of all New Deal relief programs*Milkis, Sidney M. and Jerome M. Mileur, eds. The New Deal and the Triumph of Liberalism (2002)*Mitchell, Broadus. Depression Decade: From New Era through New Deal, 19291941 (1947), survey by economic historian*Parker, Randall E. Reflections on the Great Depression (2002) interviews with 11 leading economists*Patterson, James T. The New Deal and the States: Federalism in Transition (Princeton UP, 1969).* Pederson, William D. ed. A Companion to Franklin D. Roosevelt (Blackwell Companions to American History) (2011); 35 essays by scholars; many deal with politics*Powell, Jim FDRs Folly: How Roosevelt and His New Deal Prolonged the Great Depression (2003) ISBN 0761501657*Polenberg, Richard. The Era of Franklin D. Roosevelt 19331945 A Brief History with Documents ISBN 0312133103*Rosenof, Theodore. Economics in the Long Run: New Deal Theorists and Their Legacies, 19331993 (1997)*Rosen, Elliot A. Roosevelt, the Great Depression, and the Economics of Recovery (2005) ISBN 0813923689*http://www.mises.org/rothbard/agd.pdf Murray. Great Depression (1963).*Saloutos, Theodore. The American Farmer and the New Deal (1982).*Savage, James D. Balanced Budgets & American Politics. Cornell University Press. 1988.*Schlesinger, Arthur M. Jr., The Age of Roosevelt, 3 vols, (19571960), the classic narrative history.*Shlaes, Amity. The Forgotten Man: A New History of the Great Depression (2007) ISBN 0066211700*Singleton, Jeff. The American Dole: Unemployment Relief and the Welfare State in the Great Depression (2000)*Sitkoff, Harvard. A New Deal for Blacks: The Emergence of Civil Rights as a National Issue: The Depression Decade (2008)*Sitkoff, Harvard. ed. Fifty Years Later: The New Deal Evaluated. (1984). A friendly liberal evaluation.*Skocpol, Theda, and Kenneth Finegold. State Capacity and Economic Intervention in the Early New Deal. Political Science Quarterly 97 (1982): 25578. Online at JSTOR.*Skocpol, Theda, and Kenneth Finegold. Explaining New Deal Labor Policy American Political Science Reform (1977) 84:12971304 in JSTOR*Smith, Jason Scott. Building New Deal Liberalism: The Political Economy of Public Works, 19331956 (2005).*Sternsher, Bernard ed., Hitting Home: The Great Depression in Town and Country (1970), essays by scholars on local history*Szalay, Michael. New Deal Modernism: American Literature and the Invention of the Welfare State (2000)*Tindall George B. The Emergence of the New South, 19151945 (1967). survey of entire South*Trout Charles H. Boston, the Great Depression, and the New Deal (1977)**Ware, Susan. Beyond Suffrage: Women and the New Deal (1981)*Wecter, Dixon. The Age of the Great Depression, 19291941 (1948), social history*Zelizer; Julian E. The Forgotten Legacy of the New Deal: Fiscal Conservatism and the Roosevelt Administration, 19331938 Presidential Studies Quarterly . Volume: 30. Issue: 2. pp: 331+. (2000)Primary sources*Bureau of the Census, Statistical Abstract of the United States: 1951 (1951) full of useful data; online*Bureau of the Census, Historical Statistics of the United States: Colonial Times to 1970 (1976)*Cantril, Hadley and Mildred Strunk, eds. Public Opinion, 19351946 (1951), massive compilation of many public opinion polls*Carter, Susan B. et al. eds. The Historical Statistics of the United States (6 vol: Cambridge UP, 2006); huge compilation of statistical data; online at some universities*Gallup, George Horace, ed. The Gallup Poll; Public Opinion, 19351971 3 vol (1972) summarizes results of each poll.*Lowitt, Richard and Beardsley Maurice, eds. One Third of a Nation: Lorena Hickock Reports on the Great Depression (1981)*Moley, Raymond. After Seven Years (1939), conservative memoir by ex-Brain Truster*Nixon, Edgar B. ed. Franklin D. Roosevelt and Foreign Affairs (3 vol 1969), covers 193337. 2nd series 193739 available on microfiche and in a 14 vol print edition at some academic libraries.*Roosevelt, Franklin D.; Rosenman, Samuel Irving, ed. The Public Papers and Addresses of Franklin D. Roosevelt (13 vol, 1938, 1945); public material only (no letters); covers 19281945.*Zinn, Howard, ed. New Deal Thought (1966), a compilation of primary sources.External links*The Smithsonian American Art Museums Exhibition 1934: A New Deal for Artists*The New Deal Original reports and pictures from The Times*Art, Culture, and Government: The New Deal at 75 of Congress, Folklife Center Documentation of March 1314, 2008 Symposium including webcasts of presentations*Hannsgen, Greg E.and  Papadimitriou, Dimitri B.Lessons from the New Deal: Did the New Deal Prolong or Worsen the Great Depression? Working Paper No. 581, The Levy Economics Institute of Bard College. October 2009*Californias Living New Deal Project, database of the lasting effects of the New Deal in California  DealDealDealDealkurssDealDealDealDealDealDealDealkursskursasDeal (VS)DealDeal (VS)ja:DealDealDealDeal DealDealdelDealDealDealsch kinh t mi (Hoa K)zh:
19288257
Santa_Brbara,_Chihuahua
footnotes                Santa Brbara is a city and seat of the municipality of Santa Brbara, in the northern state of Chihuahua. As of 2005, the city had a total population of 8,673.(Nacional de Estadstica y Geografa. Principales resultados por localidad 2005 (ITER). Retrieved on October 19, 2008) HistorySanta Brbara, Chihuahua, was established in 1567 by Spanish conquistador Rodrigo del Rio de Losa during the rule of de Ibarra, governor of the state of Vizcaya. The Indians in the region when the Spanish arrived were the Chichimecas who were described as naked barbarians, very poor and having nothing to eat except roots and prickly pears.(Simmons, Marc, The Last Conquistador: Juan de Onate and the Settling of the Far Southwest. Norman: U of OK Press, 1991,49) The Spanish were attracted to the region by discoveries of silver and Santa Barbara grew from a population of 30 in 1575 to 7,000 in 1600. It was the northernmost outpost of Espana in the 16th century. Santa Barbara became a wealthy frontier town of slavers, ranchers, miners, adventurers, and priests.(Hammond, George P. and Rey, Agapito, The Rediscovery of New Mexico, 1580-1594.  Albuquerque: U of NM Press, 1966, 4-5)   Santa Barbara is located on a tributary of the River and was the jumping off spot for several expeditions to Mexico including Chamuscado and Rodriguez in 1581-1582, de Espejo in 1582-1583, and de Onate in 1597.(Simmons, 50, 54, 86)     On December 17, 1930, the town was designated a city by an act of the legislature. Today, Santa Barbara is overshadowed by nearby Parral but the extensive mine tailings tell of its former prominence.(Hammond and Rey, 6)   EconomyThe municipality produces wood products and nuts from trees such as walnuts, mesquite, junipers, acamos, gatuos, willows and madroos. Fruits grown in the region are peach, pear and apple. These products are being sold worldwide. The city also continues to rely on mining of lead, silver, gold, zinc, fluorite and other minerals. Lead is now the most important mineral produced in this city. The mines collectively occupy 7,180 hectares of the municipality. Tourist attractionsTourists visit caves, mountain ranges, and other natural attraction in the region.  The caves have ancient paintings on the cave walls made by early indigenous people who resided here long before the arrival of the Spaniards. ReferencesBrbara (Chihuahua)Brbara (Chihuahua)Brbara (Mxico)()
19309904
Cwmystwyth_Mines
Cwmystwyth mines are located in Cwmystwyth, Ceredigion, Wales.  Mining heritageCwm Ystwyth  is considered the most important non-ferrous metal mining site in Wales providing a premier example of mining heritage in Ceredigion. Within the site there is evidence for all phases of mining activity; from the Age, through the medieval period, to its revival in the 18th century and the peak of activity with a subsequent decline in the late 19th and the early 20th century. It has been designated as a Ancient Monument.(Cwmystwyth Lead Mine) The site also features prominently in the Upland Ceredigion Landscape of Historic Interest.HistorySilver, lead and zinc have been mined in the valley of the Ystwyth since Roman times, an activity that reached its peak in the 18th century. The largest of the very many mines was Cwmystwyth Mine. It is reputed that the average age at death of the miners in Cwmystwyth was 32, largely because of acute poisoning. There is no longer any active metal mining in the Ystwyth valley.Water useWater was extensively used during the silver and lead mining process to extract the ore. In the case of Cwm Ystwyth mine, much of the water was brought in by contour hugging leats from several miles upstream. The channel of the leat can still be followed on the hillside and is clearly visible from the road on the opposite side of the valley. Much of the water was used for hushing, prospecting and working the ore in the open.Banc Tynddl sun-discIn October 2002 the Tynddl sun-disc was discovered on the mining site.  The disc is over 4,000 years old, which makes it the earliest gold artifact discovered in Wales.GalleryImage:Main building of Cwm Ystwyth lead mine-by-Rudi-Winter.jpg|Main building of Cwmystwyth lead mineImage:Graig y Ddalfa at Cwmystwyth lead mines-by-Rudi-Winter.jpg|Graig y Ddalfa at Cwmystwyth lead minesImage:Craig-y-Ddolfa-by-Phil-Berry.jpg|Old mine workings below Craig-y-Ddolfa, east of CwmystwythImage:Cwmystwyth Mine m01.jpg|Abandoned building, old lead mine, Cwmystwyth.File:Cwm Ystwyth Mine with leat010.jpg |View of the mine workings with one of the many leats in the foregroundImage:Cwm Ystwyth Mine 013.jpg||Cwmystwyth Mine from the hill-side immediately above the mine. Winter in 1985 when many buildings were still standingFootnotesReferences*Register of Landscapes of Outstanding Historic Interest in Wales, Cadw (Cardiff, 1998), pp. 12-16.*For a comprehensive account of the mine during the historic period, see Hughes, Simon J., The Cwmystwyth Mines, (2nd edn., Talybont, 1993);*Prehistoric period, see Timberlake, S. and Mighall, T., Historic and Prehistoric Mining on Copa Hill, Archaeology in Wales, 32 (1992), pp. 38-44.*Cambrian Mountains: Metal Mines Project, by Brian Clouston and Partners, and Parkman Consulting Engineers, (unpublished report to Dyfed County Council, December 1988)*  * * Timberlake, S. 2002 a Medieval lead smelting boles near Penguelan, Cwmystwyth, Archaeology in Wales 42: 45-59*  2002 b Cwmystwyth, Banc Tynddl: gold disc, AW 42, 97-98 Timberlake, S. 2003 Excavations on Copa Hill, Cwmystwyth (19861999); An Early Bronze Age copper mine within the uplands of Central Wales. BAR British Series 348 Oxford: Archaeopress.* Timberlake, S., A. Gwilt & M. Davis. In prep. The Banc Tynddl Gold Disc. The Proceedings of the Prehistoric Society.*  External links 
19322335
Night_Sky_Mine
Night Sky Mine is a 1997 fiction novel by Melissa Scott set in a future after computer programs have run amok.  After the Crash, an interface has been created that portrays programs as various floral, faunal and mythological species, depending on the characteristics of the program.  Ms. Scott explores this interface between human society and cyberspace, both as a plot device and as back drop for the story.Ista Kelly was the sole survivor of a pirate raid on a Night Sky mining platform that was searching a remote region of space for useful gases.  Now a teenager, she is appenticed to become a hypothecary with the tools and skills to explore and harvest the hammals, floral and faunal programs of cyberspace.  She must navigate the complex relationships among Company, Union, and merchant Travellers as she becomes enmeshed in an undercover operation that could hold the keys to her identity and the mysterious happenings on the computer Net.References*Hays, Carl. Adult books: Fiction. Booklist 92.22 (Aug. 1996): 1889.*Hamburger, Susan. Book reviews: Fiction. Library Journal 121.13 (Aug. 1996): 119.*Steinberg, Sybil S. Forecasts: Fiction. Publishers Weekly 243.30 (22 July 1996): 230.
19347181
Savage_Moon
input  GamepadSavage Moon is a 3 and PSP defense game which sees the player protecting a remote, off-world mining facility from constant attack by Insectocytes, a type of carnivorous creature inhabiting the planets.  The mission is to strategically place an array of upgradeable, defensive weapons in the way of the bugs.  There is a range of towers, from rapid-fire machine guns to support towers such as the chaos tower.  The developers describe the strategy as;In keeping with the xeno-biological theme, the Insectocytes evolve throughout the game, with each wave becoming tougher, and the creatures mutating into new forms to meet the human threat. In response to this, the player needs to research and deploy new forms of technology to meet the escalation of bug toughness. The strategy of the game is a mix of open and directed levels  in some levels the player can place towers to herd the Insectocytes into their cross-fire.(http://blog.us.playstation.com/2009/01/28/savage-moon-coming-to-psn-tomorrow/ Savage Moon Coming to PSN Tomorrow! (Sony Blog)) The game was released for download from European PSN on December 24, 2008 and in North America on January 29, 2009.(http://www.ps3fanboy.com/2008/12/24/european-psn-releases-for-december-24th/)Level NamesThe game is divided into nebulae, each of which has 4 levels (moons). The game uses names in an alphabetical order rather than numbers to indicate the levels. Each nebula and moon is named after a mythical creatures, deity or figures from ancient history;*Nebula: Xipe - Full name Totec was, in Aztec mythology, a life-death-rebirth deity, god of agriculture, vegetation, the east, disease, spring, goldsmiths, silversmiths and the seasons.**Agamemnon - Agamemnon was the commander of the Achaeans (Greeks) during the Trojan War.**Baxajuan - In Basque mythology, the basajaun (plural: baxajaunak) are a race of large hairy wild men who were megalith builders.**Cerberus - Three headed-dog that guards the gates to Hades in Greek mythology.**Duergar - are a race of ugly dwarfs, particularly associated with the Simonside Hills of Northumberland, in northern England.*Nebula: Ymir - was the founder of the race of frost giants and an important figure in Norse cosmology.**Einherjar - The Norse name for lone fighters are those that have died in battle and are brought to Valhalla by valkyries.**Fenrir - A monstrous wolf from Norse mythology.**Ghede - Full name Nibo, is a spirit or Lwa in the Haitian Vodou religion.**Hyperion - Is the Titan son of Gaia (Earth) and Uranus (Sky) in Greek mythology.*Nebula: Zeus - The father of the Gods in Greek mythology.**Incubus - A demon in male form supposed to lie upon sleepers and seduce them.**Jikininki - In Japanese Buddhism these are the spirits of greedy, selfish or impious individuals who are cursed after death to seek out and eat human corpses.**Kitsune - Intelligent fox-like spirits that possess magical abilities from Japanese folklore.**Lotan - The seven-headed sea serpent or dragon of Ugaritic myths.PreviewsThe game received a good response from a number of the top game websites when shown at games shows:* This sounds like it could be a very entertaining action/strategy title, and another good one for the Store. PSX Extreme(http://www.psxextreme.com/ps3-news/3645.html SCEE Reveals Savage Moon For PS3)* For those of you that were curious as to what the mysterious Savage Moon would entail, Sony did not disappoint when revealing the game in Leipzig today. PlayStation Universe(http://www.psu.com/Leipzig--Savage-Moon-finally-revealed--a0004575-p0.php Leipzig: Savage Moon finally revealed)ReviewsThe game has received a good response from a number of computer game websites:* Savage Moon, from little known Bristol developer FluffyLogic, is about as good as its going to get for just over six quid on PSN. Videogamer.com (awarded 8/10)(http://www.videogamer.com/ps3/savage_moon/review.html Savage Moon Review on Videogamer.com)*Graphically, its one of the better-looking titles on the PSN, but its certainly not the best. The games messy landscapes are pardoned by cool sci-fi towers and a range of weird, Starship Troopers-esque alien designs...Savage Moon is a quality Store title that deserves recognition.. Play Magazine (awarded 86%)(http://www.play-mag.co.uk/ps3/games/savage_moon/savage_moon.html Play Magazine Savage Moon Review)*Unlike many other defense games, Savage Moon conveys a sense of ballistic punishment to its convoy or marauders. Later levels offer different texture maps to offer variety to the extraterrestrial skirmishes. The games sound effects portray an effectively bleak environment peppered with the thunder of war and cry of dying beasts. tech-gaming.com (awarded B+)(http://tech-gaming.com/2009/01/13/one-small-step-for-gaming-savage-moon-reviewed.aspx tech-gaming.com Savage Moon Review)*Savage Moon is an entertaining game which has a good difficulty curve, adequate visuals and entertaining gameplay. Worth a look. futuregamez.net (awarded 76%)(http://www.futuregamez.net/ps3gameso/savagemoon/review.html futuregamez.net Savage Moon Review)*You cannot compare Savage Moon to any other tower defense games currently available on other platforms. It delivers a unique combat system and a large selection of different types of enemy waves. If youre a tower defense fan, youll find Savage Moon very entertaining. Build turrets, kill incoming enemies, upgrade your guns and kill some more! nextgn.com (awarded 88%)(http://www.nextgn.com/2009/01/27/savage-moon-review/ nextgn.com Savage Moon Review)*Savage Moon costs just $9.99 on the PlayStation Store, and it is well worth the price for tower defense fans, as well as gamers new to the genre. PS3Center.net (awarded 8/10)(http://www.ps3center.net/article/244/savage-moon-review/ PS3Center.net Savage Moon Review)Waldgeist (PS3 Extra Content)On the 6th August 2009 the first DLC for the title as released called Waldgeist - the German name for a forest spirit.  The developers build on the ideas of evolution and adaptation, remarking;As the Insectocytes have evolved, so new threats have surfaced: the Death Blossom Insectocyte; a deadly evolution that carries within itself a payload of beautiful but lethal missiles.  It responds to being in range of towers it considers a threat by detonating itself and launching its cruel cargo.  A new sub-species of Insectocytes have emerged using photochromic biological adaptations, similar to those found on native Terran species such as the chameleon or the cuttlefish. They have acquired the ability to adapt their skin colour across a wide spread of the electromagnetic spectrum, rendering them invisible to all normal towers targeting systems.(http://www.fluffylogic.net/waldgeist-released)The game continued the idea of naming the levels after mythical creatures, deity or figures from ancient history;*Nebula: Waldgeist - the German name for a forest spirit.**Menja - One of two female slave giantesses from the Old Norse poem Grottasngr.**Niht - Is Germanic mythology she is the Goddess of Night.**Odin - Is considered the chief god in Norse paganism. He is associated with wisdom, war, battle, and death, and also magic, poetry, prophecy, victory, and the hunt.**Pugot Also known as the decapitated one is a mythical fiend that is found in the Ilocos region of the Philippines.**Qiqirn - In Inuit mythology, Qiqirn is a large, frightening, bald dog spirit.**Rabisu - In Akkadian mythology Rabisu (the vagabond) is an evil vampiric spirit or demon.In 2010 the soundtrack to the DLC of Savage Moon: Waldgeist - also composed by Elsaesser, was nominated for Best Original Video Game Score in the 55th Novello Awards.(http://www.fluffylogic.net/savage-moon-waldgeist-nominated-55th-ivor-novello-awards).  This was the first year that music from games was given a category in the awards.The Hera Campaign (PSP)On the 22nd December 2009 a new game set in the same universe and featuring some of the same units and towers was released titled The Hera Campaign;Savage Moon: The Hera Campaign (named after the Aegophagus or goat eating aspect of the Greek goddess of the same name) is set within a huge gathering of Imoons, the Hera Cluster, that drifted into human space. Preliminary intelligence suggests that it consists of, at least, 20 Imoons populated by a rich variety of Insectocyte forms, some of which we have encountered before and some of which are new.(http://blog.eu.playstation.com/2009/12/15/savage-moon-the-hera-campaign-%E2%80%93-invading-your-psp-this-december/)The PSP game also carried on the naming the levels after mythical creatures, deity or figures from ancient history.  Most of the names appear to come from Mayan mythology.(http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_Maya_gods_and_supernatural_beings);*Hera - In Greek mythology, Hera was the wife and older sister of Zeus.**Ahpuch - Is a from the pantheon of Death Gods.**Bacab - The name for four deities of the interior of the earth and its water deposits.**Cizin- A god of death who lived in Metnal.**Dzahui - In Mixtec mythology, Dzahui or Dzavui was the god of rain.**Ekchuah - The patron god of warriors and merchants.**Fext - Fext is a mythical undead creature in Slavic mythology. It is said that the Fext is invincible to bullets, except bullets made of glass. **Gukumatz - Feathered Snake god and creator.**Hun-nal-ye - Hieroglyphic reading of the name of the Classic Maya maize god.**Ixchel - Jaguar goddess of midwifery and medicine.**Jentil - These were a race of giants in the Basque mythology.**Kauil - Believed to be a Mayan deity representing lightning.**Lubaantun - A pre-Columbian ruined city of the Maya civilization in southern Belize, Central America.**Mextli - A god of the moon and was born fully armed as a warrior. **Nohochacyum - A creator god, most important deity of the Lacandon. His name means Our True Lord.**Oxlahuntiku - Thirteen Gods, possibly sky gods, opposed to the Bolontiku (a group of nine underworld gods).**Patecatl - A god of healing and fertility, and the discoverer of peyote.**Qaholom - One of the second set of Mayan creator gods.**Rougarou - A legendary creature in Laurentian French communities linked to European notions of the werewolf.**Simbi - In Haitian Vodou, Simbi is a large family of serpent Loa (Vodoun spirits) from the West Central Africa/Kongo region.**Tepeu - A sky god and one of the creator deities who participated in all three attempts at creating humanity.ReferencesExternal links*FluffyLogicexclusius per PlayStation 3
19363129
Germanism_(linguistics)
A Germanism is a loan word or other loan element borrowed from German for use in some other language. Linguistic domains * The military or public administration** Russian picruteny (, from German Spieruten(-laufen)), the gauntlet)** English blitz (from German Blitz(-krieg), lit. lightning-fast war)* German culture (or concepts that were first made notable in a German context)** French le  waldsterben (from German Waldsterben dieback)** English uses of gemuetlichkeit, wanderlust or schadenfreudeTechnology and engineering have also provided Germanisms, as in the English bremsstrahlung (a form of radiation), or the French schnorchel (literally, submarine snorkel, a type of air-intake device for submarine engines). Examples in different languages AfrikaansIn Afrikaans, a colloquial term for ethnic Germans is aberjetze, from German aber jetzt! (come on, now!), possibly due to the frequent use of that phrase by German farmers or overseers in exhorting their workers. Albanian Albanian has many loan words brought back from Germany by migrant workers. Krikll for beer mug, for example, is borrowed from the German term Krgel. The German word Schalter has been borrowed in both its meanings ((office) counter and (electric) switch) as Albanian shalter.  Arabic In the early 20th Century German film directors participated in the creation of the Egyptian cinema and usually concluded their work with the word fertig (done). Their local staff kept that word in the form ferkish and soon used it in other contexts.In connection with the football World Cup the German team is called farik el Mannschaft with the German Mannschaft meaning team  wherein farik is already the Arabic term for team and is supplemented by the article el. When at the football World Cup of 2006 the German team lost to Italy, a saying went el Mannschaft khessret! (The Mannschaft lost!)In Sudan, the German word Kollege (colleague) acquired a very unusual importance. There it means straw, which was bound to a bundle for drying. The background to this important change is that colleagues are seen in the context of staying closely together. Bassa In Bassa, a tribal language in Cameroon, the word for train station is banop from the German Bahnhof, which recalls the Germans building the first railway in their former colony. Belarusian In the heyday of the League (14th century), trade and administration in Belarus were strongly influenced by Germans. This show words such as yn () from German Zins for interest, handal () from German Handel for trade and tempel () from German Stempel for rubber stamp. Other examples are hieeft () from German Geschft for Business and falava () from German flschen for counterfeiting. Bosnian Bosnian has a number of loanwords from German: lager (hit, from Schlager), minka (make-up, from Schminke), najder (tailor, from Schneider), unka (ham, from Schinken) etc. In the Bosnian language rikverc means the reverse gear of a vehicle that is best to be rostfraj, stainless. The German equivalents are rckwrts and rostfrei respectively. Bulgarian German words which were adopted into the Bulgarian language include , drill, from German Bohrmaschine, , exhaust pipe from Auspuff,  from Schiebedach and in the skiing sport the term , which is the same as the English schuss, was adopted from Schussfahrt, a steep and fast ride downhill.Even the German word Anzug, suit, is used in Bulgarian. However, it means tracksuit there. Chinese One of the very few German loan words in Chinese is the word for drain covers, Gullideckel in German. The common Chinese term for rain water hole,  , yushuikou,  is called guli, , in the Qingdao form  contrary to the rest of China. The Chinese learned of storm drains for a city sewage in the German lease area of Jiaozhou. The approximately 40 German loan words that are in use in Qingdao still include the word , daman, for Damen, ladies with  meaning Jiaozhou-women. Croatian File:Tomato grass backdrop.jpg|thumb|Rajice or paradajz (Paradeiser, tomato)In the Austro-Hungarian monarchy, typical Austrian German words such as paradajz (Paradeiser meaning from paradise, for tomato, the verbatim translation rajica is increasingly used), pajza (Speise, food), knedli (Kndel, dumplings), Putar (butter, actually maslac), ribizli (Ribisel, currants), nicla (Schnitzel, pieces or chips, actually odrezak), Fijaker (Fiaker, Fiacre), foranga (Vorhnge, curtains), herceg (Herzog, Duke), majstor (Meister, master) or tiljar (Tischler, carpenter, actually postolar).Similarly, names such as pleh (Blech, tin), cajger (Zeiger, pointer), aga (Sge, saw), alter (Schalter, switch), rafciger (Schraubenzieher, screwdriver, actually odvija) or curik or rikverc (Zurck, back or rckwrts backwards, for the reverse gear) are common in Croatia. Especially in the technical fields there are almost no phonetic differences with the German words, and most Croats understand these without good language skills in German.Very rarely, the terms pajscimer (Speisezimmer, dining room), badecimer (Badezimmer, bathroom), forcimer (Vorzimmer, hall), lafcimer (Schlafzimmer, bedroom) and cimer fraj (Zimmer frei, free room) are used in the colloquial language, as these newer loans mainly appear in advertising aimed for German tourists.The washing machine is often referred to colloquially vemaina (Waschmaschine, actually perilica za rublje). Somewhat odd is the use of the term cupajz (Zuspeise, additional food) for a kind of vegetable stew. Czech The Czech language borrowed some words from neighbouring dialects such as hajzl (from Husl for a litte house) for toilet. In hbitov (cemetery), the German term Friedhof is hardly recognizable.German import words were so frequently, that already Hus 1412 vehemently opposed them. There were words like hantuch from German Handtuch for towel, orc from Schrze for apron, knedlk from Kndel, hausknecht, German Hausknecht, for servant and forman from Fuhrmann for waggoner. But Hus did not succeed. Knedlky are still served, and in 1631, the school reformer Amos Komensk didnt have a problem to translate the biblical term paradise with lusthaus (German Lusthaus house of joy).In the late 19th century, many Czech craftsmen worked in the German-speaking area of the monarchy. The Czech language degrade into a servants language and took many loan words from this category: ermloch from German rmelloch for arm hole, flikovat from German flicken for darning and piglovat from bgeln for ironing.In domestic disputes, German was a supplier of cuss words. Havel used the word glajchaltace (German Gleichschaltung) to denounce the forced bringing-into-line, and called his counterpart Klaus an oberkapar. (German vernacular Oberkaspar literally master Kasperle, master buffoon). He, in turn, called a Havel a lump (German Lump: approximately rascal, rapscallion). Sometimes opponents completely use German in order to ininhibit insult each other. Such an insult for example may be Sie blde Ente you stupid duck (in German, this animal however is usually not used as a cuss...)Other (sometimes used colloquially) Germanisms in Czech:*haksna: legs, from Austrian Haxen)*stangla: top tube of a bicycle, from German Stange (rod, pole)*ksicht: grimace, from Gesicht (face)*hic: heat, from Hitze*lochna: hole, from Loch*betla: bed, from Bett*cimra: chamber, from Zimmer*flek: blotch, from Fleck*flastr: adhesive plaster, from Pflaster*fusakle: socks, from Fusocken (German Fu feet, German Socken socks)*futro: feed, from Futter*fu: from futsch, colloquial German for gone, broken*hercna: heart, from Herz*calovat: to pay, from zahlen*biflovat: swatting, from bffeln*durch: through, from durch*plac: place, from Platz Danish In Danish, the German term Hab und Gut, Habseligkeiten, is used in the form of habengut to express ones possessions carried along. The word was introduced to Denmark by travelling journeymen who took all their possessions along with them.Bundesliga-hr (Bundesliga hair) is the Danish word for a mullet, because this type of haircut (as well as in Hungary) was regarded a characteristic of Bundesliga players. Also the Italians saw this kind of connection and dubbed it capelli alla tedesca (German style haircut). Dutch The language includes some well established words from German, for example berhaupt (at all, generally), sowieso (anyway), Fingerspitzengefhl (roughly sensitivity, literally finger tip feel).The word unheimisch is used for something scary. However in German this word no longer exists.In sports, the words Schwalbe (in German the bird swallow, but also used for (football)), Alleingang (German for solo, also used in a in a figurative sense), Ausputzer (sweeper) and die Mannschaft (the team, for the German national soccer team) are used. English The most famous German word in the English language is kindergarten. The first kindergarten outside the German area was founded in 1851 in London. Five years later, Margarethe Schurz opened the first kindergarten in America in Wisconsin. The language in the first kindergarten was German, as they were thought to be for the children of German immigrants. In 1882, the number of kindergartens in the US was 348. Meanwhile, the majority of Americans are no longer aware of the German origin of the word. The kindergarten teacher was first called kindergartner, and later kindergarten teacher. Kindergartner is now the child who attends the kindergarten. The verb to kindergarten means using the kindergarten method. Often, however, only the first letter K of the word kindergarten is used, so a pre-K is a child who is not old enough for kindergarten.In English, the German ber (hyper, over) is sometimes (often spelled uber) used in compositions, as in ubergeek, to express extreme progression. In German on the other hand, the prefix ber is rarely used in the sense of superior, instead, Super is used, as in Superminister.(A superminister is unofficially used in German for a minister responsible for a particular large ministry. Every new government restructures the various bureaucratic departments. An example of a superminister would be a minister for economy and social services.) The peculiar feature of the German language to build compound nouns contributes to proliferation of Germanisms and interesting neologisms.Americans students often use the term foosball (German Fuball) for the tabletop football, for which in Germany however the English term kicker is used.For phones, in German the pseudo-anglicism Handy is used, which is gradually establishing itself on the east coast of the United States as a designation for mobile phones, too. English slang dictionaries started to list handy in the meaning mobile phone.If somebody is sneezing, one may respond god bless you. Because many people dont want use a blessing phrase without religious context, instead the German term gesundheit is widely used. In German, Gesundheit means health, but is also used as response when someone sneezes.The Oxford English Dictionary lists the German word verboten, defined as forbidden by an authority. Estonian There are long-lasting contacts between Estonian and German languages. Estonia was conquered in the crusade by German and Danish crusaders already in the 13th century. Since then, Estonia was settled by priests, merchants and craftsmen from Germany. As a result, the Estonian language has borrowed nearly a third of its vocabulary from Germanic languages, mainly from German. Examples include: vein (Wein, wine), klaver (Klavier, piano), reis (Reise, trip) and kunst (art). Modern loans from the Germans include reisibroo (Reisebro, travel agency) and kleit (Kleid, dress). French In French, some Germanisms are due to the experiences in the Second World War, such as witz for a bad joke or threatening (in German, Witz is just joke) and ersatz for ersatz coffee (German Ersatzkaffee, but more usually Muckefuck, itself probably a Francesism from mocca faux). The word lied, same meaning in English and French, is derived from the German Lied which translates as song. (In German, the term Lied refers to any kind of song, however for contemporary music in German also often the anglicism Song is used.)In French the word vasistas denotes a skylight window. The word probably originates from the Wars, when French soldiers looking at the German skylight ask Was ist das? (What is this?) It then became the name for this kind of windows.Schubladiser is the French term for filing or procrastinating something. The noun is schubladisation. Schublade is German for drawer, therefore these French terms can be literally translated as drawering and drawerisation, resp.In French, there are some terms derived from (Swiss) German such as poutzer instead of nettoyer (cleaning, in German putzen) or speck instead of lard (bacon, in German Speck).Around the German-French border areas, inherently many words cross the language border, for example, in Lorraine: Instead of a clabousse, a spritz is used for this sputters  spritzen is sputtering in German. Spritz as a term for extruded biscuits (Spritzgebck in German) is known everywhere in France.GreekGreek uses a few German loadwords for terms related to German or Austrian culture, such as snitsel (; Schnitzel) and froilain (, from Frulein, Miss, used only for young women from Germany or Austria). Some loan words were introduced by the gastarbiter (  , German Gastarbeiter), who have spent part of their life in Germany or Austria, such as lumben ( ), meaning riffraff, from German Lump, rogue.HebrewThe modern Hebrew includes several Germanisms, some coming directly from German, and some via the Yiddish language. In the artisanal sector, some German phrases such as stecker (German Stecker for plug) and dbel (German Dbel for dowel), the latter pronounced  due to the missing  umlaut. The German word Strudel () in Hebrew is used for the character @ in E-mail addresses, after the shape of the pastry.The Hebrew word for siesta, is schlafstunde (German literally hour to sleep), although it is not clear whether the Yekkes started that habit in Israel or brought it from Germany.The modern month names in Israel correspond to the German names: Januar, Februar, Mrz, etc. The only modification is August which is  diffent from the German  pronounced Ogust, because the vocal connection au in Hebrew is unusual. Hungarian The German vocabulary has already influenced the language at the time of the marriage of the states founder, I of Hungary to princess of Bavaria in the year 996. An early example is the word Herzog (Duke). The Hungarian word herceg formed as a result of harmony, the alignment of vowels in a word. This Hungarian word was later borrowed for the landscape name Hercegovina.German clergy, farmers and craftsmen were linguistically influential, particularly in the 13th and 18th centuries, bringing their own terminology to Hungary. These include the job titles bakter (Wchter, night watchman, train guard), suszter (Schuster, cobbler) and sinter (Schinder, a knacker) as well as the terms kuncsaft (Kundschaft, customer) and majszter (Meister, master). In some professions, a large part of terms came via German, e.g. in the field of carpentry lazur (Lasur, glaze), firnisz (Firnis, lacquer), lakk (Lack, varnish), smirgli (Schmirgelpapier, sandpaper) and colstok (Zollstock, foot rule).Words were also loaned in the time of the Austro-Hungarian Dual Monarchy. This explains a number of German words that are mainly used in Austria. These include the words krampusz (Krampus, companion of Claus), partvis (Bartwisch, hand brooms), nokedli (Nocken, dumpling), and ribizli (Ribisel, gooseberry). Eszcjg derives from Esszeug. Second-hand goods dealers were called handl (merchant, Hndler). Further examples include fasrt (German faschiert, minced meat), kndli (Kndel, hot dumplings).Even a German sentence became a Hungarian word. Vigc, derived from the German greeting Wie gehts? (How are you?) is the Hungarian word for a door-to-door salesman. The word spjz (Speis, German for Speisekammer) is being used for the pantry.The Hungarian phrase nem nagy vaszisztdasz (not a big what-is-it) is an informal way of belittling the complexity/importance of something (from German was ist das?, what is it?). Italian Sometimes linguistic communities borrow the same term for a word from each others language. This is the case for razzia  the Germans taken their word Razzia from the Italians (originally Arab  ghazwa  razzia), the Italians use the term blitz for this, from the German word Blitzkrieg. Un lager in Italian is not a beer like in English, but short for Konzentrationslager.German touristss demand brought il wurstel to Italy (Wrstel is a German dialect word for sausages), and even il wurstel con krauti (German Kraut short for Sauerkraut). Japanese In Japanese include some words with German origin, such as  (arubaito) from the German Arbeit (work, job); however, in Japan it is used to denote a minor job, e.g., a students sideline.Other words transferred into Japanese are related to climbing, like  (hyutte) from German Htte for mountain hut,  (gerende) from German Gelnde for terrain,  (aizen) from German Eisen (short for Steigeisen) for crampons,  (deruwaisu) for Edelwei,  (ryukkusakku) from German Rucksack for backpack and probably also  (shurafu) from German Schlafsack for bag. Also, the main Japanese mountain chain is called Alps.During the Second World War, in Japanese weekly newsreels the military victories of the German Generalfeldmarschall Rommel in Africa were frequently celebrated, thus establishing rommel as the Japanese term for victory or success. Even today, Japanese football mascots are called with this word.Since the medical education initially was influenced by its German teachers, many German medical terms became part of the Japanese language. These include  (kuranke) from German Kranke as a term for the sick ones,  (karute) from German Karte (card) in the sense of a card to record the course of disease of a patient,  (gipusu) from German Gips for an orthopedic cast,  (arerug) from German Allergie for allergy, and  (noirze) from German Neurose for neurosis. Even the word  (orugasumusu) for orgasm originates from the German word Orgasmus.Of the typical German food items, the most commonly found in Japan are  (sawkurauto, Sauerkraut) and the cake specialties  (shutoren, Stollen) and  (baumukhen, Baumkuchen).See also gairaigo. Kirundi In Kirundi, the language of the East African country Burundi, the word for German people (the former colonial rulers) is dagi. That is derived from the German salutation Tag, short for Guten Tag (literally wish you a good day). Korean In order to remove the last relics of the occupation during the Second World War, in Korea most Japanese loan words are removed from the vocabulary. This does not include the word  (areubaiteu) with is still used both in the Korean and Japanese language. The Japanese  (arubaito) is derived from the German word Arbeit (work, job), but here denotes a students sideline.Although a majority of internationalisms (largely Latin or Greek-based) are borrowed from English, a considerable minority of internationalisms are borrowed from German, usually via Japanese, in the field of chemistry, medicine, philosophy, etc., such as  (yoodeu < Iod),  (manggan < Mangan),  (butan < Butan),  (allereugi < Allergie),  (hiseuteri < Hysterie),  (ideollogi < Ideologie),  (Tema < Thema), etc. In addition, there are also loanwords of native German origin, such as  (kopel (portable cooker), a corrupted form of Kocher, via Japanese  kohheru), and hybrids like  (meseusillindeo <German Mess- (measuring) + English cylinder; Messzylinder in German). Macedonian In Macedonian the denotation of witz is , similar as in French. Norwegian The German word Vorspiel translates to prelude, also with sexual connotation, and Nachspiel translates to aftermath. In contrast, in Norwegian the words vorspiel and nachspiel stand for the consumption of alcoholic beverages before or after a visit of bars or discothques. Polish The German language also influenced Polish and other Slavic languages, for example kajuta from German Kajte for (ship) cabin, sztorm from German Sturm for storm, burmistrz from German Brgermeister for mayor, szynka from German Schinken for ham, or handel from German Handel for trade.In Polish, szlafmyca from German Schlafmtze means night cap, but  as in German  also used in a figurative sense as sleepyhead. Szlafrok from German Schlafrock is a dressing-gown.A Polish craftsman uses a ruba (screw, from German Schraube) and klajster (paste/glue from German Kleister). If he does not know the name of his tool, he may ask for a wihajster (thingamabob, from German Wie heit er?, literally how is it called?). And will receive the requested thing::Podaj mi ten may wihajster! (Please give me the small thingamabot!)There is also the word fajrant (leisure-time, from German Feierabend). In a carousal, he can drink to someone bruderszaft (from German Bruderschaft, fraternity) and disband with a rausz (from German Rausch, inebriation). Portuguese The Portuguese incorporates German words such as diesel and kitsch.In Portuguese, German immigrants brought some German words. The word blitz describes a traffic control (German Blitz is flash, also colloquial for traffic control due to the flash light.) Also known are malzbier, quark and chopp, the latter from Schoppen (German for a pint, in Brazilian Portuguese however denoting a draught beer). Also, in Brazil the German Streuselkuchen is a cuca, spread on a bread in the Riograndian Hunsrckian became, via the German schmier (grease), chimia. In the areas of German immigraints, also oktoberfest and kerb (Hunsrckian for kermesse) are celebrated. The word chipa is derived from the German Schippe (shovel). Romanian In Romanian, German loans are especially found in names for craft items: bormain (drill, in German Bohrmaschine), techer (plug, Stecker), urub (screw, Schraube), ubler (caliper, Schublehre), nur (electric cord, German Schnur is cord in general), but there are also: *cartof (potato) Kartoffel*chifl (a scone) Kipfel*bere (beer) Bier*hingher (dogcatcher or executioner), Sax. Hoenger/German Henker*an (trench) Schanze*unc (ham) dialect Schunke for German Schinken*mirghel (emery) Schmirgel*pighel Spiegel(esen)*pilhozen (playing trousers) Spielhose*pis (spear) Spiess*pi (spiky) Spitz*plint Splint*plit (split, flint) Splitt*por (spur) Sporn*prai (spreader) Spreize Russian puck 2.jpg|thumb|German: as in English a Puck, Russian: schajba  from the German word ScheibeAfter Tsar the Great returned from Western Europe in the year 1698, the loan words were no longer taken from Greek and Polish. With Peter, transfers from Polish where replaced transfers from Western languages. For the drastic reforms in the military and administration, economic and administrative experts were recruited from Germany. 1716 Peter ordered that the administrative writers learn German::Some 30 young officials should be sent to Knigsberg for the purpose of learning the German language so that they are more suitable for the college.In some sectors of handicraft, the Germans were the majority; towards the end of the 18th Century worked in Petersburg thirty German, but three Russian watchmakers.The Russian has taken many words from the military sector from German, for example Schlagbaum  (turnpike) and Marschroute  (line of approach), and also expressions likeRucksack  (backpack), Massstab  (scale), Strafe  (in German punishment, in Russian in the meaning fine), and Zifferblatt  (clock face).Lomonosov, who studied in Marburg and Freiberg, is regarded as founder of the Russian mining science, mineralogy and geology. In his writings about mining and metallurgy, he uses German words, the names of metals and minerals Wismut  (bismuth), Wolfram  (tungsten), Gneis  (gneiss, Kwarz (in German spelled Quarz)  (quartz), Potasch (in German Potasche)  (potash), Zink  (zinc), Schpaty (German Spat)  (feldspar), and the expression schteiger (German Steiger) (foreman of miners). Also the terms geolog (German Geologe) (geologist), gletscher (glacier) metallurgia (German Metallurgie) (metallurgy), nikel (in German Nickel), schichta (German Schicht (layer), used both for ore layer and layer in a blast furnace), and schlif (German Schliff) (the grinding or cutting of a stone) fall into this category.Interestingly are terms from chess as Zugzwang , Zeitnot , Endspiel  (endgame), Mittelspiel  (middlegame), Grossmeister () (grandmaster).Modern expressions are Strichcode  (barcode), Butterbrot , and even Brandmauer, for which in German the English expression Firewall is used.Schram  is a scar and originates from the German word Schramme (scratch, scar). A schtolnja  (German Stollen) is an adit. A schpagat  (German spelling Spagat) is a (gymnastics), schpinat  (German spelling Spinat) spinach and a schpion  (German spelling Spion) a spy.Even the hockey term for puck, schajba , originates from German Scheibe, denoting a Washer. Interestingly is also the word schlang  for garden hose, derived from the German word for a snake, Schlange. The word schtepsel  originates from the German word Stpsel (plug).SerbianAn exhibition in Vienna about Gastarbeiter in Austria has the Serbian title gastarbajteri. A particularly avid student is called treber (German Streber is striver). Schlag for cream is derived from the Austrian short form for Schlagobers.The Serbian word for tomatoes,  (paradajs), is influenced from the Austrian Paradeiser.SlovakIn the 19th century, Slovak artisans in Austria-Hungary borrowed words from handicraft: plech (German Blech for metal plate), drt (Draht, wire), schuble (Schnublade, drawer), schroubovk (Schraubenzieher, screwdriver), and virhank (Vorhang, curtain).SwedishSwedes use the German word aber (but) in the sense of obstacle or objection. A riche is called Gulaschbaron (colloquialism in German language, literally goulash baron).For undercover journalism in the style of Wallraff the verb wallraffa is used, which is even part of the Academys dictionary. Slovenian The Slovenian has taken its German loan words mainly from the Austrian version, for example nagelj from Gewrznagel (clove). However, krompir comes from the Palatinate word Grumbeer (potato). Spanish The language of some South American countries incorporates Germanisms introduced by German immigrants, for example, in Chile kuchen (cake) and Frankfurter in Uruguay. The latter, however, sometimes is used for a dog  not as in German for the sausage only. In Argentine, the usage of the name Pancho is interesting: its a popular nickname for Francisco or Franco, and therefore also used for Frankfurter sausages. The Chileans pronounce kuchen as in German with the ach-Laut, not kutshen, as a Spanish pronunciation would be.In Chile, the German word suche (searching) (pronounced in Chile sutsche instead with the German ach-Laut) is used for house staff (gardeners, errand boys). After the German immigrants came to a certain prosperity, they posted job advertisements for local forces, which often started with the German verb suche in a large-size font.In Mexico, kermes, from the German word Kirmes (funfair, kermesse), is used for a charitable street party. Swahili The dominant lingua franca in East Africa, Swahili, has borrowed many words from Arabic and English. Borrowed from the German Schule, however, is the word  shule for school. Tok Pisin Even the Kreol Pisin in the former German colony Papua-New Guinea has words borrowed from German language. These include balaistift from German Bleistift for pencil, however today the English term is preferred. Raus (literally in German get out! means Go! or From the way. Derived from raus is rausim meaning empty, dismissed away.A reminder of the missionary by German Catholic lay brothers are the words bruda from German Bruder for brother and prista from German Priester for priests. A relic of German colonialists behaviour are invectives such as rinfi from German Rindvieh, literally cattle, but used also as invective for a silly person, and saise from German Scheie, shit. Turkish The Turkish word fertik as signal for a railway to be ready to depart originates from the Railway which was initially operated by German personnel. The Germans command fertig (ready) became the Turkish fertik and firstly also denoted the train conductor. Nevertheless, this word was only used in slang and has been abandoned after the 50s.Another Germanism is Otoban from German Autobahn for highway. Impact on Grammar The Modern Hebrew iton for newspaper is modeled after the German word Zeitung, using et for time (Zeit in German).Derivations of German wordsGermanisms in foreign languages may have gone through a change of meaning, appearing as friend to the learners eye. For instance, in Russian language, a  galstuk is not a scarf (German literally: Halstuch), but a tie; nor would a   parikmacher (German literally: Perckenmacher) be a wig-maker, but actually denote a hairdresser.Likewise, in Japanese, a messer is not a knife, but a scalpel. Two more examples would be Japanese  (transliterated to arubaito, derived from German: Arbeit work and abbreviated to baito) and  (transliterated to ryukkusakku; derived from German Rucksack; abbreviated to  ryukku).See also*Loanword*of German expressions in EnglishReferencesLiterature*Karl-Heinz Best: Deutsche Entlehnungen im Englischen. In: Glottometrics. H. 13, 2006, S. 6672.*I. Dhauteville: Le franais alsacien. Fautes de prononciation et germanismes. Derivaux, Strasbourg 1852. (Digitalisat)*Limbach: Ausgewanderte Wrter. Hueber, Ismaning 2007, ISBN 978-3-191-07891-1. (Beitrge zur internationalen Ausschreibung Ausgewanderte Wrter)*Andrea Stiberc: Sauerkraut, Weltschmerz, Kindergarten und Co. Deutsche Wrter in der Welt. Herder, Freiburg 1999, ISBN 978-3-451-04701-5. External links * From Kaffeklatsching to Wischi-Waschi when German Words Take a Trip around the World.. December, 2006. (German version)* www.sueddeutsche.de, Zeitung: Deutsche Wrter erobern die Welt, May 11, 2004.* www.sueddeutsche.de, Sddeutsche Zeitung: Die Fremdgeher, January 7, 2001.* www2.rz.hu-berlin.de/japanologie, (Phonologische Angleichung deutscher Lehnwrter im Japanischen)* * www.welt.de  Welt: Deutsche Fremdwrter setzen sich in Holland zunehmend durch, October 7, 1995.* www.etymologie.info (Eine Liste Wrter deutschen Ursprungs in anderen Sprachen)* SpreadGermanisms.com (Interactive collection of Germanisms)*www.spiegel.de (Foresprug durk Tecnic)cs:Germanismusde:Germanismuses:Germanismogl:Xermanismohr:Germanizamkk:nl:Germanismeno:Germanismepl:Germanizmpt:Germanismoru:  sh:Germanizam(sprkvetenskap)uk:
19379604
Lehigh_Coal_and_Navigation_Company
The Lehigh Coal and Navigation Company is an anthracite coal mining company headquartered in Pottsville, Schuylkill County, Pennsylvania,(https://www.corporations.state.pa.us/corp/soskb/Corp.asp?792797) U.S.A., with operations in the areas of Tamaqua, Coaldale, and Lansford.  The company was incorporated in 1988,(Pennsylvania Corporation Bureau website: https://www.corporations.pa.us/corp/soskb/Corp.asp?792797) taking the name of the Coal & Navigation Company, a once-prominent coal mining and shipping company first established in 1820 with the merger of The Lehigh Coal Company and the Lehigh Navigation Company, both of which operated in the Valley area of Pennsylvania beginning in 1818.(http://siris-archives.si.edu/ipac20/ipac.jsp?urifull3100001~!140147!0&term#focus) The earlier company had owned and operated an extensive system of coal mines in Carbon and Schuylkill Counties, two canals, the Canal and the Division of the Pennsylvania Canal, and a railroad system, the and Susquehanna Railroad (later leased to the Railroad of New Jersey).( National Canal Museum  The Lehigh Navigation System. Accessed 2008-09-18.)( Lehigh & Susquehanna -  NE Rails Accessed 2008-09-18.) It also built the Chunk Switchback Railway to move coal.The original company was founded by White (1780-1850) and Hazard (1790-1865).( National Canal Museum  The Lehigh Coal and Navigation Company Accessed 2008-09-18.)The current company was founded by James J. Curran,(Pennsylvania Corporation Bureau website) a Schuylkill County attorney.Like other Pennsylvania mining companies, Lehigh Coal and Navigation Company has been criticized for polluting the environment.()In 2004, the company was forced into bankruptcy by some of its creditors, and some of its land was at risk of being sold for back taxes.()   	In 2006, a new management team took over.()References*External links* Lehigh Coal and Navigation Company Official site.*http://www.canals.org/educators/curriculum/The_Lehigh_Coal_and_Navigation_Company More InfoCoal Carbon Consulting LLCCompany run by son of former VP of Lehigh Coal And Navigation
19400390
Didier_Rault
 birth_place    Paris, France Didier J. Rault (born 18 February 1968) is the Founder and Chairman of Finance Capital (IFC) and Mining Investment (WMI). He is also the Founder and Chairman of the Rault Foundation, a private non-profit organization dedicated to improving the lives of impoverished people around the world.BiographyBorn near Paris, France in 1968, his business career has taken him from Europe to Asia and to many other parts of the world. He is currently pursuing investments in Asia, Europe and America through IFC and WMI.NewsOn March 16, 2009 International Finance Capital Ltd. (IFC) Chairman Didier J. Rault announced the establishment of World Mining Investment Ltd.(WMI), a global mining investment platform based in Hong Kong. WMI identifies and invests in top mining companies throughout the world and focuses on mining companies that produce the worlds major mineral resources. These include gold, platinum, copper, diamonds, iron ore, aluminum, energy products, and industrial minerals. WMI primarily invests in mining entities that have large, long-term, diverse assets with significant proven and probable reserves. WMI focuses on investing in mining companies located in Australia, Canada, Africa, and Central Europe.QuotesMining has been an essential industry for mankind throughout history. It is even more important today as thousands of everyday products are made from these precious mineral resources. We are tremendously excited at the investment opportunities in this sector and we feel that WMI will be the perfect platform to achieve our goals.With much of the world mired in a credit crisis with new investments on hold, cash-rich Chinese companies will continue to drive investment and fuel expansion in many industries and in many regions of the world for the foreseeable future. Companies and nations around the world should welcome Chinas new role as global investor....it is increasingly clear that Chinas Journey to the West will continue, with more and more Chinese businesses pursuing IPOs and making direct investments in the West. Helping and encouraging that investment is both an opportunity and a challenge for European governments and business interests. For in the early economic races of the 21st century, attracting Chinese investment is one of the global economys top prizes. Transformative, sustainable change promotes peace and stability in communities. This change can become self-perpetuating and repeatable. The Rault Foundation understands that by working with diverse organizations and programs, change can build common understanding, promote excellence and achievement, support social welfare and empower people to improve their lives.References*Reuters article*Mining Journal article by Didier RaultExternal links*International Finance Capital*World Mining Investment*Rault Foundation
19414071
Sir_Alfred_Hickman,_1st_Baronet
Sir Alfred Hickman (3 July 1830 &ndash; 1910) was an industrialist and Conservative politician who sat in the House of Commons between 1885 and 1906. Hickman was the son of George Rushbury Hickman of Tipton, Staffordshire and his wife Mary Haden. His father was the owner of the Moat Colliery in Tipton. Hickman was educated at Edwards School, Birmingham. He became a colliery proprietor and ironmaster, as the family acquired Springvale Furnace in 1866. He was a director of Lloyds Staffordshire Proving House, a Member of Council of Mining Association of Great Britain, and chairman of Staffordshire Railway and Canal Freighters Association. In 1882 he formed the Staffordshire Steel Ingot & Iron Company Ltd to produce steel using the Bessemer process.(Debretts Guide to the House of Commons 1886)Hickman stood for parliament for the Conservatives at Wolverhampton in 1880 but was defeated. Under the of Seats Act 1885 the Wolverhampton constituency was divided and in the 1885 general election, Hickman was elected of Parliament for Wolverhampton West. He lost the seat in 1886, regained it in 1892 and held it until 1906.()Hickman was created a baronet in 1892. He was President of the British Iron Trades Council and President of Wolverhampton Chamber of Commerce. In 1902 he was given the honorary freedom of the borough of Wolverhampton. In 1906 he became Chairman of the newly formed Tarmac Ltd, the company used large quantities of his waste slag.() The Staffordshire Steel Ingot & Iron Company later became part of & Lloyds.On his death in 1910, he bequeathed a park (Hickman Park) to the people of Bilston.Hickman married Lucy Owen Smith in 1850. His son Alfred succeeded to the baronetcy.  References * External links * 
19433546
Monaville,_West_Virginia
footnotes                 Monaville is an unincorporated place in Logan County, Virginia, States, located at an altitude of 712 feet (217 m).() As of the 2010 census, its population was 309.  It lies in the valley of Island Creek, a tributary of the River near the city of Logan. Monaville is situated between the unincorporated communities of Wilkinson and Rossmore.HistoryMonaville formerly held the US Postal code 25636 until the Post Office was closed by the US Postal Service.  Monaville was formerly known as Vanceville and was listed as such on a US Postal Service Map of the late 1890s.  The region was likely named for the Vance family who owned much of the land prior to the coal mining era.The name was believed to have been changed to Monaville in honor of Mona Wilkinson, the daughter of a prominent coal mining official. The Logan Mining Company operated a coal mine here and the name Mona Mine appears on a 1918 photo of the coal tipple.Island Creek Coal Company, based in Holden, operated the #11 and #12 mines in this region. Monaville is the location of the Foster Armory, which houses a West Virginia National Guard unit.  The state archives is currently rebuilding the original split-log Monaville schoolhouse in the basement of the state capitol complex.References(Virginia Occidental)
19466336
British_Army_during_World_War_I
The British Army during World War I fought the largest and most costly war in its long history.(Bourne (2001), pp. 118119) Unlike the French and German Armies, its units were made up exclusively of volunteersas opposed to conscriptsat the beginning of the conflict.(Chappell (2003), p. 4) Furthermore, the British Army was considerably smaller than its French and German counterparts.(Chappell (2003), p. 3)During the war, there were three distinct British Armies. The first army was the small volunteer force of 400,000 soldiers, over half of which were posted overseas to garrison the Empire. This total included the Regular Army and reservists in the Force. Together, they formed the British Expeditionary Force (BEF), which was formed for service in France and became known as the Contemptibles. The second army was Army, formed from the volunteers in 19141915 destined to go into action at the of the Somme. The third was formed after the introduction of conscription in January 1916, and by the end of 1918, the army had reached its maximum strength of 4,000,000 men and could field over 70 divisions. The vast majority of the army fought in the main theatre  of war on the Western Front in France and Belgium against the Empire. Some units were engaged in Italy and Salonika against the Empire and the Army, while other units fought in the East, Africa and Mesopotamiamainly against the Empireand one battalion fought alongside the Japanese Army in China during the of Tsingtao.The war also posed problems for the army commanders, given that prior to 1914, the largest formation any serving General in the BEF had commanded on operations was a division. The expansion of the army saw some officers promoted from brigade to corps commander in less than a year. Army commanders also had to cope with the new tactics and weapons that were developed. With the move from manoeuvre to trench warfare, both the infantry and the artillery had to learn how to work together. During an offensive, and when in defence, they learned how to combine forces to defend the front line. Later in the war, when the Machine Gun Corps and the Tank Corps were added to the order of battle, they were also included in the new tactical doctrine.The men at the front had to struggle with supply problems; the shortage of food and disease was rife in the damp, rat-infested conditions. Along with enemy action, many troops had to contend with new diseases: foot, fever and trench nephritis. When the war ended in 1918, British Army casualties, as the result of enemy action and disease, were recorded as 673,375 dead and missing, with another 1,643,469 wounded. The rush to demobilise at the end of the war substantially decreased the strength of the army, from its peak of 4,000,000 men in 1918 to 370,000 men by 1920.OrganisationThe British Army during World War I could trace its organisation to the increasing demands of imperial expansion. The framework was the voluntary system of recruitment and the regimental system, which had been defined by the Cardwell and Reforms of the late 19th century. The Army had been prepared and primarily called upon for Empire matters and the ensuing wars.( In the last years of the 19th century, the Army was involved in a major conflict, the Boer War (18991902), which highlighted shortcomings in its tactics, leadership and administration. The 1904 Report recommended radical reform, such as the creation of an Army Council, a General Staff, the abolition of the office of Commander-in-Chief of the Forces, and the creation of a Chief of the General Staff.(Cassidy (2006), p. 78) The Reforms of 1907 formally created an Expeditionary Force of seven divisions, reorganised the volunteers into a new Force of fourteen cavalry brigades and fourteen infantry divisions, and changed the old militia into the Special Reserve to reinforce the expeditionary force.(Cassidy (2006), p. 79)At the outbreak of the war in August 1914, the British regular army was a small professional force. It consisted of 247,432 regular troops organised in four Guards and 68 line infantry regiments, 31 cavalry regiments, artillery and other support arms.(Tucker & Roberts (2005), p. 504) Each infantry regiment had two regular battalions, one of which served at home and provided drafts and reinforcements to the other which was stationed overseas, while also being prepared to be part of the Expeditionary Force. Almost half of the regular army (74 of the 157 infantry battalions and 12 of the 31 cavalry regiments), was stationed overseas in garrisons throughout the Empire.( The Flying Corps was part of the Army until 1918. At the outbreak of the war, it consisted of 84 aircraft.(The regular Army was supported by the Force, and by reservists. In August 1914, there were three forms of reserves. The Army Reserve of retired soldiers was 145,350 strong. They were paid 3 Shillings and 6 pence a week (17.5 pence) and had to attend 12 training days per year.() The Special Reserve had another 64,000 men and was a form of part-time soldiering, similar to the Territorial Force. A Special Reservist had an initial six months full-time training and was paid the same as a regular soldier during this period; they had three or four weeks training per year thereafter.( The National Reserve had some 215,000 men, who were on a register which was maintained by Territorial Force County Associations; these men had military experience, but no other reserve obligation.((The regulars and reservesat least on papertotalled a mobilised force of almost 700,000 men, although only 150,000 men were immediately available to be formed into the British Expeditionary Force (BEF) that was sent to the continent. This consisted of six infantry divisions and one of cavalry.( By contrast, the French Army in 1914 mobilized 1,650,000 troops and 62 infantry divisions, while the German Army mobilized 1,850,000 troops and 87 infantry divisions.(Addington (1984), p. 92)Britain, therefore, began the war with six regular and 14 reserve divisions. During the war, a further six regular, 14 Territorial, 36 Army and six other divisions, including the Naval Division from the Navy were formed.(Tucker & Roberts (2005), p. 505)In 1914, each British infantry division consisted of three infantry brigades each of four battalions, with two guns per battalion, (24 in the division). They also had three field artillery brigades with 54 18-pounder guns, one field howitzer brigade with eighteen  howitzers, one heavy artillery battery with four 60-pounder guns, two engineer field companies, one signals company, one cavalry squadron, one cyclist company, three field ambulances, four Army Service Corps horse-drawn transport companies and divisional headquarters support detachments.(Tucker & Roberts (2005), p. 810)(Messenger (2005), pp. 2526)The single cavalry division assigned to the BEF in 1914 consisted of 15 cavalry regiments in five brigades. They were armed with rifles, unlike their French and German counterparts, who were only armed with the shorter range carbine. The cavalry division also had a high allocation of artillery compared to foreign cavalry divisions, with 24 13-pounder guns organised into two brigades and two machine guns for each regiment. When dismounted, the cavalry division was the equivalent of two weakened infantry brigades with less artillery than the infantry division.(Badsey (2008), p. 198) By 1916, there were five cavalry divisions, each of three brigades, serving in France, the 1st, 2nd, 3rd divisions in the Cavalry Corps and the 1st and Indian Cavalry Divisions in the Cavalry Corps, each brigade in the Indian cavalry corps contained a British cavalry regiment.(Gudmundsson & Anderson (2007), p.29)Over the course of the war, the composition of the infantry division gradually changed, and there was an increased emphasis upon providing the infantry divisions with organic fire support. By 1918, a British division consisted of three infantry brigades, each of three battalions. Each of these battalions had 36 machine guns, making a total of 324 such weapons in the division. Additionally, there was a divisional machine gun battalion, equipped with 64 machine guns in four companies of 16 guns. Each brigade in the division also had a mortar battery with eight Mortars.( The artillery also changed the composition of its batteries. At the start of the war, there were three batteries with six guns per brigade; they then moved to four batteries with four guns per brigade, and finally in 1917, to four batteries with six guns per brigade to economise on battery commanders.( In this way, the army would change drastically over the course of the war, reacting to the various developments, from the mobile war fought in the opening weeks to the static trench warfare of 1916 and 1917. The cavalry of the BEF represented 9.28% of the army; by July 1918, it would only represent 1.65%. The infantry would decrease from 64.64% in 1914 to 51.25% of the army in 1918, while the Royal Engineers would increase from 5.91% to 11.24% in 1918.(Chandler (2003), p. 212)British Expeditionary ForceFile:British recruits August 1914 Q53234.jpg|thumb|August 1914: London volunteers await their pay at Martin-in-the-FieldsUnder the terms of the Cordiale, the British Armys role in a European war was to embark soldiers of the British Expeditionary Force (BEF), which consisted of six infantry divisions and five cavalry brigades that were arranged into two corps: I Corps, under the command of Haig, and II Corps, under the command of Smith-Dorrien.(Chandler (2003), p. 211) At the outset of the conflict, the Indian Army was called upon for assistance; in August 1914, 20 percent of the 9,610 British officers initially sent to France were from the Indian army, while 16 percent of the 76,450 ranks came from the British Indian Army.(German Emperor Kaiser Wilhelmwho was famously dismissive of the BEFissued an order on 19 August 1914 to exterminate...the treacherous English and walk over General Frenchs contemptible little army. Hence, in later years, the survivors of the regular army dubbed themselves The Old Contemptibles. By the end of 1914 (after the battles of Mons, Le Cateau, the Aisne and Ypres), the old regular British Army had been virtually wiped out; although it managed to stop the German advance.(In October 1914, the 7th Division arrived in France, forming the basis of the III Corps; the cavalry had grown into its own corps of three divisions.( By December 1914, the BEF had expanded, fielding five army corps divided between the First and the Second Armies.(Chappell (2003), p. 7) As the Regular Armys strength declined, the numbers were made up first by the Territorial Force, then by the volunteers of Field Marshal Kitcheners, New Army.( By the end of August 1914, he had raised six new divisions; by March 1915, the number of divisions had increased to 29.( The Territorial Force was also expanded, raising second and third battalions and forming eight new divisions, which supplemented its peacetime strength of 14 divisions.( The Third Army was formed in July 1915 and with the influx of troops from Kitcheners volunteers and further reorganization, the Fourth Army and the Reserve Army, which became the Fifth Army were formed in 1916.(Recruitment and conscriptionIn August 1914, 300,000 men had signed up to fight, and another 450,000 had joined-up by the end of September.(Chandler, (2001) p. 11) Recruitment remained fairly steady through 1914 and early 1915, but it fell dramatically during the later years, especially after the Somme campaign, which resulted in 360,000 casualties.() A prominent feature of the early months of volunteering was the formation of battalions.() Many of these pals who had lived and worked together, joined up and trained together and were allocated to the same units. The policy of drawing recruits from amongst the local population ensured that, when the Pals battalions suffered casualties, whole towns, villages, neighbourhoods and communities back in Britain were to suffer disproportionate losses. With the introduction of conscription in January 1916, no further Pals battalions were raised.( Conscription for single men was introduced in January 1916. Four months later, in May 1916, it was extended to all men aged 18 to 41.() The Military Service Act March 1916 specified that men from the ages of 18 to 41 were liable to be called up for service in the army, unless they were married (or widowed with children), or served in one of a number of occupations, which were usually industrial but which also included clergymen and teachers. This legislation did not apply to Ireland, despite its then status as part of the United Kingdom (but see Crisis of 1918).() By January 1916, when conscription was introduced, 2.6 million men had volunteered for service, a further 2.3 million were conscripted before the end of the war; by the end of 1918, the army had reached its peak strength of four million men.(Women also volunteered and served in a non-combatant role; by the end of the war, 80,000 had enlisted.() They mostly served as nurses in the Alexandras Imperial Military Nursing Service (QAIMNS), the Aid Nursing Yeomanry (FANY), the Aid Detachment (VAD); and from 1917, in the Army when the Marys Army Auxiliary Corps (WAAC), was founded.() The WAAC was divided into four sections: cookery; mechanical; clerical and miscellaneous. Most stayed on the Home Front, but around 9,000 served in France.(CommandersFile:Douglas Haig.jpg|thumb|Field Marshal Haig, 1st Earl Haig.In 1914, no serving British officer of the British Expeditionary Force (BEF) had controlled a formation larger than a division on active operations.(Gardner (2003), p. 1) The first Commander in Chief of the BEFappointed in August 1914was Field Marshal John French.( His last active command had been the cavalry division in the Second Boer War.(French had remarked in 1912 that Douglas Haigthe commander of the I Corpswould be better suited to a position on the staff than a field command.(Gardner (2003), p. 11) Like French, Haig was a cavalryman, his last active command had been a brigade in the cavalry division during the Second Boer War.(Gardner (2003), p. 10) The first commander of the II Corps was Lieutenant General Grierson, a noted tactician who died of a heart attack soon after arriving in France.(Liddell Hart (1933), p. 33) French wished to appoint Lieutenant General Herbert Plumer in his place, but against Frenchs wishes, Kitchener instead appointed Lieutenant General Smith-Dorrien, who had begun his military career in the War in 1879 and was one of only five officers to survive the of Isandlwana.(Tucker & Roberts (2005), p. 1096) He had built a formidable reputation as an infantry commander during the Campaign and the Second Boer War.(Gardner (2003), p. 13) After the Second Boer War, he was responsible for a number of reforms, notably forcing an increase in dismounted training for the cavalry. This was met with hostility by French (as a cavalryman). By 1914, Frenchs dislike for Smith-Dorrien was well known within the army.(Gardner (2003), p. 14)French was eventually replaced by Haig in 1915, who commanded the BEF for the remainder of the war. He became most famous for his role as its commander during the battle of the Somme, the of Passchendaele, and the Days Offensivethe series of victories leading to the German surrender in 1918.( Haig was succeeded in command of the First Army by General Carmichael Monro, who in turn was succeeded by General Henry Horne in September 1916, the only officer with an artillery background to command a British army during the war.(Blaxland (1968), p. 14)General Plumer was eventually appointed to command II Corps, in December 1914, he succeeded Smith-Dorrien in command of the Second Army in 1915.(Keegan & Wheatcroft (1996), p. 141) He had commanded a mounted infantry detachment in the Second Boer war, where he started to build his reputation. He held command of the Ypres salient for three years and gained an overwhelming victory over the German Army at the of Messines in 1917. Plumer is generally recognised as one of the most effective of the senior British commanders on the Western Front.(commanders and chiefs of staff 1918.jpg|left|thumb|300px|Sir Douglas Haig with his army commanders and their chiefs of staff, November 1918. Front row, left to right: Herbert Plumer, Haig, Rawlinson. Middle row,left to right: Byng, Birdwood, Horne. Back row, left to right: Lawrence, Kavanagh, White, Percy, Vaughan, Montgomery, Anderson.General Edmund Allenby commanded the Third Army on the western front. He had previously served in the Zulu War, the Sudan campaign, and the Second Boer war. He was commander of the cavalry division on the western front, where his leadership was noted during the from Mons and the battle of Ypres.(Page (2003), p. 13)(Olson & Shadle (1996), p. 30)(Johnstone (2005), p. 203) In 1917, he was given command of the Expeditionary Force, where he oversaw the conquest of Palestine and Syria in 1917 and 1918.(Jones (1986), p. 480) Allenby replaced Murray, who had been the Chief of Staff of the British Expeditionary Force in France in 1914.(Allenby was replaced as Third Army commander by General Julian Byng, who began the war as commander of the 3rd Cavalry Division. After performing well during the First Battle of Ypres, he was given command of the Cavalry Corps. He was sent to the Dardenelles in August 1915, to command the IX Corps. Byng planned the highly successful evacuation of 105,000 Allied troops and the majority of the equipment of the Expeditionary Force (MEF). The withdrawal was successfully completed in January 1916, without the loss of a single man.( Byng had already returned to the western front, where he was given command of the Corps. His most notable battle was the battle of Vimy ridge in April 1917, which was carried out by the Canadian Corps with British support.(General Henry Rawlinson served on Kitcheners staff during the advance on Omdurman, in 1898, and served with distinction in the Second Boer War, where he earned a reputation as one of the most able British commanders.(Tucker (2001), p. 166) Rawlinson took command of the British IV Corps in 1915 and then command of the Fourth Army in 1916, as the plans for the Allied offensive on the Somme were being developed.( During the war, Rawlinson was noted for his willingness to use innovative tacticswhich he employed during the battle of Amienswhere he combined attacks by tanks with artillery.(Keegan & Wheatcroft (1996), p. 148)General Gough commanded a mounted infantry regiment with distinction during the of Ladysmith, but his command was destroyed while attacking a larger Boer force in 1901.(Tucker (2001), p. 799) When he joined the BEF, he was in command of the 3rd Cavalry Brigade, and was promoted from a brigade to a corps command in less than a year. In September 1914, he was given command of the 2nd Cavalry Division; in April 1915, the 7th Division; and in July 1915, the British I Corps which he commanded  during the of Loos.(Tucker & Roberts (2005), p. 800) In May 1916, he was appointed commander of the Fifth Army, which suffered heavy losses at the battle of Passchendaele.( The collapse of the Fifth Army was widely viewed as the reason for the German breakthrough in the Offensive, and Gough was dismissed as its commander in March 1918,( being succeeded by General William Birdwood for the last months of the war. Birdwood had previously commanded the Corps, an appointment requiring a combination of tact and tactical flair.(Blaxland (1968), p. 143)On the Macedonian front, General George Milne commanded the Salonika Army,(Heathcote (1999), p. 210) and General Ian Hamilton commanded the ill-fated MEF during the Campaign.() He had previously seen service in the Boer War, the Sudan campaign, and the Second Boer War.(Wrigley (2002), p. 204)Back in Britain, the professional commander of the British Armyor of the Imperial General Staff (CIGS)was General James Murray, who retained that post during the early years of the war.(Moorhead (2002), p. 33) He was replaced as CIGS in 1916 by General Robertson.(Woodhead (1998), p. 6) A strong supporter of Haig, Robertson was replaced in 1918, by General Henry Hughes Wilson. ()Officer selectionFile:General Officers of World War I by John Singer Sargent.jpg|thumb|300px|General Officers of World War I, painting by Singer Sargent (1922).In August 1914, there were 28,060 officers in the British Army, of which 12,738 were regular officers, the rest were in the reserves.(Sheffield (2000), pp. 2930) The number of officers in the army had increased to 164,255 by November 1918. These were survivors among the 247,061 officers who had been granted a commission during the war.(Sheffield (2000), p. 30)Most pre-war officers came from families with military connections, the gentry or the peerage; a public school education was almost essential.(Sheffield (2000), p. 2) In 1913, about 2% of regular officers had been promoted from the ranks.(Sheffield (2000), pp. 34) The officer corps, during the war, consisted of regular officers from the peacetime army, officers who had been granted permanent commissions during the war, officers who had been granted temporary commissions for the duration of the war, territorial army officers commissioned during peacetime, officers commissioned from the ranks of the pre-war regular and territorial army and temporary officers commissioned from the ranks for the duration of the war alone.(Sheffield (2000), p. 29)In September 1914, Lord Kitchener announced that he was looking for volunteers and regular NCOs to provide officers for the expanding army.( Most of the volunteers came from the class, with the largest group from commercial and clerical occupations (27%), followed by teachers and students (18%) and professional men (15%).(Sheffield (2000), p. 31) In March 1915, it was discovered that 12,290 men serving in the ranks had been members of a university or public school Training Corps (OTC). Most applied forand were grantedcommissions, while others who did not apply were also commissioned.(Sheffield (2000), p. 37) At the end of 1915, the army introduced a new system for recruiting officers that guaranteed that the vast majority had served in the ranks.(Sheffield (2000), p. 38)Once a candidate was selected as an officer, promotion could be rapid. A. S. Smeltzerafter serving in the Regular Army for 15 yearswas commissioned as a Lieutenant in 1915. He rose in rank, and by the Spring of 1917 had been promoted to Colonel and was commanding officer of the 6th Battalion, Buffs (Royal East Kent Regiment).(Connelly (2006), p. 21)Along with rapid promotion, the war also noticeably lowered the age of battalion commanding officers. In 1914, they were aged over 50, while the average age for a battalion commanding officer in the BEF, between 1917 and 1918, was 28.(Connelly (2006), p. 22) By this stage, it was official policy that men over 35 were no longer eligible to command battalions.(Blaxland (1968), p. 7) This trend was reflected amongst the junior officers. Eden was the Adjutant of a battalion when aged 18, and served as the Major in the 198th Brigade while still only aged 20.(Robbins (2005), p. 43)The war also provided opportunities for advancement onto the General Staff, especially in the early days, when many former senior officers were recalled from retirement. Some of these were found wanting, due to their advanced age, their unwillingness to serve, or a lack of competence and fitness; most were sent back into retirement before the first year of the war was over, leaving a gap that had to be filled by lower-ranking officers.() Criticism of the quality of staff work in the Crimean War and the Second Boer War had led to sweeping changes under Haldane. The College, Camberley was greatly expanded and Lord Kitchener established another staff college at Quetta in 1904. Nonetheless, when war broke out in August 1914, there were barely enough graduates to staff the BEF. Four-month-long staff courses were introduced, and filled with regimental officers who, upon completing their training, were posted to various headquarters. As a result, staff work was again poor, until training and experience slowly remedied the situation. In 1918, staff officers who had been trained exclusively for static trench warfare were forced to adapt to the demands of semi-open warfare.(Marshall-Cornwall (1977), pp. 915)During the course of the war, 78 British and Dominion officers of the rank of Brigadier-General and above were killed or died during active service, while another 146 were wounded, gassed, or captured.(Davies and Maddocks (1995), p. 22)DoctrineBritish official historian Brigadier Edward Edmonds recorded in 1925 that The British Army of 1914 was the best trained, best equipped and best organized British Army ever sent to war.(Edmunds (1925), pp. 1011) This was in part due to the reforms, and the Army itself recognising the need for change and training. Training began with individual training in winter, followed by squadron, company or battery training in spring; regimental, battalion and brigade training in summer; and division or inter-divisional exercises and army manoeuvres in late summer and autumn.(Beckett & Simpson (1985), p. 47) The common doctrine of headquarters at all levels was outlined in the Field Service Pocket Book, which Haig had introduced while serving as Director of Staff Studies at the War Office in 1906.The Second Boer War had alerted the army to the dangers posed by fire zones that were covered by long-range, magazine-fed rifles.( In the place of volley firing and attacks, there was a greater emphasis on advancing in extended order, the use of available cover, the use of artillery to support the attack, flank and converging attacks and fire and movement.( The Army expected units to advance as far as possible in a firing line without opening fire, both to conceal their positions and conserve ammunition, then to attack in successive waves, closing with the enemy decisively.(The cavalry practised reconnaissance and fighting dismounted more regularly, and in January 1910, the decision was made at the General Staff Conference that dismounted cavalry should be taught infantry tactics in attack and defence.(Badsey (2007), P. 227) They were the only cavalry from a major European power trained for both the mounted cavalry charge and dismounted action, and equipped with the same rifles as the infantry, rather than short-range carbines.(Badsey (2008), p.198) The cavalry were also issued with tools prior to the outbreak of war, as a result of experience gained during the Second Boer War.(The infantrys marksmanship, and fire and movement techniques, had been inspired by Boer tactics and was established as formal doctrine by Colonel Charles Monro when he was in charge of the School of Musketry at Shorncliffe. In 1914, British rifle fire was so effective that there were some reports to the effect that the Germans believed they were facing huge numbers of machine guns.(Rankin (2008), pp.55) The Army concentrated on rifle practice, with days spent on the ranges dedicated to improving marksmanship and obtaining a rate of fire of 15 effective rounds a minute at ; one sergeant set a record of 38 rounds into a  target set at  in 30 seconds.(Jarymowycz & Starry (2008), p. 124) In their 1914 skill-at-arms meeting, the 1st Battalion Watch recorded 184 marksmen, 263 first-class shots, 89 second-class shots and four third-class shots, at ranges from .(Beckett & Simpson (1985), p. 56) The infantry also practised squad and section attacks and fire from cover, often without orders from officers or NCOs, so that soldiers would be able to act on their own initiative.(Beckett & Simpson (1985), p. 48) In the last exercise before the war, it was noted that the infantry made wonderful use of ground, advances in short rushes and always at the double and almost invariably fires from a prone position.(WeaponsThe British Army was armed with the Short Magazine Lee-Enfield Mk III (SMLE Mk III), which featured a bolt-action and large magazine capacity that enabled a trained rifleman to fire 20-30 aimed rounds a minute.( World War I accounts tell of British troops repelling German attackers, who subsequently reported that they had encountered machine guns, when in fact, it was simply a group of trained riflemen armed with SMLEs.(Skennerton (1988), p. 159) The heavy machine gun proved itself to be the most reliable weapon on the battlefield, with some of its feats of endurance entering military mythology.( One account tells of the action by the 100th Company of the Machine Gun Corps at Wood on 24 August 1916. This company had 10 Vickers guns; it was ordered to give sustained covering fire for 12 hours onto a selected area  away, in order to prevent German troops forming up there for a counter attack whilst a British attack was in progress. Two companies of infantry were allocated as ammunition, rations and water carriers for the gunners. Two men worked a beltfilling machine nonstop for 12 hours, keeping up a supply of 250-round belts. They used 100 new barrels and all of the waterincluding the mens drinking water and the contents of the latrine bucketsto keep the guns cool. In that 12-hour period, the 10 guns fired just short of one million rounds between them. One team is reported to have fired 120,000. At the close of the operation, it is alleged that every gun was working perfectly and that not one had broken down during the whole period.(Hogg (1971), p. 62)The lighter gun was adopted for land and aircraft use in October 1915.(Skennerton (1988), p. 6) The Lewis gun had the advantage of being about 80% faster to build than the Vickers, and far more portable.(Hogg (1971), p. 27) By the end of World War I, over 50,000 Lewis Guns had been produced; they were nearly ubiquitous on the Western Front, outnumbering the Vickers gun by a ratio of about 3:1.(Ford (2005), p. 71)The Mortar was rapidly developed when it became clear that some type of weapon was needed to provide artillery-like fire support to the infantry.( The weapon was fully man-transportable yet also capable of firing reasonably powerful shells at targets beyond the range of rifle grenades.()Finally, the Mark I tanka British inventionwas seen as the solution to the stalemate of trench warfare.( The Mark I had a range of  without refuellingl, and a speed of ; it first saw service on the Somme in September 1916.()(Infantry tacticsFile:British infantry Morval 25 September 1916.jpg|thumb|British infantry advancing in support during the of Morval, 25 September 1916, part of the battle of the SommeAfter the race to the sea, warfare gave way to warfare, a development for which the British Army had not prepared. Expecting an offensive mobile war, the Army had not instructed the troops in defensive tactics and had failed to obtain stocks of wire, grenades, or trench mortars.(Griffiths & Griess (2003), p. 63) In the early years of trench warfare, the normal infantry attack formation was based on the battalion, which comprised four companies that were each made up of four platoons.(Tucker, Matysek Wood & Murphy (2005), p. 357) The battalion would form 10 waves with  between each, while each company formed two waves of two platoons. The first six waves were the fighting elements from three of the battalions companies, the seventh contained the battalion headquarters; the remaining company formed the eighth and ninth waves, which were  expected to carry equipment forward, the tenth wave contained the stretcher bearers and medics.( The formation was expected to move forward at a rate of  every two minutes, even though each man carried his rifle, bayonet, gas mask, ammunition, two grenades, cutters, a spade, two empty sandbags and flares.( The carrying platoons, in addition to the above, also carried extra ammunition, barbed wire and construction materials to effect repairs to captured lines and fortifications.(By 1918, experience had led to a change in tactics; the infantry no longer advanced in rigid lines, but formed a series of flexible waves.(Bull (2002), p. 49) They would move covertly, under the cover of darkness, and occupy shell holes or other cover near the German line. Skirmishers formed the first wave and followed the creeping barrage into the German front line to hunt out points of resistance. The second or main wave followed in platoons or sections in single file. The third was formed from small groups of reinforcements, the fourth wave was expected to defend the captured territory.( All waves were expected to take advantage of the ground during the advance.( (see below for when operating with tanks)Each platoon now had a Lewis gun section and a section that specialised in throwing hand-grenades (then known as bombs), each section was compelled to provide two scouts to carry out reconnaissance duties.( Each platoon was expected to provide mutual fire support in the attack they were to advance, without halting; but leap frogging was accepted, with the lead platoon taking an objective and the following platoons passing through them and onto the next objective, while the Lewis gunners provided fire support.( Grenades were used for clearing trenches and dugouts, each battalion carried forward two trench mortars to provide fire support.(Bull (2002), pp. 5051)Tank tacticsThe tank was designed to break the deadlock of trench warfare.() In their first use on the Somme, they were placed under command of the infantry and ordered to attack their given targets in groups or pairs. They were also assigned small groups of troops, who served as an escort while providing close defence against enemy attacks.( Only nine tanks reached the German lines to engage machine gun emplacements and troop concentrations. On the way, 14 broke down or were ditched, another 10 were damaged by enemy fire.(In 1917, during the battle of Cambrai, the Tank Corps adopted new tactics. Three tanks working together would advance in a triangle formation, with the two rear tanks providing cover for an infantry platoon.(Bull (2004), p. 53) The tanks were to create gaps in the barbed wire for the accompanying infantry to pass through, then use their armament to suppress the German strong points.(Tucker & Roberts (2005), p. 251) The effectiveness of tankinfantry cooperation was demonstrated during the battle, when Major General Montague Harper of the 51st (Highland) Division refused to cooperate with the tanks, a decision that compelled them to move forward without any infantry support; the result was the destruction of more than 12 tanks by German artillery sighted behind bunkers.(Tucker & Roberts (2005), p. 252)The situation had changed again by 1918, when tank attacks would have one tank every 100 or , with a tank company of 12-16 tanks per objective. One section of each company would be out in front, with the remainder of the company following behind and each tank providing protection for an infantry platoon, who were instructed to advance, making use of available cover and supported by machine gun fire.(Bull (2002), p. 56) When the tanks came across an enemy strong point, they would engage the defenders, forcing them into shelter and leaving them to the devices of the following infantry.(Artillery tacticsFile:British 39th Siege Battery RGA Somme 1916.jpg|left|thumb| howitzers of the 39th Siege Battery, Garrison Artillery conducting a shoot in the Fricourt-Mametz valley, August 1916, during the battle of the Somme.Prior to the war, the artillery worked independently and was taught to support the infantry to ensure a successful attack.( In 1914, the heaviest artillery gun was the 60-pounder, four in each heavy battery. The Horse Artillery employed the 13-pounder, while the Field Artillery used the 18-pounder gun. By 1918, the situation had changed; the artillery were the dominant force on the battlefield. Between 1914 and 1918, the Royal Field Artillery had increased from 45 field brigades to 173 field brigades,(Gudmundsson (2005), p. 55) while the heavy and siege artillery of the Garrison Artillery had increased from 32 heavy and six siege batteries to 117 heavy and 401 siege batteries.(Clark & Delf (2004), p. 7)With this increase in the number of batteries of heavier guns, the armies needed to find a more efficient method of moving the heavier guns around. (It was proving difficult to find the number of horses required.) The office ordered over 1,000 Holts caterpillar tractors, which transformed the mobility of the siege artillery.(Clark & Delf (2004), p. 8) The army also mounted a variety of surplus naval guns on various railway platforms to provide mobile long-range heavy artillery on the Western Front.()Until 1914, artillery generally fired over sights at visible targets, the largest unit accustomed to firing at a single target was the artillery regiment or brigade.( One innovation brought about by the adoption of trench warfare was the barragea term first used in the of Neuve Chapelle in 1915.(Hogg (1971), p. 13) Trench warfare had created the need for fire, with the use of observers, more sophisticated artillery fire plans, and an increasingly scientific approach to gunnery, where artillerymen had to use increasingly complicated calculations to lay the guns. Individual guns were aimed so that their fall of shot was coordinated with others to form a pattern; in the case of a barrage, the pattern was a line.(The barrage was a barrage that lifted in small increments, perhaps , so that it moved forward slowly, keeping pace with the infantry,(Hogg (1971), pp. 2526) who were trained to follow close behind the moving wall of their own fire, often as close as ; infantry commanders were encouraged to keep their troops as close to the barrage as possible, even at the risk of casualties from fire.(Tucker (2001), p. 356)(Hogg (1971), p. 21) A creeping barrage could maintain the element of surprise, with guns opening fire only shortly before the assault troops moved off. It was useful when enemy positions had not been thoroughly reconnoitred, as it did not depend on identifying individual targets in advance.() The idea behind the creeping barrage was that the infantry should reach the enemy positions before the defenders had time to recover, emerge from shelters, and man their positions.( On the first day of the of the Somme, the barrage outpaced the infantry, allowing the defenders to recover and emerge from their dugouts, with disastrous results for the attackers.(Hogg (1971), p. 26) The creeping barrage demonstrated its effectiveness a year later, in 1917, during the battle of Arras.(Nicholls (2005), pp. 5354) A weakness of the creeping barrage was that the infantry was subordinated to the artillery schedule, while the infantry commanders had less control over the tactical situation and were therefore in danger of forgetting how to manoeuvre their troops around the battlefield.( The importance of the barrage was such that traditional infantry tactics, including a reliance on the infantrys own fire power to support its movement forward, was sometimes forgotten.(Griffith (1996), p. 67)Once the infantry had reached the German trenches, the artillery shifted from the creeping barrage to the standing barrage, a static barrage that would protect the infantry from counter-attack while they consolidated the position. A variant was the box barrage, in which three or four barrages formed a boxor more often three sides of a boxaround a position to isolate and prevent reinforcements being brought up into the front line. This was normally used to protect trench raids,(Connelly (2006), p. 85) although it could also be used offensively against a German unit. Another type of barrage was the SOS barrage, fired in response to a German counter attack. An SOS barrage could be brought down by firing a flare signal of a pre arranged colour, as a German barrage tended to cut the telephone lines. A pre-registered barrage would then descend on No Mans Land.(Griffith (1996), pp. 4144)With the introduction of the tank the artillery was no longer required to aid the infantry by destroying obstacles and machine gun positions. Instead, the artillery assisted by neutralising the German artillery with battery fire.(Bailey (1989), p. 142) British Army researchers under Lieutenant Lawrence Bragg developed ranging, a method of determining the location of hostile artillery from the sound of its guns firing.(Bragg (1971), pp. 3140) A Counter Battery Staff Officer (CBSO) was appointed at each corps to coordinate the counter battery effort, collating reports from sound ranging and Royal Flying Corps observers.(Griffith (1996), pp. 152153) By the end of the war, it was realised that the important effect of the barrage was to demoralise and suppress the enemy, rather than physical destruction; a short, intense bombardment immediately followed by an infantry assault was more effective than the weeks of grinding bombardment used in 1916.(CommunicationsThe Engineers Signal Service, formed in 1912, was given responsibility for communications that included signal dispatch, telegraph, telephone and later wireless communications, from army headquarters to brigade and down to battery level for the artillery.( For most of the war, the Armys primary methods of communication were signal dispatch (employing runners, messengers on horseback, dogs, and pigeons), visual signalling, telegraph, and telephone.( At the start of the war, the Army had a small number of wireless sets, which in addition to being heavy and unreliable, operated on longwave. In 1915, trench wireless sets were introduced, but the transmissions were easily intercepted by the listening Germans.(Civilian telephones were used at the outset of the war, but they were found to be unreliable in the damp, muddy conditions that prevailed. Consequently, the telephone was designed; a device that operated with its own switchboard. Apart from voice communication, it featured a buzzer unit with a code key, so that it could be used to send and receive coded messages. This facility proved useful when, in the midst of bombardment, exploding shells drowned out voice communication. The telephones were connected by lines that sustained continual damage as a result of shell fire and the movement of troops. The lines were generally buried, with redundant lines set in place to compensate for breakages.(The primary types of visual signalling were Semaphore flags, lamps and flags, lamps and lights, and the heliograph. In open warfare, visual signalling (employing signal flags and the heliograph) was the norm. A competent signaller could transmit 12 words a minute with signal flags (during daylight) and signal lights (at night). Signal lights, which were secured in a wooden case, employed a battery-operated Morse code key.( These signalling techniques had certain disadvantages, however. In trench warfare, operators using these methods were forced to expose themselves to enemy fire; while messages sent to the rear by signal lights could not be seen by enemy forces, replies to such messages were readily spotted, and operators were, once again, exposed to enemy fire.(During the war, the Army also trained animals for use in the trenches. Dogs carried messages; horses, mules and dogs were used to lay telephone and telegraph cables.( Carrier pigeons, who transported messages back from the front line, were also carried in tanks so that they could deliver messages during an attack.( Over 20,000 pigeons and 370 handlers were used during the war, and at times, they were the sole means of communication.()Royal Flying CorpsFile:Royal Flying Corps poster.jpg|thumb|Flying Corps World War I recruiting posterAt the start of the war, the Royal Flying Corps (RFC) in the Field, commanded by Sir David Henderson consisted of five squadronsone balloon squadron (RFC No 1 Squadron) and four aeroplane squadrons (Nos 2, 3, 4 and 5).() These units were first used for aerial spotting on 13 September 1914, but only became efficient when they perfected the use of wireless communication at Aubers ridge on 9 May 1915. photography was attempted during 1914, but again, it only became effective the following year. In August 1915, General Hugh Trenchard replaced Henderson. The British use of air power evolved during the war, from a reconnaissance force to a fighting force that attempted to gain command of the air above the trenches and carry out bombing raids on targets behind the line.(Millett & Murray (1988), p. 54) The early aircraft of the RFC were inferior to their German rivals; in April 1917, (known as April), the RFC lost over 300 aircrew and 245 aircraft.(Franks & Van Wyngarden (2007), p. 36) Not until late 1917, with the introduction of the Camel and the S.E.5, were they able to compete successfully for control of the air.(On 17 August 1917, General Smuts presented a report to the War Council concerning the future of air power. Given its potential for the devastation of enemy lands and the destruction of industrial targets and centres of population on a vast scale. He recommended a new air service be formed that would be on a level with the Army and Royal Navy. The formation of the new service, however, would make use of the under-utilised men and machines of the Naval Air Service (RNAS), as well as ending the inter-service rivalries that at times had adversely affected aircraft procurement. On 1 April 1918, the RFC and the RNAS were amalgamated to form a new service, the Air Force (RAF). The RAF was under the control of the equally new Ministry. By 1918, photographic images could be taken from  and interpreted by over 3,000 personnel. Planes did not carry parachutes until 1918, though they had been available since before the war.(Beckett & Simpson (1985), p. 254) After starting with some 2,073 personnel in 1914, the RAF had 4,000 combat aircraft and 114,000 personnel by the beginning of 1919 .()Corps of Royal EngineersOn 1 August 1914, the Royal Engineers consisted of 25,000 officers and men in the regular army and reserves; by the same date in 1917, it had grown to a total of 250,000.() In 1914, when the BEF arrived in France, there were two Engineer field companies attached to each infantry division, which was increased to three companies by September 1914.() Each division also had a Signals company, which was responsible for communications between Corps, Division and Brigade headquarters. ()Engineer tunnelling companies were formed in response to the German blowing of 10 small mines in December 1914, at Givenchy.( The first British mine was detonated at Hill 60 on 17 February 1915. Mining was used increasingly during the battle of Aubers ridge in May 1915, and the of Loos in September 1915. In July 1916, on the first day of the battle of the Somme, what became known as the Crater was created by a mine at Boisselle.()Twenty-one companies were eventually formed and were employed digging subways, cable trenches, Sapping, dugouts as well as offensive or defensive mining.( At the end of the war, Engineers were directly responsible for maintaining buildings and designing the infantry front-line fortifications and artillery positions, the telephones, wireless and other signalling equipment, railways, roads, water supply, bridges and transport. They also operated the railways and inland waterways.(Machine Gun CorpsIn September 1915, the Gun Corps (MGC) was formed to provide heavy machine-gun teams after a proposal was made to the War Office for the formation of a single specialist machine-gun company for each infantry brigadea goal to be achieved by withdrawing guns and gun teams from the battalions.() Created in October 1915, the MGC consisted of infantry machine-gun companies, cavalry machine-gun squadrons and motor machine-gun batteries.( In the trenches, the Corps guns were deployed with an interlocking field of fire and proved to be a devastating defensive weapon against attacking infantry.( They were also used in an indirect fire support role, in which they fired over the heads( and from the flanks(Connelly (2006), p. 66) of the advancing infantry and behind the German trenches to stop reinforcements and supplies from getting to the front.(Tank CorpsThe Tank Corps was formed as the Heavy Section Machine Gun Corps in 1916.(Hofmann (2006), p. 53) Tanks were used for the first time in action in the battle of the Somme on 15 September 1916. The intention being that they would crush the barbed wire for the infantry, then cross the trenches and exploit any breakthrough behind the German lines.(Hoffmann (2006), pp. 5354) In November 1916, they were renamed the Heavy Branch MGC and in June 1917, the Tank Corps.(Swinton (1972), p. 178)Originally formed in Companies of the Heavy Branch MGC, designated A, B, C and D; each company of  four sections had six tanks, three male and three female versions (artillery or machine guns), with one tank held as a company reserve.() In November 1916, each company was reformed as a battalion of three companies, with plans to increase the Corps to 20 battalions, each Tank Battalion had a complement of 32 officers and 374 men.(The first offensive of the war in which tanks were used on mass was the of Cambrai in 1917; 476 tanks started the attack, and the German front collapsed. At midday the British had advanced five miles behind the German line.(Tucker & Roberts (2005), p. 407) The of Amiens in 1918 saw the value of the tank being appreciated; 10 heavy and two light battalions of 414 tanks were included in the assault. 342 Mark Vs and 72 Whippets were backed up by a further 120 tanks designed to carry forward supplies for the armour and infantry. By the end of the first day of the attack, they had penetrated the German line by , 16,000 prisoners were taken.(Griffiths & Griess (2003), p. 155) In September 1918, the British Army was the most mechanized army in the world. Some 22,000 men had served in the Tank Corps by the end of the war.(Bond 2009, p. 5.)Army Service CorpsThe Service Corps (ASC) operated the transport system to deliver men, ammunition and matriel to the front. From 12,000 men at the start of the war, the Corps increased in size to over 3,000,000 by November 1918.( In addition they had under command Indian, Egyptian, Chinese (Labour Corps) and other native labourers, carriers and stores men.( They provided horsed and mechanical transport companies, the army remount service and ASC Labour companies.( In August 1914, they delivered  of bread to the front which increased to  by November 1918.()Royal Army Medical CorpsThe Army Medical Corps (RAMC) supplied the doctors, casualty evacuation, field ambulances and hospitals for the army.() The Corps was assisted in its work by voluntary help from the Red Cross, Johns Ambulance and the Ambulance Unit.(The only person to be awarded the Cross twice during the war was a doctor in the RAMC, Captain Godfrey Chavasse, VC and Bar, MC.()While not strictly a member of the RAMC, stretcher bearer Corporal Harold Coltman VC, DCM & Bar, MM & Bar, was the  most decorated other rank of the war.(Holmes (2005), p. 471)Life in the trenchesBy the end of 1914, the war on the Western Front had reached stalemate and the trench lines extended from the Belgian coast to the Swiss frontier.( By September 1915, the length of the British front line stretched some . Soldiers were in the front or reserve line trenches for about eight days at a time, before being relieved.()There were three trenches in a typical front line sector; the fire trench, the support trench and the reserve trench, all joined by communication trenches.( The trenches varied in depth, but they were usually about four or five feet deep, or in areas with a high table a wall of sandbags would be built to allow the defenders to stand upright, fire trenches were provided with a fire step, so the occupants could return fire during an attack (see diagram).( Ideally, the bottom of the trench was lined with duckboards to prevent men from sinking into the mud and dugouts were cut into the walls, these gave shelter from the elements and shrapnel, although in the British Army dugouts were usually reserved for the officers and senior NCOs.( The men were then expected to sleep wherever they could and in wet weather they lived under groundsheets or in tents at the bottom of the trench on the duckboards.()At the front, soldiers were in constant danger from artillery shells, mortar bombs and bullets and as the war progressed they also faced aerial attack.( Some sectors of the front saw little activity throughout the war, making life comparatively easy. Other sectors were in a perpetual state of violent activity. However, quiet sectors still amassed daily casualties through snipers, artillery fire and disease. The harsh conditions, where trenches were often wet and muddy and the constant company of lice and rats which fed on unburied bodies, often carried disease.( Many troops suffered from foot, fever and trench nephritis. They could also contract bite in the winter months and heat exhaustion in the summer. The men were frequently wet and extremely muddy, or dry and exceedingly dusty.(() Food could not usually be cooked in the front line trenches as any smoke would draw enemy fire, hot food had to be carried along communication trenches in clumsy hayboxes, sometimes arriving late or not at all.Daily routineFile:Cheshire Regiment trench Somme 1916.jpg|thumb|left|A sentry of the Regiment 1916, what is not so obvious are the four men sleeping in the trenchDaily routine of life in the trenches began with the morning stand-to. An hour before dawn everyone was roused and ordered to man their positions in order to guard against a dawn raid by the Germans.() With stand-to over, it was time for the men to have breakfast and perform ablutions. Once complete, the NCOs would assign daily chores, before the men attended to the cleaning of rifles and equipment, filling sandbags, repairing trenches or digging latrines.( Once the daily tasks had been completed the men who were off-duty would find a place to sleep.( Due to the constant bombardments and the sheer effort of trying to stay alive, deprivation was common. Soldiers also had to take it in turns to be on sentry duty, watching for enemy movements.()Both sides front line was constantly under observation by snipers and lookouts during daylight; movement was therefore restricted until after the dusk stand-to and night had fallen.( Under the cover of darkness, troops attended to vital maintenance and resupply, with rations and water being brought to the front line, fresh units swapped places with troops moving to the rear for rest and recuperation.( raiding was also carried out and construction parties formed to repair trenches and fortifications, while wiring parties were sent out to repair or renew the wire in mans land.( An hour before dawn, everyone would stand-to once more.(Moving into the front lineA set procedure was used by a division that was moving into the front line. Once they had been informed that they were moving forward, the brigadiers and battalion commanders would be taken to the forward areas to reconnoitre the sections of the front that were to be occupied by their troops.( Meanwhile, the battalion transport officers would be taken to the headquarters of the division that they were relieving in order to observe  the methods used for drawing rations and ammunition, and the manner in which they were supplied to the troops at the front. Detachments from the divisional artillery group would move forward and were attached to the artillery batteries of the division they were relieving.( Five days later, the infantry battalions that were destined for the front line sent forward their specialists from the Lewis gun teams, and the grenade officer, the machine gun officer, the four company commanders, and some of the signallers to take over the trench stores and settle into the trench routine before the battalions moved in.( Overnight, the battalions would move into the line, and the artillery would take over the guns that were already in position, leaving theirs behind to be taken over by the batteries that had been relieved.()Western frontUnder the command of Field Marshal Sir John French,(Pearce & Stewart (2002), pp. 289290) the BEF began to deploy to France within days of the of war.( The first encounter with the Germans came at Mons on 23 August 1914,(Pearce & Stewart (2002), p. 289) after which the Allies began the Retreat, the BEF was involved in the of Le Cateau.() The BEF had a small role in halting the German advance at the Marne,() before participating in the Aisne counter-offensive,() in September which was followed by a period known as the Race to the Sea during which the BEF redeployed to Flanders.()For the BEF, 1914 ended with First Ypres which marked the beginning of a long struggle for the Ypres salient.( British casualties in the fighting between 14 October and 30 November were 58,155 (7,960 dead, 29,562 wounded and 17,873 missing). It is often said that the pre-war professional army died at the first battle of Ypres.( The army had arrived in France with 84,000 infantry. By the end of the battle, the BEF had suffered 86,237 casualties, mostly to the infantry.()File:British infantry advancing at Loos 25 September 1915.jpg|thumb|British infantry advancing through gas during the of Loos, 25 September 1915.warfare prevailed in 1915, and the BEFas the junior partner on the Western Frontfought a series of small battles, at times coordinated with the larger French offensives, like the of Neuve Chapelle which is always associated with the shell crisis, the of Aubers Ridge, the of Festubert in May and the of Givenchy in June.()()() On 22 April 1915, the Germans launched the battle of Ypres, employing gas for the first time on the Western Front and capturing much of the high ground that ringed the salient.() By September 1915, the British Army had grown with the first of Kitcheners New Army divisions entering the line, and as part of the battle of Artois,(Tucker & Roberts (2005), p. 230) the army launched a major attack, the of Loos, utilising its own newly developed chemical weapons for the first time.(Frothingham (1920), p. 118) The resulting failure marked the end for Field Marshal French. On 19 December 1915, General Sir Douglas Haig replaced him as Commander-in-Chief of the BEF.(Griffiths & Greiss (2003), p. 69)wounded Bernafay Wood 19 July 1916.jpg|thumb|left|British wounded returning from fighting on Bazentin Ridge, July 1916. Photo by Ernest Brooks.For the British Army, 1916 was dominated by the battle of the Somme which started disastrously on 1 July. The day on the Somme remains the bloodiest day in the history of the British Army when over 19,000 soldiers were killed and nearly 40,000 were wounded, all for little or no gain.() The only real success was in the south where, using imaginative tactics and helped by the French, the (Eastern) Division and 30th Division took all their objectives, including Montauban, and the 7th Division captured Mametz.( At Thiepval, the (Ulster) Division seized the Redoubt but was forced to withdraw because of lack of progress elsewhere.( There followed nearly five months of attrition during which the Fourth Army of General Henry Rawlinson and the Fifth Army of General Hubert Gough advanced an average of  at a cost of 420,000 casualties.(Sheffield (2007), p. 151)In February 1917, the German Army began to withdraw to the Line and it was these formidable defences that elements of the British Army assaulted in the battle of Arras in April. For this battle, the British Prime MinisterLloyd Georgehad placed Haig and the BEF under the orders of new French Commander-in-Chief (Nivelle), who planned a major French Army offensive in Champagne.(Ashworth (2000), pp. 5556) When the battle officially ended on 16 May, British troops had made significant advances, but had been unable to achieve a major breakthrough at any point.( Having failed to deliver a breakthrough, Haig now embarked on his favoured plan to launch an offensive in Flanders. In a successful preliminary operation, General Herbert Plumers Second Army seized the Messines ridge south of Ypres.(Wolff (2001), p. 102) The battle of Passchendaele, which began on 31 July 1917, was one of the harshest ordeals endured by British and Dominion troops during the war, with the battlefield reduced to a quagmire. It was not until 6 November that Passchendaele ridge was captured, by which time the British Army had sustained 310,000 casualties.() For the British Army, 1917 ended with the battle of Cambrai which demonstrated the potential of tanks operating en masse. The Third Army commanderGeneral Julian Byngplanned an ambitious breakthrough and achieved an unprecedented advanced of  on the first day but lacked the reserves to either continue or consolidate. A German counter-offensive succeeded in recapturing most of the lost ground.(Turner & Dennis (2007), pp. 3565)The final year of the war1918started with disaster and ended in triumph. On 21 March 1918, German General Ludendorff launched the Offensive and the main weight of the first blowOperation Michaelfell on the British Fifth Army of General Gough which was forced to retreat, finally halting the German advance on the Marne in June 1918.() The next German attack came south of Ypres in the battle of the Lys river and here too the British Army fell back. Haig issued his famous Order of the Day, With our backs to the wall and believing in the justice of our cause, each one of us must fight on to the end. In response to the crisis facing the Allies, French general Foch was made Supreme Commander for Allied forces on the Western Front, placing the BEF under his strategic direction.(York Times, 13 April 1918)(Keegan (1998), p. 403) On 8 August 1918, General Rawlinsons Fourth Army launched the battle of Amiens which marked the start of the Days Offensive, the final Allied offensive on the Western Front. Over the following weeks, all five armies of the BEF went on the offensive from the Somme to Flanders.(Langley (2008), pp. 575) Fighting continued right up until the Armistice with Germany came into effect at 11:00 am on 11 November 1918.(Mallam (2003), p. 1889)In the final offensive, the BEF captured 188,700 prisoners and 2,840 guns which was only 7,800 prisoners and 935 guns less than those taken by the French, Belgian and American armies combined.()Other campaignsChinaIn 1914, the British Army was involved in what became known as the of Tsingtao when the 2nd Battalion Wales Borderers landed in China in support of Japanese forces in the capture of the German port of Tsingtao.(Willmott & Kindersley, p. 91) The British were part of a 23,000-strong task force which included a mixed BritishIndian Brigade of 1,500 troops and the battleship . A bombardment of the port started on 31 October 1914, and by 7 November, the Japanese 18th Division, 29th Infantry Brigade and the BritishIndian Brigade, had stormed and captured the garrison and its 4,000 troops.(East African1914 also witnessed the commencement of the East African Campaign against von Lettow-Vorbecks elusive German and African askari forces. Most British operations in Africa were carried out by African askari units such as the African Rifles (KAR), South African or Indian Army units. The British force was led, in turn, by General Horace Smith-Dorrien, South African General Jan Smuts, and British General Reginald Hoskins.(() The force was composed of units of the KAR and the 27th Bangalore Brigade from the British Indian Army, with the 2nd Battalion, Regiment (North Lancashire) under command. The German forces of von Lettow-Vorbecks Schutztruppe remained undefeated and surrendered on 25 November 1918, 14 days after the Armistice in Europe.(The casualty rate amongst British and Empire troops, excluding the Africans, was 6,000 dead and 3,000 wounded. More troops died from diseases than from enemy action, and illness accounted for 70% of the total casualties.(MesopotamiaFile:Maude in Baghdad.jpg|thumb|March 1917, British troops entering Baghdad.The British force fighting in Mesopotamia was principally drawn from the British Indian Army, with only one solely British formation, the (Western) Division. Its objective was to secure the Navys oil supply from Persia. On 7 November 1914, the British Indian forceled by General Sir John Nixoninvaded Mesopotamia, and on 23 November, entered Basrah.( After this initial invasion, there followed a disastrous and humiliating defeat for the British by the Turks at the of Kut-al-Amara from 7 December 1915-29 April 1916, when the entire garrison of 13,000 British and Indian troops surrendered.( The British reorganised and raised the number of available troops to 250,000.( The British eventually regained momentum upon General Stanley Maude becoming commander, and a new offensive began in December 1916. On 24 February 1917, Kut-al-Amara fell to the joint British and Indian force, and Baghdad was captured in March 1917.( A week after the capture of Baghdad, General Maude issued the of Baghdad, which contained the famous line, our armies do not come into your cities and lands as conquerors or enemies, but as liberators.() Lieutenant General Sir William Marshall succeeded Maude following the latters death from cholera on 18 November 1917. He continued with the River War until October 1918, when the British captured the Mosul oil fields, a development that led to the collapse of the Turkish forces. The of Mudros with Turkey was signed on 30 October 1918. During the campaign, 100,000 British and Indian casualties were caused. Of these, 53,000 died, with 13,000 of the dead succumbing to disease.(GallipoliFile:V Beach Helles Gallipoli.jpg|thumb|left|V Beach, Helles Gallipoli.Turkey had entered the war on the German side on 31 October 1914. One of its first acts was to close the Dardanelles Straits to the Allies.( In April 1915, following the failure of the Royal Navys attempt to capture the Dardanelles, British and ANZAC forces landed on the Gallipoli peninsula, under the command of General Ian Hamilton.( The main British attacks were the first, second and third battles of Krithia. These were a series of attacks against the Turkish defences aimed at capturing the original objectives of 25 April 1915. They all failed to achieve their objectives.(Haythornthwaite (1991), pp. 5264) In August, another landing was made at Suvla Bay. The Suvla landing was reinforced by the arrival of the 10th Division from Kitcheners New Army, 53rd, 54th first-line Territorial divisions and the dismounted yeomanry of the 2nd Mounted Division.( The 29th Division was also moved from Helles to Suvla for one more push. The final British attempt to resuscitate the offensive came on 21 August, with attacks at Scimitar Hill and Hill 60. Control of these hills would have united the Anzac and Suvla fronts, but neither battle achieved success. When fighting at Hill 60 ceased on 29 August, the battle for the Sari Bair heights, and indeed, the battle for the peninsula, was effectively over;  by January 1916, the Allies had withdrawn.(Estimates of casualties vary enormously, but of the around 480,000 Allied troops involved in the campaign, 180,000 were wounded and 44,000 died, 20,000 of the dead being British.(IrelandThe Easter Rising was a rebellion staged in Ireland during Week, 1916. It was mounted by republicans with the aims of ending British rule in Ireland and establishing an Republic. Organised by the Military Council of the Republican Brotherhood, the rising lasted from 24-30 April 1916.( Members of the Volunteers, joined by the smaller Citizen Army, along with 200 members of na mBan, seized key locations in Dublin and proclaimed an Republic independent of Britain.()Army reinforcements were moved  into Dublin and by 28 April, the 1,600 rebels were facing 18 to 20,000 soldiers,( the rising was suppressed after seven days of fighting, its leaders were martialled and executed.() Easter Rising casualties were 450 killed, 2,614 wounded, and nine missing, almost all in Dublin. The only significant action elsewhere was at Ashbourne,  north of Dublin. Military casualties were 116 dead, 368 wounded and 9 missing. The Irish and Dublin police forces had 16 killed and 29 wounded,  254 non-combatant civilians died.()Salonikaof the 4th (Highland) Mountain Brigade with a  mountain gun, SalonikaA new front was opened in Salonika at the request of the Greek government, intending to support Serbian forces and oppose Bulgaria. The first troops of the Salonika Army, arrived in Salonika in October 1916, too late to prevent the Serbian Army from retreating into Albania and Greece. French, British and Russian troops arrived in Salonika between 1916 and 1917 and became known as the Army of the East or the Army of the Orient, under the overall command of French General Sarrail.(Tucker & Roberts (2005), p. 423)With the objective of destroying the Bulgarian Army, the French and British launched a new offensive in April 1917, without any significant success. A stalemate ensued without any movement by either side; the front became known as Europes biggest internment camp for the Allies by the Germans.() This situation lasted until 18 September 1918, when the British and Greek Armies, under the command of General George Milne attacked in the Lake Doiran Sector.( The Bulgarian Armynow in retreatsigned an armistice on 30 September 1918.(ItalyItaly joined the war on the Allies side on 5 May 1915, declaring war on Austria-Hungary on 23 May 1915 and on Germany on 28 August 1916. The British Armys involvement in the Italian campaign did not start until late 1917, when troops were sent to help prevent a defeat on the Italian front. On 24 October 1917 in the of Caporetto the Second Italian Army collapsed and the Italians were forced to retreat to the River, where they could be reinforced with five British and six French Divisions from the Western Front, complete with supporting arms and commanded by General Plumer. The reinforced Italians successfully managed to halt the Austro-Hungarian advance at the of the Piave river. During the Allied counter-attack in October 1918, the Austro-Hungarian Army collapsed after taking heavy losses at the of Vittorio Veneto. An armistice was signed shortly afterwards on 3 November 1918.(Fighting the Senussi ArabsIn late November 1915, in response to the growing threat from a pro-Turkish Islamic Arab sect known as the Senussi, a composite British body known as the Western Frontier Force was sent into the Desert to Matruh, under the command of British Indian Army officer Major General Alexander Wallace. A series of sharp battles against the Arabs ensued at Um Rakhum, Gebel Medwa, and Halazin during December and January. The Western Desert Force, now under Major General Peyton, re-occupied Barrani and Sallum in February and March 1916. Shipwrecked British seamen from HMT Moorina and HMS Tara, who had been held at Bir Hakeim, were rescued by a contigent of armoured cars led by the Duke of Westminster.(Bean (1929), pp. 959964)Sinai and PalestineFile:Allenby enters Jerusalem 1917.jpg|thumb|left|General Allenby, enters Jerusalem on foot out of respect for the Holy City, 31 December 1917The Sinai and Palestine Campaign was fuelled by criticism of the policy of a static defence of the Suez Canal, which employed six infantry divisions and five mounted brigades.(Tucker & Roberts (2005), p. 1091) After the repulse of the Turkish Suez Offensive, nine divisions were sent to the Western Front and one to Mesopotamia.(MacMunn and Falls (1928), p. 98)The British Army in the Sinai and Palestine subsequently included the 10th, 42nd, 52nd, 53rd, 54th, 60th, 74th and 75th divisions. British yeomanry formed part of the Mounted Division, Mounted Division and Mounted Divisions. With the Camel Corps Brigade, mounted troops formed the Desert Column. The whole forceknown as the Egyptian Expeditionary Force (EEF)was under the command of General Sir Murray in Cairo.(MacMunn and Falls (1928), pp. 356-358)Murray made steady progress against the Turkish forces, which were defeated in the battles of Romani, Magdhaba and Rafa. However, he was repulsed at the first and battle of Gaza in 1917.() The defeat in the Second Battle of Gaza prompted the Office to change the command of the EEF, and on 28 June 1917, Murray was replaced by General Sir Edmund Allenby, who reinvigorated the campaign.(MacMunn and Falls (1928), p. 368)Allenby reorganised his forces along more conventional lines. The EEF now included the Mounted Corps, under Lieutenant General Sir Chauvel; XX Corps under Lieutenant General Sir Phillip Chetwode and  XXI Corps under Lieutenant General Bulfin.(Falls (1930), p. 16) In October 1917, they defeated the Turkish forces in the battle of Gaza and the battle of Mughar ridge, which succeeded in causing the Ottoman Seventh and Eighth Armies to withdraw towards Jerusalem and Haifa respectively. This led to the capture of Jerusalem in December 1917.(In February and April 1918, Australian mounted troops took part in two raids east across the Jordan River near Es Salt, a village in Palestine  west of Amman. Although these raids were unsuccessful, they encouraged Turkish commanders to believe that the main British effort would be launched across the Jordan, when in fact it would be launched along the coastal plain.( ) The EEF was greatly weakened at this time by the crisis in France, which led to the despatch of the 52nd and 74th Divisions to the Western Front, the breaking up of the Yeomanry Mounted Division, and the replacement of most of the British infantry in four of the remaining divisions with Indian troops.(Falls (1930), pp. 413421) In September 1918, Allenbys forces won the decisive Megiddo Offensive, which precipitated the of Mudros with the Ottoman Empire, which was signed on 31 October 1918.(Karsh (2001), p. 327)Total Allied casualties in the Sinai and Palestine campaign were 60,000 of which 20,000 were killed. Some 15,000 of the dead were British.(PersiaFollowing the abdication of the Russian Tsar in 1917, the Caucasus Front collapsed, leaving Central Asiaand beyond it Indiaopen to the Turkish Army. The Office responded with a plan to send a force of hand-picked British officers and NCOs to organise any remaining Russian forces or civilians who were ready to fight the Turkish forces. This force became known as Dunsterforce after its commander, Major General Charles Dunsterville, the inspiration for the titular character of Kiplings novel & Co.. It arrived in Baku in August 1918. It was hoped that Dunsterforce could raise an army from the Christian Georgian, Armenian and Assyrian people who had supported the Russians and had historically feared the Turks. While Dunsterforce had some success the task proved beyond its ability.(Bean (1937), pp. 728731)AftermathThe British Army during World War I was the largest military force that Britain had put into the field up to that point.(Tucker & Roberts (2006), p. 816) On the Western Front, the BEF ended the war as the strongest fighting force, more experienced and larger than the American Army, its morale was in better shape than the French Army.(The cost of victory was high. The official final and corrected casualty figures for the British Armyincluding the Territorial Forcewere issued on 10 March 1921. The losses for the period between 4 August 1914 and 30 September 1919 included 573,507 killed in action, died from wounds and died of other causes and 254,176 missing (minus 154,308 released prisoners), for a net total of 673,375 dead and missing. Casualty figures also indicated that there were 1,643,469 wounded.(The Army Council (1921), pp. 6272)For some, the fighting did not end in 1918. The army dispatched troops to Russia during the intervention in the Russian Civil War, which was followed by the War in January 1919 and the Anglo-Afghan War in May 1919.(Barthorp (2002), p. 152) The third Afghan war was followed by the conflict between British forces and Somaliland dervishes. Those not involved in fighting or occupation duties were demobilised. The demobilisation of 4,000,000 men that followed the end of the war had, within a year, reduced the army to 800,000; by November 1920, this figure had fallen to 370,000 men.(Jeffery (1984), p. 13)The Year Rule was introduced in August 1919, which stipulated that the armed forces  should draft their estimates on the assumption that the Empire would not be engaged in any great war during the next ten years. In 1928, Churchill, as of the Exchequer, successfully urged the Cabinet to make the rule self-perpetuating and hence it was in force unless specifically countermanded.(Kennedy (1976), pp. 273296) There were cuts in defence spending as a result of this rule, falling from 766 million in 19191920, to 189 million in 19211922, and to 102 million in 1932.(Kennedy (1976), p. 231)The British Army tried to learn the lessons of World War I, and adopt them into its pre-war doctrine.(French (2000), pp. 1415) In the 1920s and much of the 1930s, the General Staff tried to establish a small, mechanised, professional army and formed the Mechanized Force, but with the lack of any identified threat, its main function reverted to garrison duties around the British Empire.(French (2000), p. 15)NotesReferences******************************* Digitized 21 November 2007*************************************** Digitized 10 June 2008*************
19487837
Hugh_Henshall
Hugh Henshall (17341816) was an English engineer, noted for his work on canals.  He was born in Staffordshire and was a student of the engineer Brindley, who was also his brother-in-law.Early lifeImage:Brindley James.jpg|right|thumb|upright|BrindleyHenshall was born to John Henshall and Anne Cartwright (d. February 1776), most likely in Newchapel, Wolstanton.  They had five children between 1731 and 1747.  Henshalls father John may have assisted James Brindley on early surveys of the and Mersey Canal.  The two families became close, and Henshall became a pupil of Brindley.(  Henshall later met John Gilbert, his brother Thomas Gilbert, and Clowes.  Henshalls sister, Jane, married William Clowes, a local landowner with mining interests and elder brother of Josiah Clowes.()  Another sister of Henshall, Anne, married Brindley on 8 December 1765 when she was 19, and he was 49.()In 1778 Henshall purchased the farm and surrounding lands at Greenway Bank,() near Tunstall in Staffordshire.He died on 16 November 1816, and is buried at St. James, in Newchapel.(Waterways engineeringHenshall worked with Brindley and Smeaton in 1758 to survey the proposed Trent and Mersey Canal. In 1765 he helped survey the Weaver from Winsford to Lowton, and in the same year planned a link from Cheshire to the Canal, and surveyed the Severn.() In 1768 Brindley, assisted by Henshall, surveyed the route of the and Worcestershire Canal.( Henshall carried out the survey for the act of Parliament, with Samuel Simcock.Henshalls experience surveying the River Weaver became invaluable. He was made clerk of works on the and Mersey Canal, and made the parliamentary map of the canal. Brindley, engineer for the canal, died in 1772. Henshall became Brindleys heir,( and continued his work, completing the Tunnel and the northern reaches of the canal including the junction with the Bridgewater Canal.( He completed the canal in May 1777. Brindley had also surveyed the route of the Canal in 1769, and was supervising its construction at the time of his death. John Varley moved from being clerk of works to resident engineer with Henshall. Concerns were raised about Varleys accounting, and collusion in awarding contracts for construction to his relatives, and in 1774 Henshall was appointed Chief Engineer. The canal was to be built as a narrow canal, but in 1775, nine shareholders offered to fund the extra cost of making it a broad canal from Retford to Stockwith. The death of Henshalls mother, and his absence led to criticism from the canal company for not attending to the work. Henshall also completed the Canal in 1776.()In December 1787, along with two other engineers, he investigated flooding on the and Irwell Navigation and noted that the navigable depth at Hollins Ferry was 2 feet to 2 feet 9 inches, whereas it had been 1 foot 8 inches sixteen years previously.(In 1790 he was asked to survey the route of the proposed Bolton & Bury Canal.(() He produced a written report which helped assuage the fears of local mill owners, worried that the new canal would harm their water supply. He was a member of the committee to the canal, and a subscriber to the scheme, making an initial investment of 1,000 in shares.() He also helped engage contractors during construction of the canal.()In 1792 Henshall was asked to re-survey Josiah Clowess plans for the route of the and Gloucestershire Canal, and recommended a diversion to Newent, where there were minor coalfields.( The following year, along with McNiven, he returned to the Mersey and Irwell navigation to perform a survey. He reported that if the locks and cuts were kept in good order and the millers prevented from lowering the water level that the navigation could be more successful and more reliable.()Henshall and Dadford, Jr. (another pupil of James Brindley) surveyed the line of the & Brecon Canal for a tramroad from Llan-march Coal and Mine Works to the Clydach ironworks.( Henshall also worked for Jessop while he was advising on the line of the Western Canal.(  In 1795 Henshall completed the survey of the Canal.(Other business interestsHenshalls purchase of Greenway Bank allowed him to concentrate on his canal carrying business, Hugh Henshall & Co.  This company became the carrying company for the proprietors of the Trent and Mersey Canal.  The business was a success and in 1786 was taken over by Pickfords.(  He also became involved in the pottery trade with Robert Williamson at Longport.See also* of the British canal system* in the United Kingdom* of civil engineersReferencesBibliography*:Although no details of author and date are given, this is likely to be a reliable source as it was published for the Ship Canal Company in 1973 or later (a picture of the reopening of the canal is on the cover).**
19505346
Wiluna_Branch_Railway
The Wiluna Branch Railway was a branch line of the Australian Government Railways which extended from Meekatharra to Wiluna. Overview It was open between 1932 and 1957 and mainly served a gold mining area.(	Montgomery, A. (1927) Report on the request of the Wiluna Gold Mines, Limited, for railway connection of Wiluna with the State railway system Perth : Govt. Printer.) Intermediate stations The line is an extension of the Northern Railway.* Meekatharra* Paroo (563m)* Wiluna References 
19523741
River_Runs_Red_(Midnight_Oil_song)
#REDIRECT Sky Mining
19542637
Maathaad_Maathaadu_Mallige
Maathaad Maathaadu Mallige(Kannada:  , translation: Speak, Speak out, Jasmine) is a Kannada language film directed by  Chandrashekhar.  Maathaad Maathaadu Mallige can be roughly transliterated from North Karnatakas colloquial Kannada as Speak, Speak out, Jasmine. Maathaad Maathaad Mallige depicts the challenges faced by the people living in rural sectors of India.The plotThe movie starts with a happy small family of Hoovaiah ((actor)) and Kanaka (Suhasini) having a small field growing flowers of Mallige, Sampige and other flowers which spread fragrance. The couple have three daughters in a small village of Jenu Koppa. Hoovaiah stands true to his devotion to Gandhi philosophy of Satyagraha come whatever may facing with nonchalance  and non-violence. Globalization companies cause problems for the village as there are rich mine deposits nearby.Hoovaiah, zamindar of Jenu Koppa village, is a flower seller.Villagers revere him. When the government gives an MNC the licence to acquire land for mining in Jenukoppa, he strongly opposes it. But Kurupayya (Rangayana Raghu) joins hands with politicians and officials and tries to brainwash people to sell their land for a huge amount.Police atrocities and laati charges on villagers force Hoovaiah to fight a lone battle against land acquisition. Fed up by the turn of events, all villagers decide to leave the village.But Hoovaiah launches a hunger strike to save the village and finally wins the battle.Cast*Dr.Vishnuvardan .. Hoovaiah*Suhasini .. Kanaka*Rangayana Raghu .. Kurupayya*Sudeep .. Cameo appearance*Mandya Ramesh*Taara*KomalThe CompletenessIt shows the everlasting marriage customs of Indian culture crafted with a small incidence taking place between husband and wife wherein Hoovaiah Vishnuvardhan tries to catch a Chitte or butterfly unsuccessfully throughout the movie which also becomes a metaphor when it comes to their own offsprings.The story also depicts the Indian melodrama of diversity of woman folks. The two daughters who become literate in medium of English - synonymous with globalization and not education pursue their interests and leave their family and motherland as they have to display convictions to their decisions. The third daughter although is illiterate is shown as well educated when it comes to human values.The tough Mother played by Suhasini depicts character of a rural household hardworking wife with all the knowledge given by her folk customs. The main story revolves around Hoovaiah fighting for the preservation of his motherland and culture and showing people that money in fact is just a cover of illusion when it means to earn them by selling their own Aatma or Self.The DialoguesMany dialogues get accolades from audience when* Hoovaiah says to government authorities to take mines kept below 3 inches of soil which will belong to government leaving those 3 inches of soil.* Ammana Laali marethu gummana jothe saagidevallo and  Rangana Thittigu kooda rajeya haaki hodavallo (from song ELli Hodavo) - when daughters fly off with witches deserting their parents and their views.* Ella Maya Naale Neevu Maaya ( from song Jhana Jhana) - which says all are Maya in this world.* Ganigala Dhanigala dibbanadalli bharatha maatheye bettaladalu (from song Jhana Jhana) - which metaphors requirements of corrupt globalized world as a fat bridegrooms arrival making motherland naked.* Hoovaiah rejects The strong minded tough new generation naxalite Sudeep offering of help and goes with the lawyer showing his faith in Indian constitution- but in return offers him an advice to be treated as given by an elder brother to a younger brother who has lost his way.* Akka, Nanagyaako bhayavaagtha ide, Nee swalpa olage hogu - Mandya Ramesh, acting as a drunkard in an attempt to save some more falling into the web of urbanization and its attractions tells a coffee shop owner to go inside when some officer comes to inspect Jenu Koppa.* Nammane Aramane Nammappa Maharaja Nammamma Maharani - showing the small family values and the satisfied members comparing themselves to King and Queen of the institution which comes as a little surprise to most urban blues.Overall the movie revolves round the man who tries to get everyone into him as he grows his thoughts whenever he is faced with a challenge, but in the meanwhile he has to avoid his own saplings of frgrance somewhere on the way, and also lose some , but spreading his heart he not only wins over others but also with his own self and limitations.The movie will also be remembered for being one of very rare commercial movies which geniunely tries to address the problems of farmers such as unjudicial exploitation of cultivating lands by globalised companies.The character played by Vishnuvardhan would also be the best in his film career next to that of Mutthina Haara.SoundtrackThe official soundtrack contains 9 songs composed by Murthy with lyrics penned by Chandrashekhar and Gollahalli Shivprasad.Reviews(http://www.rediff.com/movies/2007/aug/24ssmath.htm Rediff).(http://www.chitraloka.com/sections/how_is_it/2007/mathad_mathad_mallige_07.shtml Chitraloka).(http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/moviereview/2309091.cms of India).(Kannada Film Reviews | Mathad Mathadu Mallige | Dr. Vishnuvardhan | Actress Suhasini).References
19558329
Jim_Allen_(playwright)
James Jim Allen (7 October 1926  24 June 1999) was a socialist playwright from England, best known for his collaborations with Loach. Early life Allen was born in the Platting area of Manchester on 7 October 1926, the second child of Kitty and Jack Allen, Catholics of Irish descent.  At the outbreak of war in 1939, Allen left school at the age of 13 to work in a wire factory.  He had various jobs during the war, before being called up into the Army in 1944.  He joined the Highlanders, and served with the British occupation forces in Germany.  After leaving the army in 1947, he worked at a variety of jobs, including a builders labourer, a fireman in the Merchant Navy, and a miner at Bradford colliery. Politics During his military service, Allen was imprisoned for assault, where a fellow inmate introduced him to the ideals of Socialism.  He was a passionate socialist for the rest of his life, although he detested Stalinism and refused to be associated with the Party of Great Britain. In 1958 Allen joined the Labour League (the forerunner of the Workers Revolutionary Party) led by Healy and Lawrence, a group within the mainstream Labour Party. The SLL objected to the close association between the CPGB and the National Union of Mineworkers, and Allen was a prominent campaigner for the League, attending rallies at coalmines throughout the UK. In 1962, the Labour Party declared the SLL to be a proscribed organization, leading to Allens expulsion from the party. He subsequently resigned his membership of the League, and was not associated with any recognized political party thereafter. Writing career Allen began to write during his time as a miner.  In 1958, he was involved in the launch and publication of The Miner, which actively recruited for the SLL.  The proscription of the SLL, together with the shop system of the time, made it impossible for him to find work in the mining or building trades, and he decided to adopt writing as a full-time profession.  In 1964, he submitted a script to TV, and was taken on as a scriptwriter for the soap opera Street.  He worked for Granada until 1967; his 1969 play, The Talking Head, tells the story of a talented writer driven to a nervous breakdown by the pressure of deadlines.His first full-length play, The Hard Word, directed by Scott, was broadcast by the BBC in 1966 as part of their drama series Wednesday Play.  It was followed by The Lump, directed by Gold, first broadcast in 1967.  Both plays were based on his experiences in the building trade, and The Lump features an activist worker who frequently quotes Lenin and London, establishing the political nature of Allens work which was to continue throughout his career.Allen was introduced to Loach through Wednesday Play producer Garnett, beginning their long collaboration.  The first of Allens plays to be directed by Loach was The Big Flame, also for the Wednesday Play series, broadcast in 1969.  The play depicts a strike among the dockers of Liverpool, led by a Trotskyite docker against the wishes of the established union; the strike is violently broken by the army and police.In 1975, Allen wrote, Garnett produced, and Loach directed of Hope, Allens best-known work.  A mini-series with four episodes, it tells the story of the British Labour movement between the end of the Great War in 1918 and the General Strike of 1926.  The series depiction of the British Army was the subject of much hostile criticism in the press.Allen also wrote five plays (The Rank and File (1971), A Choice of Evils (1977), The Spongers (1978), United Kingdom (1981) and Willies Last Stand (1982)) for the BBCs for Today drama series, and several episodes of the Granada series Crown Court.Allen and Loachs most controversial production was the stage play, Perdition. Presented as a courtroom drama, the play dealt with an allegation of collaboration between Hungarian Zionists and the Nazis during the Holocaust. The play was due to open at the Court Theatre in January 1987, but was cancelled 36 hours before the opening night; the script was read in public at that years Festival. Lord Goodman wrote in the Standard: Mr Jim Allens description of the Holocaust can claim a high place in the table of classic anti-Semitism. The work was not produced as a stage play until 1999.With Loach as director, Allen wrote the screenplays for three feature-length films: Hidden Agenda (1990), which portrays the murder of an American civil rights activist in Belfast, Stones (1993), a kitchen-sink tragicomedy set in Greater Manchester, and, Allens final dramatic work, and Freedom (1995), telling the story of an idealistic young Communist from Liverpool who joins the Government forces in the Spanish Civil War. Death Allen was diagnosed with cancer in February 1999, and died the following June. References **  External links * Jim Allen. Obituary at Guardian.* Jim Allen biography at BFIs Screenonline.* An interview with Jim Allen conducted in 1995 by Barbara Slaughter and Vicky Short. Socialist Web Site, 11 August 1999. * Allen (Autor)Allen
19587559
Stuart_Glenn
Stuart Glenn (born 22 September 1957) is President and Operating Officer of PB International. PB International is the international arm of Brinckerhoff, a US$1.8 billion company based in York. PB International has 6,500 staff throughout divisions covering UK/Europe/Africa, Australia Pacific, the East, and Asia. Career Glenn was officially appointed Chief Operating Officer and President of PB International in 2007.Glenn is currently responsible for PB International projects including Jumeirah in Dubai, urban transport systems in Dubai, Delhi, Mumbai, Cairo, and Kong, airports in Spain and India, mining projects in Africa and Australia, energy and water projects through Australia Pacific, the Middle East and Europe, and port projects in Australia and China.Glenn is a Trustee of the for Economic Development of Australia (CEDA), and is a contributor to policy issues facing the infrastructure industry. (Changing Leadership http://www.news.com.au/adelaidenow/story/0,22606,23037689-5014050,00.html) (The common good, Business Review Weekly, Bruce Andrews, 8 February 2007) Education Glenn graduated with a Bachelor of Environmental Science from University and subsequently graduated from the Business School in New York.  References   External links * Parsons Brinckerhoff* PB Europe and Africa* PB Asia* PB Australia-Pacific* Committee for Economic Development of Australia
19598782
List_of_Voltron_characters
This is a list of characters from the Voltron series. The spelling of some names is hypothetical as not all name spellings (especially alien names) are provided from official canon material.Galaxy GarrisonLion Voltron Force* Commander Keith (voiced by Ross in the 80s and 90s series, Giles Panton in the 2011 series)(): Commander and leader of the Voltron Force, who pilots the Black Lion that forms the bulk and head of Voltron. Keith wears a red uniform in the original series, and a black uniform in Voltron: The Third Dimension. Keith is a quiet individual who spends much of his time pondering his decisions, thinking up new strategies, and simply being a leader. He also has a hobby of reading books and can often be found doing so either in the pilots lounge, or in his room. He seemingly cherishes Princess Allura and is thought to be somewhat protective of her; his worst fear, according to Voltron: The Third Dimension, was that she would be forced to marry the evil Prince Lotor. In the Devils Due comic series, Keith originally ran a dojo prior to being recruited by Hawkins. * Lance (voiced by Michael Bell in the 80s and 90s series, Francis in the 2011 series)(: Second-in-command of Voltron, who pilots the Red Lion that forms the right arm of Voltron. Lance wears a blue uniform in the original series, and a metallic red uniform in Voltron: The Third Dimension. He is a tall man, both wiry and wily, and Lance is always cracking jokes and teasing others whenever he gets the chance. He is the only one in the group who contests any of Keiths commands. He is a ladies man and a great pilot, though reckless at times. In the Devils Due comic series, Lance was forced into the mission to Arus due to his criminal record.* Pidge (voiced by Ross in the 80s series, West in the 90s series, Vincent in the 2011 series): Pidge is the youngest, smartest, and smallest of the group; he pilots the Green Lion that forms the left arm of Voltron, and wears a green uniform. His home planet Balto (Earth in the Japanese version) was destroyed by nuclear missiles from King Zarkon. Pidge graduated from the academy at a young age, and his specialty is science. Like the others, he is well-trained in arts, and uses his size and agility to his advantage. Pidge is not afraid to speak his mind, especially to the villains. His heart is often in his words. Pidge has a twin brother, Chip, who is a member of the Vehicle Voltron Air Team.* Sven (voiced by Michael Bell): Sven, a Norwegian pilot, was the original second-in-command. He piloted the Blue Lion and wore a black uniform at the very beginning of the series. In Episode 6, he was badly injured (killed in the Japanese version) during an attack by Haggar, and was sent away to the planet Ebb for medical treatment. Ebb was attacked and raided by Lotors forces, and Sven was captured. The prison ship on which he was transferred accidentally crashed on Planet Doom where Sven went into hiding becoming a hermit within the caves. He eventually encountered Alluras cousin from the Planet Pollux, Princess Romelle, who had been sent to the slave mines after she rejected Lotors advances. During Svens time on Planet Doom he witnessed Zarkon and Lotors cruelty to their slaves, which drove him to the point of madness. He recovered thanks to Romelles emotional support and helped her escape Doom. Sven was later reassigned to the Planet Pollux with Romelle and her brother Prince Bandor. Sven eventually fell in love with Romelle, though he was reluctant to pursue his feelings because he felt he was unworthy of her. Sven was always very quiet and reserved, and spoke only when he had something important to say. Though he may not show it, he is a very emotional person, and his heart is always leading his mind in any decision. Sven does not appear in nor is he mentioned in Voltron: The Third Dimension. Although Sven no longer pilots the Blue Lion on a regular basis after Episode 6, he (his twin brother in the Japanese version) continued to be featured as a pilot for the Voltron Force in the opening credits of the series( while Allura appears in the closing sequence. However, Sven piloted the Blue Lion into combat on one more occasion, during the second season episode Whos Flyin Blue Lion, and quickly demonstrated that his time away had not diminished his formidable combat piloting skills.* Princess Allura (voiced by B.J. Ward in the 80s and 90s series, Ball in the 2011 series): Princess Allura of the planet Arus is the ruler of the Kingdom of Altair, as well as facto ruler of the entire planet, and is also the object of Lotors affections. Daughter of the late King Alfor, Allura inherited her fathers authority on his death and is in chief and of state for the planet Arus, and thus Commander Keiths superior. However, later she takes over for Sven as the pilot of the Blue Lion that forms Voltrons right leg, and defers to Keith during operational engagements. Allura wears a pink uniform in the original series, and a metallic blue uniform in Voltron: The Third Dimension. Though a bit nave, especially with matters of romance, Allura is a strong-willed person, and is very capable of ruling her planet, though some like Coran and Nanny tend to doubt this ability. She is capable of invoking the dead, particularly her father, the late King Alfor. In The Third Dimension, Allura later learns special mind skills that could allow the Voltron Force to control the Lions without having to be in the cockpits, and also helps the others to learn it as well. (* Hunk  (voiced by Weinrib in the 80s series, Michael Richardson in the 90s series, Olsson in the 2011 series): Hunk is the strong-man of the group, piloting the Yellow Lion that forms Voltrons left leg. He is shown wearing an orange uniform in the original series, and a metallic yellow uniform in Voltron: The Third Dimension. He may look tough and mean, but has a soft heart, especially when it comes to children and puppies. He is never late for a meal. Though his friends tease him about his appetite, most of Hunks bulk is muscle. It is revealed that he eats -Fruit Loops (almost) every morning.(Cadets* Daniel (voiced by Tong): Exclusive to Voltron Force, he is one of three new cadets for the Voltron Force. He and Vince were once cadets for the Galaxy Alliance, but were selected to be cadets for the Voltron Force due to their piloting skills. He also has a liking for going fast. This is evident by his VoltCom powers, which he can use to accelerate the speed of the Voltron lions, Voltrons formation sequence and Voltron himself. Hes kind of impulsive, always getting into trouble; though many of his antics are beneficial to the success of Voltron Force. He sometimes gets jealous of Vince and Larmina because of their connections to Voltron, and tends to feel left out of the group. * Vince (voiced by Bell Jr.): Exclusive to Voltron Force, he is one of three new cadets for the Voltron Force and a direct descendant of the original creators of Voltron. He and Daniel were once cadets for the Galaxy Alliance, but were selected to be cadets for the Voltron Force due to their piloting skills. He also has impressive technical skills which helps Pidge out a lot and appears to have some kind of power that links him to Voltron. The reason of why Vince has it is currently unknown, but recently it has been revealed that the Voltron lions have programing that enables them to use Vinces power as a Key to allow Voltron to accomplish special functions when the situation calls for it, particularly to make new formations of Voltron with new powers by reconfiguring him with a different lion to form the main body while having the black lion form a limb. This explains the true nature of Vinces power, particularly why it tends to act on its own. Vince can use his power under his own will, but it takes a lot of concentration and effort.* Larmina (Voiced by Chan-Kent): Exclusive to Voltron Force, she is one of three new cadets for the Voltron Force. She is very skilled in hand-to-hand combat and is Alluras niece. While Allura is unmarried and an only child, the original Voltron series twice featured Alluras surviving Aunt, Queen Orla. It is possible that Queen Orla is Larminas mother, with Aunt being a title of respect to an elder cousin. Larmina enjoys a good fight and hates to be left out of the action. She doesnt always think things through.Vehicle Voltron ForceAir TeamAir Team uniforms were dark blue, yellow, and white.* Air Team Commander Jeff (voiced by Ross): Also leader of entire vehicle Voltron Force, Jeff is hot-headed, occasionally quick-tempered, yet still brave and a very capable leader, even if he doesnt always follow the rules. Although dialogue early in the series hints at something going on between him and Ginger, later episodes suggest a relationship between him and Lisa. He pilots the Command Jet Explorer (#1), which becomes the head of Voltron. In Fleet of Doom, it is revealed that Jeff and Keith had a friendly rivalry in their academy days.* Rocky (voiced by Weinrib): Brooklyn-accented member of the Air Team, usually described by fans as the Hunk of the Vehicle Voltron Force. He pilots the Strato Weapons Module (#2) that forms the upper torso of Voltron. Sparring partner of Hunk in their academy days.* Wolo: A blue-skinned member of the Air Team with very little character development. He pilots the Advanced Recon Helicopter (#3) that becomes the right upper arm of Voltron.* Chip (voiced by Ross): Member of the Air Team, and the youngest member of the Vehicle Voltron Force. Chip is Pidges twin brother. Although not often prominently featured except in one episode, Chip can be described as the brains of the Vehicle Force, much like Pidge is to the Lion Force. He pilots the Advanced Recon Helicopter (#4) that becomes the left upper arm of Voltron.* Ginger (voiced by B.J. Ward): Member of the Air Team. Ginger is a brave and capable pilot, and has fought for a worthy cause ever since she helplessly watched her family destroyed in an astro-ship explosion when she was a little girl. She pilots the Falcon VT Fighter (#5) that forms the chest plate of Voltron.Sea TeamSea Team uniforms were navy blue and aqua.* Sea Team Commander Krik (voiced by Michael Bell): Hailing from an unnamed planet, Krik is appropriately the leader of the Sea Team. Speaking with a stande dialect, he has clairvoyant powers that tend to tell him when something bad has happened 25 years after it did actually happen. He is the pilot of the Communications Module (#6) that becomes the torso mid-rif section of Voltron.* Lisa (voiced by B.J. Ward): Kind and compassionate member of the Sea Team. She is very knowledgeable in ancient cultures, and always seems to know the right thing to say to others. She is in a relationship with Jeff. She pilots the Space Prober (#7) that becomes the right thigh of Voltron.* Tangor One of the members of the Vehicle Voltron Force who is usually treated as an anonymous background characters. Tangor pilots the Space Prober (#8) that forms the left thigh of Voltron.* Shannon (voiced by Michael Bell): Irish-accented member of the Sea Team. Like Ginger, he too fights for a worthy cause, as his brother is a prisoner of the Drule Empire, on Planet Doom. He pilots the Multi-Wheeled Explorer (#9) that becomes the right lower leg of Voltron.* Zandee: Another member of the Vehicle Voltron Force who is usually treated as an anonymous background character. Zandee pilots the Multi-Wheeled Explorer (#10) that becomes the left lower leg of Voltron.Land TeamLand Team uniforms were red and white* Land Team Commander Cliff (voiced by Weinrib): He has a strong Australian accent, and sometimes tends to have a wry sense of humor. He pilots the Jet Radar Station (#11) that forms the lower torso/hips of Voltron. When he first came to the academy, Lance and Wolo yanked him into the pool.* Cinda (voiced by B.J. Ward): Member of the Land Team. Like Korusa, she too is kind and emotional, especially when it comes to nature. She comes from the same water planet as Cric. She pilots the Rotating Personnel Carrier (#12) that forms the right forearm of Voltron.* Modok (voiced by Michael Bell): Large member of the Land Team, who can best be described as a gentle giant. He pilots the Armored Equipment Carrier (#13) that forms the left forearm of Voltron.* Marvin and Hutch (voiced by Michael Bell and Cullen, respectively): Good buddies and members of the Land Team, these two are often seen together, either playing cards or brawling with each other. While Marvin is usually comedic, Hutch is a regular tough guy, always looking for a good fight. They pilot the All-Terrain Space Vehicles (#14 and #15) that form the right and left feet of Voltron, respectively.Mecha(Lion) VoltronA sentient robot created by King Alfor on Arus to fight against the armies of Planet Doom. Voltron was later separated into the five Lions by Haggar. In the first season finale of The Third Dimension, Voltron was destroyed, but recreated in the beginning of the second season, and would go on to be reconfigured into Stealth Voltron whenever he passed into another dimension. In Voltron Force, due to Vinces mysterious powers, Voltron can reconfigure himself with a different lion to form the main body while the Black Lion becomes a limb. Additionally, Voltron can use Daniels VoltCom powers to boost the speed of the lions, his formation sequence and himself.* Black Lion: Piloted by Keith, forming the main body of Voltron. Piloted by Allura in one episode. Unlike the other Lions, the Black Lion did not have a closed hangar. Throughout the series, it was assumed that the Black Lions hangar was located on the large tower fronting the castle, which was previously occupied by a winged lion statue which hid it. When the Black Lion was first activated, this statue crumbled apart to reveal it, and the Black Lion folded its seldom-used wings. In Voltron: The Third Dimension, it is shown that the winged lion statue literally morphs into the Black Lion when the lion is launched. In Voltron Force, Black Lion gains a Tail Shock and its hangar is the center tower of the castle, which opens to deploy the Black Lion. Additionally, the default configuration of Voltron is also known as Black Center. In all media, when the Black Lion forms the body of Voltron, his weapon is the Blazing Sword.** Weapon form command (all shows): Form Blazing Sword** Reconfiguration command (Voltron Force only): Form Black Center* Red Lion: Piloted by Lance, the Red Lion forms the right arm of Voltron. Later piloted by Princess Allura in one episode since Lance was using the Blue Lion to find the cure for the deadly flowers. The Red Lions hangar was located inside a volcano near the castle. In Voltron Force, Red Lion gains a Precision Laser and can form the body of Voltron (known as Red Center) which uses the Magma Pistols. In Red Center configuration, the Black Lion is Voltrons right arm.** Weapon form command (Voltron Force only): Draw Magma Pistols (Form Blazing Guns the first time)** Reconfiguration command (Voltron Force only): Form Red Center* Green Lion: Piloted by Pidge, the Green Lion forms the left arm of Voltron. Piloted by Keith in its first launch before the Black Lion was recovered. The Green Lions hangar was located in a forest near the castle. In Voltron Force, Green Lion gains Boomer shield, in Green Center configuration, the Black Lion will be Voltrons left arm.** Reconfiguration command (Voltron Force only): Form Green Center* Blue Lion: Originally piloted by Sven until Allura became its offical pilot, the Blue Lion forms the right leg of Voltron. Piloted in one episode each by Keith, Coran, and Nanny together, and a replacement pilot (who turned out to be an agent of Zarkon). Piloted once by Lance when he went off to a distant planet to find the cure by which to heal the Princess. Lance piloted the Blue Lion because the planet had a special magnetic field that only the Blue Lion could overcome. The Blue Lions hangar was located underneath the moat that surrounded the castle. In Voltron Force, Blue Lion gains a Freeze Ray and can form the body of Voltron (known as Blue Center) which uses the Titanic Trident, a double-ended trident. In Blue Center configuration, the Black Lion is Voltrons right leg. it is also shown to perform better underwater than the other lions, sort of like how the black lion appears to fly faster than the other lions.** Weapon form command (Voltron Force only): Form Titanic Trident ** Reconfiguration command (Voltron Force only): Form Blue Center* Yellow Lion: Piloted by Hunk, the Yellow Lion forms the left leg of Voltron. The Yellow Lions hangar was located inside a cave located in a desert near the castle. In Voltron: The Third Dimension, its hangar was redesigned to resemble a sphinx-like form instead of an ordinary cave. In Voltron Force, Yellow Lion gains a Demolition Tail as well as a prominent underbite which helps serve as a land plower and can form the body of Voltron (known as Yellow Center) which uses the Wrecking Maces twin flails. Voltron Yellow Center has the unique ability to deploy cell wings and recharge the robot when hes away from Planet Arus. In Yellow Center configuration, the Black Lion is Voltrons left leg.** Weapon form command (Voltron Force only): Rock Wrecking Maces (Form Blazing Something the first time)** Reconfiguration command (Voltron Force only): Form Yellow Center(Vehicle) VoltronIn the Devils Due comic series, Vehicle Voltron was created due to the Galaxy Garrison reverse-engineering the original Voltron after abducting him from Arus under orders from a Drule spy. The machine was named V-15 within the comics, and was first deployed after Voltron to recapture him until they received new orders to support him. Unlike the animated series, which depicted the two Voltron Forces as being family members, as with Chip and Pidge, or longstanding friends (as shown in an episode at the end of the Lion Force run and in the Fleet of Doom special, which brought both Voltrons together; however, the Devils Due comic showed Keith and Jeff as having an antagonistic relationship with one another, particularly with regard to Lion Voltrons accidental sneak attack on Vehicle Voltron during the robots first battle together.* Strato Fighter: Piloted by the Air Team.** Command Jet Explorer 1: Piloted by Jeff.** Strato Weapons Module 2: Piloted by Rocky.** Advanced Recon Helicopter 3: Piloted by Wolo.** Advanced Recon Helicopter 4: Piloted by Chip.** Falcon VT Fighter 5: Piloted by Ginger.* Aqua Fighter: Piloted by the Sea Team.** Communications Module 6: Piloted by Cric.** Space Prober 7: Piloted by Lisa.** Space Prober 8: Piloted by Tagor.** Multi-Wheeled Explorer 9: Piloted by Shannon.** Multi-Wheeled Explorer 10: Piloted by Zandee.* Turbo-Terrain Fighter: Piloted by the Land Team.** Jet Radar Station 11: Piloted by Cliff.** Rotating Personnel Carrier 12: Piloted by Cinda.** Armored Equipment Carrier 13: Piloted by Modoch.** All-Terrain Space Vehicle 14 (the yellow one): Piloted by Marvin.** All-Terrain Space Vehicle 15 (the black one): Piloted by Hutch.Other Mecha* Mouse Plane / Mouse Voltron: Piloted by the Space Mice.* Castle of Lions: The Lion Voltron Forces base of operations and their home, which near the finale can transform into a flying fortress piloted by Coran.* S.S. Explorer: Mothership of the Voltron Vehicle Team, piloted by Commander Hawkins.AlliesLion Voltron Force* Chief Kalon Exclusive to Voltorn Force, Kalon is an ancient lion protector or Lion Rider of Planet Ariel. He and his lion riders protect the Krelshi, ghostly beasts that are an essential part of Ariels harmonious spiritual aura. After Voltron Force helps him maintain order with the Krelshi, he is in their debt. During Keiths plan to rescue political prisoners from The Void, he is surprised when he finds Kalon in the Black Hole cell with him and plans to make his escape. In the final battle with Sky Marshall Wade, Kalon and his lion riders help out in the fight destroying Wades robots in the process and takes Wades pet lion into custody wondering why he was raised in such an evil way.    * Coran (voiced by Cullen in the 80s series, Michael Bell in the 90s series, Halder in the 2011 series): Coran is Alluras royal advisor, and is in charge of the Castle Control. He also advises the Voltron Force, and is very wise, though he can be very overprotective and opinionated at times. He is the commander of the Castle of Lions crew, once the Castle became battle-worthy, and especially once it transforms into the Mecha Fortress. In Voltron: The Third Dimension, Coran remains the same as before but is now more affiliated with the Galaxy Alliance. His biggest role in that series came when the Voltron Force was on trial for treason; he spoke in their defense, which resulted in the Alliance finding them not guilty. In Voltron Force, he represents Planet Arus in the Galaxy Alliance and was the most vocal about reactivating Voltron when it was proven that Lotor had returned. Due to the Alliance being under the control of Sky Marshall Wades regime, he has returned to Castle Control.* Farla: Farla is the princess of Planet Lyra who gives Lance the seeds to the famed Rose of Lyra so that he can save the people on Planet Arus from the evil flowers sent by Haggar.* King Alfor (voiced by Cullen in the 80s series, Curry in the 90s series): King Alfor is Alluras deceased father, and the previous ruler of planet Arus. Years ago, King Alfor went forth to battle against King Zarkon and his forces in the Valley of Zohar on Planet Arus. He was tragically killed on that day. His body was placed in a royal tomb located directly beneath the castle. Nowadays, he returns to the world of the living in a ghostly form to give advice to his daughter to help her in her struggles to maintain peace on Arus and the surrounding galaxy. King Alfor is credited with being the designer of Voltron. In The Third Dimension, it was Alfors rejection of Witch Haggar that embittered her to evil. She later got her revenge on him by capturing his spirit with magic and implanting it within a robeast, preventing the Voltron force from attacking it. He was eventually released with the help of Allura and the voice of Queen Ariella.(* Manset (voiced by Chalk) Exclusive to Voltron Force, Manset is a crustacean-like alien smuggler and friend of Keith who was once a political prisoner of the Den Resistance imprisoned in The Void, a floating prison operated by Sky Marshall Wade. He was broken out of prison by Keith and escaped into obscurity, not to be heard from again until he is seen helping out with the relief effort by importing food and supplies for Planet Ebb. He also provided backup for the Voltron Force by suppling one of his airships filled with Krelshi, ancient lion riders in the final battle with Wade. Manset has a few ideas how to get Voltron back home, and gives Voltron Force the friends and family discount with the shipping. It appears Manset has gone legit, as his smuggling days may be over...for now.(http://toonbarn.com/2011/09/voltron-force-clash-lions-review/)     * Nanny (voiced by B.J. Ward)(: Nanny is Alluras over-protective caregiver, who always wants to make all of Alluras decisions for her. Like Coran, Nanny fusses over the Princess and is bent on keeping her away from all harm.* Prince Bandor (voiced by Ross): Co-ruler of planet Pollux, along with his older sister, Princess Romelle.* Princess Romelle (voiced by B.J. Ward): Princess Romelle is Alluras cousin, who lives on the planet Pollux, where she co-rules with her brother, Prince Bandor. She is a dead-ringer for Princess Allura, in terms of physical appearance although Romelles voice is lower than Alluras. Romelle was once a slave of Lotor, until Sven came to her rescue; together they fight for her people against the Drule Empire. She and Sven fall in love and live happily ever after on Pollux.* Queen Ariella: First Queen of Planet Arus in The Third Dimension. She first came to Arus from another planet and was found and raised by the five lions before they became Robot lions. It was said they she constructed the Castle of Lions. Now deceased, she appears to Allura as a spirit, much like her father does, and reveals to Allura a way to recreate the five Lions after they are destroyed. She explains that the five lions can never really be destroyed, as their spirits will always be with Arus.* Space Mice: The Space Mice are pastel-colored mice displaying a human-like level of intelligence, who were Princess Alluras friends as a child. They are often mischievous, but sometimes helpful. There are five Space Mice, though the fifth mouse is rarely seen until later episodes, perhaps because of not being born, or being too young to leave the nest at first. There is a large light blue mouse, a large pink mouse, two medium-sized light blue mice, and a much smaller light blue mouse. The cartoon was very inconsistent with the names of the mice; names used for various mice included Chitter, Cheddar, Cheeser, Cheesy, Pip, Squeek, Mousie, Prince, Toady, Inky, and Suki. Toward the end of the Lion Force Voltron series, the Space Mice wear  orange Voltron Force uniforms and pilot a machine called the Mouse Plane, which can transform into a comic-looking Mouse Voltron. In the Devils Due comic series, the Space Mice were cybernetic robots constructed for Princess Allura by her father. The robotic Space Mice are continued into Voltron Force.Vehicle Voltron Force* Commander James Hawkins: (voiced by Cullen)(): Commander of the S.S. Explorer, it is Commander Hawkins who gives all the orders to the Vehicle Voltron Force. Firm and strict, Hawkins is determined to make peace with the Drule Empire, despite how many times they attempt to backstab him in the process. In the Devils Due comic series, Hawkins was the one who gathered Keith and his crew together in order to have them find Voltron for their fight against the Drules.* Captain Newley (voiced by Weinrib): Captain of the S.S. Explorer, and good friend to Commander Hawkins. Midway through the series, he gets transferred back to Galaxy Garrison on Earth, but that doesnt stop his fight against the Drules.* Professor Page (voiced by Angel): The S.S. Explorers chief scientist and acting physician, he can tell you all about a planet and even its cultures simply by examining a mere sample or artifact.* Hardware: Little green robot aboard the S.S. Explorer, who according to Ginger, is the only one who likes it when the Vehicle Voltron Force cant go out on a mission.* Captain Kio: Captain of the backup fleet, Kio is of the same race as Wolo and Tangor. Against orders not to interfere, the Voltron Force attempts to defend Kios fleet against an ambush from a Drule fleet that pretended to be a peace envoy. Kio orders the Voltron Force to obey orders and return to the Explorer. Kio and his crew sacrifice themselves to prevent a political incident. Along with Yurak, Kio is the only other named character in Voltron whose death is retained without editing or dialogue disclaimers.Galaxy AllianceThe government within the Voltron series. While some of its members help the Voltron teams, others have their own agenda.* Space Marshal Graham (voiced by Angel): Supreme commander of the Galaxy Alliance. Along with Commander Steele, he is usually conducting meetings discussing current situations involving the ongoing conflict with the Drule Empire.* Commander Steele: High-ranking official of the Galaxy Alliance. Along with Space Marshal Graham, he is usually conducting meetings discussing current situations involving the war with the Drule Empire. He takes a more active role in the conflict towards the end of the series.* Amalgamus (voiced by Ross): Cyborg-like liassion to the Voltron Lion Force in Third Dimension. He is an amalgam of all 900 planets of the Galaxy Alliance and the highest-ranked official of Galaxy Garrison. He at first was reluctant to have Voltron reactivated, believing diplomacy could be used to make peace with Lotor, but over time he comes to accept Voltron as a necessary ally. He is also the only one who fully trusts Zarkon, which is also his greatest weakness as he was unknowingly reprogrammed by Zarkon to distrust the Voltron Force more and more, going as far as to have them decommissioned five times and even put them on trial for treason against the Alliance one time. When Lotor held the Troika Moons hostage in exchange for the destruction of the Voltron Lions, it was Amalgamus who gave the order to destroy them. This, along with Zarkons position within the Alliance, left Galaxy Garrison open for an easy assault by Lotor at the end of the first season. By this time, Amalgamus had learned of Zarkons true allegiance, but was helpless to stop Zarkon from turning him into a video game and then later a cowardly blabbermouth later in the series. Towards the end of the series, he was retaken by the Voltron Force and restored to his original Voltron-allied programming, and exposed Zarkons true plans to the Alliance.EnemiesPlanet DoomThe villains of the Lion Voltron series, ruled by King Zarkon. In the Devils Due comic series, Planet Doom is the center of the Drule Empire as the Kingdom of Night.* King Zarkon (voiced by Angel in the 80s series, Michael Richardson in the 90s series)(: The main villain of the Lion Force Voltron, King Zarkon of the Planet Doom is one of the rulers of the Drule Empire, though by no means the absolute ruler. He is constantly using others as scapegoats for his own failure, including his son Lotor. Zarkon resurfaces in Voltron: The Third Dimension, having redeemed himself prior to his final defeat, and became a member of the Galactic Council. His redemption, however, was a ruse in which he turned out to be the mastermind behind Prince Lotor in a bid to take over the alliance.* Lotor (voiced by Weinrib in the 80s series, Curry in the 90s series, Mark Hildreth in the 2011 series)(: Lotor is the son of Zarkon and prince of Planet Doom, though he would plot to overthrow his father to rule in his place with Princess Allura by his side, to whom he has developed a strong and obsessive attraction. So powerful are his feelings that he is unable to even destroy a holographic image of Allura. Lotor is a very sly, smart, smooth, powerful man, who exudes force and emanates what seems to be pure evil, except when Allura is around. In the Devils Due comic series, Lotor met Allura while they were children during Zarkons invasion of Arus and follows a warriors code of honor while seeing all non-Drule life forms to be inferior. In Voltron: The Third Dimension, Lotor was mortally wounded in the final battle, and was converted into a cyborg after he was placed in prison. However, he escaped and perpetrated his revenge on the heroes, though he still has feelings for Allura. In Voltron Force, succeeding in becoming king, Lotor was killed off in the final battle. However, he is revived years later by his body being infused with Haggarium with side-effects that enable him to fight Voltron despite the size difference. Much like in The Third Dimension, Lotor still is bent on making Allura his queen.* Queen Merla (voiced by MacNeille): A villainess exclusive to the U.S. version and the Devils Due comic, serving as Lotors bride to be as Zarkons attempt to reap the political benefits of their union.* Witch Haggar (voiced by B.J. Ward): Haggar the witch is the one responsible for creating all of the Robeasts Zarkon uses. She is notorious for using her magic to cast hypnotizing spells over people. Though she was once good and beautiful, she is now evil and ugly. It was Haggar who was responsible for originally splitting Voltron into five components in the American version. In Voltron: The Third Dimension, Haggar went into hiding after the final battle, but rejoined Lotor in his conquest schemes. They strike a deal in which, if Lotor conquers the universe, she gets the magic of the lions while he gets the universe and the lions themselves.( In the Devils Due comic series, Haggar had no part in Voltrons origin story, replaced by an ancestor of Zarkons, though she is well versed in it. She also attempts to brainwash Sven under Merlas wishes. In Voltron Force, for reasons not yet revealed, Haggar became a quasar from which a special energy called Haggarium is cultivated to revive Lotor and produce a new series of Robeasts.** Cova: Haggars blue cat and enemy of the Space Mice.* Commander Yurak: (voiced by Angel): Commander of the Doom Forces. Due to his numerous defeats by Voltron, he is sentenced to death. He is transformed into a gigantic Robeast fighter in hopes of redeeming himself. However, he is killed by Voltron.* Mogor (voiced by Angel): Took Yuraks place as Prince Lotors second-in-command.* Karp: A cocky, egotistical ace pilot who is recruited by Lotor and Haggar. Although given a Robeast to pilot, he retains his smug attitude by demanding that the Robeast be painted red to match his trademark color. He wreaks considerable havok on Arus and several other planets. He is made Governor General much to the annoyance of Mogor who disliked Karps superior attitude. Karp was eventually defeated by Voltron; one of the few enemies that Voltron defeated by chance. Mogor was not disappointed that Karp had such a short career as Governor General. In the American Voltron, as was usual, Karps death was covered by dialogue; in this case Lotor saying Maybe hell land safely and come again. Lotors voiceover continues over what is actually a sunrise; however, the added sound effect suggests an explosion on the planet. Lotor states that Karp, unfortunately, did not make a very good landing and would probably be in no condition to fly for a long time.* Commander Cossack (voiced by Angel): A replacement for Mogor, he was generally ineffective against Voltron, though like Yurak, he often went into battle throwing everything he could think of against the robot, including various robeasts given to him by Haggar for the purpose of battling Voltron. Calls himself Cossack the Terrible.* Queequeg and Lafitte (voiced by West and MacNeille): Exclusive to Voltron: The Third Dimension, these two were drafted by Lotor for menial work.* Igor (voiced by Brown): A robotic figure who was commander of Lotors army in Voltron: The Third Dimension. Never seen after Lotors conquest of the galactic administrative council.* Maahox (voiced by Halder): Exclusive to Voltron Force, he is a scientist with knowledge in occult and genetic manipulation before sent into exhile. He aids Kala in reviving Lotor, only to betray her and turn her into the first new generation Robeast while becoming Lotors right hand man.* Kala: (voiced by St. Germain): Exclusive to Voltron Force,  a Drule commander infamous for her military intellect and equaled bloodlust. She recruits Maahox to resurrect Lotor, only to be betrayed by the scientist and fused with an alien arachnid to become the first of a new generation of Robeasts. In her new Robeast form, Kala manages to capture Wades robot lion and merge with it into a more powerful form before being defeated by Voltron and tossed into space. However, Kalas Robeast body began to rebuilt itself.* Ultra Droids: Planet Dooms footsoldiers.Drule EmpireThe villains of the Vehicle Voltron series, who are at war with Galaxy Garrison. They are humanoids with light purple skin and red eyes* Emperor Zeppo: (voiced by Michael Bell): Through most of the series, all we ever see of Zeppo is a portrait of him adorning every Drule command ship. It is not until much later that he is introduced in the flesh, attending meetings of the Drule Supreme Council. No other Drule holds higher royal rank than the Emperor. When the liberation of planet Drule finally came, Zeppo quietly stood by as Hazar personally overthrew his rule. Hazar thus immediately became Drules rightful emperor, though he then decreed that their world would no longer have any Emperors, but that leaders would from then on be elected. Zeppo and Throk proceeded to quietly flee the dying planet. Shortly after the inevitable destruction of planet Drule, the liberated citizens were moved to a new planet by the Galaxy Alliance. As soon as they settled in, Zeppo and Throk set up a decoy to distract the Voltron Force, while the remnants of the Drule Empire swept in on the planet and retook control of their people. Emperor Zeppo was in control again.* Viceroy Throk (voiced by Cullen): Possibly the worst of the worst, Throk is at bitter ends with Mozak and Hazar, and the loyalist supporter of Emperor Zeppo. Throk becomes the main baddie under Zeppo towards the very end of the series, especially during the impending arrival of the Voltron Force on the planet Drule to aid Hazar in liberating the homeworld, and overthrowing Zeppo. Later, Throk would join forces with Zarkon in building the universes most feared space armada, the Fleet of Doom.* Dorma (voiced by B.J. Ward): Hazars kindhearted sister, who appears towards the end of the series. When she is kidnapped by the Drule U.R.F. (Underground Rebel Force), she agrees to join in their fight for peace and freedom on planet Drule.* Chancellor Mozak: Hazar and Dormas father, and kindhearted member of the Drule Supreme Council, he wishes nothing more than for peace and freedom on planet Drule. He often clashes in his views with Viceroy Throk.* Bakki (voiced by Michael Bell): Founder of the U.R.F., Bakki is a kind-hearted Drule, who hopes to liberate his homeworlds citizens from the tyranny of the Drule rulers.* Marshall Keezor (voiced by Michael Bell): Wicked and crafty member of the Drule Supreme Council. He first arrived personally to give Hazar the news of his demotion, then appeared to take on Hazars duties of eliminating the Voltron Force. In the Lion Voltron series, it was also Keezor who arranged for Zarkon to be stripped of his powers and to have those powers handed over to Lotor.* Zandu: A Drule pilot who is captured by the Explorer crew. Commander Hawkins, in usual form, treats the pilot as a guest instead of a prisoner. However, this upsets Shannon, a member of the Voltron Force Sea Team, who has a brother being held prisoner by the Drules. Shannon, upon getting to know Zandu, realizes that Zandu, despite being on the side of the enemy, is only following orders and unaware of the evil nature of his masters. Zandu is allowed to return to his ship, but is shot down by a Drule commander, who believes it is a trick by the humans. In the American version, he crashlands on a planet and though badly wounded, apparently survives.Commanders* Hazar (voiced by Angel): High-ranking warlord of the Drule Empire. At the beginning of the series, he was a typical Drule leader bent on galactic conquest. However, midway through the series, he begins to have a change of heart, and becomes more compassionate in his quest; and, like Commander Hawkins, tries time and time again to arrange for peace between the Drule Empire and the Galaxy Alliance. Throughout the series, he has had to put up with demotions, imprisonment, and worst of all, treacherous underlings who repeatedly and deliberately disobey his direct orders of helping bring peace, in favor of attacking the Alliance.* Quark: An early opponent of the Explorer and its crew. Persistent, but ultimately ineffective against the Voltron Force. He causes the destruction of an uninhabited planet that the Drules and humans were competing over. Curiously, his death scene is included in the American Voltron release, but the scene was incongruously dubbed over, with Quark saying, Ill be back, before his ship explodes. A member of the Voltron Force (Wolo) later states, Quark got away again.* Brak: Hazars earliest opponent to peaceful negotiations with the Galaxy Alliance. Brak attempts to drive a wedge between Hazar and Mongo. Unlike other opponents to Hazar, Brak appears to respect Hazar and hopes to persuade Hazar to consider the needs of the Drule Empire first. In frustration over failing to persuade Hazar, Brak attempts to stage a military coup but failed and was imprisoned.* Zabbar (voiced by Weinrib): An ambitious Drule commander who sides first with Brak, then Nerok against Hazars stand for peaceful cooperation. He hopes to be given rule of Earth after the defeat of the Galaxy Alliance. Immediately following the last episode in which he appeared, another Drule commander appeared who was also named Zabbar and had a similar voice. The two Drule commanders did not resemble each other, so this was possibly due to a script blooper. In some of the episodes, Zabbars voice was identical to Prince Lotors.Captains* Mongo: One of the Drule Empires best officers, and loyal friend to Hazar. When Hazar began to have a change of heart, Mongo was one of the few Drules who supported him, and he continued to loyally support him, until he eventually went into exile midway through the series. Presumably due to an error, during the first two episodes in which this character appears, he was called Malvor and had a different voice.* Nerok (voiced by Michael Bell): Cruel and heavyset Drule officer. A natural-born kiss-up and backstabber, he lives for nothing more than destroying the Galaxy Alliance and making Hazar look like a fool.* Twyla (voiced by B.J. Ward): A female Drule officer who is captured by the Explorer crew. She is confused by Commander Hawkinss treatment of her as a guest instead of a prisoner. Hawkins explains to her that willingness to discuss peace negotiations is not the same thing as selling out her race. Her final fate is unknown, but Hawkins hoped that she communicated a new alternative to other members of her race.RobeastsMonsters used by members of Planet Doom and the Drule Empire were often send to fight the two Voltrons of the Galaxy Alliance. The Robeasts from planet Doom, reared in gladiatorial combat, are humanoid monsters created through a combination of superscience and Haggars magic, usually from prisoners of war though some of them are simply being giant robots piloted by Doom soldiers. The Drule Robeasts that battled the Explorer were uniformly technology based.In Voltron Force, a new series of Robeasts are produced by infusing predators from various planets with Haggarium. The resulting creatures are biomechanical beasts with the Haggarium enabling them to normally weaken Voltron with special abilities augmenting their natural talents.Planet Doom RobeastsDrule Empire RobeastsDrule VoltronExclusive to Voltron: Fleet of Doom, this evil version of Voltron is made from four robeasts and one of Lotors Skull Ships. Armed with an Iron Mace, Lazon Rays, Scorch Beams, Iron Claw and the Blazing Scimitar (known as an ultra weapon and the Blade of Doom). Fortunately for both Voltron Forces, this Voltrons weak point was the skull on its chest.* Lotors Skull Ship: Forms the head.* Rhino Beast: Forms the legs and lower tower.* Scorpio: Forms part of the chest armor as well as the crotch.* Beetle: A stag beetle robeast. Froms the back and wings.* Armor Beast: An armadillo robeast. Forms the shoulders and arms.Predator RobeastA similar monster called the Predator Robeast is seen in Voltron Force when Maahox used 5 robeasts to attack the Voltron Lions in their lairs, then later combine to form a single massive Voltron-like robeast. Despite the best efforts of the Voltron Force team, the Predator Robeast was able to easily defeat them. Only Lotors recall of the Robeast stopped the teams destruction.The five robeasts were:* Minotaur Beast: Forms the head and torso.* Serpent Beast: Forms the right arm.* Dragon Beast: Forms the left arm and wings.* Shark Beast: Forms the left leg.* Panther Beast: Forms the right leg.Other Enemies* Sky Marshall Wade (voiced by Gary Chalk): Exclusive to Voltron Force, he is a dangerous, corrupt official who simply wants money and power. He has the highest seat of power in the Galaxy Alliance and serves as the secondary antagonist to the series by outlawing Voltron and attempting to reverse engineer the Black Lions technology to create his own robot lion that he controls via virtual interface along with his remote controlled robot soldiers. Wade intends to turn the Alliance into a dictatorship under his control. The only problem was that Voltron had a negative effect on his profits and his plans. For this reason, among others, he hates the Voltron Team almost as much as King Lotor does and, like Lotor, will stop at nothing to destroy them. The Voltron Force suspects him of sabotaging the lions to go berserk during a celebration, giving Wade an excuse to outlaw Voltron and lock the lions away. When Voltron Force reassembled, Wade used his robot lion to try to eliminate them, but his creation was absorbed by Kala, and he was rendered unconscious throughout the remainder of the fight. He later reappears with a dual-pronged effort to destroy the Voltron Force. The Voltron Force have made many efforts to expose his crimes and free the Alliance. Some of their successes to defeat Wade include stopping him from mining on a defenseless planet and freeing political prisoners from his maximum security prison. After the team freed Voltron from being hijacked by Wade, who fired a corite bullet into the mighty robots chest, seized control over him, changed him into Wadetron, and forced him to attack a city nearby, Wade was finally arrested for his crimes. Another note is that Wade was once a Galaxy Alliance cadet, and he tried to become a Voltron pilot, but he was rejected because the Black Lion found him unworthy. This caused Wade to go insane.References
19621920
George_Samuel_Fereday_Smith
George Samuel Fereday Smith (7 May 181226 May 1891) was an English industrialist and canal manager who from 1837 to 1887 was the Deputy Superintendent of the Bridgewater Trustees and their successors, whose major source of income came from the Canal.Early life and educationFereday Smith was born in 1812 at Tipton, Staffordshire, the elder son of Richard Smith, an ironmaster and Elizabeth Fereday, the daughter of Samuel Fereday, who was also an ironmaster.  He was educated at Charterhouse and University College, London before going to Queens College, Oxford where he graduated as of Arts in mathematics and physics in 1835.  He then went to Germany to study mining and geology, after which he returned to Staffordshire where he gained practical experience of mining and surveying.  At the beginning of 1837 he was working as an engineer on the and Gloucester Railway, when in March, at the age of 24, he was appointed as Deputy Superintendent of the Bridgewater Trustees at a salary of 600 a year.(Gerald Crompton, Smith, George Samuel Fereday(18121891), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004 http://www.oxforddnb.com/view/article/48197, accessed 5 October 2008)()CareerThe Superintendent of the Bridgewater Trustees was Loch.  Loch was extremely busy because of his involvement in other matters, which left Fereday Smith in charge of the detailed administration of the Trust.()  In addition to the Bridgewater Canal, the Trust administered the Bridgewater Collieries, the home farms, the Bridgewater Estate, a lime-burning business, Worsley Yard and, from 1848, the and Irwell Navigation.()  During this time the canals were in serious competition with the railways and Fereday Smith met the competition with great vigour.(  He was greatly in favour of capital investment and the facilities he instigated included Egerton Dock at Liverpool, the and Weston Canal, and the Alfred Dock at Runcorn.  He installed telegraph along the banks of the canal.(Fereday Smith and James Lock were not always in agreement, but Fereday Smiths influence in the business increased after Lochs death in 1855.  From that time he was in effect the general manager of the undertaking, Lochs successor Egerton having less influence than Loch.  During the time of Fereday Smiths management, the profit from the canal and the collieries increased considerably.  He continued in his post when the control of the business passed from the Trustees to the Bridgewater Navigation Company in 1872 but retired when the Ship Canal Company took over ownership in 1887.(Personal life and honoursIn 1845 Fereday Smith married Mary Jane Hampson and the couple had two daughters and a son.  He became financially prosperous, partly from his income, which had increased to 1,500 a year by 1864, and partly through a private income gained through his marriage.  In his late thirties he studied at the Temple and was called to the bar in 1852.  He had wide interests outside the Trust.  He was a fellow of the Geological Society and the Geographical Society and a member of the Chetham Society.  He served as a Conservative councillor in Manchester from 1846 to 1849 and was also a borough magistrate.  In the early 1870s he bought Grovehurst, a country house in Kent, and was appointed sheriff of Kent in 1884.  He died in London in 1891 and was succeeded in his post by his son, Richard Clifford Smith.(See also*of the United Kingdom*of the British canal systemReferencesNotesBibliography*
19636250
Hyco_International_Inc
thumb|right|The Hyco International Logo features a stylized Hydraulic CylinderHyco International Inc is one of the worlds largest manufacturer of cylinders. Hyco International was established in June 1998 by Centre Partners, a New York based investment group, with the acquisition of Dana Corporations cylinder business consisting of 4 cylinder manufacturing facilities in Canada, Germany and the United States.(  Business Week )  Hyco made three additional acquisitions of hydraulic cylinder manufacturers in Canada (1999), Germany (1999)(Diesel Progress March 1999 article on Hyco acquiring Ultrametal) and Brazil (2001). In 2000, the facility in Arab, Alabama was expanded.( Atlanta Business Chronicle article on Hyco plant expansions) Most recently (2008) the Hengstler facility in Hausach, Germany underwent major expansion. Hyco International is headquartered in Atlanta, Georgia, USA.(  Securities and Exchange Commission Report on Hyco)Company overviewHyco International has grown to become one of the worlds largest manufacturer of hydraulic cylinders employing over 600 personnel. The company manufactures on average over 2000 cylinders per day. Current annual sales are approximately $120 million US. This represents about a 4% share of the total global hydraulic cylinder market.(  Securities and Exchange Commission Report on Hyco )Today Hyco International has 4 manufacturing plants on 3 continents making it a truly global manufacturer of hydraulic cylinders. These plants include:*Hyco Canada in St. Wenceslas, Quebec, Canada http://www.hycocanada.com*Hyco Alabama in Arab, Alabama, USA http://www.hycoalabama.com*Hyco Hidrover in Caxias do Sul RS, Brazilhttp://www.hidroverbrazil.com*Hyco Hengstler in Hausach, Germany http://www.hyco-hengstler.deAlthough it might first appear that Hyco is a relative newcomer to the hydraulics industry, the individual factories have a remarkable history that extends back to the 1930s. Hyco has retained this experience and technology along with the acquisitions.The company employs the latest in computerized design and manufacturing technologies (CAM) and is able to electronically transfer hydraulic cylinder designs and distribute production efficiently among all 4 manufacturing centers. Engineering, research and development technology is networked and shared among all facilities.( All Business)The international nature of the Hyco Corporation enables the company to offer customers a one stop, global sourcing solution for hydraulic cylinders. This is very important to large multinational mobile equipment manufacturers. It also allows the company to take advantage of international monetary fluctuations, worldwide metal and component supply, and global labor costs. This has made Hyco a very effective competitor in the global hydraulic cylinder market.( Diesel Progress Article on Hyco August 1998)Productthumb|right|Hyco Hydraulic Cylinders are used by OEMs of Heavy Construction EquipmentHyco focuses on manufacturing high duty cycle welded body hydraulic cylinders in both single stage rod style and multi-stage telescopic style, large bore & long stroke included. The welded style of cylinder design is preferred for mobile hydraulic equipment and heavy industrial machinery. These cylinders are used in a broad variety of industrial sectors including:( Business Wire Feb 2, 2000 Article on Hyco)   *Construction Equipment*Material Handling Equipment*Mining and Aggregates*Management and Recycling*Defense*Heavy equipment*Forestry, Pulp, and Paper*Agricultural Equipment*Heavy Trucks*Oil Field Equipment*Marine and Shipyard Equipment*Mobile Hydraulic Machinery Attachments.Hydraulic cylindersHydraulic cylinders are fundamental components of machinery. The function of a hydraulic cylinder is to convert the hydrostatic power of a fluid into mechanical power. They are the actuators or muscles of heavy equipment providing motion and force including steering, suspension, pushing, pulling, lifting, lowering, tilting, extending, clamping, stabilizing, and so on.( Business Week article on Hyco)frame|center|A Cut Away of a Hyco Welded Body Hydraulic Cylinder showing the internal components Proper cylinder design and manufacture are critical as the failure of a cylinder will usually render the entire machine inoperable. Hyco produces high quality, rugged cylinders that are designed to have a long service life even in difficult applications and harsh environments. thumb|right|Hyco Large Bore, Long Stroke Telescopic Cylinders are used on heavy equipment such as this oil drilling rigMore than 90% of Hycos production is custom designed for specific applications. These cylinders are built to suit the exact requirements of Hycos customers and are optimized for the specific machine application. These customers are mostly equipment manufacturers (OEMs) in the mobile hydraulic cylinder market. The remaining 10% of production consists of catalogued, multi-use cylinders of a standard design.(  SEC Report on Hyco )Hydraulic cylinders produced range from miniature hydraulic cylinders of only 1/2 (12mm) bore up to very large bore and long stroke hydraulic cylinders of 36 (914mm) bore. Telescoping cylinder products have been produced in extremely large sizes up to 600 stroke (15.24 meters).Custom cylinder designs produced by Hyco involve: specially designed mountings to interface with customer equipment; special seals, materials, and coatings to meet environmental and operational requirements; value added components assembled to the actuator such as fittings, piping, valves and guards; electronic stroke and feedback control sensors.Cylinder manufacturing processesthumb|right||A Robotic Welder at the Hyco Ultrametal plant in Kitchener, OntarioHyco uses a large number of manufacturing processes in order to produce their final products. The processes include rod and tube machining and grinding, custom metal machining, component machining, skive and roller burnishing, friction and inertia welding, plating, painting, and hydraulic component assembly. Robotic and CNC machines are used in many of these processes. Several plants specialize in large capacity machining and handling the very heavy, oversized components used to produce very large bore, very long stroke hydraulic rod and telescoping cylinders. Hyco manufactured cylinders are well-known to mobile equipment manufacturers for their application-specific features, including sealing elements, induction hardened chrome plated piston rods and roller burnished tube bores. Hyco has maintained long-standing relationships (many of over 25 years) with a variety of leading multinational OEMs.( Diesel Progress Article on Hyco August 1998 )thumb|right|Hyco Cylinders are used worldwide on Mobile Hydraulic Equipment like these two on the arm of a construction excavatorAll Hyco manufacturing facilities are at a minimum 9000:2000 quality assurance level.ReferencesExternal links# Hyco Corporate Web Site# Hyco Alabama Web Site# Hyco Hidrover Brazil Web Site# Hyco Canada Web Site# Hyco Hengster Germany Web Site
19656192
Leavitt_Hunt
laterwork Photographer, attorney, farmer, inventor, art collectorFile:LeavittHuntSinai.jpg|thumb|right|300px|Convent of St. Catherine on Sinai, photographed by Leavitt Hunt, first American to photograph the East, 1852, Eastman HouseCol. Leavitt Hunt (Leavitt Hunts birth name was Henry Leavitt Hunt, but he subsequently dropped the Henry.http://books.google.com/books?idj34WAAAAIAAJ&pgPA186&lpgPA186&dq%22LEAvitt+hunt%22&sourcebl&otsWY4Xk5eBpJ&sig80giFUuIxneQ3MNNVz0TdrbCMLo&hlen&ei9rCuS4K-E4OosgOsrNz1Cw&saX&oibook_result&ctresult&resnum2&ved0CAgQ6AEwATgo#vonepage&q%22LEAvitt%20hunt%22&ffalse)(1831&ndash;February 16, 1907) was a Harvard-educated attorney and photography pioneer who was one of the first people to photograph the East. He and a companion, Nathan Flint Baker, traveled to Egypt, the Land, Lebanon, Turkey and Greece on a Tour in 1851&ndash;52, making one of the earliest photographic records of the Arab and ancient worlds, including the Sphinx and the Pyramid, views along the River, the ruins at Petra and the Parthenon in Greece.BiographyThe youngest son of General Jonathan Hunt of Vermont and the former Jane Maria Leavitt, and brother to architect Morris Hunt and painter Morris Hunt,(The fourth brother was Jonathan Leavitt, a graduate of the University of Paris who became a medical doctor in Paris. Like his brother, painter William Morris Hunt, Jonathan Hunt was an apparent suicide, at age forty-nine in Paris) Leavitt Hunt was born in Vermont, but grew up in Paris following the early death of his father Jonathan Hunt, a Vermont Congressman whose father had been the states Lieutenant Governor.() Leavitt Hunt attended the Latin School,(Catalogue of the Boston Public Latin School, Established in 1635, with An Historical Sketch, Henry F. Jenks, Published by the Boston Latin School Association, Boston, Mass., 1886) and subsequently enrolled in a Swiss boarding school, finally taking a law degree from the of Heidelberg. He then enrolled at the Swiss Military Academy in Thun. Hunt was a scholar: he was fluent in French, German, Italian, Latin, Greek and Hebrew, and could write in both Persian and Sanskrit.(Known as the scholar in the family, Hunt was offered a professorship at Princeton, then known as the of New Jersey, but turned it down in favor of his interests in the law, travel and the arts.) Hunts companion on his Eastern journey was a wealthy sculptor from Ohio and friend of the Hunt family. Nathan Flint Baker had been travelling in Europe for a decade, and announced his intention to travel through the Middle East. Hunt decided to join him, meeting him in Italy, in late September 1851.Hunt and Baker spent several weeks in Rome practicing photography, and then sailed from Naples to Malta and eventually up the River into the Peninsula, to Petra (where they were among the first to photograph the ruins), then on to Jerusalem, to what is today Lebanon, then on to Constantinople and Athens, before returning to Paris in May 1852.Hunts and Bakers photographs were dazzling, especially for a brand-new medium many had never seen before. They photographed the Sphinx and the Pyramids at Giza, the templex complex at Karnak, the Ramesseum at Thebes, and the ruins on the Island of Philae. They travelled farther to photograph the of St. Catherine at Sinai, the tombs and temples of Petra, the of the Holy Sepulchre in Jerusalem, the ruins at Baalbek, and finally the buildings of the Acropolis in Athens.The 60 extant photographs from their journey show that Hunt and Baker were keen on the new medium and familiar with its techniques. It was a real partnership: both men brought their own strengths to the process, and images that survive demonstrate their aesthetic acumen as well as their journalistic desire to show the settings in which they worked. One image of an unveiled Ghawazee female dancer, signed on the negative by Hunt himself, is likely the earliest photographic portrait of a Middle Eastern woman. Another image of the less photogenic view from the rear of the Parthenon demonstrates two men unafraid to indulge their take on a revered landmark.File:LeavittHuntPyramid.jpg|thumb|left|400px|The Great Sphinx and the Great Pyramid at Giza, calotype photograph by Leavitt Hunt, circa 1852, Library of CongressThe trip was a logistical challenge. Accompanying the two travelers for part of the journey were Leavitt Hunts older brother, the architect Richard Morris Hunt, and two other friends. The group hired a dahaheah(A dahaheah was a large houseboat with triangular cross-sails. The rear of the boat sported a cabin, where the chartering party could sleep. Typically, they took their meals on the roof of the cabin under a large awning. This means of conveyance was typically used by English and other foreign tourists on the Nile in the nineteenth century. The crew consisted of a dozen or more men, who cooked, captained the vessel and shopped in the bazaars for supplies.) and a crew of 13 Egyptians to take them down the River. Architect Hunt, later famous for his Age Newport palazzos, painted and made sketches along the Nile while his younger brother and Baker took photographs. (The results were later shown at a 1999 exhibition in Washington, D.C.)Following their arduous journey, the pair of no-longer-neophyte photographers returned to Paris and made prints from their 18x24 cm negatives which were made using a waxed-paper process.(As pioneers of photography, it is unclear how Hunt and Baker learned so much so early. The Englishman Fox Talbot was still perfecting his Calotype (sometimes called Talbotype) process at the time of the duos journey. Indeed, it was the year 1852, while Hunt and Baker were embarked on their trip, that one of the early pioneers of Talbots work, the English inventor, geologist and Society member Landon Boscawen Ibbetson showed his new book using the Talbot process at a London Society of Arts exhibition.) Having developed the negatives, each man kept a personal album of the prints. The young Hunt showed his to the German naturalist and explorer von Humboldt, who brought them to the attention of the King of Prussia, and Hunt made a formal gift of 11 prints to Richard Lepsius, the German founder of the study of ancient Egyptology.(The Annals of Brattleboro, 1681&ndash;1905, Vol. II, Mary Rogers Cabot, E. L. Hildreth & Co., Brattleboro, 1922) Baker left his album with a New York dealer to discern commercial interest in the prints.Following their extraordinary journey, the two men took divergent paths. Baker returned to Ohio, to enjoy the life of a wealthy aesthete, while Hunt completed his studies at the Swiss Military Institute, then returned to America where he took a second law degree, this one from Harvard.(Quinquennial Catalogue of the Law School of Harvard University, Harvard Law School, Harvard Law School Association (1817&ndash;1904), Published by the Law School, Cambridge, 1905) He began practicing law in York City, the home of his brother Richard Morris Hunt, until the outbreak of the Civil War, when he enlisted as lieutenant on the staff of General Heintzelman. Eventually he was promoted to lieutenant colonel for bravery at the of Malvern Hill.(Civil War to the Bloody End: The Life and Times of Major General Samuel P. Heintzelman, Jerry D. Thompson, Texas A & M University Press, 2006) Hunt subsequently attained the rank of full colonel and assistant general in the Army.(The Civil War Defenses of Washington: Historic Resource Study, National Park Service)Following the Civil War, Leavitt Hunt returned to New York City and his law practice for several years, until he retired in 1867 to Vermont, where his wife Katherine Jarvis (The Life and Times of Hon. William Jarvis, Mary Pepperell Sparhawk Jarvis Cutts, Hurd and Houghton, New York, Riverside Press, Cambridge, 1869) had inherited the estate belonging to her father William Jarvis, a prominent Vermont businessman and diplomat best known as the first importer of sheep into America.Leavitt Hunt purchased his own estate at nearby Bow and became a gentleman farmer.( Hunt was particularly interested in the rare breeds of Dutch cattle that he raised,(Annual Report of the Vermont State Board of Agriculture, Manufactures and Mining for the Year 1872, Peter Collier, Secretary of the Board, Montpelier, 1872) as well as the white pine forests he propagated on his estate, which he dubbed Elmsholme.(Leavitt and Katherine Hunt, Elmsholme, Weathersfield, Vt., New York Social Register, Social Register Association, New York, 1897) During his retirement as a farmer, Hunt also became an inventor,(United States Patent Office, Patent number 91445, Issued June 1869, Leavitt Hunt of Weathersfield, Vermot, Improvement in Plow) with several patents for new plows.(Annual Report of the Commissioner of Patents for the Year 1869, United States Patent Office, Vol. II, Government Printing Office, Washington, 1871)(Improvement in Sulky-Ploughs, Patent number 77617, May 5, 1868, United States Patent Office, Leavitt Hunt, Weathersfield, Vermont)As far as is known, neither Hunt nor his companion Baker ever showed much interest in the photographic medium after their journey. Their prints are rarely seen, very scarce, and are among the most valuable early photographic images. Hunts personal album is now in the collection of the Bennington Art Museum, Vermont. Bakers album evidently disappeared. The collection of photos presented to Eygptologist Richard Lepsius is housed at the Ludwigs AgfaPhoto-Historama in Germany. File:Clyde du Vernet Hunt in his Paris studio.jpg|thumb|right|200px|Artist Clyde du Vernet Hunt, son of Col. Leavitt Hunt, in his Paris studio, c. 1900Hunts personal negatives are believed lost, but the prints he made became the property of his brother Richard Morris Hunt. They are now preserved in the Richard Morris Hunt Papers at the American Architectural Foundation in D.C. A 1999 show at the American Architectural Foundations Octagon Museum showcased Leavitt Hunts 1853 journey. Entitled A Voyage of Discovery: The Nile Journal of Richard Morris Hunt, the exhibition consisted of seventy of Leavitt Hunts original photographic prints, as well as drawings and watercolors by Richard Morris Hunt from the museums Prints and Drawings Collection.(A Voyage of Discovery: The Nile Journal of Richard Morris Hunt, 1999, The Octagon Museum, The Museum of the American Architectural Foundation, archfoundation.org)Some of Leavitt Hunts personal prints were donated by his family after his death to the of Congress, where they are part of the permanent photographic collection.(Hunts daughter Maud Hunt (Mrs. William E. Patterson) donated 26 Hunt prints to the Library of Congress in 1947, including views in Egypt, Greece, Jerusalem, and along the Nile River, including views of temples, tombs and ruins.http://memory.loc.gov/cgi-bin/query/p?pp/ils:@FILREQ(@FIELD(CALL+@band(LOT%202388))+@FIELD(COLLID+coll))::SortByDOCID) There are also a few original prints from this early Middle East trip in the Photographic Collection and at the Eastman House in New York. Universitys Harrison D. Horblit Collection of Early Photography also owns several of the works by Hunt and Baker.Although Leavitt Hunt never returned to photography, he remained vitally interested in the arts until the end of his life, corresponding with fellow Harvard-educated lawyer and author Dwight Sedgwick, as well as other intellectuals of the era.(Correspondence between Henry Dwight Sedgwick and Leavitt Hunt, Sedgwick Family Papers 1717&ndash;1946, Massachusetts Historical Society, masshist.org) He and his wife travelled frequently, often crossing paths with family friends like Hodges Choate and Thomas Jefferson Coolidge.(Autograph File, Houghton Library, Harvard College Library, Harvard University, lib.harvard.edu)  He also wrote poetry on the side.(Nature and Art: Poems and Pictures from the Best Authors and Artists, Louise Reid Estes, Estes and Lauriat, Boston, 1882)Perhaps the highest tribute paid Leavitt Hunt and his brothers was that of Waldo Emerson. The remarkable families, Emerson wrote, were the three Jackson brothers....the three Lowell brothers....the four Lawrences....the Cabots....the three Hunts, William, Richard and Leavitt (William Hunt tells also of his brother John, in Paris); the Washburns, three governors, I believe.(Journals of Ralph Waldo Emerson, 1864&ndash;1876, Ralph Waldo Emerson, edited by Edward Waldo Emerson and Waldo Emerson Forbes, Houghton Mifflin Company, Boston, 1914)File:Sargent - Richard Morris Hunt.jpg|thumb|left|175px|American architect Morris Hunt, painted by Singer Sargent. Richard Morris Hunt accompanied brother Leavitt on their trip down the Nile, 1853Clyde du Vernet Hunt, who graduated from Andover and Law School, and subsequently became a painter and sculptor accepted by the Paris Salon,(The Phillipian, Phillips Andover Academy, Andover, Mass., April 24, 1897) was the son of Leavitt Hunt and his wife, the former Katherine Jarvis.(The Lincoln Trilogy, Clyde Du Vernet Hunt, Bennington Museum)(Rarely Viewed Hunt Family Work on View at the Bennington Museum, benningtonmuseum.org) A portrait of Leavitt Hunt painted by his brother William Morris Hunt in 1874 is in the permanent collection of the Brooks Memorial Library, Brattleboros main library.(Newspapers and magazines of the day carried news that Leavitt Hunt was writing a biography of his brother the painter, but this work never appeared. Apparently Leavitt Hunts intentions were supplanted by the 1899 volume Life of William Morris Hunt, written by William Morris Hunts longtime student Helen Mary Knowlton. http://books.google.com/books?idjE0FAAAAQAAJ&pgPA265&dq%22leavitt+hunt%22+salem&eiDZzsSLXEKoScswPputXqBg) Artist William Morris Hunt sketched other members of his brother Leavitts family as well.(Exhibition of the Works of William Morris Hunt, Boston Museum of Fine Arts, Alfred Mudge & Son, Boston, 1880) Hunt, another son of Col. Hunt and his wife, became a noted Chicago architect.(Annals of Brattleboro, Volume II, Chapter LXIX)Leavitt Hunts wife Katherine, daughter of businessman William Jarvis, died June 6, 1916, at New Jersey, and was interred with her husband at Weathersfield.(Obituary, Katherine Jarvis Hunt, The New York Times, June 6, 1916, nytimes.com) Leavitt Hunt predeceased his wife, dying at Weathersfield on February 16, 1907. The couples infant son Morris Hunt, who died in 1871, is interred with his parents.(Weathersfield Bow Cemetery, Weathersfield, Vermont)See also*Morris Hunt*Morris Hunt*Hunt*Leavitt*Hunt (Vermont Representative)*Hunt (Vermont Lieutenant Governor)*States Sanitary CommissionNotesReferences;Inline;General*Encyclopedia of Nineteenth Century Photography, John Hannavy, pp. 729-731, CRC Press, 2008Further reading* A Voyage of Discovery: The Nile Journal of Richard Morris Hunt, 1999, The Octagon Museum, The Museum of the American Architectural Foundation, Washington, D.C.* Exploration, Vision & Influence: The Art World of Brattleboros Hunt Family, Catalogue, Museum Exhibition, The Bennington Museum, Bennington, Vermont, June 23&ndash;December 31, 2005, Paul R. Baker, Sally Webster, David Hanlon, and Stephen Perkins* See also Fox Talbot, inventor of the Calotype, sometimes called the Talbotype, the medium used by Hunt and Baker* Pilgrims on Paper: The Calotype Journey of Leavitt Hunt and Nathan Flint Baker, David R. Hanlon, History of Photography, December 2007External links*Great Pyramid and Sphinx, Gizeh, Egypt, Calotpye print, ca. 1852, Leavitt Hunt, Prints & Photographs Reading Room, The Library of Congress, www.loc.gov.rr*Agrippa; or, The Evangelists: Historical Point of View, Leavitt Hunt, Miller & Curtis, New York, 1857
19669640
Bodie_Hills
 footnotes The Bodie Hills are a low mountain range in Mono County, California, is where the mining district and town of Bodie, California is located.( The Hills are between Bridgeport and the Nevada border, where they become the Mountains in County, Nevada. The Nevada (U.S.) Range towers to the west.Early Native American peoples of the tribe and Northern Paiute people inhabited this locale and engaged in trade with distant coastal tribes such as the Chumash in California.(C.M. Hogan, 2008)Bodie State Historic ParkThe town of California is now in Bodie State Historic Park, a preserved town, designated a Historic Landmark and a park within the Department of Parks and Recreation system in 1963 for public touring.(http://www.parks.ca.gov/?page_id509 . accessed 6/24/2010) Roads to Bodie and it beyond allow ease of exploring the Bodie Mountains.See also*of ghost towns in California*of ghost towns in NevadaReferences* Bodie Hills, Mono County, California (2008) http://www.schweich.com/geoCAMnoBodieHills.html* C.Michael Hogan (2008) Morro Creek, The Megalithic Portal, ed. by A. Burnham http://www.megalithic.co.uk/article.php?sid18502External links* Official Bodie State Historic Park website*Bodie Hills area maps and information
19693586
John_Pitcairn,_Jr.
 footnotes  John Pitcairn, Jr. (10 January 1841  22 July 1916) was a Scottish-born American industrialist. With just an elementary school education, Pitcairn rose through the ranks of the Pennsylvania railroad industry, and played a significant role in the creation of the modern oil and natural gas industries. He went on to found the Pittsburgh Plate Glass Company (now Industries), an early industry innovator which quickly grew into the largest manufacturer of plate glass in the United States, and amassed one of the largest fortunes in the United States at the time.Pitcairn was also the primary financial benefactor of the Church of the New Jerusalem, a Christian Church which follows the teachings of Swedenborg, and was a major activist in the American anti-vaccination movement.Early lifePitcairn was born on January 10, 1841() in Johnstone, Renfrewshire, Scotland to parents John Pitcairn, Sr. (18031884), a machinist, and Agnes McEwan (ca. 1803 - unknown), a housekeeper.() He was one of six children resulting from the marriage, and also had two older half-siblings from his fathers first marriage.() In 1846, he emigrated with his family to Pennsylvania, where his uncle, Alexander Pitcairn, had started a woolens business.( There, he attended public school until dropping out at age 14 to pursue a career in the railroad.(CareerRailPitcairn began his professional life at the age of 14, working as an office boy for the general superintendent of the Railroad in Altoona. He soon learned telegraphy, and through that became friends with Carnegie.() Pitcairn rapidly worked his way up through the railroad industry; first as Assistant to the Superintendent of the Fort Wayne and Chicago Railroad, and next as Assistant to the Superintendent of the Philadelphia Division of the Pennsylvania Railroad. On February 22, 1861, during his tenure at the latter, Pitcairn was in charge of the train which carried President-elect Lincoln from Harrisburg to Philadelphia, en route to the inauguration in Washington, DC. Later, when the Confederate Army invaded Pennsylvania before the of Antietam, Pitcairn and his brother Pitcairn were dispatched by Colonel A. Scott, then Assistant Secretary of War, to Chambersburg, to head the train service for the government. Pitcairn next served as Assistant Superintendent of the Middle Division of the Pennsylvania Railroad, and followed this with a stint as the Superintendent of the Middle Division of the and Erie Railroad.() Finally, in 1869, he was appointed General Manager of the Creek and Allegheny River Railway Company.(EnergyUpon forming a partnership with J. Vandergrift of Pittsburgh and V. Forman of Buffalo, Pitcairn resigned from his position of general manager to focus exclusively on the oil business.( During this period, Pitcairn built the Imperial Refinery at City, Pennsylvania, and was heavily involved with the production, refining, and pipeline transportation of oil. With Vandergrift, he built and controlled the first natural gas pipeline for manufacturing purposes, and had a controlling stake in the Natural Gas Company, Ltd., founded in the summer of 1875, and later to become the Natural Gas Company of West Virginia.( Through these and other successful investments in energy, mining, and banking, Pitcairn substantially expanded his wealth.()GlassIn 1883, Pitcairn teamed up with Captain Baptiste Ford and several others to establish the Pittsburgh Plate Glass Company (PPG). Based in Pennsylvania (about 20 miles north of Pittsburgh along the River), PPG soon became the United States first commercially successful producer of high-quality, thick glass using the plate process. PPG was also the worlds first plate glass plant to power its furnaces with locally-produced gas, an innovation which rapidly stimulated widespread industrial use of the cleaner-burning fuel.() PPG expanded quickly. By 1900, known as the Glass Trust, it included 10 plants, had a 65 percent share of the U.S. plate glass market, and had become the nations second largest producer of paint.() Today, known as Industries, the company is a multi-billion dollar, 500 corporation with 150 manufacturing locations around the world. It now produces coatings, glass, fiberglass, and chemicals.(Pitcairn served as a director of PPG from its start, its president from 1897 to 1905, and  chairman of the board from 1894 until his death.()MagnatePitcairns interests and holdings were not limited to PPG; at the time of his death, he was also president of the C. H. Wheeler Manufacturing Company, the Pittsburgh Valve and Fittings Company, and the Loyal Hanna Coal and Coke Company, and a director of the Central National Bank of Philadelphia, the Columbia Chemical Company, the Michigan Chemical Company, the Natural Gas Company of West Virginia, and the Owosso Sugar Company.(FamilyPitcairn was the brother of Pennsylvania railroad magnate Pitcairn and consul-general Pitcairn.In 1877, the already highly successful, 38-year old Pitcairn met 21-year-old Gertrude Starkey (18551898). Two years later, he proposed marriage, but was gently turned down. Reputedly, Starkeys strong New Church beliefs about the ideal of marriage required her to conduct a close examination of the spiritual nature of her feelings for him. Undeterred by her rejection, Pitcairn continued to court Starkey for five more years. Finally she accepted, and they were married in 1884.() Following their marriage, the couple lived on Spring Garden Street in Philadelphia, until the completion of the new family estate, Cairnwood, in 1895.( Together they had six children, only four of whom survived infancy.( These were: * Vera Pitcairn (18871910). Vera died suddenly of appendicitis at the age of 23.()* Pitcairn (18851966). Raymond was a lawyer, a businessman, a collector of ancient and medieval art, and an amateur architect. He supervised the building of the Athyn Cathedral.( He was also the national chairman and a major financial supporter of the of the Republic, a right-wing political group of the 1920s and 1930s which opposed child labor legislation and the Deal.()* Pitcairn (18931973). Theodore was an arts collector and philanthropist, and a minister in the Church of the New Jerusalem.( In the late 1930s a doctrinal schism within the church led him and several other members to found a new Swedenborgian branch known as The Lords New Church Which Is Nova Hierosolyma. He served as a leader of this new church until his death.()* Frederick Pitcairn (18971960). Harold, a lifelong aviation enthusiast, started Aviation, an air mail service that ultimately grew into Airlines. He founded the Aircraft Company, which designed and built under license pioneering airmail aircraft and autogyros. He played a key role in promoting rotary wing flight leading to development of the helicopter.()Religious philanthropyPitcairn was an active member and benefactor of the Church of the New Jerusalem, a branch of the Church, which follows the teachings of Swedenborg. Pitcairns financial largess enabled the founding of the Swedenborgian settlement at Athyn, Pennsylvania,  the construction of the towns library, and the New Churchs spectacular Athyn Cathedral.()  He also financed the construction of a new campus for the Academy of the New Church, a Swedenborgian learning center comprising a secondary school, a college, and a theological school. The campus was completed in 1911.()Anti-vaccination activismDuring the last ten years of his life, Pitcairn was highly active in the American anti-vaccination movement. On March 5, 1907, in Harrisburg, Pennsylvania, he delivered an address to the Committee on Public Health and Sanitation of the General Assembly criticizing vaccination.()He later sponsored the National Anti-Vaccination Conference, which, held in Philadelphia on October, 1908, led to the creation of the League of America. When the League was organized later that month, Pitcairn was chosen to be its first president. In May, 1910, an article by Pitcairn entitled The Fallacy of Vaccination was published in the Home Journal, a periodical with a readership of several million. On December 1, 1911, he was appointed by Pennsylvania Governor K. Tener to the State Vaccination Commission,( which in accordance with the law mandating it, was to include as members two anti-vaccinationists as well as two pro-vaccinationists.() Pitcairn subsequently authored a detailed report strongly opposing the Commissions pro-vaccination conclusions.(Later life and deathConstruction of Pitcairns family estate, Cairnwood, was completed in 1895. His wife, Gertrude, died just a few years later, in 1898. Pitcairn never remarried. When asked why, he once responded, I would no sooner remarry than if Gertrude were standing in the other room.(Pitcairn remained quite active in his numerous business, philanthropy, and social activism capacities well into his seventies. Finally, in the fall of 1915, he suffered a bout of pneumonia, from which he never fully recovered. He died at Cairnwood on July 22, 1916.(In 2002, Cairnwood was entered onto the Register of Historic Places.(ReferencesExternal links*Photograph of John Pitcairn, Jr. (at the Gyllenhaal Family Tree Project)*PPG Industries corporate history
19725733
Lake_Buluan
cities  Lake Buluan is a lake located in the island of Mindanao, Philippines.()() With an estimated area of 61.34 square kilometers, it is the third largest lake in Mindanao,(()() after Lanao and Mainit. It has an average elevation of 4.5 meters.(The lake is sandwiched between the provinces of Maguindanao and Kudarat. The lake falls under the political jurisdiction of the municipalities of Buluan of Maguindanao and President Quirino and Lutayan in Kudarat. The lake actually consists of adjoining marshy basins of the Pulangi, Maanoy, Buluan, Alah rivers, which are all tributaries of the River.Species of FishThe following species of fishes are found in the lake:()* Climbing gourami (testudineus)* Snakehead murrel (striata)* Milkfish (chanos)* Walking catfish (batrachus)* Common carp (carpio carpio)* Sundari bele (giuris)* Mozambique tilapia (mossambicus)* Spotte barb or common barb (binotatus)* Snakeskin gourami (pectoralis)Environmental ConcernsMining operations in the nearby provinces of Cotabato and del Sur as well as Kudarat poses a threat to the lake habitat.()()References
19751325
QEMSCAN
QEMSCAN is the name for an integrated Mineralogy solution providing quantitative analysis of minerals, rocks and man-made materials. QEMSCAN is an abbreviation standing for Quantitative Evaluation of Minerals by SCANning electron microscopy and a registered trademark owned by Company since 2009. The integrated system comprises a Scanning Electron Microscope(SEM) with a large specimen chamber, up to four light-element energy dispersive X-ray spectrometers (EDS), and a software suite controlling the automated data acquisition, as well as providing interactive data analysis and report functionality.Mineral and Texture IdentificationQEMSCAN identifies mineral phases using backscattered electron and secondary electron signals, in combination with electron-induced secondary X-ray emission.(Gottlieb, P., Wilkie, G., Sutherland, D., Ho-Tun, E., Suthers, S., Perera, K., Jenkins, B., Spencer, S., Butcher, A., Rayner, J. 2000. Using quantitative electron microscopy for process mineralogy applications. JOM - Journal of the Minerals, Metals and Materials Society, 52, 4, 24-25. doi:10.1007/s11837-000-0126-9) In addition to chemical assays and modal mineral proportions, most QEMSCAN measurement modes provide textural information of the sample. By mapping the sample surface, size, mineral associations, liberation and porosity can be characterised. The generic mineral analysis capabilities of QEMSCAN are: particle-by-particle analysis; automated mineral & phase classification; mineral & phase abundances; deportment; mineral, particle and rock texture; mineral association; mineral liberation; size, shape and density of particles and mineral grains.Sample typesQEMSCAN can identify most rock- and ore-forming minerals. Any sample can be measured as long as it fits into the specimen chamber, is coated with an electrically conductive layer and is stable under vacuum conditions. Common sample types include resin-impregnated and polished blocks of core and cuttings, sections of rock and soil samples. Very small particles such as dust are often measured on carbon tape or filter paper. Coal samples are mounted in wax offering sufficient contrast to allow the measurement of both coal and inorganic phases.Software SuiteFile:Iexplorer particle view example.png|right|thumb|180px|Example of cuttings in QEMSCAN iExplorer ParticleViewQEMSCAN comes with the software package iDiscover consisting of four different modules:# Datastore Explorer - Data management module# iMeasure - Measurement module, SEM and EDS control, image processing and classification tools, mineral database management# iExplorer - Data analysis and reporting module, analyse and view sample mineral abundance, elemental distributions, particle and grain size distributions, mineral associations, liberation and locking, particle densities and shape factors, porosity, filter data sets, group mineral definitions# SIP editor - phase classification moduleMeasurement ModesQEMSCAN comes with 5 customisable measurement modes# BMA Bulk Mineralogical Analysis# PMA Particle Mineralogical Analysis# SMS Specific Mineral Search# TMS Trace Mineral Search# Field Image surface imaging modeApplicationsQEMSCAN measurements can be applied in quantitative mineral characterisation of rocks, weathering products such as regolith and soils, and most man-made materials. As a result it has commercial and scientific applications in mining;(Goodall, W.R., Scales, P.J., Butcher, A.R. 2005. The use of QEMSCAN and diagnostic leaching in the characterisation of visible gold in complex ores. Minerals Engineering, 18, 8, 877-886 doi:org/10.1016/j.mineng.2005.01.018) O&G;(Frhlich, S., Redfern, J., Petitpierre, L., J.D. Marshall, M. Power, Grech, P. 2010. Diagenetic evolution of incised channel sandstones: implications for reservoir characterisation of the Lower Carboniferous Marar Formation, Ghadames Basin, Western Libya. Journal of Petroleum Geology, 33; 3-18. abstract) coal;(Liu, Y., Gupta, R., Sharma, A., Wall, T., Butcher, A., Miller, G., Gottlieb, P., French, D. 2005. Mineral matterorganic matter association characterisation by QEMSCAN and applications in coal utilisation. Fuel, 84, 10, 12591267. doi:10.1016/j.fuel.2004.07.015) sciences;(Haberlah, D., Williams, M.A.J., Halverson, G., Hrstka, T., Butcher, A.R., McTainsh, G.H., Hill, S.M., Glasby, P. 2010. Loess and floods: high-resolution multi-proxy data of Last Glacial Maximum (LGM) slackwater deposition in the Flinders Ranges, semi-arid South Australia. Quaternary Science Reviews, 29, 19-20, 26732693. doi:10.1016/j.quascirev.2010.04.014) forensic geosciences;(Pirrie, D., Power, M.R., Rollinson, G.K., Wiltshire, P.E.J., Newberry, J., Campbell, H.E. 2005. Automated SEM-EDS (QEMSCAN) Mineral Analysis in Forensic Soil Investigations: Testing Instrumental Reproducibility. In:K. Ritz et al. (eds.) Criminal and Environmental Soil Forensics, 84, 10, 411-430, Springer Science doi:org/10.1007/978-1-4020-9204-6_26) archaeology;(Knappett, C., Pirrie, D., Power, M.R., Nikolakopoulou, I., Hilditch, J., Rollinson, G.K. 2005. Mineralogical analysis and provenancing of ancient ceramics using automated SEM-EDS analysis (QEMSCAN): A pilot study on LB I pottery from Akrotiri, Thera. Journal of Archaeological Science, in press doi:10.1016/j.jas.2010.08.022) agribusiness; environment and geology.(Schrader, C.M., Rickman, D., Stoeser, D., Wentworth, S.J., Botha, P.W.S.K., Butcher, A.R., McKay, D., Horsch, H., Benedictus, A., Gottlieb, P. 2008. Analysis of Lunar Highland Regolith Samples from Apollo 16 Drive Core 64001/2 and Lunar Regolith Simulants - An Expanding Comparative Database. NASA Technical Report, MSFC-2144 abstract)History*1970s CSIRO Australia devised a way to automatically use X-ray spectroscopy technology and a Electron Microscope to accurately image and identify minerals in ore samples.(Frost, M. T., OHara, K., Suddaby, P., Grant, G., Reid, A.F.,  Wilson, A.F., Zuiderwyk, M. 1977. A description of two automated control systems for the electron microprobe. X-Ray Spectrometry, 5, 4, 180-187. doi:10.1002/xrs.1300050403) This technology became patented and known as QEM*SEM (Quantitative Evaluation of Minerals by Scanning Electron Microscopy)*1980s New digital hardware and software developments by CSIRO allowed for automated analysis of multiple samples, creation of particle images form which mineralogy, texture and metallurgical parameters can be extracted and quantified.*1990s Light element X-ray detectors are introduced improving the mineral identification. The Kruttschnitt Mineral Research Centre at the of Queensland develop the Liberation Analyzer image analysis software.*2001 CSIRO announces intention to commercialise QEMSCAN.*2003 Intellection Pty Ltd. is founded to develop, market and sell QEMSCAN technology solutions.*2009 Company announces the acquisition of selected assets from Intellection Pty Ltd., including the QEMSCAN technology.*2010, June.  Ammtec completes the first on site analysis, utilising an R series QEMSCAN, at a oil well drilling site in Sumatra, RI.http://www.ammtec.com.au/public_panel/news_article.php?nid39*Sep.1, 2010 press release on new version 5.0 iDiscover software now capable of identifying 72 elements for improved complex mineral composition discrimination.*Nov.15, 2010 press release on new website launch for QEMSCAN and MLA Mineralogy solutions for Resources*Apr. 10, 2011 press release on a QEMSCAN inspired portable automated mineralogy system for use at the oil well drilling sites called ROQSCAN developed by Robertson.*Aug. 9, 2011 http://www.fugro-robertson.com/roqscanForest Oil Corporation utlize Fugro Robertsons ROQSCAN system on a Wolfcamp shale well in West Texas, USA. References External links*Automated Mineralogy Resources - Automated Mineralogy Interest Group discussing journal papers, conference abstracts and presentations on Automated Mineralogy applications*FEI Australia website - Automated Mineralogy solutions website maintained by Company*http://fugro-robertson.com/roqscan - Automated Mineralogy solutions website maintained by Robertson
19770099
Amir_Ali_Sheibany
Amir Ali Sheibany was the founding father of National Iranian Steel Co. (NISCO)(Cordero, Harry George, Iron and steel works of the world,p. 387 (1978) (identifying Sheibany as general managing director of National Iranian Steel Corp)) He was born in Birjand, Iran in 23-11-1922EducationSheibany obtained a Masters Degree in Mining Engineering from University in 1945, a Masters Degree in Civil Engineering from University in 1957,(Water supply in medium size Oklahoma cities (1957) (written by Sheibany)) and a Terminating Engineering Degree from University in 1958.(Harvard Alumni Directory, 1382 (1965) (57-57 MEng))Professional records with the Iranian GovernmentAssociate Professor at Technical Faculty of Tehran University.Consultant at Ministry of Industry and Mines.Founder of the Secretariat of Atomic Energy Commission of Iran.Assistant General Managing Director of National Iranian Steel Corporation.  (1st Cabinet of Mr. Sharif-Emami)Undersecretary of Ministry of Industry and Mines. (Dr. Aminis Cabinet)Undersecretary of Ministry of Economy.  (Mr. A. Alams Cabinet)General Managing Director of National Iranian Steel Corporation.() (Mr. A. Hoveydas Cabinet until 1978)Adjoudan-e Keshvari (Aide-du-Champ Civil de Sa Majeste Imperial le) Shahanshah Areyamehr.DecorationsFirst class medallion of Science of Ministry of EducationGrand Officier du LOrdre Polaire granted by His Majesty the King of SwedenThe Homayoon No.1 Decoration granted by His Imperial Majesty the Shahanshah of IranReferences
19798532
Mokelumne_Wilderness
U.S. Forest ServiceThe Mokelumne Wilderness is a (Official site -Stanislaus NF, Mokulumne History page) federally designated area located  east of California.  It is within the boundaries of three national forests: Stanislaus, Eldorado and Toiyabe. First protected under the Act of 1964, the Mokelumnes (pronounced moo-ka-la-mi) borders were expanded under the Wilderness Act of 1984 with the addition of 55,000(California Wilderness Act of 1984, P.L. 98-425 Sec.101(16)) acres. The wilderness takes its name from the Mokelumne River, which was named after a Mi-wok Indian village located on the  riverbank in Californias Central Valley.(Sierra Nevada Wild webpage on Mokelumne Wilderness  accessed 16 October 2008)The wilderness encompasses an area of the Sierra Nevada mountain range between Pass to Pass. There are two sections separated by the Blue Lakes Road and an Off-Road Vehicle corridor.Elevations range from  to .  The highest point is Round Top (10,364 feet(United States Geological Survey Feature Detail Report.)), a remnant volcano from which the wilderness areas volcanic soils are derived from and is located on the east side of the Sierra crest.Landscape, flora and faunaThe west slopes have been eroded by glaciation and water down to the granite bedrock which has created a dramatic contrast between the volcanic and the granitic landscapes.The wilderness protects habitat for a great variety of plants and animals especially on the slopes of Round Top, which is designated a special interest area.  Plants include Ponderosa pine, canyon live oak as well as alpine vegetation of pine, subalpine fir, and western juniper, with white pine, hemlock, and lodgepole pine found in sheltered areas.Waterways such as the North Fork of the River have riparian zones of white and mountain alder,  creek dogwood, western azalea and bitter cherry.Wildlife include the black bear and deer, as well as martin, bald eagle and the California owl.(Adkinson p.153)Areas of special interestThe Round Top Botanical Area is at the junction of three botanical provinces and includes red fir forest, sagebrush scrub, subalpine and alpine environments. The combination of soil types, varying exposure and elevations produce diverse plant life, such as the phantom orchid (austiniae), a rare plant that gets nutrients from dead material (saprophyte). The plants common name is due to its color being all or mostly white.The Round Top Geologic Area has more than  within the wilderness and encompasses a variety of geological  areas, including exposed granodiorite, lava flows, dikes, glacial moraines and cirques. The landform known as Elephants Back is a rounded mass of solidified lava. Mineralization produced gold-bearing quartz veins, and relics of past gold mining activities are still present in the area.RecreationThe Mokelumne Wilderness has a variety of recreational opportunities all year.  With landscapes ranging from deep canyons to alpine heights and more than two hundred ice-scoured lakes and tarns, fishing and hiking are popular activities as well as cross country skiing. Access is from roads surrounding the wilderness boundary with Carson Pass being the most used entry point.The Crest Trail, the Trail and the Emigrant Summit Trail all cross through the Mokelumne Wilderness. The Emigrant Summit Trail is a designated National Recreation and Historic Trail that follows the western boundary and then passes through the wilderness from Valley to Lake.Wilderness permits are required year-round for overnight visits.(http://www.fs.fed.us/r5/eldorado/recreation/wild/moke/permit/)FootnotesReferencesEldorado National Forest Interpretive Association website.  accessed July 30, 2009Adkinson, Ron Wild Northern California. The Globe Pequot Press, 2001External links* Mokelumne Wilderness page, Stanislaus National Forest website.* Wilderness.net webpage, Mokelumne Wilderness*  Eldorado National Forests page on Mokelumne
19826803
Langbourne_Meade_Williams,_Jr.
Langbourne Meade Williams, Jr. (February 5, 1903 &ndash; September 8, 1994) was an American businessman.  Williams was one of eight children born to Langbourne Meade Williams (September 12, 1872 &ndash; April 2, 1932) and Susanne Catherine Nolting (August 29, 1876 &ndash; January 13, 1951) of Virginia. A descendant of Edmund Randolph, Bartholomew Dandridge and grandson of John Williams of the John L. Williams & Sons banking firm, in September 1930 he married Elizabeth Goodrich Stillman (d. 1956), sister of Chauncey Devereux Stillman, daughter of Charles Chauncey Stillman and granddaughter of James Stillman of the National City Bank, and a niece of Percy A. Rockefeller and Mrs. William G. Rockefeller. He married Frances Pinckney Breckinridge in 1956.He graduated from the Episcopal High School in Alexandria, Va. in 1921, received a bachelors degree at the University of Virginia in 1924, and gained a Harvard University masters degree in business administration in 1926. He worked for the New York investment banking firm of Lee, Higginson & Company for a year before joining the family firm of John L. Williams & Sons. One of the investments of the family firm was with the Freeport-Texas Company for which he and some associates decided to launch a corporate raid with a proxy fight in 1928. The previous management at one point filed a $1 million libel suit against Mr. Williams and his associates for accusations that the managers had put their interests ahead of their shareholders. In 1930, the Williams group prevailed by less than 4,000 shares. At age 27 he return to New York to become vice president, treasurer and a director of the Freeport-Texas company. He became president of  Freeport-Texas with Hay Whitney as chairman three years later. He then served as chairman from 1958 until 1967.In 1941 he became a governor of New York Hospital and served until 1961, when he was named an honorary governor. In 1948 he assisted with the Plan to rebuild Europe and later became a member of the on Foreign Relations. He was also a trustee of the George C. Marshall Research Foundation.Mr. Williams came into conflict with the US Government after Freeport-Texas was caught in 1959 investigating a government official in a suspected attempt to influence the government stockpiling contract which the company had enjoyed since having their nickel declared a cold war strategic commodity. The chairman of a House Government Operations subcommittee, Jack Brooks, denounced Mr. Williams for disgraceful, ethically reprehensible snooping, for hiring a former FBI investigator to look into the private life of a General Services Administration official supervising a nickel plant in Cuba. Claiming the Administration official was hostile Mr Williams claimed we felt it necessary to find out whether there was some special reason for his attitude. Freeports nickel-mining operations in Cuba were seized after Fidel Castro came to power in 1959.
19868026
BallaratSkipton_Rail_Trail
thumb|Nimmons BridgeThe BallaratSkipton Rail Trail in western Victoria, Australia, runs 53 kilometres(My Ballarat : June 2008, Page 16) along the old railway line from western Ballarat, southwest through Haddon, Smythesdale and Pittong to Skipton. The trail was in poor condition for many years before being upgraded and resurfaced in 2008, at a cost of $700,000, funded in roughly equal measure by local, state and federal government.(Ballarat-Skipton Rail Trail - Updates  Bicycle Victoria)(BalBug - Ballarat Skipton Rail Trail) The new surface is compacted granitic sand.( The total length of the trail is 63 km including an 8 km section from Ballarat railway station to the trailhead.One major landmark on the route is the historic Nimmons Bridge at Newtown which the trail passes over. Landmarks(Source: Ballarat Scenic Bike Rides tourist brochure) * 0 km: Trail begins at Ballarat railway station* 4.5 km: Arch of Victory and Avenue of Honour. Trees commemorate Ballarat residents who enlisted in World War I between 1917 and 1919.* 7.6 km: Rail trail proper starts* 10.2 km: Cardigan Station* 17.8 km: Haddon Station* 25 km: Smythesdale Station; Smythesdale was a former gold mining town.* 29.3 km: Scarsdale Station* 33.8 km: New Town Station, Nimmons Bridge* 36.5 km: Ruins of another trestle bridge* 42.3 km: Historic township of Linton* 50 km: Pittong* 62.6 km: Skipton Station* 63 km: Skipton External links *Bikely map*railtrails.org* References 
19885305
Beach_theft
A beach theft, in the sense of theft of beach, is an unauthorized and illegal removal of huge quantities of sand from a beach leading to the full or partial disappearance of the beach.  This article does not deal with the related sense - theft in beach, i.e. incidents of theft occurring in beaches, a more common petty theft.Sand theft and beach theftStealing of sand is a worldwide phenomenon.(Hanson Denies Stealing Sand, Los Angeles Times   dated 28 October 2003 http://articles.latimes.com/2003/oct/28/business/fi-sand28 (Retrieved on 23 October 2008))(Stealing sand from Sahara, Western Sahara Resource Watch http://www.wsrw.org/index.php?art665&cat128&mto0&searchStringaai%FAn&shw3&sm&stm&sy&page1 (Retrieved on 23 October 2000)) (Sand thieves strike again, Voice of Malaysian dated 09 August 2008http://voiceofmalaysian.com/2008/08/09/sand-thieves-strike-again/ (Retrieved on 23 October 2008)) Beach theft, the large-scale removal of sand to the point that entire stretches of a beach disappear, is considerably less common. Two instances of beach thefts have been widely reported in the media: one in Hungary in 2007 and another in Jamaica in 2008. The beach that was stolen in Hungary was an artificially created one on the banks of a river. The other one is a genuine example of a beach theft.Beach theft in Jamaica A beach theft was discovered  in Jamaica in July 2008(Jamaica puzzled by theft of beach,  BBC News dated 18 October 2008http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/world/americas/7678379.stm (Retrieved on 21 October 2008)).The beach at Coral Springs, in Jamaicas northern parish of Trelawny, was 400 metres  of white sand. The bulk of the sand in the 0.5-hectare beach, of approximately 500 truckloads, was found missing in July 2008. The beach was to form part of a resort complex, but the theft of its most important feature has led to its developers putting their plans on hold. Illegal sand mining is a problem in Jamaica; the local tradition of people building their own homes has caused a huge demand for construction material.InvestigationThe disappearance of the beach was considered so important that Jamaicas Prime Minister Golding took a personal interest in the theft and ordered a report into how such a large quantity of sand could have been stolen, transported and presumably sold. Police carried out forensic tests on beaches along the coast to see if any of it matched the stolen sand. A three-month police investigation failed to lead to anyone being charged. There were unconfirmed reports about collusion between the criminals and certain police officers, but Jamaican police denied any such collusion.Beach theft in HungaryAn incident of beach theft occurred in Hungary in 2007 (HOWTO: Steal a Beach (Hungarian Style)  http://www.today.com/external.php?urlhttp://feeds.feedburner.com/~r/Jaunted/~3/206533450/257&reffurlhttp://www.today.com/view/mindszentas-howto-steal-a-beach-hungarian-style/id-1397987/ (Retrieved on 21 October 2008)). In this case, thieves stole hundreds of tonnes of sand from an artificial beach created by a resort alongside the banks of river  Mindszentas.(Jamaican police left stranded after thieves steal a beach,  The Guardian dated 21 October 2008  http://www.guardian.co.uk/world/2008/oct/21/jamaica (Retrieved on 2 October 2008))Hungary is a land-locked country. The river Mindszentas runs through Hungary. Its banks are sunny and warm in the summer. Some enterprising Hungarians shipped in some 6,000 cubic meters of sand, added lounge chairs, playground rides, and beach huts, and made a perfect artificial beach. In Hungary, the winters are frigid. To protect their sandy treasure, in September 2007, the owners covered the rides with tarpaulin and closed the place for the season. When one of the owners drove by, they noticed that the beach was gone. Only dreary muddy banks left behind.Authorities blame the new Schengen Zone which eliminated border controls between EU member state and Europe. This allows people to move freely between countries without a passport.References 
19893291
342_U.S._437
#REDIRECT v. Benguet Mining Co.
19910528
BIfFI
BIfFI is Business Intelligence for FInance. Its a model that could be deployed through Business Intelligence (BI) applications to focus on functions of Finance. Its a model that has been conceptualised by Jagjit Singh, an IT Architect.The common functions of Finance are*Billing*Invoice validations and Payments*Reconciliation and SettlementsThe common functions of Controlling as separate organizational unit within Finance are*Reporting and Performance Management*Planning*Masterdata and Metadata ManagementIn present marketplace, BI products and solutions are more commonly applied to Reporting and Performance Management for Finance. The first three common functions of Finance are usually either left to the Financial and Enterprise Resource Planning (ERP) packages or bespoke developed applications.A few key characteristics of typical enterprise Finance applications are*Finance processing, especially bulk and cyclic billing, payments and reconciliation, involves huge processing tasks*Finance is based on closed-out transactional and meta data*Bulk billing could be mining millions of transactions during every cycle (of billing)*Estimated billing could be based on millions of historic transactions and further millions of external records*The functions around validation of invoices (before clearing out payments) itself could be a huge toll on processing resources*Huge need of processing resources for billing impacts the Business-as-usual*Frequent and serious discrepancies observed between the billed data (from disparate transaction systems) and reported data (consolidated from disparate transaction system onto data store)*Finance applications implemented through Off-the-shelf packages are often heavily customised leading to higher RTB costsAs the requirements and characteristics of key Finance functions are similar to the other applications of Business Intelligence i.e. Reporting, Data Warehouse and Performance Mgmt.The BIfFI model proposes to*Design and deploy Business Intelligence to deliver all Finance functions*A single instance that services all needs from charge calculations, invoice generation, reporting, budgeting and forecasting*BI writes and stores back the transactional data from charge calculations and invoicesThe detailing of BIfFI model is in-progress. External links *Introduction to BIfFI*Blog by Jagjit on Business Intelligence for FInance*Decision Support Systems and Business Intelligence
19934711
Oil_shale_in_China
Oil shale in China is an important source of oil. A total Chinese oil shale resource amounts of 720 billion tonnes, located in  80 deposits of 47 shale basins. This is equal to 48 billion tonnes of oil.( At the same time there are speculations that the actual resource may even exceed the oil shale resource of the United States.(The shale industry was established in China already in 1920s.( After decrease in the production, the industry started to increase and as of 2008; several companies are engage in the shale oil production or the oil shale-based power generation.(  After 2005, China became the largest shale oil producer in the world.( At the end of 2006, the Fushun Shale Oil Plant was the largest oil shale plant in the world, consisting of seven retorting units with total of 140 Fushun-type retort and producing 180,000 tonnes of shale oil per annum.((( In 2005, the China National Oil Shale Association was established in Fushun.(()The main oil shale research institution in China is the University of Petroleum.(ReservesFrom 2004 to 2006 China undertook the national oil shale evaluation. According to the evaluation, it has been estimated that a total Chinese oil shale resource amounts of 720 billion tonnes, located in  80 deposits of 47 oil shale basins. This is equal to 48 billion tonnes of shale oil.()  The proven oil shale reserves comprise about 36 billion tonnes.(The principle Chinese reserves with commercial importance lie in Fushun (Liaoning), Maoming (Guangdong), Huadian and Nongan (Jilin), and Longkou (Shandong).(()  The Fushun oil-shale and coal deposit of Eocene age is located in north-eastern China, south of Fushun,  Liaoning. Coal and oil shale are in a small outlier of Mesozoic and Tertiary sedimentary and rocks underlain by Precambrian granitic gneiss. The thickness of the layer of oil shale varies from  to  with the average of . The lacustrine origin oil shale is presented in the Jijuntun Formation, overlying the Guchengzi Formation consisting coal and underlying of green mudstone of the Xilutian Formation.(The Tertiary age Maoming oil-shale deposit is  long,  wide, and  to  thick. The ore is yellow brown and the bulk density is about 1.85. The oil shale contains 72.1% ash, 10.8% moisture, 1.2% sulfur, with a heating value of 1,745 kcal/kg (basis).  It is not suitable for above-ground retorting, but it could be used for a power generation by a bed combustion.(Professor Alan R. Carroll of of WisconsinMadison estimates that Upper Permian lacustrine oil shale deposits of the Junggar-Turpan-Hami basins in northwest China, absent from previous global oil shale assessments, are comparable to the River Formation.()HistoryThe extraction of oil shale in China began in 1926 under the Japanese rule.(  The commercial-scale production of shale oil began in 1930 in Fushun, Manchuria, with the construction of the Refinery No. 1 operating Fushun-type retorts.()(  After World War II, the shale oil production was ceased, but 100 Fushun-type oil shale retorts and the related shale oil processing units were restored in 1949 after the founding of the Peoples Republic of China.( In 1950, total 266 retorts were in operation, each with the capacity of 100200 tonnes shale oil per day.(In 1954, the Refinery No. 2 began its production and in 1959, the maximum annual shale oil production increased to 780,000 tonnes.(( The produced shale oil was acid and alkaline washed and hydrotreated for producing light liquid fuels.(()  In 1961, China was producing one third of its total oil production from oil shale.( In Maoming, Guangdong Province, a new oil shale retorting plant with 64 retorts was put into operation in 1963.(Since 1965, oil shale usage in Fushun started to decline.(  With the discovery of oilfield in 1960s, the shale oil production declined and  Sinopec, an operator of shale oil production these times, shut down its oil shale operations in the beginning of 1990s.(  At the same time, the Fushun Oil Shale Retorting Plant was established as a part of the Mining Group. It started production in 1992.(  In 2005, China became the largest shale oil producer in the world.( At the same year, China National Oil Shale Association was established in Fushun.((IndustryThe major oil shale industry in China is the Fushun Mining Group. At the same tme several other coal and oil companies expand their activities into oil shale extraction.Fushun Mining GroupFushun Mining Group owns geological reserve for high grade oil shale about 3.6 billion tonnes, of which exploitable reserve is 920 million tonnes, divided between East Open Pit (760 million tonnes) and West Open Pit (160 million tonnes). The oil shale production uses reserves from the West Open Pit, while the East Open Pit oil shale reserves are not mined yet.  Oil shale is produced as a byproduct of the coal mining. In 2006, Fushun Mining Group produced 240,000 tonnes of shale oil, and was expected to produce 300,000 tonnes in 2007.(At the end of 2006, the company operated the largest oil shale plant in the world consisting seven retorting units with 20 retorts in each unit, total of 140 Fushun-type retorts.()()  Annual oil shale processing capacity is designed to be 7 million tonnes of oil shale. In addition, the company plans to construct Alberta Taciuk processor (ATP) to treat small size oil shale (particulate oil shale) which cant be processed in Fushun retort. The company also plans another plant with annual shale oil yields of 400,000 tonnes.( The 250 tonnes per hour ATP processor will be engineered and provided by Canadian company UMATAC Industrial Processes, a subsidiary of Engineering Ltd.( )  After completing these projects, the shale oil production by Fushun Mining Group will be over 700,000 tonnes annually.(The cost of shale oil production in Fushun is US$18.46 per barrel (1,500 yuan per tonne), of which the mining costs 0.184, transportation 4.25, and retorting 13.84.((  Fushun shale oil is sold as fuel oil, while part of the surplus retort gas with low heating value is used in an internal combustion engine for producing steam and power.()  Spent shale and shale ash is used for the cement production; the annual production of cement is 300,000 tonnes and the annual production of bricks is 240 million.(PetroChinaIn 2006, PetroChina, the largest Chinese oil company, set up a department of New Sources of Energy, which is responsible for the oil shale development.() In August 2008, it started to build a shale oil plant in Mudanjiang, Heilongjiang. The plant is designed to process 1.2 million tonnes of oil shale per year and produce 100,000 tonnes of shale oil.()MaomingMaoming oil shale industry was developed from the 1960s to the 1990s by Maoming Petrochemical Company, a subsidiary of Sinopec, which built 64 Fushun-type retorts and 48 gas combustion retorts for producing shale oil. The production peaked with 180,000 tonnes of shale oil per annum. This industry was shut down in the 1990s. The Guandong Province authorities have a plan to use the Maoming oil shale for the power production using fluidized bed combustion.( Longkow Coal Mining CompanyLongkow Coal Mining Company plans to produce oil shale as a coal mining byproduct. The project foresees construction of shale oil plant with capacity of  200,000 tonnes of shale oil per year by using Fushun-type retorts. In addition, the shale char mixed with particulate oil shale would be burnt in fluidized bed combustion for power generation, and the shale ash would be utilized for production of building material.(Jilin Energy & Communication CorporationIn 1996, Jilin Energy & Communication Corporation, a subsidiary of the Power Investment Corporation, put into operation the first oil-shale-fired power plant in China, consisting of three circulating fluidized-bed units with capacity of 12 megawatts (MW). In 2005, the company in cooperation with the Jilin Municipal Government put forward the Huadian oil shale comprehensive utilization project. The project includes construction of the shale oil plant with capacity of  200,000 tonnes of shale oil per year, two circulated fluidized bed combustion units with capacity of 50 MW each and production of 1.2 million tonnes of cement and other building materials utilizing spent shale and shale ash.(()() The shale oil plant will utilize the Petrosix technology.(Royal Dutch ShellDutch Shell has established a joint venture with the Jilin Guangzheng Mineral Development Company Limited to explore and develop oil shale resources in Jilin Province.  61% of shares of the joint venture, Jilin Shell Oil Shale Development Company Limited (Jilin Shell), belongs to Shell China, while 39% is owned by Jilin Guangzheng. The company is planning to use the Shells in-situ conversion process.()()Other industries In Wang Qing (Jilin Province), a private company set up 10 Fushun-type retorts, and produced 15,000 tonnes of shale oil in 2006.(  The Harbin Gas and Chemical Company plans set up a shale oil plant with the capacity of 1,000 tonnes of shale oil per day in Heilongjiang. Similar plant is planned by the Song Ya San Coal Mining Company.( The Mingxin Mining Company is planning to co-produce coal and oil shale in Mingxin, Gansu Province. The planned shale oil plant would have a capacity of 400,000 tonnes of shale oil per year.(  In addition, five private companies produce about 30,000 tonnes of shale oil by utilizing the Fushun-type retorts in Jilin.(Other potential industries could be start in Uromqi (Xinjiang), Yongden (Gansu),  and Chanpo (Hainan).(ResearchThe main oil shale research institution in China is the University of Petroleum. Its Applied Chemistry Department is the main institution dealing with oil shale. The universitys oil shale experts undertake oil shale evaluation, consulting, and reviewing work for pre-feasibility and feasibility studies and development projects for domestic and foreign countries. e.g. Mongolia.(References
19956702
Jastrzebska_Spolka_Weglowa
 Jastrzebska Spolka Wglowa   is a large coal mining company in Poland producing around 12 million tonnes of coal every year. The company has proven recoverable reserves of 503.4 million tonnes of coal. External links*Official site
19978312
Hebron,_Utah
 blank_info  1455698(Hebron is a town located on Shoal Creek in Washington County in southwestern Utah, States. Hebron was inhabited from 1862 until 1902, when the already-declining town was almost completely destroyed by an earthquake. The present-day city of Enterprise,  to the east, was settled largely by people leaving Hebron.HistoryFoundationThis area was explored in 1862 by a group of men led by John and Charles Pulsipher, who were herding livestock owned by Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints.( They drove the cattle from the St. George area as far north as Mountain Meadows, then explored much of the land lying south of the Desert.( They were favorably impressed with the Shoal Creek area and decided it would be a good place to settle with their families. Encouraged by the local Paiutes, the pioneers brought their families and organized a ranching community called Shoal Creek.( The Pulsiphers father, prominent LDS leader Pulsipher, moved here in the fall of 1862 and became the local presiding church officer.(A small fort was built here in 1866,( when the outbreak of the Black Hawk War caused widespread fear of Indian attacks.( The larger community of Clover Valley, located in present-day Nevada, was evacuated and its residents moved to the Shoal Creek fort.( Gardens and fodder grew well, and the settlement began to thrive. It became an important source of supplies for the mining camps of eastern Nevada, particularly Pioche, and later for nearby Reef, Utah. In 1867 a schoolhouse was built.(In 1868, LDS Apostle Snow came to form a congregation. The population was 75. Snow directed the surveying of a formal townsite,(  which John Pulsipher named for the biblical Hebron.( Shoal Creek had been a scattered, loosely-organized settlement,( but Hebron became a fast-growing town. Soon it had a hotel, several stores, freight offices, and in 1872 a telegraph office.(DeclineIn common with other early settlements of Dixie, Hebrons greatest obstacles had to do with water. Originally planned as a ranching community, it lacked sufficient water for the irrigation of substantial farms.( A wooden flume was built to bring water from a nearby spring to water Hebrons farms, but it collapsed due to excessively wet weather in 1885.( One of the former Clover Valley farmers named Orson Huntsman proposed to build a large reservoir on Shoal Creek, but the plan was controversial and received little support from his neighbors. In 1891, Huntsman had a  townsite surveyed below the proposed reservoir site, then filed a land entry on the land, which he called Enterprise. After some three years of seeking investors, he organized a formal company to construct the reservoir in 1893.( Hebrons leaders responded by building a new, longer aqueduct( with additional dams, ditches, and roads. They tried to keep water and residents from flowing from Hebron to Enterprise, but families began to move where the farming prospects were better.(DestructionOn November 17, 1902, Hebron was severely damaged by an earthquake centered at Pine Valley, with an estimated magnitude of 6 and an intensity of VIII.( Most of the rock homes in Hebron were irreparably ruined, and the exodus to Enterprise accelerated. The rest of Hebrons residents moved, selling their rights to the Enterprise Reservoir Company. In 1904, what was left of the town of Hebron sold all remaining water rights.( The departing residents tore down the damaged buildings for the materials, leaving only rubble and a small cemetery.(References refs()()()()()()()(Alder, pp.187&ndash;191.)()External links* Hebron at GhostTowns.com* Hebron at St. George Online
19999686
Irvinebank
Irvinebank is a village in the western foothills of the Tablelands of North Queensland, Australia. Once a thriving town with an economy based on mining, milling and smelting. At the 2006 census, Irvinebank had a population of 311.()In the ten years up to the 1911 census the population had swelled from 619 to 1264, but another 10 years saw it reduced back to only 607 and continued to fall.(http://queenslandplaces.com.au/irvinebank)First known as Gibbs Camp, the town was founded in 1884 by John Moffat, who had purchased the mining leases from the original prospectors. He built a dam, a mill, smelters and other infrastructure that attracted settlers and miners to the area.(http://users.qldnet.com.au/~loudounhouse/irvinebankHeritage.html)External links* University of Queensland: Queensland Places: Irvinebank*Irvinebank School of Arts and Progress Association*Mike OCallaghans History of Irvinebank References 
20009873
Bridal_Veil_Falls_(Telluride)
thumb|right|275px|Bridal Veil Falls world_rank  Bridal Veil Falls is a 365 foot (111 m) waterfall at the end of the canyon overlooking Colorado. Hiking and off-road trails pass by the falls and the power plant at its top.  In winter the frozen shape of the falls forms an imposing challenge to intrepid ice climbers.Bridal Veil Falls is a two pronged waterfall.(Bridal Veil Falls in Telluride, Colorado. AmazingColorado.com. Retrieved on 17 November 2008.) The trail past the falls continues on to mountain meadows and mountain lakes above .The house/power plant atop the falls was restored, operated and lived in (19912010) by Eric Jacobson. The power generated now provides about 25 percent of Tellurides demand for electricity. The plant  was originally used to power the Mine and in winter requires an aerial tramway for access. It is the second-oldest operating AC generator in the United States, the first being the nearby Hydroelectric Generating Plant by Colorado. The Idarado Mining Company now owns and operates the power plant.The falls were opened briefly in the 1990s to ice climbers, but the area is private property so climbing has been legally prohibited since.( Referred to as a mega classic and the most difficult waterfall ice climb in North America some climbers have trespassed to take a crack at the imposing and dangerous climb, but a land purchase proposal and an insurance deal may change the situation.( Climbers were excited by the proposal in 2008 that would reopen the falls to climbers.( Legendary climbers Lowe (climber)  and Mike Wiess were known to have been the first to summit the falls in 1978, the effort having been broadcast on ABCs Wide World of Sports.( )The area around Bridal Veil Falls is subject to avalanche and controlled shelling to create controlled slides is an event popular with spectators and photographers.  Reaching the top of the falls in winter can be a precarious venture, even for the experienced family that call the plant home.( )See also*ColoradoReferences*External links*
20035326
Binubulauan
 easiest_route  noneBinubulauan is a remote stratovolcano, part of the volcanic Cordillera Central mountain range. Binubulauan is in the province of Kalinga, in the Administrative Region, one of the of the Philippines, in the central north of the island of Luzon, in the Philippines.   Current ListingsThe Institute of Volcanology and Seismology (PHIVOLCS) lists Binubulauan (under a variant spelling) as one of the Philippines inactive volcanoes.()  Details given on the PHIVOLCS website( are: *Name Binuluan, Co-ordinates N 1715 E  12108, Province Kalinga-Apayo, Region Cordillera Administrative Region, Elevation 2329 meters ASL.(PHIVOLCS also lists Ambalatungan at almost the same location.(The Smithsonian Institutions Volcanism Program does not list Binubulauan separately but includes Binuluan as a cone subfeature in the listing for Ambalatungan:()*A little-known cluster of volcanoes in the Cordillera Central of northern Luzon is known as Ambalatungan by Alvir (1956)(Alvir A D, 1953. A cluster of little known Philippine volcanoes. Proc 8th Pacific Sci Cong, 1953, 2: 205-206) and the Philippine Commission of Volcanology (1981) and as Mount Binuluan by Wolfe (1982, pers. comm.). The dacitic Ambalatungan Group was described as consisting of three volcanoes constructed along a roughly E-W line. Ambalatungan volcano proper contains a steep-walled crater with hot springs and vigorous sulfur-encrusted fumarolic vents that produce loud noises. Bumabag volcano, 3 km east of Ambalatungan, has two craters that also show strong fumarolic activity. Podakan volcano, 1 km SE of Bumabag, also has a large steam vent. A possible steam eruption was reported from 2329-m-high Mount Binuluan (whose relationship to the previously mentioned volcanoes is unclear) in 1952, during which a sulfur-rich debris flow killed a dozen people.(thumb|heavily sulfur stained Pasil River, upstream from Bu-ot Fumarole Fieldthumb|Bu-ot Fumarole Fieldthumb|Bu-ot Fumarole Field, steep sidedthumb|Bum-bag Fumarole Fields (distance) thumb|Bum-bag Rice Terracesthumb|Bum-bag Fumarole Field #1thumb|Bum-bag Fumarole Field #1 closerthumb|Bum-bag Fumarole Field #2thumb|Bum-bag Fumarole Field #3thumb|Sugo-oc Fumarole Fieldthumb|Sun-ut Sulfur Spring (centre)thumb|Bunog Falls and Hot Springsthumb|Batong Buhay jeepney near start of once a day journey to Tabukthumb|Pasil River Valley from Magmag-am Passthumb|Chico River Valley at Tinglayanthumb|Armed Guides at Bum-bag Fumarole Field #2NameAmbalatunganLocals living in the surrounding barangays in the Pasil River valley in 2007 and 2008 were unfamiliar with the name Ambalatungan. Reasons for the original appellation need further investigation.BinubulauanThe highest peak in the area is Binubulauan, pronounced Bin-oo-boo-LAH-wahn (Lubuaganyen dialect), with oo as in look.Locals regard Binubulauan as THE volcano. There has been some geological surveying related to the Batong Buhay gold mining activities, but the locals say no-one has ever climbed or surveyed Binubulauan because it is too far away, theres no reason to go there, it is too difficult climbing that, and even the geologists didnt bother.Groundwork in 2007 and 2008 as part of a comprehensive systematic survey, shows volcanic related activity to the NW, W, SW, S, SE, E, around Binubulauan, with the peak of Binubulauan in the centre of the half-ring of activity.Groundwork in the drier season in 2009 had to be abandoned due to tribal conflcits on the SW flank (Tinglayan-Tulgao tribal conflict), and unrelated inter-tribal conflicts on the NW and NE flanks (Upper Uma-Lubuagan conflict).Craters and Cluster2007 and 2008 groundwork indicated that the Smithsonians description of craters is unsatisfactory. Ground expeditions and discussions with local elders in a 10 kilometre radius around Binubulauan in 2007 and 2008, did not disclose any craters with volcanic activity. Ground expeditions with GPS geomapping and photography show that the areas described as craters in the Smithsonian listing are not craters in the usual or volcanological sense of the word.It seems the description a cluster of volcanoes in the Smithsonians listing is based on the use of the word crater, which is inappropriate.  It therefore appears that the description cluster of volcanoes is similarly inappropriate here.Because there does not appear to be a cluster of volcanoes, the use of the word group to describe the volcanic forms here also appears inaccurate.Satellite terrain maps indicate Binubulauan could be the prehistorical primary with perhaps some daughter vents associated.  Binubulauan is usually covered in cloud or mist and so photographs from the few vantage points are difficult to obtain.  But when Binubulauan does appear, an argument for daughter cones on the northwestern flank seems tenable. The village of Bangtitan in Upper Uma is a good vantage point for views and photography of Binubulauan on the rare occasions when the primary peak is not mist-enshrouded.EruptionIn 2007 and 2008, ninety and one hundred year old elders in Tinglayan and Tulgao said the loss of life in 1952 was caused by an eruption during a typhoon with the collapse of a natural earth bank below Sugo-oc fumarole field, high on the northern side of the Bunog River valley, with the consequent mudslide burying a few houses below and killing maybe 12 people or thereabouts.Sugo-oc is on the southern flank and is largely inaccessible from the northern and western flanks of Binubulauan. Also Sugo-oc is not mentioned by name or description in the Smithsonians listing. If information about the eruption had been originally obtained from the Pasil River valley people, there could have been some difficulty in explaining to non-Kalingan people the precise location of the fatalities and their cause in a different, unconnected, valley. In 2007 and 2008, people in southern Kalinga around Binubulauan spoke of an eruption at Sugo-oc in 1986 or 1987.  During the Abra earthquake at 20:16 hours on Sunday 13 January 2008, buildings in Tinglayan shook and windows rattled for about 10 seconds. When speaking in English, the locals there at the time called this an eruption. Gentle questioning of locals over months led to the conclusion that there are difficulties in communicating the difference  between an eruption and an earthquake. Further inquiries in southern Kalinga in December 2008 - January 2009 resulted in reports that there was an earthquake in 1986 which was felt throughout Labuagan Municipality and Tinglayan Municipality, and at the same time there was an eruption at Sugo-oc resulting in the ejection of ash and rock from Sugo-oc. Three people in Dananao village were killed by ejected rock during this eruption. Because of the eruption and deaths, there was a large migration out of Dananao village with the Dananao people taking possession of land on the Tubuk to Aurora road in eastern Kalinga and resettling there. Further details will be sought during a field expedition to Dananao and Sugo-oc when current intertribal unrest decreases.Details about the eruption in 1952 are still scant. There may have been an eruption or there may have been a lahar at the Sugo-oc sulfur fumarole field located near the villages of Dananao and Sumadel, with loss of some dwellings and about 12 lives. There was a projectile eruption at the same location in 1986 killing three people.In 2009, the Sugo-oc fumarole field is still active.Fumarole FieldsBu-ot Fumarole FieldThe Bu-ot Fumarole Field (Balatoc dialect) is located on the western valley side above the Pasil River, immediately below the village of Balatoc, on Balatoc tribal land.The linked photos http://commons.wikimedia.org/wiki/Image:Bu-ot80420cgb.jpg show this is a steep area. It is located at approximately 17 degrees 21.078 minutes N, 121 degrees, 05.676 minutes E, at an elevation of about 754 meters above sea level. It is beside the Pasil River on the steep western valley wall, with the path to Balatoc village immediately to the right of the fume hole field.  When the photos were taken on 20 April 2008, there were two active steam vents with yellow water flowing from the vents, as well as from some other locations in the field, down to the Pasil River. The rocks of the Pasil River are heavily stained orange-yellow both upstream http://commons.wikimedia.org/wiki/Image:PasilRiver80420acg.jpg and downstream from the Bu-ot fume hole field.Bu-ot is steep-sided but is not a crater.In 2008, residents of Balatoc did not know of any place called Ambalatungan. However, it is suggested Bu-ot is the area the Smithsonian description calls Ambalatungan. Primary reason for suggesting this is because of the location of the other two fumarole fields in the valley in relation to this field, and the absence of any other fume hole field in the relevant area.Bum-bag Fumarole FieldsBum-bag fumarole fields (Balatoc dialect), (or Djum-ag in Upper Uma dialect), are located approximately 3 kilometres east of Bu-ot, on Batong Buhay tribal land. Pronunciation is closest to boom-bug in English, with boom pronounced like look.Bum-bag is on the eastern side of the Pasil river valley at an elevation of about 1437 metres above sea level.It takes its name from the Bum-bag rice terraces (see pic) which one walks through at an elevation of about 1182 metres, on the way to the fume hole fields.Field 1 http://commons.wikimedia.org/wiki/Image:Bum-bag1stFumaroleFieldacg80420.jpg is located about 100 metres north of field 2, had 11 separate fumarole vents, covered about 2 Ha, and was the most active of Fields 1, 2 and 3, as at April 2008.Field 2 http://commons.wikimedia.org/wiki/Image:Bum-bag2ndFumaroleFieldbcg80420.jpg is located at N 17 degrees 19.590 minutes, E 121 degrees 05.016 minutes, had 16 separatefumarole vents, and covered about 2 Ha, in April 2008Field 3 http://commons.wikimedia.org/wiki/Image:Bum-bag3rdFumaroleField80420acg.jpg is located about 250 metres south of field 2. It was not examined closely in April 2008 because of some disagreement between the 5 guides and the landowner who belongs to a different tribe.Field 4 is said to be located about 1 kilometre SE of field 2. On 20 April 2008, on site, Mr Carlon Baling-gao, co-owner of the fields (with his brother Alfred), said field 4 has the largest surface deposit of sulfur of all the fields and is the most active.  He said the rattling, banging, and explosions, which used to go on underground stopped years ago, but he could not be any more specific as to time, and was not specific about which particular field.There were broad swathes of bare ground between the numbered fields where all vegetation was absent except broken scorched trunks of mature pine tree.  Whether these areas were former fields which blocked up, or areas which had recently been heated to a degree where all vegetation was crisped, or some other factor(s), was not clear in 2008.  There could be a further field over the ridge to the north of field 1. The owner and the guides compellingly warned against investigation there, but would not give any scientifically credible reason.Bum-bag Fumarole Fields 1, 2 and 3, are steep-sided, but none is a crater.Fields 1, 2 and 3 would appear to be consistent with the Smithsonians Bumabag Volcano.Field 4 may be consistent with the Smithsonians Podakan Volcano, though this needs further field investigation.Sugo-oc Fumarole FieldIn October 2007 the Sugo-oc fumarole field was sighted and photographed from the opposite (southern) side of the Bunog River valley, on the Tinglayan Tulgao road. Unfortunately mist, cloud, and intermittent rain precluded any clear photo, and heavy rain on the return journey the next day prevented all photographing.An on-site investigation was planned for the dryer season in April-May 2009, with access through Sumadel rather than Tulgao or Dananao, but had to be abandoned due to an escalation in the border dispute between the Tinglayan tribe and the Tulgao tribe.Hot SpringsNumerous hot springs, both fresh water, and sulfurous water, exist in a wide half ring around the south and western sides of Binubulauan. Bu-ot fume hole field, Bum-bag fume hole fields, and Sugu-oc fume hole field, all have hot sulfurous water springs.Along the Pasil River upstream from Bu-ot, 6 hot sulfurous water springs are said to be located.  One of these is said to be a fume hole. Downstream from Bu-ot on the Sun-ut River below the village of Ag-agama, is the Sun-ut hot sulfur water spring. The local priest in Ag-agama says there used to be a natural bowl on the banks of the Sun-ut River into which the spring flowed and in which the people of Ag-agama bathed daily.  But a typhoon induced flooding of the Sun-ut river washed away the bowl and now the spring flows directly into the river. The spring is located on private property, the owner living in Ag-agama.Along the Bunog River, downstream from Bunog Falls below Tulgao West, are numerous hot sulfurous springs.  The first is in sight of Bunog Falls 100 metres downstream from the Bunog Falls hot fresh water springs. Tulgao and Tinglayan locals say there is a hot salt water spring on the Bunog River which used to be harvested and the water cooked to produce salt, before the Cordillera Highway was first blazed. They also say one of the springs has poison water which kills animals and birds which drink from it. There is no path along the Bunog River, so systematic investigation will be difficult.Further information from locals may disclose other hot water springs in tributaries off the Pasil River upstream from Bu-ot.Unfortunately detailed satellite telemetry is not available.  Available satellite mapping is too low in resolution to show likely fumarole fields in the remote jungles and higher elevation pine forests around Binubulauan.Locals in Tinglayan and Lubuagan do not know of any hot sulfur water springs in the Chico River or its tributaries other than the Bunog River.ClassificationPhivolcs classifies volcanoes http://www.phivolcs.dost.gov.ph/index.php?optioncom_content&taskview&id50&Itemid86 as:Active * Eruption in historic times* Historical record - 500 years* C14 dating - 10,000 years* Local seismic activity* Oral / folkloric history Potentially Active* Solfataras / Fumaroles* Geologically young (possibly erupted 100 in last 20 years at Batong Buhay mines alone), heat destruction of vegetation, poisonous water, fumarole fields with new and shifting activity. Plus there was the explosive eruption at Sugu-oc fumarole field in 1986.Site difficultiesAccess to the site is very difficult.  It is located in Kalinga province, on northern Luzon, in the Philippines.From Manila one can travel to Tabuk by car or coach - a journey of about 10 hours at night or longer by day, or one can travel from Manila to Bontoc by bus or 4 wheel drive, about 10 hours at night. From Tabuk, capital of Kalinga province, one jeepney (see pic) leaves about 7am for Batong Buhay, in the Pasil River Valley (see pic). If there is sufficient demand a second jeepney may leave about 8am. Travelling this way from the north is about 5 hours. 4 wheel drive and high clearance is required for any private vehicle.  There are no signposts and local knowledge is needed. There is no western style accommodation anywhere in the Pasil River Valley. Alight at Ag-agama drop-off to see the Sun-ut hot sulfur water spring http://commons.wikimedia.org/wiki/Image:Sun-utSulfurSpring81017acg.jpg. Alight at Balatoc drop-off to walk to Balatoc seeing the Bu-ot fume hole field on the way, and the orange-yellow stained rocks of the Pasil River. At Balatoc you might be able to arrange a local guide to take you to Bum-bag fume holes. Most of the walk is on tribal lands or private property. Walk from Balatoc to Bum-bag is only for the fit and takes about 5 hours one way. There is no accommodation at Bum-bag fume holes although there are some very basic huts at the Bum-bag rice terraces. Bum-bag fume holes are located on private property and permission is required from the owner.  This might take up to a week to obtain because of the complete absence of modern communication in the area.   From Bontoc, capital of Province, a bus leaves for Tabuk at about 9am, and jeepneys also leave in the morning. Travelling this way from the south, after about 4 hours exit the bus at Tinglayan, in the Chico River Valley (see pic). A reliable local guide from Tinglayan (where reasonable accommodation is available) can take you to either Tulgao or Sumadel by foot - about 3 hours hike.  Most of the year there is rain or mist along these paths and appropriate warm waterproof clothing is necessary. Along the Bunog River from Tulgao to Tinglayan are a number of hot clean water springs http://commons.wikimedia.org/wiki/Image:BunogFallsHotSpring71020acg.jpg, hot sulfurous water springs, and some poison water springs. In Tulgao or Sumadel you need to negotiate to find a local guide willing to take you to the Sugo-oc fumarole field.  The trek from the village to the fumarole field is steep, difficult, at higher elevation, along carabao (buffalo) tracks.  Tourists do not visit Sugo-oc and special arrangements need to be made. There is no western style accommodation in the villages of Tulgao or Sumadel, and no accommodation at all at Sugo-oc. There is a little used foot track from Sumadel to the plateau on the southern flank of Binubulauan but requires some months of planning and negotiation and a high level of fitness.It is not known if Binubulauan itself has ever been climbed.The terrain is rugged and undeveloped.  Most usual transport is by foot, with jeepneys along the few roads.Kalinga is a tribal area and is often subjected to inter-tribal conflict which can quickly escalate to armed warfare with many deaths.  Most tribes have peace pacts with other tribes, but some tribes refuse to enter into the peace pact system.  Tribal law (customary law) is recognised by the Republic Government and takes precedence over republic law. A person who trespasses, damages property, hurts another person, or kills another person, is likely to be dealt with under tribal law, which can allow revenge killings under some circumstances.  Foreigners and lowlanders are not covered by the peace pact process and need to be extremely careful if entering any of the lands around Binubulauan.  Local guides/guards are needed at all times (see pic). The Armed Forces of the Philippines (AFP) are not covered by the peace pact process, and if any soldier kills a Kalinga person, whether deliberately or accidentally, the family of the killed is obliged to make a revenge killing of the soldiers involved. When this happens, the army then usually escalates the problem, by itself undertaking reprisal killings - anti-subversive operations, against the citizens of the area in which the soldiers were executed.  Foreigners need to keep away from these activities as the soldiers often shoot and kill first and ask questions later.In second half 2008 elements from the AFP told the locals that all of Binubulauan, plus many other areas, are prohibited areas, which civilians may not enter and where the army will shoot anyone on sight.See also*volcanos in the Philippines*volcanos in the Philippines*active volcanos in the Philippines*volcanos in the Philippines*VolcanoReferencesExternal links*Philippine Institute of Volcanology and Seismology (Phivolcs), List of Inactive Volcanoes*Phivolcs classification of volcanoesde:Ambalatunganeo:Ambalatungan
20051111
Resistance:_The_Gathering_Storm
Resistance: The Gathering Storm is a 2009 science fiction novel based on the Resistance video game series and acts as a midquel to Fall of Man and 2. It was written by C. Dietz. The novel details several months after the events in Fall of Man and takes place during the Chimeras early invasion of the States of America, and follows Nathan Hales experience months following the events that unfolded in Iceland, which detailed Hales original mission with the SRPA shortly after his departure from Britain.Synopsis SettingThe Gathering Storm takes place four months after the events in Fall of Man, beginning from November to December, 1951. The alien parasitic race known as the Chimera, having conquered most of Europe and Asia, had already begun to invade North America and threateningly encroaching into the United States. Much of northern America have already fallen to the Chimera in which the US armed forces had been forced to pull back into defending lands untouched by the Chimera near the still-in construction of the Liberty Defense Perimeter. Under the leadership of Noah Grace, who has been increasingly totalitarian and displaying megalomania, the current administration instituted increasingly tighter control of the United States which had become very unpopular to the American public. As a result several resistance groups, the most prominent being Freedom First, violently opposed both the Chimera and the Grace administration.CharactersThe protagonist of The Gathering Storm is Nathan Hale, following months after his extraction in Britain and having been recruited into the Sentinel Program with the rank of Second Lieutenant. Dr. Cassandra Cassie Aklin, the protagonist in Resistance 2 s alternate reality game Project Abraham and still working as an Army-employed psychologist supporting SRPA, currently assigned to a team of psychologists treating the Sentinels and Hales love interest (which had been hinted at during the Project Abraham website videos). Major Richard Blake and the Chimeran entity Daedalus from Resistance 2 are introduced alongside Noah Grace, the President of the United States, and his Vice President Harvey McCullen who were mentioned in the backstory of the Resistance universe. Susan Farley, who was mentioned in Project Abraham, is Nathan Hales foster sister and only surviving relative. PlotThe novel primarily focus on a presidential conspiracy through the actions of President Noah Grace, who realized the inevitable that his nation will fall to the Chimera, announced to his Cabinet of implementing a compromise known as Project Omega which calls for a negotiation between the United States and the Chimera - through the former human being Jordan Shepherd, known as Daedalus. Grace reasoned his decision as a necessary option in having the United States to be spared in the Chimeran War at the expense of the world (as Grace planned to withdraw Americas forces from other theaters of conflict). Furthermore, Grace, privately, intended the negotiations to save himself, and only himself. This decision is met with disgust and outrage from Graces of War Henry Walker, who recognized this as treason and secretly records Graces plans. After Project Omega was overall accepted by Graces cabinet, Walker fled with his wife to the resistance group Freedom First in Chimera-occupied Chicago in order to expose Project Omega; however, while en-route to the city the Walkers are captured by the Chimera and taken to a mining pit in Wisconsin alongside with the other human prisoners that is being used as a conversion center. Henry Walkers absence became aware by Grace who ordered a manhunt on Walker either dead or alive. In which the search for Walker was led by Chief of Staff William Dentweiler, who is also in charged of Daedaluss capture.Meanwhile, Nathan Hale returned to his adopted home in South Dakota, now under Gray Territory, to learn the fate of his foster family. Unfortunately, he soon discovered that his entire family were killed during the invasion saved for his foster sister, Susan Farley, who had escaped the slaughter. Following his fore-naught search, Hale and his unit Echo Team were ordered by Dentweiler to find Walker on the basis that the former Secretary of War is betraying his species to the Chimera. Following a lead in Chicago after contacting Freedom First, they only to learn that Walker hadnt came to Freedom First. Still unaware of Walkers capture by the Chimera, SRPA sent Hale to infiltrate a Freedom First training camp in Montana to learn of Walkers whereabouts but only to be outed when reunited with Susan, who had joined Freedom First. Hale is released on good relations for previously fighting alongside Freedom First in Chicago, and came out empty handed on Walker. Susan also refuses to come with Hale as she had decided to remain with Freedom First due to her disillusionment with the Grace administration and its increasingly totalitarian nature.By December, William Dentweiler successfully captured Daedalus after luring him to rescue his wife Hannah, who was apprehended against her will, from torture by government agents, and then being brought to a military base near Wyoming while threatened under electrocution to prevent his escape and establish his cooperation. The news of Daedaluss capture enlightened President Grace to carry out a Victory Tour in the American heartland from the nations temporarily capital in Denver (after D.C. was struck by a Spire attack). At this moment, Susan and another Freedom First rebel plot to take advantage of the Victory Tour to assassinate the president. As Grace prepares a speech in front of Denvers Capitol, Susan prepares to kill Grace by sniper fire but only to be spotted by Hale, who was assigned as leader of a Sentinel security detachment for the president, foil the assassination and leading to Susans immediate arrest.In Wisconsin, Henry Walker - who had lost his wife - and the other prisoners made an escape attempt through building escape tunnels. Only a few prisoners made out of the pit, among them Harley Burl, who was befriended by Walker, was able to escape to American territory and informed SRPA of Walkers location. A Sentinel strike force is deployed to the mining pit. Hale joins the strike force alongside with Burl and William Dentweiler, who the latter had insisted to come along to ensure Walkers death. After rescuing the prisoners, Burl learned from them that Walker had been taken and converted. He then informs to Hale about what he learned from Walker about Project Omega and the recordings he possessed. Hale detained Dentweiler and ordered his Sentinels to search for Walker; however, they are set upon by more Chimeran forces in which during the battle Dentweiler escaped and had fled inside the conversion center. Hale and several Sentinels enters the center and find the Chief of Staff having been cocooned and nearly converted into a Chimera. Dentweiler is then euthanize and Walkers recordings are salvaged.After learning the full disclosure of Project Omega through Walkers recording, Hale traveled to Sheridan where Grace had arrived to negotiate the terms with Daedalus. Hale, as head of the SRPA Sentinel detachment of the presidents security team, easily accesses the chamber Grace is interrogating Shepherd in and, instead of killing Daedalus when he has the chance, he shoots Grace in the head with his rifle, killing him. Daedalus then immediately take advantage of Graces death and breaks free of his confinement by sending out a mental blast and paralyzed every human being within the vicinity, as he escaped to an awaiting Chimeran battlecruiser. Shortly thereafter, Daedalus is blamed on Graces death and the entire events of Omega is covered up to the general population. Hales superior Major Richard Blake plans on notifying Vice President Harvey McCullen of his sudden succession.Plot DevelopmentThe book expands details on key characters; most notably Nathan Hale (and others being Noah Grace and Jordan Shepherd, and the people they are). Other storylines are expanded upon as well, and some unanswered questions are revealed. Revelations include;* Hale is one of the original Sentinels.* Hale is famous throughout SRPA, despite his attempts to keep a low profile, not only due to him being the only survivor of the American force sent to Britain, but because of what happened to him and what he did to liberate the country in Fall of Man.* Aklin and Hales relationship during Project Abraham (hinted at during the website videos) was strictly and clinically professional, but there was underlying tension between them. When they meet up in the general public, eventually Hale and Aklin become (secret) lovers* Aklin holds tremendous guilt over what Hale endured, and is still enduring, as a result of Project Abraham, where she was responsible for him involved in the first place.* Richard Blake is revealed to be a Sentinel.* Blake is a member of the SRPA leadership; and so, while other officers are technically senior, he is generally the head of military operations.* Fyodor Malikov is one of the three co-founders of SRPA, and was the head of Project Abraham.* Operation Overstrike was mentioned: it confirms its official purpose was to destroy the hub tower in Paris, which doing so disrupted Chimera throughout Western Europe, but un-officially was to implement the virus to kill the Carriers and shut down the Conversion Centers, which succeeded as seen in Retribution.* Cartwrights name is mentioned as being Stephen Cartwright rather than Steven Cartwright.* SRPAs designation is officially given as Special Research Projects Administration.* Jordan Shepherd is welcomed into the Chimera due to the shared belief that Shepherd is in control of, and can even manipulate, the Chimeran virus. He has the ability to sent his consciousness to any Chimera type or unit on Earth; while remaining linked to his body. Furthermore, he still possesses his human memories, primarily those of people who have significance to him (specifically his wife and Hale).* Jordan did not murder his wife; Hannah, as was implied in the comic book series. Instead, Jordan (because he did have blood on his hands later on) only murdered his neighbor Mr. Hetterwood, after mistaken him for being too close to his wife.* Hannah, like every other family member of soldiers drafted into the SRPA, was informed her husband was dead. She was informed of the truth, initially in a limited capacity - she discovered the true scope of it when she met Jordan as Daedalus. She accepted it, however, having never lost her feelings for him.* The Chimera are still using Angels - but in an increasingly diminished capacity.* The Chimera species is explored - they describe their species as being part of a great whole; in which lesser units serve the larger ones. They also refer to themselves as Chimera (as well as the names given to them by humans e.g. Hybrids, Titans, Steelheads etc.) The Chimera, also, have a strong thirst for human blood.* The Chimera hub tower in Holar, Iceland; next to SRPA Station Igloo, is described as being the Chimeras headquarters on Earth.SequelResistance: A Hole in the Sky is an indirect sequel to Resistance: The Gathering Storm and is currently being written by William C. Dietz. He has announced that the book will be out on July 26th, 2011.
20073946
Rio_Grande_Scenic_Railroad
website   The Rio Grande Scenic Railroad of Colorado, a railway, began operations in 2006, operating both steam and diesel locomotives in the Luis Valley.  Located  south of Colorado, the Rio Grande Scenic Railroad operates out of Alamosa, Monte Vista and La Veta. The original La Veta line of the and Rio Grande Western Railroad was completed on June 22, 1878; with standard gauge track over Veta Pass. Historically called the Scenic Line of the World, the trains connections between Alamosa and La Veta with views of the de Cristo Mountains and several of Colorados  peaks. History The predecessor of the Rio Grande Scenic Railroad is credited for opening the San Luis Valley to the rest of the world by laying tracks across its borders.  The town of Alamosa was literally built in one day with buildings transported by the and Rio Grande Western Railroad in 1878.  By 1890, and during the following half-century, Alamosa was the hub for  narrow gauge railroading in America.  The railroad departs from the original depot in the heart of downtown Alamosa, where freight trains once delivered ore, lumber, sheep, cattle and farming products, and shipped out agricultural and mining products.  Trains from Denver, Durango, Creede, Salida and Fe, New Mexico  arrived and departed daily with passengers.Locomotives and passenger serviceThe Rio Grande Scenic Railroad collection includes vintage locomotives, including the addition of the LS&I-18, built by the Locomotive Company at its Pittsburgh works in 1910.  This locomotive previously operated on the Grand Canyon Railroad and the Mount Hood Railroad.  The LS&I joins the SP-1744, a fully restored 2-6-0 Mogul that began service in 1901 for the Pacific Railroad.Inventory* Five remodeled dome cars for railroad sightseeing, with a glass roof on top of the car where passengers can ride and see in all directions around the train;* 1930s-era open-air cars with bench-style seating for passengers and the option of opening windows;* 1950s-era restored Pullman Coaches with new windows, heating, air conditioning, and concessions; and* Parlor Car restored for first-class style with floor-to-ceiling observation window.Special eventsA few events include Mothers Day Brunch in the dome cars, Rails & Ales Brewfest, Jazz on the Tracks mountain concerts; fall foliage and pumpkin patch rides; and the North Pole Express.See also*List of Colorado historic railroadsReferences External links *Rio Grande Scenic Railroad Home Page
20094505
Domestic_policy_of_Evo_Morales
File:Bolivia evo-morales goverment Joel Alvarez.jpg|thumb|Morales addressing the Bolivian congress in 2008The domestic policy of Morales refers to the domestic policy initiatives of the current President of Bolivia, including past pre-presidential advocacies by Morales.PoliticsMorales articulated the driving force behind MAS in the following terms:He also stated: the ideological principles of the organization, anti-imperialist and contrary to neoliberalism, are clear and firm but its members have yet to turn them into a programmatic reality.()Morales has argued for the establishment of a constituent assembly to transform the country. He also proposed the creation of a new hydrocarbon law to guarantee at least 50% of revenue to Bolivia, although MAS has also shown interest in complete nationalization of the gas and oil industries.  Morales has taken a middle ground: supporting the nationalization of natural gas companies, but supporting foreign cooperation in the industry.Morales has referred to the U.S.-driven Trade Area of the Americas as an agreement to legalize the colonization of the Americas and has supported the stated desire of Venezuelan President Chvez to form an of Good between Bolivia, Cuba, and Venezuela, in contrast to the of Evil comprising the United States and its allies.()In March 2006, President Evo Morales announced in Santa Cruz an increase in the wage by 50%. As it is currently set at 440 bolivianos(45 euros) per month, it would then increase to 660 bolivianos (67 euros) per month. Morales had earlier stated that it should be increased by 100%.() However, 6 out of 10 workers are part of the economy, thus limiting the impact of this increase.( )Fulfilling a campaign promise, Morales opened on August 6, 2006 an assembly to begin writing a new constitution aimed at giving more power to the indigenous majority.()Education reformIndigenous languages in schoolsMorales supports a movement to teach indigenous languages such as Aymara, Quechua, and Guaran which are spoken mainly in the rural areas of Bolivia. His government estimates that only 37% of the population speaks a native language that predates the introduction of Spanish in the 16th century. Moraless Education Ministry has declared the drive to increase this percentage as part of a broad effort to decolonize the mindset and the Bolivian state.() The program is seen as emblematic of his governments indigenous-based social agenda.( In 2006 Moraless Minister of Education and Culture, Patzi, announced that he would be requiring all government employees to take indigenous language training. The Morales governments proposal to require all state schools to teach the languages has angered many urban Bolivians who see it as a move to replace Spanish. This is denied by the Morales government who point out that over half of Bolivians claim indigenous heritage and that it should not be shameful to speak an indigenous language outside of the home or local community. Patzi brought further controversy to the movement by calling Bolivians who cant speak an indigenous language an embarrassment and by issuing a letter stating that no school would be recognized unless they guaranteed indigenous language instruction in the 2007 academic year.(Reform of religious classes in state schoolsIn June 2005, Minister Felix Patzi brought organizational opposition against the Morales governments ideas when he declared that Catholicism would no longer be the official religion taught at schools.() After mass protests led by the Catholic hierarchy this proposal was shelved by Morales.AftermathMorales, initially supportive of Patzi and his policies, faced with the opposition of the Catholic hierarchy dropped the proposal to change the religion classes in state schools. Morales also relaxed the language requirement, no longer requiring it to be obligatory in 2007.( In late January 2007, Morales replaced several members of his cabinet, including Patzi whose suggestions had got Morales in hot water with the Roman Catholic Church.() The Bolivian media reported that this cabinet shuffle reduced the number of ministers of indigenous descent, and incorporated more middle-class politicians from the radical left to his cabinet.()Economy Nationalization of natural gas industry In 2005, following popular protests and president Gonzalo Snchez Goni de Lozadas resignation, Congress passed an energy law that added a 32% tax on production to an already-existing 18% royalty. It also required that companies renegotiate their contracts with the state.As of May 1, 2006, President Morales signed a decree stating that all gas reserves were to be nationalized: the state recovers ownership, possession and total and absolute control of hydrocarbons (Bolivia has the second largest resources of natural gas in South America  1.38 trillion cubic meters  after Venezuela). He thus put to some effect his electoral promises made during the various Gas Wars, declaring that We are not a government of mere promises: We follow through on what we propose and what the people demand.The announcement was timed to coincide with Workers Day on May 1. Ordering the military and engineers of YPFB, the state firm, to occupy and secure energy installations, he gave foreign companies a six-month transition period to re-negotiate contracts, or face expulsion. Nevertheless, Morales stated that the nationalization would not take the form of expropriations or confiscations. Vice President Garca said in Pazs main plaza that the governments energy-related revenue will jump to $780 million in 2007, expanding nearly sixfold from 2002.()Among the 53 installations affected by the measure are those of Brazils Petrobras, one of the largest foreign investors in Bolivia, which controls 14% of the countrys gas reserves.() Brazils Energy Minister, Rondeau, reacted by condemning the move as unfriendly and contrary to previous understandings between his country and Bolivia.( )US Mobil Corporation, Petrobras, Spains YPF, UK gas and oil producer Group Plc, and Frances Total are the main gas companies present in the country. According to Reuters, Bolivias actions echo what Venezuelan President Chvez, possibly Morales biggest ally, did in the worlds fifth-largest oil exporter with forced contract migrations and retroactive tax hikes  conditions that major oil companies largely agreed to accept. YPFB will pay foreign companies for their services, offering about 50% of the value of production, although the decree indicated that companies exploiting the countrys two largest gas fields would get just 18%.Nationalization of smelterOn February 8, 2007, Morales announced that a metal processing plant outside of the city of Oruro owned by the Swiss mining company International AG would be nationalized. The plant processes tin, lead, and silver. Morales said that there had been a lack of transparency in its financial dealings and that corporations that abide by Bolivian law had nothing to fear. He said Companies that respect Bolivian laws, that do not steal money from the Bolivian people, will be respected. But if the companies do not respect the laws, I have no other alternative than to recover those companies. Vinto was privatized by the Banzer government in 2000, when it was sold to London-based Allied Deals.  However, Allied Deals promptly went bankrupt and was unable to meet its commitments, forcing the government to liquidate the asset.  The liquidating entity Grant Thornton sold Vinto to Compaa Minera Colquiri, owned by Compaa Minera del Sur (51%) and Great Britains Commonwealth Development Corporation (49%), in June 2002. Glencore purchased the plant from Comsur-CDC in 2004.( )CocaBackgroundLicit and illicit usesCoca is the raw material for cocaine but is prized by many Bolivians (especially among those of Amero-Indian descent) for its traditional uses in medicines and herbal teas. Long before coca was used to make cocaine, the indigenous people of the Andean region, the Aymara and Quechua, chewed coca leaves as a dietary supplement, a means to ease pangs of hunger and thirst and an antidote for altitude sickness.() Many Amero-Indians continue to view the plant as sacred. In modern Bolivia, coca leaves may be legally consumed and are most often prepared in teas like de coca. The legal sale and consumption of coca leaves are part of daily life for some groups of Bolivian peasants, especially those in mining and other fields of heavy labor. Noted celebrities who have consumed coca tea include the late John Paul II and The Princess Royal. While a limited market exists for coca leaves, since the early 1990s the United States has put pressure on the Bolivian government to reduce the amount of coca leaves produced for refinement by the international drug trade.Plan DignidadIn 1995 at the height of coca production, one out of every eight Bolivians made a living from coca.( The country was the worlds third largest grower of coca after Peru and Colombia.( In 1997, 458 square kilometres of land were being used to produce coca leaves, with only 120 km of that being grown for the licit market.() In August 1997, with strong support of the US government, Bolivian President Banzer developed Plan Dignidad (The Dignity Plan) to counter the scourge of drugs. The plan focused on eradication, interdiction (through lab destruction), efforts to counter money laundering, and implementation of social programs that countered and prevented drug addiction. The plans heavy emphasis on plant eradication and noticeable lack of focus on trafficking organizations was noted by its critics at the time. The US Embassy in Bolivia defended the aggressive focus on crops, maintaining that Bolivia was devoid of significant trafficking organizations and  claiming that the bulk of illegally exported coca went through small mom-and-pop operations. This claim continues to be rejected by scholars of Bolivian society who say Bolivia is very vulnerable to the influence of international trafficking organizations and that it is very likely that the participation of Bolivian entrepreneurs in the illegal business has increased. During the initial years of the operation area of coca production dropped. While in 1997 it had been 458 km, by 1998 it was down to 380 km; in 1999 it fell to 218 km, and in 2000 it reached its lowest point at 146 km.( Since the 1990s, the US has been funding the Bolivian governments eradication program by an average of $150 million a year.()Opposition to eradication, rise of MoralesCritics of the aggressive focus on farmers and the programs lack of effort against traffickers argued against the claims that Bolivias traffickers were only mom-and-pop organizations. They pointed out the increase in prices offered to Peruvian coca farmers during 1998 as proof that international trafficking organizations were going to Peru to make up for the Bolivian shortfall caused by the program. They also pointed to the 1999 indictment for drug trafficking of Marino Diodato who was married to the niece of President Banzer, and was an Italian believed to have Mafia and Camorra ties. By 2001 coca planting in Bolivia moved outside of the traditional growing areas of Chapare and Yungas and the area in production began to climb ever since.(Along with an increase in world wide coca production, the program contributed to a decline in the real standard of living of Chapare peasants leading to protests and violent social unrest (where both demonstrators and police were slain). The Bolivian governments use of the military in coca-growing regions during the unrest brought criticism from NGOs such as Rights Watch.() Promises of alternative development for farmers stagnated because of worsening external economic conditions. These conditions caused social mobilization among coca farmers like Evo Morales who called for an end to forced eradication and other measures enacted with the intent of countering narcotics. From 2000 forward, the Bolivian government made several agreements with coca grower federations to end confrontations, but they failed to follow through on their promises causing further opposition to these governments. Morales rose to national attention by leading the political opposition to eradication and this position is a central reason for his election to the Bolivian Congress. His association with anti-eradication forces caused his expulsion from Congress in 2002 which led to his Presidential campaign with its surprising showing that same year.(Morales coalition prevailsPressures from the Morales-led coalition caused president Snchez de Lozada to stop forced eradication. To address some of his opponents concerns in 2003 he initially proposed allowing families to cultivate small plots of coca but in the face of strong pressure from the US Embassy he withdrew the idea.( Snchez de Lozada resigned the presidency due to the Gas War. When his successor Mesa was unable to stem the increasing conflict over distribution of wealth from fossil fuel production he also resigned. Moraless support from coca farmers was seen as a large reason for his victory to the open presidential office in the 2005 election.()On his way to vote during the 2005 election Morales carried a coca plant. After it was declared that he was the front runner in the election he called for a referendum on how the plant should be controlled. Countering US fears that he would ignore coca cultivation expressly done for narcotic purposes Morales said, There wont be the free cultivation of the coca leaf. He also called on America to enter into an agreement with Boliva to truly fight drug trafficking. He repeated his position calling for zero cocaine production and zero drug trafficking, but not zero coca growing or zero cocaleros growers. He announced his government would study whether the amount of coca allowed for legal traditional consumption should be increased. At the time coca growing was legal on 29,000 acres (120 km) of the Yungas valley with lesser area in the Chapare region.()Morales PresidencyIn early 2006, soon after taking office, Morales traveled to the tropical region of Chapare and met with a crowd of 20,000 consisting mainly cocaleros. A garland of coca leaves was placed around his neck and more leaves placed upon a straw hat he donned to shield him from the sun. He told the crowd, The fight for coca symbolizes our fight for freedom. Coca growers will continue to grow coca. There will never be zero coca.(There is much disagreement between Moraless administration and the United States regarding anti-drug laws and cooperation between the countries, but officials from both countries have expressed a common desire to work against trafficking, with Sean McCormack from the U.S. State Department reinforcing the support of Bolivian anti-drug policy, and Morales repeatingly calling for zero cocaine production and zero drug trafficking.()Processing plantIn February 2007, Venezuela loaned Bolivia $250,000 to build two coca processing plants in Chapare and Las Yungas to turn coca into tea and trimate (a mixture of aniseed, chamomile and coca). The plants are set to be up and running in September or October 2007 and the products will likely be sold in Venezuela.( Retrieved on February 8, 2007.)Constitutional AssemblyOne of Moraless electoral promises was to establish a Assembly to re-write the Bolivian constitution.  This was also one of the central demands of the Bolivian social and indigenous movements who supported Moraless candidature for the presidency.(Bolivia Information Forum Bulletin No 2 Towards the Constituent Assembly)  A Assembly was established and elections for assembly members were held in July 2006.(Bolivia Information Forum Bulletin No 3 The Constituent Assembly results)  The Assembly then sat in Sucre, in the Gran Mariscal and was given 12 months to write a new Bolivian constitution.  The process of drafting the constitution was initially stalled by debates over voting procedures (whether a simple majority or two-third majority should be required to make decisions)(Bolivian Information Forum Bulletin No 4 Constituent Assembly Disputes) and then by the introduction of an arcane debate about which should be Bolivias capital city, Sucre or Paz.(Bolivia Information Forum Bulletin No 8  Capitala: An Unexpected Divisive Issue within the Assembly)  The draft Constitution was finally approved in December 2007, in a session which took place in Oruro.  Although most of the members of the opposition party, PODEMOS, absented themselves from the session, the assembly was able to pass the draft constitution with the two-thirds majority required.(Bolivia Information Forum News Bolivias Controversial Constitution, John Crabtree)Constitutional referendumIn mid-October 2008, a deal was reached to press ahead with a referendum on a new constitution after Morales acceded to demands not to run for more than one more term. The agreement was reached after Morales led a march of more than 100,000 of his supporters on the congress. He told the cheering crowd in Paz: Four political parties agreed to make the ratification of the constitution possible, the referendum to approve the constitutional draft will take place on January 25.(http://english.aljazeera.net/news/americas/2008/10/20081021152750851709.html) It was decided that the referendum would take place on 25 January 2009.()ReferencesExternal links*The Bolivian Revolution and Cubas Conduct by Fidel Castro, April 12, 2009
